Authors
Berge Garabedian
Number of Reviews
412

Title
Review for Dead Man on Campus (1998)
For more movie reviews and screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
PLOT:
Upon the realization that they are failing all of their classes, two
roommates try to find a third roomie who will kill himself, since the
school's charter automatically grants top grades to the roommates of any
student who succeeds in suicide.
CRITIQUE:
Despite this film's interesting premise and dark subject matter, this movie
sucks because it is unfunny, boring, and presents us with one of Tom Everett
Scott's worst acting performances. Add that to a completely unsuccessful
romance element, many lame and corny jokes, a long wait for the setup, and
an ending that takes all the blackness out of this "black comedy" (If you're
gonna create a black comedy, don't chicken out in the end-see VERY BAD
THINGS (8/10) for a perfect example), and you've got yourself a trite MTV
creation worthy of its own subject matter. I barely laughed at any gags,
found the bong element contrived and repetitive, and was horrified NOT to
find any gratuitous nudity tossed anywhere in this movie (If you're gonna
make a bad College comedy, at least slap in some free T&A shots for the kids
:). This one's not even worth the rental, fellas. Skip it altogether!
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
During auditions for THAT THING YOU DO!, Tom Everett Scott's first feature
film role, director Tom Hanks was opposed to hiring Tom because of the fact
that Scott could've passed for Hanks 15 years ago. It wasn't until Hanks'
wife Rita Wilson saw the audition tape, and decided he was cute, that Hanks
decided to risk hiring Scott.
The actor who played Scott Cooper in this film, Mark-Paul Gosselaar, is best
known for having played the character of Zack Morris on TV's "Saved by the
Bell". His parents are Dutch and named Hans and Paula.
And who would've guessed that this is director Alan Cohn's first shot at
directing a feature film?

Title
Review for 10 Things I Hate About You (1999)
For more reviews and movie trivia, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Hmmm...okay, let's take a classic tale from William Shakespeare, since he's
"hot" right now: "The Taming of the Shrew" (Note: When said real fast, the
title of this film may actually sound like it too!). Toss it the kids' way
by involving a couple of good-looking leads, some hipper than thou music, a
high school setting, and one of the worst movie titles of the year, and
you've got the tale of girl who nobody desired, and who in turn, desired no
one. Better all-around movie than SHE'S ALL THAT (6.5/10) and NEVER BEEN
KISSED (6/10).
PLOT:
Two diametrically opposed sisters, the younger being cute and outgoing, the
older reserved and independent, live under the rule of their strict father
who will not let the young one go out on a date until the older one gets a
date herself, which she is adamantly against. But halt, alas, here is a
mighty prince being paid a hefty compensation to attempt to date the
"unapproachable" girl by a weasel who wants to "nail" the younger one. And
what about the sweet kid who really does love the younger sibling? Find out!
CRITIQUE:
Light, safe, enjoyable little tale of the teenage world, boasts a couple of
charming and utterly convincing performances from its two stars, quite a few
chuckle-as-you-go-along jokes, and a surprisingly believable component of
depth within a few well-developed movie characters. Okay, so it's not
perfect, I mean it still has a couple of the one-dimensional players that we
find in all teenage flicks, along with the proverbially boring ritual of one
guy introducing another to the various cliques in a high school (Wow, what a
concept!), but overall, it plays well because of its non-stop pace, the
interesting relationship between the sisters, and most of all, the enjoyable
and engaging performances by stars-to-be Heath Ledger and Julia Stiles.
Little sister, Larisa Oleynik, also played her cutesy role to a tee, even
managing to add some credibility to her first-thought-of-as-one-dimensional
role. There were also plenty of romantic scenes in this movie, which are
sure to set any girl's eyes a-flutter (Mrs. JoBlo almost fluttered her way
out of her seat during the touching serenade in the soccer field scene).
Having said that, I think that I could have done without another "prom
scene" or some of the out-of-place eighties tunes playing during a party of
sixteen year olds (Do any of them even know who the Thompson Twins are??),
but all in all, this film managed to hook me into its net of romance, fluff,
comedy and teenage shenanigans. Mix that in with an utterly entertaining
presentation by the way of the overly cautious father, Larry Miller, and the
funniest teacher to hit the big screen in a long while, Daryl "Chill"
Mitchell, and you've got yourself a pleasant time at the movie garage, or a
decent nite of home video. Either way, don't forget the nachos and your
better half.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:  (Some facts gathered from
the IMDb)
Several names reflect the Shakespearean origin of this movie. Bianca's and
Katerina's last name is Stratford (Shakespeare was born in
Stratford-upon-Avon). Patrick's last name is Verona (birthplace of
Petruchio, the corresponding character from the play). The high school is
called Padua, which is the city in which the play is set. Groovy, eh?
Actress Julia Stiles was born in New York City on March 28, 1981.
Actor Heath Ledger was born in Perth, Australia on the 4th of April, 1979.
He starred in a film called BLACK ROCK, which was nominated for Best
Australian picture in 1997.
This is director Gil Junger's first feature film. He has directed many TV
shows before, including "Dharma & Greg", "Living Single" and "Ellen".  He
was nominated for an Emmy for directing the infamous episode of "Ellen" in
which she revealed herself to be Lebanese...I mean, a lesbian! :)
The man who played the funny teacher, Daryl "Chill" Mitchell was part of a
Hip-Hop group from the 80's known as Groove B. Chill. He played the
character of "Chill" in both HOUSE PARTY movies.
Larisa Oleynik considers actress Claire Danes and Winona Ryder as her role
models. She and Joseph Gordon-Levitt are both on TV's "3rd Rock from the
Sun".

Title
Review for Valentine (2001)
For more reviews and movie wallpapers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
PLOT:
A young lad who used to get crapped on by the girls in his junior high
class, is now older and stronger and apparently out to whack each and every
one of them heartbreakers. Or is it someone else just pretending to be the
nerdy ol' kid and slicing and dicing said victims up? Pretty cool premise,
huh? Read on.
CRITIQUE:
Can a movie that starts off with a big-breasted girl in a tight tanktop
performing an autopsy be all that bad? Sadly...yes! And I generally love
watching these kinds of movies, you know, frivolous flicks with cheap
thrills and girls with big cans...but this movie just plain sucks. It's got
zero rhythm, almost no energy, no chemistry between anyone in the cast (were
they all there for the paycheck or what?), no scares (other than your
garden-variety "boo!" stuff), stale dialogue, unoriginal killings and worst
of all...and this hurts the most, boys and girls...no T&A! At least give us
a little T&A, man! Or at least some T!! (and I don't mean Tease, which is
one of the few things that this film does deliver well) Anyway, what else
can I tell you here? Oh yeah, the premise is good, I mean, I think we've all
thought of doing this at one point or another in our lifetimes, but the
execution, aaaaaah, the execution...just awful. Where is the suspense? Where
is the caring for any of the characters? (all of whom chime in on one
dimension) Where is the goddamn intelligence, people?! I mean, I know that
this is a slasher movie and you're supposed to suspend disbelief to a
certain extent, but man-o-man, allow me to share this one scene with you
all. There is a murderer on the loose, right? Everyone is scared witless,
right? Nobody knows who it is or where they'll strike next, right? So what's
the first thing that you would do during a party packed with a bunch of
people? Hmmmmm...now think hard...really? Would you, A) Stay close to others
B) Dance the night away...with others C) Go off to a dark room by yourself
and hang out in a hot tub? Hehehehe. Tough one, eh?
But there were many other problems with this movie as well. The "first
scene" kill, which has now become a custom in all teen slashers, sucked the
big one, and didn't offer anything original. The ending of the movie, which
I won't spoil here, was a little bit of a surprise, but left a million
questions unanswered. That Dorothy girl (Jessica Capshaw) only seemed to act
with her lips and teeth (does that count?), and that bothered me. Actually,
quite a few things bothered me, and when I end up noticing little things
like that in a movie, it can generally only mean one thing. Yeah, who woulda
figured that this movie would be, and I hate to say it... ...boring! It just
lacked. Lacked...lacked...lacked a lot! Sure, we get Denise Richards in a
bathing suit, acting like the ultra-queen-bitch like only she can do, but is
that enough for you to fork over your hard earned buckeroonies? Well, to
some, it might be, but even if you toss in the Katherine Heigl major
cleavage factor, the super "hotties" for the ladies and the ever-perky
Heather Graham look-a-like, the whole thing just doesn't add up to much.
Another wasted opportunity. The film had the potential to become something
interesting but somewhere along the line, it was crapped away entirely.
Marley Shelton and David Boreanaz were good, but they both seemed to belong
in another movie altogether. But are there still some really, really cheap
thrills to be had? Yeah, I guess...but nothing to write to mother about.
I only wish that the fervent intensity that went into successfully marketing
this film on the Internet had been shared with the actual making of the
movie. It might've turned into an entertaining, smart and original thriller,
but all that we're left with now, are pieces of a film that might've been...
Keep it moving, folks...nothing to see here. Oh yeah, and the soundtrack
also sucked!
Where's JoBlo coming from?
Urban Legend (5/10) - Urban Legends (4/10) - I Know What You Did Last Summer
(7.5/10) - Wild Things (7/10) - The Bride of Chucky (7.5/10) - Scream (8/10)

Title
Review for Toy Story 2 (1999)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Listen, I am going to admit right up front that I am not a big fan of
animation films, and wasn't a particularly over-enthused admirer of the
first part of this Pixar duo of film, but gosh darned if I wasn't bowled
over like the rest of those over and under grown kids in the theatre tonite!
PLOT:
Woody the cowboy is stolen from Andy his owner, and it is up to Buzz
Lightyear and the rest of those nutty toy friends of his to save his wooden
ass. During his abduction, Woody meets a few of his older friends from his
days as a TV star and is suddenly faced with the tough decision of remaining
with them and preserving his legacy forever, or returning to his rightful
owner, who is bound to get rid of him any year now.
CRITIQUE:
A rollickin' great lil' fun adventure for newborns, children, kids,
teenagers, young adults, parents, grandpas and grandmas alike. It doesn't
take much for one to enjoy themselves with this movie. It's got fantastic
effects, a fun story, likeable characters, an upbeat soundtrack, a decent
runtime and toys, toys and more toys. And what an adventure they get into
here. Indiana Jones could take lessons from some of these cartoon munchkins.
>From its opening scene, which is one of the cooler action animated sequences
that I have ever seen on film, to the last twenty minutes of the movie which
just rattle from one humdingin' close call after another. This film has got
everything that its original had and more, including one really cute new toy
named Jessie. Va-va-voom! What an adorably cute doll! They even toss in a
decent "touching" scene for effect. Pretty cool. Now folks, please don't get
me wrong here.
This film is not a revolution of the medium of film. I mean, honestly
speaking, the animation isn't a thousand times better than the original or
anything, but does remain quite spectacular on the big screen. But if you
happen to be reading this review a few years after the film's original
release, you may just scoff at my enthusiasm since the leaps and bounds
which continue to be made in this burgeoning industry seem to leave much of
their own ancestry flying in the wind. Buuuuut, at this point in time, I can
honestly say that this film was a positively enjoyable treat. In fact, the
first film seems more like a "set-up" for this one, a sketchpad used to
clarify the actual creation of this complete animated "movie". In fact, most
of this film takes place on the "outside" of the room in which the human
being characters have become eerily lifelike. I can't wait until they start
creating computer-generated pictures starring human characters in
extraordinary situations...wow, things are really gonna be nuts! All in all,
kudos to everyone associated with this exciting new-age cartoon adventure
sure to satisfy all lighthearted people looking for a good time.
Of course, the biggest handshake should be reserved for the genius who
actually thought to come up with an idea for a cartoon film based on the
actual merchandise of the film (i.e. the toys)!! Wow, now what kind of
merchandising exposure do you think we could get with this one, boss?!?
Yikes, laughing all the way to the toy bank, eh fellas?
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Various references to other films pepper this flick with at least three
blatant homages including the one right off the top playing the theme to
2001: A SPACE ODYSSEY. There is also a pretty cool photocopied shot of the
dinosaur running after a jeep, as seen through the side-view mirror, a la
JURASSIC PARK and one of the funniest moments of the film for me, which was
a beautiful tip of the hat to the STAR WARS trilogy, involved Buzz' final
confrontation with Zurg. I won't say any more.
A couple of new celebrity voices have joined the fray in this film including
the always adorable Joan Cusack as the ever adorable Jessie and Kelsey
Grammer as Stinky Pete the Prospector. And let's not forget Newman! That's
Wayne Knight as the voice of Al McWhiggin, the evil antique toy collector.
Brrrrrr.
Director John Lasseter was also the man behind Pixar's first original
computer generated film called LUXO JR. in 1986. That film involved a
smaller, younger lamp bouncing around after a ball, while the older lamp
looked after it. That short "lamp" film was obviously very special to the
people at Pixar, since they've made it part of their visual logo before each
of their films. In 1996, Lasseter received a Special Achievement Award at
the Academy Awards, for the development and inspired application of
techniques that have made possible the first feature-length
computer-animated film. He also directed TOY STORY and A BUG'S LIFE.

Title
Review for Adventures of Rocky & Bullwinkle, The (2000)
For more reviews and movie wallpapers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
I suppose that the seamless blend of animated cartoon characters and real
live actors on the big screen was a pretty big deal back in 1988, when WHO
FRAMED ROGER RABBIT captured the nation's attention. But nowadays, with the
incredible innovations in computer generated imagery, DVD and the
mind-blowing effects in films like THE MATRIX and THE PHANTOM MENACE, it
takes a little more to get us excited, right? Allrighty-then...how's about
producing yet another remake of an old, cheezy cartoon television series,
but this time, mix in some live-action folks and see how that plays. Sound
like a good idea?
PLOT:
After having been cancelled from television back in the 1960s, TV cartoon
characters Rocky and Bullwinkle are left to dwindle their lives away in
their animated world of Frostbite Falls, until their nefarious counterparts,
Boris, Natasha and Fearless Leader escape, and take a live-action leap into
today's real world. It isn't long before the cartoon two-some are summoned
by a rookie FBI agent in the hopes of squishing Fearless Leader's maniacal
plot to become the president of the United States.
CRITIQUE:
A very cartoony film with a quick pace, may be suited for fans of the old
series, but falls flat within today's comedic standards set by the Simpsons,
with many unfunny goofy puns, easy jokes and childish pranks. Strangely
enough, many of the jokes in this film are geared towards adults with many
play-on-words and literal interpretations, but at the same time, the film is
more than obviously meant for children, with a silly plot, over-the-top bad
guys and oh-so simple humor ("Allow me to be frank with you" - "Oh hullo
Frank, I'm Bullwinkle"). Yeesh! Yet another COPS parody also didn't twirl my
nipples, and neither did half a million Bullwinkle misinterpretations, which
I suppose were meant to be funny, but just left me feeling kind of,
well...bored. I'll admit that I was never much of a fan of the original TV
series on which this film is based (if I was flipping the channels and it
was on, I generally tuned it for a bit, but that was about it), but I reckon
that most kids who will go see this movie, would not have seen it either, so
let's just hope that they "get it". Personally, I wasn't taken by either of
the two leads, be it Rocky or Bullwinkle, and I especially didn't care for
the dim-witted aspect of the Moose. Oh, I get it...he's stupid, so that's
funny!
To be fair, I did hear quite a few people laughing in my audience, but even
then, most of them were adults. I suppose that if you're in "the mood" and
appreciate the "Bullwinkle humor", then you might enjoy this film, which to
its credit, doesn't take itself seriously for a moment, and sure doesn't
pretend to be about anything either. It's a cartoon movie with some
live-action stars intermixed. In the end, the film will either work for you
or not depending on your connection to the humor. The film's first 20
minutes are probably its most ambitious, with an excellent explanation of
how the badly drawn duo from the 60s got to be the better-looking 3D
animation characters in the year 2000. There is also a pretty cool sequence
featuring Bullwinkle literally "surfing the Internet" near the end, but
other than that, the effects did little to impress me. The film is also
filled with plenty of cameos (see below), most of which feature actors whose
best work is long behind them, and also stars a cute Britney Spears wannabee
FBI agent, who I've never heard of before, but from whom I wouldn't mind
hearing again! Robert DeNiro must've taken a little less than a week to film
his scenes, because he's barely in the film, while Alexander and Russo both
perform admirably as the notorious No-Goodniks from Pottsylvania, Boris and
Natasha. But in the end, without much to impress me visually, without much
humor to make me laugh, and without much of a story (granted, the film is a
cartoon, you don't really expect much there), the film didn't do much for
me.
But who knows, others may just enjoy it on their own level as an empty,
frivolous, campy (funny to some), children's cartoon. And for anyone who
wants to tell me to "lighten up", I'd be more than happy to accept your
directive. I'll be the one watching yet another hilarious episode of TV's
"The Simpsons". Now, there's some real humor!
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
This film does manage to spoof a couple of other famous movies, including a
flying scene straight out of SUPERMAN, and the infamous "you talkin' to me"
scene from TAXI DRIVER, interpreted once again, by the man who helped make
those words immortal in the first place, Robert DeNiro.
Several star cameos line this film including Janeane Garofalo, Carl Reiner,
Jonathan Winters (playing three different parts), Whoopie Goldberg, Billy
Crystal, David Alan Grier and John Goodman.
Look for DeNiro's own daughter in this film, Drena DeNiro, in a small part
as a RBTV lackey. She is actually his daughter through adoption. She is
Diahnne Abbott's real daughter from a previous marriage. DeNiro adopted her
when he was married to Abbott from 1976-1988.
Director Des McAnuff was originally a stage director, and the man
responsible for bringing The Who's "Tommy" to Broadway. His first foray into
film directing came in 1998 when he directed COUSIN BETTE starring Jessica
Lange. He also produced last year's critically acclaimed animated feature
THE IRON GIANT.
Rumor has it that "Simpsons" creator Matt Groening inserted the infamous "J"
in Homer J. Simpson's name as an homage to Rocky & Bullwinkle, whose full
names are Rocky J. Squirrel and Bullwinkle J. Moose. Their middle "J" comes
from creator Jay Ward's own name.
So what has the Britney Spears-like actress (aka Piper Perabo) of this film
done besides this, you may ask? Well, actually not much, although she is one
of the stars in that all-girl sexy, momma-jomma film coming out in August,
COYOTE UGLY, so stay tuned!
Executive producer Tiffany Ward is Jay Ward's daughter. Jay Ward is the
creator of the series upon which this film is based, as well as the man
behind the characters in GEORGE OF THE JUNGLE and DUDLEY DO-RIGHT.
June Foray, the original voice behind Rocky, is back as the voice of the
flying squirrel in this film. Australian comedian-mimic Keith Scott voices
both Bullwinkle and the film's omnipresent, wry narrator.
Screenwriter Kenneth Lonergan also co-wrote the DeNiro comedy ANALYZE THIS.

Title
Review for Practical Magic (1998)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
PLOT:
Two sister witches have to live with a curse placed upon their family, which
prevents them from ever enjoying a full life with a lover. The hex invokes
the eventual demise of their loved one. When one of their past loves comes
back to haunt them, they have to figure a way out of their eternal dilemma.
CRITIQUE:
I've been waiting for a good witch movie for a while now, but hold on to
your brooms and incantations, cause this puppy is far from being it! For a
film that has the word "magic" in its title, this movie contains very few
moments of magic...or humor for that matter, drama, suspense, or romance.
Well actually, there is some manufactured romance within a plot that is so
muddled, it never lets you in on whether it's a comedy, a drama, a horror
show, or a murder mystery. Or maybe it's a romance, eh? It doesn't really
matter, cause the characters in the film are so boring and uninteresting,
that you have absolutely no basis on which to care for them, or the film as
a whole. If only the filmmakers had spent as much time on the plot as they
did the sinfully obvious soundtrack, this film might've had a chance to be
more than what it is now. Which is an unentertaining, crappy film that uses
the witch angle as a diversionary tactic to weave us away from its grab-bag
of stupid voice-overs, overdone songs, melodramatic romance, undeveloped
story and uneven acting. I only wish that I could make that one hour and
forty-five minutes of my life re-appear, but alas, it is lost in the
spiritual world of "interesting ideas gone wildly awry".
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
This film is based on the novel written by Alice Hoffman.
Co-screenwriter Akiva Goldsman also wrote the screenplay for 1997's BATMAN &
ROBIN.
Director Griffin Dunne is known mainly as an actor in such films as AN
AMERICAN WEREWOLF IN LONDON and AFTER HOURS.

Title
Review for Boiler Room (2000)
For more reviews and movie trailers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
In 1987, Charlie Sheen's character in WALL STREET asked his mentor Gordon
Gekko "how much was enough?". Gekko responded: "It's not a question of
enough, pal. It's a zero sum game, somebody wins, somebody loses. Money
itself isn't lost or made, it's simply transferred from one perception to
another." A great film for the 80s, but with day-trading, dot-com mania and
a bullish market running rampant today, the question that now plagues the
gang in this similarly themed flick is "how far would you go?". And what I
want to know is...does greed still work?
PLOT:
A young man caught between an overbearing father and his lust for the big
money, gets a plush gig at an off-Wall Street brokerage house, and quickly
becomes one of their top men on the phones. Unfortunately for the young lad,
he soon discovers that the firm itself isn't as kosher as he was originally
told.
CRITIQUE:
Just call it GLENGARRY GLENROSS JR. or the SON OF WALL STREET since this
film is nothing more than a modern-day remake of these two great films with
some hipper-than-thou dialogue tossed around for kicks, an over-the-top rap
soundtrack and several strong performances from its young cast of male
hotshots. Giovanni Ribisi is one who has also been known as a solid actor in
my neck of the woods, but hopefully this starring gig will get him the
widespread recognition that he deserves. Ben Affleck pulls an "Alec Baldwin
in Glengarry" cameo as the tough-as-nails supervisor who comes in every now
and again and busts everybody's balls with a solid delivery and fun style.
It's pretty obvious from his demeanor that he just loved playing this role!
And boy, did he have some doozy lines to deliver. Vin Diesel is another
standout as the man on the inside who kind of takes Ribis under his wing
when he first joins the mini-Billionaire Boys Club. In fact, I would say
that it was probably the combination of the great cast, tasty dialogue and
interesting professional milieu that made this film so much more
entertaining for me. Mind you, I have a background and degree in business,
so there may be some bias on my part here : )
Now if you're looking for an original story, well this film just ain't for
you. This tale follows the standard premise of any film which has the
sympathetic innocent character from the outside being pulled into a (what
seems like) once in a lifetime opportunity, only to find out that it's
actually not as great an opportunity as once led to believe. This film tries
to add some feelers with a back-story about Ribisi's cold hearted dad
affecting his behavior, which only slightly worked for me, and the fruition
of a romance between Ribi and a secretary, which should just have been left
on the cutting room floor, but all in all, I was entertained throughout this
film and thoroughly enjoyed the open references to the former films
mentioned above. One thing I still don't understand is how studios keep
trying to satisfy the most common denominator in films like this by adding a
token romance for the obvious female target crowd, when in reality all that
they are doing is taking the focus away from an interesting story set inside
a highly toxic male testosterone environment. Stick to the story at hand
folks, and they will come! Anyway, I still don't think that this film will
particularly appeal to the female demographic since the focus of the film is
basically on a bunch of spoiled, loud, brash, erect male penises out to make
a million, but then again, does that really sound inviting to anyone? Well,
I certainly enjoyed it plenty and it sure does give you a little more
insight into the mighty worlds of cold-callers and stock dealers. So if you
like all that sales lingo, don't mind the basic storyline, love the actors
and enjoy well-written dialogue, then by all means, put this film on your
list of to do's over the next weekend or so.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Actors Vin Diesel and Giovanni Ribisi co-starred alongside one another in
Spielberg's 1998 war drama SAVING PRIVATE RYAN (8/10). Diesel was also the
voice of the "iron giant" in 1999's THE IRON GIANT (5/10), and has written
and directed two films of his own, MULTI-FACIAL and STRAYS, which were
screened at the 1995 Cannes Film Festival and 1997 Sundance Film Festival
respectively.
Giovanni Ribisi's birth name is Antonio Giovanni Ribisi. He is a member of
the Church of Scientology.
Ben Affleck's middle name is Geza. He reportedly received only $7,000 to
star in Kevin Smith's CHASING AMY, but went on to pocket $600,000 for his
role in ARMAGEDDON (8/10).
Scott Caan is the son of actor James Caan. He is also a screenwriter in his
own right, having recently sold the rights to his script CHASING THE PARTY:
HOW HUGH HEFNER SAVED MY LIFE to mega-producer Jerry Bruckheimer. The film
is apparently slated for production in early 2000, with Caan attached to
star.
Despite DAZED AND CONFUSED being Nicky Katt's breakthrough role, it is to be
noted that he also played a schoolchild in 1984's GREMLINS.
Writer/director Ben Younger makes his feature film directorial debut with
this film. He is a 27-year old Brooklynite who attended the City University
of New York studying in political science, and put himself through school by
working as a stand-up comic. After becoming the youngest campaign manager in
NY City, he switched from politics to filmmaking, and came up with the idea
for this script when he was recruited as a boiler room trainee himself.
What is a "boiler room"? It's a brokerage firm that houses a bunch of
hard-working, smart-mouthed kids off the streets who pressure their
cold-call customers any which way they can into buying stock in unknown or
bogus companies for huge commissions. Once the price of the stock is driven
high enough, insiders sell, making fortunes for themselves and often wiping
out the savings of innocent investors. They are seductive, secretive firms
where only those trained and recruited to be loyal are allowed inside.
Recently, the North American Securities Administrators Association made
prosecuting boiler rooms a top priority.

Title
Review for Night Shift (1982)
For more reviews and trivia, go to http://surf.to/joblo
Director Ron Howard's first pairing with producer Brian Grazer,
features plenty of early appearances by the big stars of today,
alongside a starring role for his buddy Fonzie from the popular TV
sitcom "Happy Days", Henry Winkler. This film was actor Michael
Keaton's cinematic debut.
PLOT:
A shy, timid man works in a morgue during the night shift, and can't
seem to ever stand up for himself. An extraverted "idea man" joins his
crazy hours, and tries to turn him into a real man. The two men join
forces with a pimp-less hooker, and set up shop in their working area.
All together, they attempt to make the business and the lives of the
prostitutes thrive. Love, wisecracks and an '80s soundtrack ensues. 
CRITIQUE:
Dated comedy offers very little in the chuckle department, with even
less in narrative obstruction, but remains interesting only for the
early work of now-famed director Ron Howard, the dynamic screenwriting
duo team of Babaloo Mandel and Lowell Ganz, Batman himself Michael
Keaton, and a lesser known Shelly Long, from TV's "Cheers" fame. This
film might've been humorous in the early 80's, but nowadays, it plays
like a retardedly slow comedic mishap. The one-liners are so-so, the
obstacles in the story are non-existent, and the "love story"
contrived. All in all, this film is a dud, save it for the nostalgia
factor.
The casting is one of the only redeemable qualities of the film, with
Henry Winkler actually pulling off a character that is in no way
related to his Fonzie alter-ego, or the third banana characters that
he's been playing in the 90's (The retro trend sure revived this guy's
flaccid acting career.) He plays his role very well, as does Keaton,
who used this role to staple his acting career as the fast-talking,
wise-cracking hipster. Long is decent as the prostitute, but I couldn't
help but think about the unattractiveness of the rest of the
streetwalkers. I mean, was it an 80's thing, or are most prostitutes
douchebags to begin with? All in all, this film offers a few decent
one-liners, a humdrum plotline, some decent nostalgic acting
performances by its stars, and a few early cameos by some of the bigger
names of showbiz today (see little known facts below.) 
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Actor Kevin Costner plays Frat Boy#1 in this film. He is visible only
for a few seconds, but if you play your video on slo-mo, you will make
him out quite clearly during the frat party scene in the morgue. He is
the first guy egging Michael Keaton on in his balancing act.
Actress Shannon Doherty also makes an extremely early appearance in her
career, as the 7-year old girl-scout who shouts "Mugger!" and blows her
whistle, after she catches Henry Winkler going through Shelley Long's
purse in the elevator.
Director Ron Howard also makes a cameo in this film as the annoying
saxophone player. Of course, he is best known for playing the part of
Richie Cunningham in the popular TV sitcom "Happy Days".
This film was also the first pairing of the comedy screenwriters
extraordinaire, Babaloo Mandel and Lowell Ganz, who went on to scribe
such hits as SPLASH (7/10), PARENTHOOD (8/10), CITY SLICKERS (7.5/10)
and many more.
Ron Howard's actor brother, Clint Howard, makes the first of his many
appearances in his brother's movies. 

Title
Review for Why Do Fools Fall In Love (1998)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
PLOT:
One-time 50's teen phenom crooner Frankie Lymon has his life immortalized
via the recollections of three women who all claim to be his wives and the
rightful heirs to his estate.
CRITIQUE:
Interesting, highly stylized movie featuring a groovy soundtrack packed with
many of the funnest hits from the 50's, with some decent performances from
its four stars (despite some obvious prosthetics for their "older" looks)
and an overall authentic feel of the era. Afterwards, I will say that I was
somewhat disappointed to find out that some of the events taking place near
the end of the film were slightly dramatized for effect ("made up" for us
lay people, see Little Known Facts below), but still enjoyed its quick pace,
sometimes heavy-handed but generally creative directing style, and great
rockin' tunes. This film should definitely be seen by all those who are
interested in the music of that era, and/or anyone excited about any of the
film's main stars. Laurenz Tate specifically gives an exceptionally
well-rounded performance as the ill-fated Frankie Lymon.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Word on the street is that the wives never really bonded in real life as
shown in the film.

Title
Review for Memento (2000)
For more reviews and movie trailers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Even though this review contains ** NO SPOILERS **, I would highly suggest
that any of you interested in seeing this film, try not to read much about
it, because the less you know, the more likely you are to enjoy the entire
process. Trust me.
PLOT:
I am seriously not going to say much about this film's plot other than to
point out that it's about a guy who has a rare disorder which deletes his
short-term memory and that he's essentially trying to find the person who
raped and murdered his wife. Now strap on the mental cap, do not turn away
from the screen for more than a second, and enjoy the groovy ride.
CRITIQUE:
Every now and again, a film comes out and reminds us how cool movie watching
can be. How a film can just take a hold of your mind, massage it a little
here, toss you a little clue there, show you something here, and allow you
the opportunity to take part in a real-life mystery of the mind. Wow, this
movie blew me away! I mean, I'm still thinking about it as I type this, and
I dig that kind of thing! The puzzle of the story, the development of the
characters, the unsure nature of the entire premise soaked in lotsa style,
innovative filmmaking techniques and superb acting (Guy Pearce deserves a
lot of recognition for this one). But before you read the next sentence, you
must also appreciate the fact that this film is not for everyone. It is a
film designed for people who love to think at the movies. Now don't me
wrong, I love popcorn cheese-fests as much as the next guy (see my ode to
such in my review of ARMAGEDDON, natch!), but I also love all types of other
films too, and boy, is this ever another type of film! The basic premise of
this movie is an interesting one to begin with. Here's a guy who cannot
access his short term memory and he's looking for a murderer. Now you'd
think that a "regular" murder investigation would be difficult enough as it
is, but without any short-term memory? How does he do it? How does he know
how things are evolving, who to trust, who's lying, who's talking behind his
back and if he's getting any closer...if he can't remember something he did
fifteen minutes ago!?!
Anyway, needless to say, this quandary is one that is delved into completely
in this movie, and within that, the entire structure of the film is
remarkable. The deconstruction of the story, the actual participation of the
audience as we, essentially, learn things along with the protagonist, the
suspense, the humor (yes, there are actually a few very funny moments in
this movie as well) and the denouement, which boggles the mind as it
unfolds, and continues to boggle as you walk out of the theatre. This is the
kind of movie that'll have you talking about it all the way down the stairs,
into your specific mode of transportation, out of your transport, into your
house and onto the phone for even more bla-blas. The Arrow and I dissected
this puppy for at least an hour after the movie, and continued to learn new
things as we conversed. A triumph. A genuinely original film which makes you
want to see it over and over and over again.
I don't think I've ever seen a film which gives the viewer a greater
understanding of what it's like to be in the skin of the film's lead
character. This movie really does make you feel like you are learning things
along with the main man, and as his past begins to clear up, so do the
events leading up to the film's eventual ending. Now does all that sound
like an interesting idea to you? Are you grooving on that concept or does
the whole thing just leave you shrugging your shoulders? Well, if you're not
in the mood to think or ingest loads of information, as you struggle to hold
onto the information which was passed along to you right before that, I
suggest you not take part in the viewing of this film, cause you will most
likely not appreciate it. But for those people, those few proud men and
women, those who love to watch movies and talk movies and shit movies, I
tell you, there probably isn't going to be many better films than this one
this year, so buy that ticket, shut out all those external circumstances and
people (in other words, don't see it in a busy theater or with someone who
wants to talk crap while you watch) and get ready to allow your mind to be
thoroughly f*cked through the ringer...but in a good way! :) Hitchcock and
Kubrick would be proud. Thank God...this movie has single-handedly restored
my hope in the rest of the films coming out this year. Woo-hoo...bring it
on!
Where's JoBlo coming from?
Blair Witch 2 (7/10) - Dead Again (8/10) - Fight Club (10/10) - Groundhog's
Day (8/10) - Lost Highway (10/10) - Pulp Fiction (8/10) - The Sixth Sense
(8/10)- The Spanish Prisoner (9/10)

Title
Review for G.I. Jane (1997)
A Demi Moore cinematic vehicle directed by the man who brought us
another "gung-ho women" movie back in 1991 entitled THELMA AND LOUISE
(8/10): Mr.Ridley Scott. His brother is fellow hot-shot director Tony
Scott of TRUE ROMANCE (9/10) and CRIMSON TIDE (7/10) fame. Scott Free
is their production company.
PLOT:
O'Neil (Moore) is selected as a test-case candidate to undergo three
months of Navy Seals training, as to identify the capability of a woman
in that branch of the United States Armed Forces. Many people want her
to succeed. Many others want her to fail. The outcome is this film.
CRITIQUE:
This is a 2-hour movie that bored me stupid during the first hour or
so, with countless shots of the men, and woman, training really hard
(how many sweaty shots of Demi Moore must we endure before we crack?),
and politicians and Army heads trying to figure out what to make of the
whole thing. "Navy Seals training is hard, and politics is a dirty
game"-now there's something we never knew before!! Yawn. To entertain
yourself during these early scenes, watch for the Scott brothers'
trademark inclusion of a heavy downpour at some point in the film, as
well as the eternal shot of a man smoking a big "manly" cigar, and
those darn cute rays of sunlight flashing through a shuttered window. 
The second half of the film does add a little intensity, and a spec of
suspense, but not enough to make it an entirely enjoyable movie. I
mean, I don't really think there's anybody out there that can't
confidently predict the ending of the film, eh? Having said that, Anne
Bancroft is perfect in the role of the steadfast, political piranha
Senator, and Viggo Mortensen draws a wonderful performance as the
"hard-as-nails" Major Chief. He even gets to deliver my second
favourite line from a 1997 film (the first being "Yeah baby, yeah !!
from AUSTIN POWERS (7/10)), "Lieutenant O'Neil, when I want your
opinion...I'll give it to you." Yeah baby, yeah !!!
Other than that, the last twenty minutes are the only ones to include
any kind of "action" in this film (as contrived and obvious as the
conclusion does turn out....), and Demi Moore's performance is
adequate. But I guess that if you're in the mood for something that
starts off slow, gets a little political, and ends on a semi-action
tip, then I guess GI JANE should visit your VCR in the near future.
Otherwise, skip it and rent the ultimate "underdog beating all odds"
movie called ROCKY (8/10). Maybe you've heard of it? Viggo rules. 
Little Known Facts: 
Earlier titles for this movie were "In Pursuit of Honor", "Matter of
Honor, A", "Navy Cross" and "Undisclosed".
Demi Moore is married to fellow actor Bruce Willis, with whom she's had
three children who go by the names of Rumer, Scout Larue and Tallulah
Belle (and who said Moon Unit and Dweezel were weird names?). Her own
stepfather (real father left before she was born) killed himself when
she was 18 years of age.
Viggo Mortensen speaks fluent English, Spanish and Danish.
Anne Bancroft was born in The Bronx, New York, under the birth name of
Anna Maria Louisa Italiano (I think she's Italian, eh?), and has been
happily married to director/writer/actor Mel Brooks for over 30 years. 

Title
Review for Thin Red Line, The (1998)
For more reviews and movie trivia, visit http://www.joblo.com/
This film could also have been titled "Deep Thoughts" by Terrence Malick.
The recluse director, who actually beats fellow recluse director Stanley
Kubrick in the number of years elapsed between movies (Malick's last film
was 20 years ago, while Kubrick's only dates back 13), returns to Hollywood
with a solid cast of names, and an attempt to recapture his brilliance from
BADLANDS and DAYS OF HEAVEN.
PLOT:
This film takes place in the Second World War during the Battle of
Guadalcanal. We specifically follow a set of soldiers as they attempt to
break the Japanese stronghold on a giant hill, while listening to their
words of wisdom, and breathing in the lush scenery.
CRITIQUE:
This film may just be the best-looking movie of the year. It may also
contain a solid cast of actors, effective tension when required, and a
life-like feel of being in the bush with the boys. Unfortunately for this
170-minute, overdone, ode to philosophical poetry, this movie just doesn't
muster up enough real interest, plot development or character attachment,
for anyone to give too much of a crap about its existential insights.
There is a reoccurring narration that permeates the entire movie as the
supposed thoughts of the soldiers, which is supposed to make us ponder life,
death and everything in between. All it did for me was tinker the strings of
boredom, as the long pauses between the words had me losing track of most of
what was said, and feel like I was at a poetry hearing, instead of a movie
theater. The last third of the film is especially guilty of this offense, as
the director seemed to have overdosed on his own indulgences, and simply
shot exquisite sceneries, and inserted scattered scenes of the boys and
their apres-winning shenanigans. "Too many vague queries, and not enough
developed thoughts make JoBlo a very uninterested boy."
Acting-wise, this movie is rock-solid, with the lesser named actors pulling
off the best gigs, as Jim Caviezel, Adrien Brody, Ben Chaplin and Elias
Koteas stole the show from the rest of the big names. Within the better
known clique, Nick Nolte jerked off an effective Colonel Tall, with his
grimy impression of a man who lived to bark out orders and thrived on
adversity. And if you're actually thinking of checking into this movie, in
the hopes of seeing your favorite actor, John Travolta or George Clooney, in
action, then I suggest you think thrice about your move, cause they
respectively carry five and one minute screen times in this ocular
air-wafer. All in all, I would say that this film is a visual pearl caught
up in a masturbatory web of overly-profound drivel, which is meant to
stimulate the mind, but ultimately stretches itself too long, and into
indifference. Having said that, the first couple of hours are pretty good,
notably the tense-filled "battle for the hill", and actors solid. So if
you're in the mood for Kierkegaard, I guess this movie might be your
prescribed trip, as long as you don't forget to bring your weed, beret and
"thinker" glasses :)
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Actors Lukas Haas and Bill Pullman respectively played the roles of
"Newcomer" and Supply Sgt. MacTae in this film, before their scenes were
deleted by the director during the editing process.
After 1978's DAYS OF HEAVEN, director Terrence Malick apparently split his
time between Paris and Texas, supporting himself with lucrative, although
uncredited, screenwriting assignments. One such assignment had him helping
out the "wonder twins", Matt Damon and Ben Affleck, on their Oscar-winning
script for GOOD WILL HUNTING (7.5/10). Malick went to St. Stephen's high
school in Austin, Texas, where he played football, and then to Harvard. He
was a Rhodes Scholar. In his contract for directing this film, he stated
that no current pictures of him could be published or shown anywhere.
It took the producers ten years to get this story to film. The story rights
were bought from the author's (James Jones) wife in 1988.
Actor Nicolas Cage might also have starred in this film, were it not for a
little mix-up in telephone messages between him and Terrence Malick. The
misunderstanding ultimately left Malick feeling slighted by Cage for not
returning his call, and Cage feeling sorry because he never got the message.
There was a film in 1998 called A SOLDIER'S DAUGHTER NEVER CRIES, which was
a biopic on the life of "A Thin Red Line" novelist James Jones, written by
his daughter, Kaylie.
Although some shooting for this film was actually done in the Guadalcanal
Island, most of the film was shot around Port Douglas in Queensland,
Australia.
The script for this movie was apparently 213 pages long, shot over 123 days,
and held a budget of $50Million.
Actor Elias Koteas was born in my hometown of Montreal, Quebec, Canada.
Actor Jim Caviezel's feature film debut was as an airline clerk in Gus Van
Sant's 1991 film MY OWN PRIVATE IDAHO (7.5/10).
Review Date:       February 4, 1999
Director:               Terrence Malick
Writer:                  Terrence Malick (based on novel by James Jones)
Producers:           Robert Michael Geisler, Grant Hill and John Roberdeau
Actors:                  Nick Nolte as Lieutenant Colonel Gordon Tall, Sean
Penn as First Sergeant Edward Welsh, Elias Koteas as Captain
James Staros, Jim Caviezel as Private Witt, Ben Chaplin as Private Jack
Bell, Adrien Brody as Cpl. Fife
Genre:                   Drama
Year of Release:  1998
---------------------------------------
JoBlo's Movie Emporium
http://www.joblo.com
---------------------------------------
(c) 1999 Berge Garabedian

Title
Review for U-571 (2000)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Okay, so the film doesn't exactly have the catchiest title in the world, but
how could you go wrong with Harvey Keitel and singer/actor Jon Bon Jovi in
the same movie? Well, uhhm....okay, forget that! All you have to remember is
that this is a submarine movie, an action submarine movie, a fun, loud,
easy-to-swallow action submarine movie. Slap in handsome naked
pothead/bongo-man Matthew McConaughey, and you've got yourself a swingin'
time!
PLOT:
World War II is raging on when an American Navy crew is sent to overtake a
stranded Nazi U-boat (aka nasty sub), stuck somewhere in the middle of the
ocean. Their mission: to capture their unique decoding device.
CRITIQUE:
A loud, fast-paced, simple story set within the always tense environment of
a submarine, featuring a lot of repetitive "sub-talk", great looking men in
cool Navy garb and the official christening of the summer popcorn flick
season. (Splashes) I can't say that much about this film surprised me, in
fact, I can't say that anything about it really did. But I suppose there are
only so many ways that one could tell a story in a sub. Lots of cramped
quarters, an all-male crew tossing jargon upon jargon back and forth, others
manning the electronic surveillance equipment diligently, everyone bracing
for impact, or hoping for the non-impact. The proverbial "dive, dive, dive"
bellow from the captain, the rookie member of the crew with his big moment
to shine, the captain's difficult decision to make, the staple scene of the
entire crew stripping down to their skibbies and getting "jiggy" with one
another. Well, okay...that last one was just to see if you were paying
attention! (Splashes)
All in all, the film does deliver on its intended purpose: to entertain. I
thoroughly enjoyed the film while I was there, liked the loud booms and
bangs of the detonations, felt like I was getting thrown around just like
one of the crew. Really liked the actors, McConaughey in particular, with
his great looks, great hair and subtle confidence...a perfect casting
choice. Keitel was also decent in his second fiddle role, as were the rest
of the dirty group, who all seemed real enough for me to care about.
(Splashes) Of course, the screenplay doesn't really get too deep in respect
to any of the characters, or the story for that matter (Nazis
bad...Americans good), but these aren't exactly the types of films which
accentuate character development. This film is about having fun, believing
what you see, being entertained and made especially for those who enjoy the
easy, crunchy, action movies. Admittedly, I could have done without the
umpteen shots of people staring at the sky waiting for the eventual
impact/non-impact or the cheesy dialogue here and there, but God bless
America, because this movie took my mind off my crappy problems du jour and
at the end of the day...that's what it's all about! Get the nachos, grab the
better half, spread some salsa all around and have yourself a good time!
(Splashes)
The (Splashes) references throughout my text are made to poke fun at a
recurring line from the film which was just too good to pass up. And for all
you Jovi fans who want to know how the man makes out in this film, allow me
to put your minds at ease, since he does deliver a pretty decent
performance. Of course, things do get a little slippery when wet, right?
(Sorry, but I just had to!)
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Director Jonathan Mostow recently dropped an email over at our good buddy
Harry Knowles' infamous movie site, and offered him some behind-the-scenes
pictures of the full-scale 600 ton diesel-powered submarine replica which
they built especially for this film. If you'd like to see the pics, visit:
http://www.aint-it-cool-news.com/display.cgi?id=5693
Actor Jack Noseworthy also starred in director Mostow's second picture
called BREAKDOWN starring Kurt Russell. Mostow's directorial debut came in
1989 when he helmed the comedy BEVERLY HILLS BODYSNATCHERS starring TV
"Alice's" own Vic Tayback. Incidentally, Jack Noseworthy was also featured
in a Bon Jovi video called "Always". Ironically, he co-stars with Jovi in
this movie.
Jon Bon Jovi's birth name is John Francis Bongiovi. Jovi lost the lead role
in CROW: CITY OF ANGELS to French actor Vincent Perez (Thank your lucky
stars, Johnny boy!).
Harvey Keitel is a great actor who is also known for showing off his
"goodies" onscreen in various pictures including THE PIANO, BAD LIEUTENANT
and FINGERS. Rock on, Harv!

Title
Review for Instinct (1999)
For more movie reviews and screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Seeing this movie's trailer, I wasn't sure whether this was a film about a
man's love for monkeys, or an intense thriller pitting two of our best
modern day actors against one another, a la THE NEGOTIATOR (7/10). It turned
out to be a little bit of both, although the intensity of the thrills were
at a much lower level than the man's love for his monkeys.
PLOT:
A doctor who was lost in the African jungles for two years, and known to
live side-by-side with gorillas, is found after he savagely murders two game
wardens. Upon his return to the States, a young, career-minded psychiatrist
is chosen to attempt to communicate with the man and understand his violent
and anti-social behavior.
CRITIQUE:
One part ONE FLEW OVER THE CUCKOO'S NEST (7/10), one part THE SHAWSHANK
REDEMPTION (9/10) and one part GORILLAS IN THE MIST, one part SILENCE OF THE
LAMBS (7.5/10), and one really big part TARZAN. This film offers very little
in originality or thrills, but does manage to convey an effective loving
relationship between the good doctor and the gorillas, and some superb
acting on the part of the two lead actors. In fact, I think I would have
been really bored were it not for the intense and believable portrayals of
both characters. Anthony Hopkins plays an excellent doctor gone semi-loony
who has us believing that a man of his intelligence could truly be taken in
by a family of gorillas. Cuba Gooding's doctor Dooright character also
meanders through every emotion flawlessly with all of his happiness,
sadness, fear and cockiness creating a character to whom we can all relate
and invest our emotion.
Were there enough twists in the plot? No, not at all. Pretty predictable.
Were there any crazy monkey love-making scenes? Certainly not. But what this
film does offer is a couple of great actors chewing down on some pretty
tasty lines inside a plot which may resonate with some, in respect to its
derogatory depiction of modern-day living, and society's over-emphasis on
control, possessions, career and dominance. Now the lack of originality or
action may have some of you returning to your ticket counter and demanding
that they "Show you your money back!" (I'm sorry, but I just had to! :), but
I quite enjoyed the performances in this film, and its oddly satisfying
conclusion. Skip it if you're looking for an intense thriller or a sci-fi
man-turns-into-a-gorilla vibe (ALTERED STATES (5/10) fans beware!), but
check it out if you like either of the two leads or movies with monkeys in
'em!
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Anthony Hopkins' role was originally slated for Sean Connery. He probably
turned it down because he already sported that ugly, long, dirty grey
haircut in THE ROCK (7/10). Being British, Mr. Hopkins was glad to have
conquered his alcoholism in 1975. He stands 5'7".
Cuba Gooding Jr's first big-screen role came as the "boy getting haircut" in
Eddie Murphy's 1988 hit COMING TO AMERICA (8/10). He reportedly received
only $32,000 for his breakthrough role in 1991's BOYZ IN THE HOOD (8/10),
while pocketing around $2.5 Million for his part in this one. He stands
5'10", and was born in The Bronx, New York. He also appeared in four
episodes of TV's "MacGyver" from 1989 to 1991.
Director Jon Turteltaub went from directing such films as 3 NINJAS and COOL
RUNNINGS to 1995's WHILE YOU WERE SLEEPING and 1996's PHENOMENON.
Believe it or not, the gorillas used in the film were not real. They all
came from the wonderful world of Stan Winston's puppet Studio.
This film was originally titled ISHMAEL, based on the novel of the same name
by Daniel Quinn. The film credits this book as the piece from which its
script was "suggested".
Most of the jungle scenes were actually shot in Jamaica.

Title
Review for Bedazzled (2000)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
A remake of the 1967 comedy starring Dudley Moore and Racquel Welsh
(growl!!), this movie takes some of the basic elements from the original,
and brings them to age with Brendan Fraser and Elizabeth Hurley in the lead.
Haven't we all wished that we could be someone else every now and then?
Well, the lead character in this film gets seven wishes from the devil to
become whoever he wants to be. In return, all he has to do is give her his
soul (surprise, the devil is a woman...hehe). Now that's not asking too
much, is it? I wish...I could be a great movie! Poof.
PLOT:
A dweeby guy with a secret woodie for a co-worker decides to trade his soul
to the devil in return for seven wishes. As time goes by, the man realizes
that the gorgeous physical manifestation of Satan, isn't exactly playing
fair, and tries to improve upon his wishes every time.
CRITIQUE:
An underwhelming remake featuring yet another great comedic turn by Brendan
Fraser, a perfect sexy hot tamale role for Elizabeth Hurley, but ultimately
too much like a sketch comedy show, rather than a movie. Very little oomph!
The idea of this film is in itself, actually quite ambitious. To allow this
guy to have seven wishes, with him transforming into a Columbian drug lord,
a 7-foot tall basketball player, an ultra-sensitive guy and so forth, but
something seemed to be missing along the way. There were some funny scenes,
some so-so scenes and other tired ones. The whole thing felt sort of pieced
together from a good idea but a not so humorous script. Don't get me wrong,
I laughed here and there, Brendan Fraser was tops as usual in a Murphy-esque
type of role, with him portraying various different characters out of one,
but there were no laugh-out loud scenes and the ending of the film was just
flat. Looking back, it was one of those movies that's sort of "okay" as you
watch it, but entirely forgettable afterwards. It also got predictable
pretty early on, as much of the film's development could be guessed by the
end of the character's first "wish".
I really liked a couple of the situations that Brendan was placed in,
especially the extra-sensitive guy routine, which was really well done and
quite funny, and the whole basketball sequence, which was also very
well-handled, both effects-wise and the humor. Others could have been
funnier such as the Columbian drug lord scenario, which felt more like a
"one-joke" pony. But then there was the luscious Elizabeth Hurley, who kept
me in the game for quite some time. Looking better and better from scene to
scene, featured in various delectable costumes as every boy's fantasy (pant,
pant), Hurley managed to juice all that she could out of her devilish
character. I thought the devil was just a little "too nice" in my opinion,
especially in the end, but then again, the film itself isn't exactly based
in airtight reality. Overall, I would say that it's a safe, easy-going,
fantasy puffball with fun performances from the leads, but definitely less
than what its premise sets it up to be. I was hoping for more.

Title
Review for Lock, Stock and Two Smoking Barrels (1998)
For more movie reviews and trivia, visit http://www.joblo.com/
I agree with most critics that this is a fine movie, but let's be frank
here, originality ain't this movie's strong suit! If you liked any
combination of the following movies, you will probably enjoy the goings-on
in this film, despite its deja-vu feel at times: ROUNDERS (7/10), RESERVOIR
DOGS (9.5/10), OUT OF SIGHT (8/10), TRUE ROMANCE (9.5/10), TRAINSPOTTING
(9/10) and PULP FICTION (7.5/10).
PLOT:
Four dudes that get in over their head after losing a chunk of dough in a
poker match to a really nasty, bad guy, have to figure out a way to repay
the man half a million pounds before the end of the week. Plenty of crime,
seedy, underground characters and unpleasantries ensue.
CRITIQUE:
Fun, interesting, rehash of yet another crime caper starring a sackful of
quirky and degenerate characters, which features some fine acting by all
involved, a hot-dogging soundtrack, and some of the finer stylish shots to
hit crime cinema since 1996's TRAINSPOTTING. Granted, some of the filming
techniques used to stir our imagination are somewhat overused, but still
cool to watch, especially the stop-motion slo-mo stuff sprinkled throughout.
I did enjoy the plot line as well, but my rating of this film versus all of
the others mentioned above, gives you an indication of how derivatives of a
great thing, don't always impact the viewer as much as the originals did.
That, and the fact that I had to filter out a good lump of the dialogue due
to the ol' British accents and slang.
Unlike Tarantino movies, this film wasn't peppered with pop references all
over the place, but it did lace itself with a fine overtone of comedy and
irony. It doesn't even try to hide its influences, with plenty of hinted
homages to the many recent great crime films mixed into its lair of colorful
characters, stylish bravado and double-smoking entertainment. You'll
probably like this movie if you're "into" this whole hip, black comedic
crime flicks theme, or if you really dig films with a lot of flashy style.
You'll probably hate it, if you think that many of the films that I named
above sucked. Note: There are almost no women in this entire movie.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Director Guy Ritchie started his career off as a TV commercial director.
"Hatchet" Harry's collector in this movie named Big Chris, is played by
actual "football" star Vinnie Jones. Noted as one of soccer's hard men, he
leapt to fame when a photographer at a match snapped him "marking" another
player by grabbing his testicles. His nickname is "Psycho".
Trudie Styler is one of the executive producers of this film. In real life,
she is married to singer/actor Sting, who happens to play the role of Eddy's
dad in this movie. Sting's real name is Gordon Matthew Sumner.
This film was nominated for the Alexander Korda Award for Best British Film
at the 1998 British Academy Awards, and won a best director award for Guy
Ritchie at the 1998 Tokyo International Film Festival.
Originally titled TWO SMOKING BARRELS.

Title
Review for Stigmata (1999)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
What you get when you cross a badly-done veiled version of THE EXORCIST with
an MTV video directed by a man who might consider Tony Scott, Michael Bay
and Simon West as his modern-day directorial heroes? Read on.
PLOT:
Mary Jane Nobody gets inflicted by the stigmata, a condition in which a
person is physically impaled like Jesus was on the cross. Being an atheist,
she doesn't understand why this is happening to her, and neither does the
brooding priest/scientist who comes from the Vatican to investigate the
supernatural event.
CRITIQUE:
The answer to the question from above is that you get STIGMATA, a film which
relies mostly on style and mood, and leaves the story element far away in
the backseat. I personally do enjoy films with a lot of stylish camera
tricks, but this one went a little overboard, with an overabundance of shots
featuring water dripping down, tight close-ups, slow motion scenes, quick
edits and loud music. This wouldn't have been too bad if the story had
enough meat to straddle my interest, but unfortunately, I was bored after
the first hour of watching Patricia Arquette get bloodied over and over
again, without much else going on. Redundancy, you have a name and it is
Stigmata! This film also features a drab resolution, which fortunately for
me, I could have cared less about at that time (And were those the worst
looking fake flames you have ever seen in the last scene?? Yikes!). One
thing's for sure, I ain't much into religion, but I can't imagine anyone
from the church being too much of a happy camper after seeing this flick.
On the positive tip, I sure did enjoy the soundtrack which proved that
Smashing Pumkin Billy Corgan could sure do a great Trent Reznor impression,
and the performance by Patricia Arquette, which was excellent as a cute,
hip, young chick who anyone, at least in our generation, could relate to.
And how about all of her funky getups and apartment fillers? Very kewl!
Byrne was okay as the Jason Miller part from the original EXORCIST, but did
they have to toss in a cheesy romance? Not my bag. Anyway, all in all, this
film might satisfy some folks who love the MTV-style movies with little plot
development despite a lot of movement, and Patricia Arquette fans, but
thriller fans, lovers of the supernatural genre, will not find anything to
get excited about in this bombastic retread. And despite not appreciating
the film's story line, I do mark it higher than usual, because I personally
do like Patricia Arquette and enjoyed some of its stylish intent.
Unfortunately, the director went too far in this area, believing himself to
be directing an action/adventure film instead of a taut thriller.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
I really did not know this fact before I wrote my actual review, but after
reading through some of the studio's production notes, it was a nice
confirmation to find out that director Rupert Wainwright was once an
acclaimed commercial and music video director! Score one for the home team.
:) He directed commercials for clients ranging from Reebok and Sprint, to
music videos for Michael Jackson and NWA. His first major directing gig was
1994's BLANK CHECK for Walt Disney.
Born in Chicago, but raised in Southern California, actress Patricia
Arquette is surrounded by actors in her family. Her father Lewis and
grandfather Cliff started it all, while her siblings Rosanna, Richmond,
David and Alexis continuing it alongside her today. This must be a widely
known fact by now, but Patricia has been married to actor Nicolas Cage since
1995. However, the way they got together is quite interesting: Cage proposed
to Patricia on the day he met her in the early 80s. Arquette thought he was
a bit strange but played along with his antics by creating a list of things
Cage would have to fulfil to win her (Like a black rose, J.D. Salinger's
autograph, etc...). When he started to work his way through the list,
Arquette got scared and avoided him. They met again many years later and
later went on to marry.
Gabriel Byrne comes straight out of Dublin, Ireland, and professes to be a
Catholic. He's also had quite a life. He only started acting at the age of
29 and came to America for the first time when he was 37. Before becoming an
actor, he was an archeologist, a schoolteacher, a short-order cook and a
bullfighter. He was also married to actress Ellen Barkin for about ten
years.
Actress Nia Long's career got started by Betty A. Bridges, mother of actor
Todd Bridges AKA ex-Different Strokes cast member. Betty was her acting
coach for 15 years
Billy Corgan's previous experience in composing music for film includes Mel
Gibson's RANSOM, which he partly scored.
This film was originally titled TOBY'S STORY.

Title
Review for Enemy of the State (1998)
For more reviews and trivia, go to http://surf.to/joblo
Tony Scott joins up with producer Jerry Bruckheimer for the fifth time,
after 1986's TOP GUN (7/10), 1987's BEVERLY HILLS COP II (6.5/10),
1990's DAYS OF THUNDER (6.5/10) & 1995's CRIMSON TIDE (7.5/10), and
takes on the new age of technological surveillance, with a solid cast
led by the ultimate big-ticket opener Will Smith and Gene Hackman.
PLOT:
Lawyer Robert Dean gets caught up in an elaborate chase, after someone
drops an extremely important piece of evidence on his person. The NSA
(National Security Agency) decides to take matters into their own
hands, and destroy Dean's credibility whilst bugging every part of his
life. They track him all across town, in an attempt to recapture the
proof, while former-NSA employee Brill, helps him along the way. 
CRITIQUE:
The ultimate chase movie, this film offers us non-stop action, a decent
plot with a light touch, good acting, but does seem to run about half
an hour too long, and float into some repetitive waters once too often.
This movie starts off with a great premise and snowballing build-up,
and eventually gears into a kynetic two-hour chase via technologies
beyond anyone's imagination. Overall, I did like this movie, but did
find myself a little bored about halfway through the chasing, because
it all seemed like the same thing after a while. Having said that, the
film does offer a decent twist in its ending, and peps up its
jargon-filled dialogue with spurts of humour and cameos by James
Robards, Tom Sizemore (ballooning as we speak), David Byrne (who is
credited in the opening credits for some reason, but is really in the
film for only a few minutes) and the return of ex-Cosby kid Lisa Bonet
as the second tomato to Smith's wife in the movie.
On the acting side of things, Jon Voight is convincing as the head of a
department that's seriously lobbying to play "big brother" in America's
technological future. The rest of the bad guys are your standard fare,
with many of them sporting the same spiked, platinum haircuts, so that
nobody will detect them as a team (Good move, guys!). Gene Hackman
returns as a super-paranoid recluse fresh from the conclusion of his
role in 1974's THE CONVERSATION (6.5/10), in which he started of as a
surveillance expert, and eventually disintegrated into a total paranoid
fruitcake (Just a cool coincidence? I think not.) He is also quite good
in his role, and physically standardized as the "crazy, whacked-up guy"
as per his donning of the proverbial black rimmed glasses. Will Smith
was actually okay in his part, but seemed to have delivered most of his
funniest lines in the film's trailer. And lastly, Jason Lee of MALLRATS
(6/10) fame, pulls off another slick performance as the hip, young cat
who could swear with the best of them.
Director Scott also returns with many of his trademarks, as his
frenetic camera shots, five second edits, and overdone technical
mumbojumbo (How many times do we have to see the satellite dish
floating out in space, and the overhead camera shots of people being
chased...okay, Tony, we get it...they're cool shots, but let's move on
already!). He also made sure to have at least one wicked downpour near
the film's conclusion, as to solidify its presence in every one of his
films. All in all, the film is packed with energy and thrills, delivers
many decent performances, an intelligible plot with some obvious holes,
but does run on for about half and hour too long, and could get
repetitive at some points.  
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Will Smith turned down a scolarship to MIT to pursue his singing
career. He is also known as the "Fresh Prince"- rap singer. Will also
helmed a successful 6-year sitcom on NBC called "The Fresh Prince of
Bel-Air." Despite being a millionaire by age eighteen, Smith was
nonetheless deeply indebted to the I.R.S. when he landed said sitcom.
He had spent a lot of money on a house, cars and jewelry. He stands
6"3.
Gene Hackman was over 30 years old when he finally decided to take his
chance at acting by enrolling at the Pasadena Playhouse in California.
Legend has it that Hackman and Dustin Hoffman were voted "least likely
to succeed". His complete name is Eugene Alden Hackman.
Three TRUE ROMANCE (9/10) references that I caught in this movie
included the derogatory word used to describe African Americans in both
films, being "eggplant". The Mexican standoff shootout that shows up in
both films, and the appearance of one Tom Sizemore, who played a much
skinnier cop in the former movie, while portraying a real slob of a mob
boss in this one.
Gabriel Byrne started acting at the age of 29 and he went to America
for the first time when he was 37. He is originally from Ireland. He
was married to actress Ellen Barkin from 1988 to 1993.
Jason Lee is also a professional skateboarder.

Title
Review for American Pie (1999)
For more movie reviews and screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
This film is being touted as the 90s version of PORKY'S or FAST TIMES AT
RIDGEMONT HIGH, and the conglomeration of last year's THERE'S SOMETHING
ABOUT MARY (7.5/10) and CAN'T HARDLY WAIT (7/10). It stars a bunch of
unknown teens in a raunchy script which actually talks about the main thing
that most kids talk about in high school: getting laid!
PLOT:
Four good friends, who all happen to be virgins, make a pact to get laid
before prom nite. Prom nite happens to be only three weeks away.
CRITIQUE:
Finally, a high school movie that puts the "T" back in Teen flicks! Yes,
there is nudity in this film. Yes, there are masturbation scenes, oral sex
scenarios, intercourse montages, but nothing too graphic on the whole.
Mostly implied. Overall, the film features a few huge laughs (a la MARY),
featuring a doctored cup of beer, the by-now infamous apple pie sequence,
the Internet used to its full potential and a cute Mrs. Robinson vibe
nodding THE GRADUATE, and a lot of open talk about sex, masturbation, porn,
but nothing terribly insightful, shocking or hilarious for my taste. I was
personally hoping that this film would take more chances than it did, but
ultimately it seemed to go for the easy visual gag or toilet humor (one
pulled directed from the Farrelly's DUMB AND DUMBER (7.5/10)). Sure, I did
laugh at most of them, but the script seemed to play more like a few funny
sketches plotted against an average high school story, than a string of
laughs strategically laced through a unique script.
The couples in the film were also so-so, with one of them not really all
that interesting to keep track of, and another tapping into a sugary
fairy-tale ending. The few actors that did stand out for me included Jason
Biggs, who played the every-guy who we could all relate to (And yes, we've
all pulled a whack to scrambled TV porn!), Chris Klein reprising his
goofy-nice-guy role from ELECTION (7/10) (Two funny performances, but now
it's time to stretch, Chris) and Sean William Scott, as the jerk with all
the over-the-top insulting lines. Other than that, the film seemed to run a
little long, although they might cut it by release date, since our preview
was a "rough cut", and featured a decent teen soundtrack. Overall, I think
that the frank sexual content and dialogue in this film will be refreshing
to most teens, despite the script's lack of other innovative narrative
additions: it's still the nerds vs jocks, prom nite, kids lying about their
virginity, etc... A teen version of THERE'S SOMETHING ABOUT MARY? Kind of.
But certainly not your average high school flick, and certainly eons away
from the safe teenage flicks bestowed upon us by the great John Hughes in
the 80s.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Big Ben Affleck's baby brother, Casey Affleck, makes a cameo in this film as
the "older, wiser brother".
Director Paul Weitz and producer Chris Weitz are brothers. They are known to
have co-written the screenplay for ANTZ (6.5/10). Born in New York, the
brothers are third generation Hollywood pedigree. Their grandfather was the
fabled agent Paul Kohner, who represented such legendary filmmakers as John
Huston, Billy Wilder and Ingmar Bergman and their parents are fashion
designer John Weitz and Academy Award-nominated actress Susan Kohner.
Californian punk-rockers BLINK 182 are featured on the soundtrack, and also
make an appearance in this movie. Their band name is derived from the number
of times Al Pacino uttered the F-word in SCARFACE (8.5/10).
This film was originally sold as the "Untitled Teenage Sex Comedy Which Can
Be Made For Under $10 Million Which Studio Readers Will Most Likely Hate But
I Think You Will Love". It then went through two other name changes, GREAT
FALLS and EAST GREAT FALLS HIGH. It also took this film four tries to get an
R-rating instead of an NC-17.
Actor Chris Klein got his big break in the acting world when he literally
bumped into director Alexander Payne (ELECTION) while he was scouting
Klein's high school as a possible shoot location for his film. Months later
when Klein was attending college at Texas Christian University, Payne cast
him in the co-starring role of Paul Metzler.
Actress Alyson Hannigan is best known to television audiences for her
regular role as Willow on TV's "Buffy, the Vampire Slayer".
Actor Thomas Ian Nicholas is also touring on the road with his band, "The
T.I.N. Men". Some of you may remember his girlfriend in this film, actress
Tara Reid, from her role as Bunny Lebowski in the Coen Bros' film THE BIG
LEBOWSKI (6.5/10).

Title
Review for Suicide Kings (1997)
For more movie review and trivia, go to http:/surf.to/joblo/
Christopher Walken re-enacts his role as the low-talkin', wise-cracking
mobster he twice played in Abel Ferrara's KING OF NEW YORK, and my
personal favourite TRUE ROMANCE (9/10). This film blends some of the
camaraderie of the gangsters from THE USUAL SUSPECTS (7.5/10), with the
hipper-than-thou Tarantino undertones of the RESERVOIR DOGS (9/10)(see
Little Known Facts below for an homage to DOGS in this film), and comes
up with another cinematic cocktail served via slick characters. 
PLOT:
Five rich friends kidnap an ex-mob boss in order to get him to help
them retrieve the kidnapped sister of one of the guys. The mobster is
handily tied up to a chair and forced by said fellas, to attempt a
recovery of the snatched lass, despite him having nothing to do with
the actual caper. Soon enough, the friends all start suspecting each
other of being involved in the sister's kidnapping, while the cool
mobster gently massages their collective brains for relevant
information.
CRITIQUE:
Interesting ensemble piece that features plenty of good actors doing
their stuff, in a script obviously written within the Tarantino
universe, this film offers some cool dialogue, cooler characters, but
an overall flawed plot line, that finally falters in its ambiguous
conclusion. I don't want to be blunt about this whole thing, but the
fact of the matter is that a gentleman by the name of Christopher
Walken just rocks!! And I'm not talking about in this film alone. I'm
talking about the man's legacy of playing extremely creepy, warped,
dangerous, but always interesting characters with the Walken twist of
lime always stuffed in on the side. If you like this man's acting
abilities, his skill to consistently project fear across a movie
screen, his capacity to convey fierce emotion by simply drawing his
eyelids to a close, his charismatic smile and blinding jet-black hair,
you will enjoy him in this film.
Admittedly, the rest of the cast also rack up some brownie points in
their respective roles, with Denis Leary drumming up some of the
funniest lines this side of his jellyfish boots. But all in all, the
film lacked the originality needed to make it a good film. It had some
of the elements, some wired scenes, some great actors, but it was
missing the key element that made all of the previously mentioned films
re-watchable over and over and over again: a great story. You could
slap all the bells and whistles you want around Christopher Walken's
chicken-like neck, but you won't garner half the nacho-munching film
geeks that the others would, unless you manage to lasso a great script
into the molten mix. This film has some of the pieces of that
mish-mash, but can't complete the magic puzzle because of its lack of
originality, uninspired soundtrack and weak ending. Walken and Leary
alone deserve salsas for being the awesome ball-busters that they are,
but the film as a whole works particularly when served as an
after-dinner divertissement, or a pre-supper aperitif. Fun enough to
watch and be playfully amused, flawed enough to forget once the last
melted morsel of cheese is scarfed off the proverbial nacho plate.     
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
There is an obvious homage to Quentin Tarantino's RESERVOIR DOGS in
this film (His influence is palpable in the screenplay), in the one
scene where the two kidnappers are watching said classic motion picture
on the tube (Blink and you'll miss it.) It's the scene in which Mr.
Pink is hauling ass from the cops via a stolen vehicle.
Christopher Walken's real name is Ronald Walken. He was director George
Lucas' second choice for the role of Han Solo in 1977's STAR WARS
(8.5/10). He has been married to the same woman for over 25 years. One
of his most famous quotes, "I make movies that nobody will see. I've
made movies that even I have never seen."
Denis Leary is the cousin of TV's late night talk show host himself,
Conan O'Brien.
This film is based on a short story written by Don Stanford, called
"The Hostage." 
Henry Thomas is better known for his childhood role as Elliot, the
lucky kid who befriended E.T.
Sean Patrick Flanery is a triathlete with a black belt in karate.
Jay Mohr was a performer on TV's "Saturday Night Live" for a few years.

Title
Review for Mystery, Alaska (1999)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
I will admit that I was sick of seeing the trailer of this film every time
that I went out to the theatres over the past year. It was apparently pushed
back a couple of times, but here it is now, right before the real hockey
season gets under way. Anyway, it isn't every day that Hollywood comes out
with a hockey movie which isn't turned into an actual NHL franchise, so I
was still willing to give this one a shot. Good move.
PLOT:
A small wintery town that prides itself on its dignity and game of hockey,
soon find themselves on the receiving end of a proposal from the actual New
York Rangers. The NHL team want to challenge the small town goobers to an
exhibition game, after a flattering article about their rich tradition of
hockey fills the pages of Sports Illustrated.
CRITIQUE:
I love hockey. You don't have to like hockey to like this movie, but being
Canadian, and liking hockey, both allowed me to appreciate this film's
universal message on a deeper level. Three films which kept resonating in my
mind as I watched this small but effective film, were the underdog done good
flick, RUDY, the character driven small town tale, BEAUTIFUL GIRLS (8/10),
and the bigger budgeted FOR LOVE OF THE GAME (7.5/10). Consider this one an
amalgamation of the three. Sound like you've "been there, done that"? Maybe.
But this movie worked for me. It's about heart. It's about drive,
inspiration, pride, tradition, love of a game which anyone, including
non-hockey fans, could truly appreciate. It's also about relationships and
the hardships that people have to endure to survive a small town
micro-culture, a feeling of second banana to a sport, and opportunities
missed and achieved. I don't live in a small town, but I am always smitten
by films of these kind which successfully convey the small town feel to
someone who has never been. It's easy to see how many of these communities
are deemed to be extended families, as every little thing once does somehow
seems to affect every one else in the group. So strange.
Not only was this film able to convey this atmosphere convincingly with many
sharply written characters all grieving on some level or another, but even
more importantly, it was able to resonate the importance and deeply
ingrained feeling of love for a sport, which allowed us to feel for these
characters, and obviously, root for them in the big game. You should know
that this film does not feature a lot of hockey play. In fact, I would say
that it is more of a character-driven film based around a common "obsession"
which happens to be the game of hockey. There are funny moments, dramatic
moments, touching moments, and obviously moments of fun hockey. I enjoyed
all of the performances in the film, except for the Burt Reynolds character
who seemed a little too narrowly drawn for my taste, but kudos to Russell
Crowe and the rest of the gang for portraying these folks as real human
beings, instead of stick figures from the minds of Hollywood execs. There is
also a cute cameo near the end of the film (Read the little known facts if
you really want to know who it is) which seemed soooo appropriate for this
movie. Some may find this film corny and derivative, but God help me if I
didn't enjoy its every moment. Another unnamed critic hailed this film to
the "Rocky of hockey", and despite the complete banality of that statement,
I would have to agree in respect to its intent. If you're in the mood for a
feel-good, character-driven drama featuring some good performances, funny
and tender moments, then this is one that you should definitely check out.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
When you consider the fact that this actor is Canadian, has gone on the
record as saying that he loves hockey, and that he starred in director Jay
Roach's two previous directing efforts (Roach is the director of this film
and married to the singer from The Bangles, Susanna Hoffs), it shouldn't
surprise you to find out that actor Mike Myers makes a quirky and humorous
cameo near the end of this film. He plays a hockey commentator.
Actor Russell Crowe was born in New Zealand but now calls Australia home.
You might remember his wife in this film, actress Mary McCormack, from her
popular role of Alison Stern, wife of the self-acclaimed "king of all media"
Howard Stern, in the movie PRIVATE PARTS (7/10).
Shot entirely in Alberta, Canada, this film apparently led to at least one
barroom brawl when actor Russell Crowe was alleged to have gotten himself
into such an altercation during the filming months of this movie.
In case you are living on the planet Mars and still don't know who writer
David E. Kelly is, he is the man behind the two Emmy-winning shows, "Ally
McBeal" and "The Practice". He's also known for being the man who once got
Michelle Pfeiffer to agree to marry him in 1993, and has since been married
to the lovely actress, and the man who penned three other motion pictures,
TO GILLIAN ON HER 37TH BIRTHDAY, the monster tale, LAKE PLACID and FROM THE
HIP, which has apparently based on some of his own experiences as a lawyer.
Sadly, it starred actor Judd Nelson :) David actually used to be a lawyer in
Boston and attended both Princeton University and Boston University Law
School.
This film was originally titled POND RULES.

Title
Review for Say It Isn't So (2001)
For more reviews and movie wallpapers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
PLOT:
A local boy falls from a local girl who turns out to be his sister. The two
split but the boy later finds out that he might not be her brother after all
and chases after the girl. Of course, by then, the girl is already engaged
to be married to a millionaire dude, and well, supposed hilarity ensues. I
stress the word "supposed"...
CRITIQUE:
There are many films that can be described as "stupid funny", but this movie
is just plain "stupid stupid!" I think it's time to officially christen an
end to the Farrellization of comedic cinema. You know the formula: take one
part dimwitted yet likeable leads, one part retarded or physically impaired
co-stars, add many an over-the-top gross moment (this film features someone
sticking their entire arm in a cow's ass!), plenty of lame songs to kill
time, Lyn Shaye and plenty of animals, and you've got the makings of a
"Farrelly comedy". Well, unfortunately for the kooky brothers, it appears as
though their jig is finally up. Time to give back the keys, boys, let
someone else give it a try. You see, the one element that also needs to be
included in any comedy is well...comedy! You know, laughs, humor...things
that make you go ha-ha! Now here's a movie that starts off with a lame
story, tosses in a super gross joke every twenty minutes, adds more lame
story, features Heather Graham crying a few dozen times, and tries sooooo
very hard to be funny, that's it's actually kind of excruciating to watch
(Oh, so the town is called Beaver, eh? Haha, pretty funny). And didn't Sally
Field learn her lesson with BEAUTIFUL last year? Lady, take a break...your
career radar seems to be malfunctioning. And what about Klein and Graham,
you ask? Well, what can you say? It's pretty obvious to anyone who watches
this movie that both actors are extremely photogenic, but also, sadly
lacking in much depth, personality or charisma. Talent? Well, that's a
toss-up, but I'd say that both actors aren't exactly going for range in
their careers with this one (think Freddie Prinze Jr. and be afraid...be
very afraid!).
But enough putdowns, I mean what you really want to know as a reader is
whether or not there were some genuinely some funny moments in this film,
right? Well, the answer to that question is a resounding "yes"...but with a
qualifier. There were exactly three laugh-out loud scenes in this movie
(hence the 3/10) and a few smirks here and there. The funniest part of the
film was the father with the stroke and Voc-A-Lator strapped 'round his
neck, played brilliantly by the under-appreciated Richard Jenkins. Now
despite that bit being ripped off the SOUTH PARK series to begin with, it
was still pretty funny, but for some strange reason, sadly underused. It
just goes to show how the makers of this film simply did not know what to do
with all this guacamole, as some inexplicably "serious moments" somehow made
it into this movie as well. Did they honestly want us to get into this
lame-ass story? I mean, c'mon fellas, I bought the whole
brother-nailing-his-sister thing, but keep it light, keep it funny and keep
it stupid, but stay away from the serious stuff, for God's sakes...this
ain't the place for that! In the end, the movie simply didn't work for many
reasons, the lack of story, the lack of characterization, the lack of
empathy for anyone in the movie, and most importantly for any comedy...the
lack of laughs! Like I said earlier, there's stupid funny and then there's
just plain stupid, and unfortunately for the filmmakers, which include the
Farrelly brothers (who have made no effort to distance themselves from this
project and therefore deserve some of the blame), this movie is just stupid.
Where's JoBlo coming from?
Airplane (9/10) - American Pie (7/10) - Dumb & Dumber (7/10) - Head over
Heels (2/10) - Kingpin (8/10) - Me, Myself & Irene (5/10) - South Park
(9/10) - There's Something About Mary (7/10)

Title
Review for Peacemaker, The (1997)
Mimi Leder's directorial debut was also the first theatrical release
from the newly formed Hollywood studio Dreamworks SKG. S for Steven
Spielberg, K Jeffrey Katzenberg, G for David Geffen. 
PLOT:
Russian bad guys steal some nuclear warheads from a train. Good
Military Guy Devoe (Clooney), and Nuclear Expert Kelly (Kidman) are the
two American wunderkinds appointed to find the warheads and save the
world from a possible nuclear disaster. 
CRITIQUE:
Mostly unexciting, humdrum romp that doesn't really offer us any real
action or suspense until the last half an hour. Set in various
international destinations, this jargon-filled strategy session set
amongst military folk, nuclear experts and politicians, is the movie
equivalent of a long day at the dentist's office. Warning: There is a
lot of talking in this film, and very little action. The special
effects are limited to one great nuclear blast at the beginning of the
picture, and many redundant explosions throughout the rest of the
flick.
Clooney does okay in his wise-cracking, super-Special-Forces dude role,
while Kidman literally runs through her part like she's in a hurry to
get to London to film Stanley Kubrick's EYES WIDE SHUT with her
husband, Tom Cruise. The rest of the cast just seem like a bunch of
people standing around and taking orders from either of the two stars.
And coincidentally enough, both stars always seem to be right. How
exciting! Yawn.
The last forty minutes finally wakes us from the numbing sensation
induced by the film's first hour and a half delivery (alas, Mrs. JoBlo
couldn't make it all the way through), and does actually deliver some
pretty neat suspense, good action, and a centered point of reference.
Other than that, this film does not deliver in regards to its "thrills"
moniker one bit, and will leave many a thriller fan invariably
disappointed. Mind you, if you enjoy films that seem to realistically
encapsulate the essence of being part of an actual governmental body of
people chasing after bad guys, then you might enjoy most of the
talkie-talkies in this film. I did not. 
 I would like to take this moment to thank those "powers
that were" who did forsake us from the otherwise obvious Clooney/Kidman
cheap romance. For that, and only that, I thank you.   
Little Known Facts: 
George Clooney stands 5"10, was born in Kentucky, owns a pet pig, has
taught actresses Kirsten Dunst to drive (on a golf cart) and Laurie
Metcalf to drive a stick shift, is cousins with actor Miguel Ferrer,
and nephew to singer/actress Rosemary Clooney. He also flailed through
many TV sitcoms before settling into his dramatic shoes at ER
("Roseanne" and "The Facts of Life" are two of the shows in which he
briefly participated).
Nicole Kidman also stands 5"10, was born in Hawaii, but brought up in
Australia, and has two adopted children with her husband of eight
years, Tom Cruise. She is a high-school dropout.
Mimi Leder directed many episodes of the popular NBC TV drama ER,
starring the ever-popular George Clooney, before making her debut as a
movie director with this film (I wonder how he got this gig?).

Title
Review for Shadow of the Vampire (2000)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
PLOT:
Based on some actual events and a healthy dose of make-believe, this story
takes a behind-the-scenes look at director F.W. Murnau's making of
NOSFERATU. With all of the cast and crew on board, the director brings in an
unknown to play the lead vampire. The man in question likes to remain in
character at all times, and ultimately draws fear from others on the set.
The question now becomes, is he really a vampire or just a method actor
"becoming" the part?
CRITIQUE:
A film that is sure to appeal to the art-house crowds more than the mass
audiences, this film gives us a super-creepy performance by Willem Dafoe,
some very cool atmosphere, a unique style of direction and an okay story. I
wasn't bowled over by this story because it was difficult for me to come to
grips with the whole reality vs fantasy elements of this movie. I mean, the
film is obviously based on real people, a real movie and a real movie
production, but many of its elements are purely fantasy-based and made up,
so I was sorta left scratching my head at certain points (if you see someone
grab a bat and devour it right in front of you, wouldn't you "kinda" think
that he "might" be a vampire?). I guess I would have rather seen the whole
film made completely as a fantasy or an ED WOOD type scenario, in which all
of the actual events are portrayed, but this point didn't really spoil my
viewing. In fact, I quite enjoyed the movie as a whole, loved the way
Merhige shot the actual scenes in color and then transformed them into black
and white when the "film within the film" began to shoot, and appreciated
the dark and mysterious mood of it all. But I guess that I might've been
expecting a little too much in the first place.
Critic or not, I am but a person, and that definitely happens sometimes,
especially when you've heard about a movie for such a long time, and
anticipate it so. This is the kind of movie that I, or anyone else for that
matter, will likely enjoy more on video or DVD. It's slow-paced and doesn't
really follow any conventional arc of a story, feeling much more like a
documentary based on the possible events of a film production, rather than
an actual film created to entertain. In fact, the film is original in that
sense, since it rarely possesses any real thrills, suspense, romance, humor
or action, but does still manage to keep you interested throughout (well, at
least it did me). I definitely don't think this film will work for everyone,
and it certainly won't work for anyone looking for a horror type of movie,
or a slasher with blood, etc... In fact, this movie barely sheds one drop of
any blood. It's really much more about the ambiguous nature of the lead
character and the full extent that the director is willing to go in order to
get his film made. Does that sound interesting to you? If yes, check the
movie out. If you're not really interested in that aspect of the film, and
don't particularly care to see one of the most bizarre portrayals of a "man"
on screen in the past few years, that would be Willem Dafoe, I'd say skip it
altogether.
I liked it and I certainly look forward to catching it again on DVD real
soon. And if the Academy doesn't toss Dafoe a nomination for this memorable
role, it will all but assure the fact that they're filled with a bunch of
dodos (since we all expect them to diss Christian Bale as well).
Where's JoBlo coming from?
Blade (7/10) - Bram Stoker's Dracula (7/10) - Dracula 2000 (7/10) - Ed Wood
(7/10) - Interview with a Vampire (7.5/10)
Interview with director E. Elias Merhige here:
http://www.joblo.com/sandiegocon2000/con3.htm

Title
Review for Simpatico (1999)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Many claim that an Academy Award nomination is a springboard to bigger and
better things. In Sharon Stone's case, her nomination for 1995's CASINO
brought her roles in such commercial disasters as DIABOLIQUE, LAST DANCE,
SPHERE, THE MIGHTY and GLORIA. Unfortunately for her fans, this film is just
another piece of dung to hang on the mantle of bad movie choices.
PLOT:
The lives of a rich horse-breeder and his wife are turned upside-down when
an old friend returns with some incriminating evidence to link them to a
blackmailing scheme which occurred about 20 years earlier.
CRITIQUE:
Interesting premise and build-up turns into a ho-hum mystery flick with very
little intrigue or originality, filled with overwrought drama in the face of
underwhelming secrets and characters who behave in ways inexplicable and
unexplained to the audience. Mystery dramas work best when a deep, dark
secret draws layers and layers of deceit, blackmail and revenge on top of
the original cover-up, but this film basically takes one blackmailing secret
and blows it up to be more than what it truly is. In fact, this supposedly
"dark secret" seems to have been eating away at these people for over twenty
years, but according to what I saw in this film, there wasn't really much to
be worrying about in the first place. In fact, the movie doesn't even really
bother resolving anything regarding the secret, save for a few bogus
attempts by one of the original blackmailers to seek revenge on the others,
but even that doesn't really go anywhere. If there is some deeper meaning in
this film about how one's past is always set to haunt them, well then fine,
whoop-dee-doo, good point.
But why waste a perfectly well-established blackmailing background when you
are just going to beat around its bush for an hour and a half, offer very
little intrigue or suspense, and end it all off on a shoulder-shrugging
whimper? What a bust. It's too bad because I was actually interested in this
movie for most of its length, with a definite kudo in the way of the
flashback sequences which helped establish the back-story as the film
progressed. Albert Finney was also a standout as the old man with a sorted
past, as well as Keener who spiced up her cute, innocent role with some of
her usual flair. Of course, Bridges and Nolte respectively stamped in their
proverbial roles as the upper-class dude with great blow-dried hair and the
two-bit boozehound with a messed up doo. And Stone, aaah Sharon Stone, what
can we say? Can anyone say "over-acting" or a cheap imitation of the classic
Jessica Lange drunk? Luckily for her, she's barely in this film, but I think
it's time for her agent to start handing her more of the "sexier" scripts,
since her foray into the world of character flicks, seems to falling flat.
All in all, this film does have a decent premise and solid acting for the
most part, but doesn't fill in enough holes, offer enough real suspense or
give us enough insight into the motivations of its characters to warrant a
recommendation from my end.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Actress Sharon Stone is apparently a member of MENSA, with an IQ of 154. Her
first "screen" role was as the "pretty girl on the train" at the beginning
of Woody Allen's STARDUST MEMORIES. In 1980, she auditioned and lost the
role of Vickie LaMotta to Cathy Moriarty for the Martin Scorsese movie
RAGING BULL. Fifteen years later, she starred as Ginger in Martin Scorsese's
CASINO and received her first Oscar nomination for her role.
According to the IMDb, in 1962 Nick Nolte was given a 5-year probation for
selling fake draft cards.
Actress Catherine Keener is married to actor Dermot Mulroney.
Kimberly Williams plays the "young Sharon Stone" role in this movie. Her
first big break was when she was chosen as the lead in the 1991 comedy THE
FATHER OF THE BRIDE with Steve Martin.
This is director Matthew Warchus' first film as well as his screenwriting
debut. The film is actually based on a Sam Shepard play.

Title
Review for Scream 3 (2000)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Get excited everybody, we finally got ourselves a really good movie in the
year 2000! It only took a little over a month but SCREAM 3 has arrived,
tagged to a solid storyline, bloodstained action, a great cast, slick
dialogue, an unpredictable ending and cameos all around. If you liked 1 & 2,
you'll scream for numero 3!
PLOT:
Poor l'il Sydney has moved to L.A. and isolated herself from the outside
world. In the meantime, the third movie based on her life, called STAB 3, is
being filmed in and around the Hollywood lots. It isn't until the actual
cast members of the film start getting killed in real life, that Sydney
decides that it's time to come back out into the world and face up to her
past...and a nutjob who goes by the name of ghostface!
CRITIQUE:
The end of this trilogy is a solid hit on all counts with plenty of
suspense, intrigue, bloody murders, big boobies and cool in-jokes to satisfy
any SCREAM fan who had been patiently tolerating all of the lame-brain
wannabees over the past few years. This one kept me and my buddy guessing
about the killer the whole way through, and with typical Craven pinnache,
everyone in the cast seemed to be a suspect at some point or another. Of
course, I won't spoil it for you, but suffice it to say that I was satisfied
with the conclusion, and certainly didn't guess it before it was revealed.
It was definitely a much better finale than the lame one that the sequel had
tossed our way a few years back. The cast in this film was another thumb up,
with everyone involved doing their share to make this film as authentic as
any other. This time around, most of the story seemed to center around the
Cox and Arquette characters, and both actors came through on their
respective counts. In fact, Arquette and Parker Posey are both excellent in
this film, with each one coming up just enough laughs to keep things light
between killings. Jenny McCarthy also clocked in a decent performance
alongside her boobs who delivered their lines perfectly while demonstrating
great versatility and range.
The twists and turns in the film were also well handled and intelligently
written, and will likely leave the proverbial scary movie "that doesn't make
any sense" complaints outside the theater. The big opening scene is just
that...a big opening scene, which lives up to its predecessors and delivers
the bloody goods as always. Overall, I guess I am also kind of glad that
this will be the final one because it is a very good movie, and I would
rather remember this trilogy as just that, instead of it turning into a
tired ol' parody of itself over and over and over again. In fact, that's
probably the only thing that I did hold against this film, and that is the
fact that despite it being an original tale set among actual Hollywood
soundstages, the overall framework of the movie is basically the same.
Ghostface wants to kill Sydney...ghostface kills others who get in the
way...now let's guess who ghostface is. Thankfully, they ended the trilogy
on a real high note with this winner.
And contrary to some initial reports, the violence in this film is still all
there, in fact, I got the impression that this installment had an even
higher body count than either one of its previous incarnations...but don't
quote me on that. The pacing was also solid with a little setup, some
action, some blood, some background story, more action, more murders and so
on and so forth. Pretty neat if you dig that kind of shtuff. The one thing
that is for sure is that you definitely have to be a fan of the first two
movies to truly enjoy this one. In fact, I would suggest re-watching them
both before checking this one out, cause this is definitely a continuation
of the story, and many references to the previous films abound. All in all,
this scary movie is the perfect bookend to the successful trilogy that
jumpstarted the teen horror genre back in the late 90s. It's packed with
murders, humor, suspense, cheap scares, pretty girls, hip dialogue and a
legitimately surprise ending. Sound like something you'd like? Well what are
you waiting for then...get out there and scream your ass off! And what is
your favorite scary movie??
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Okay, so we all know by now that the girl who once appeared in Bruce
Springsteen's 1984 "Dancing in the Dark" video, Courteney Cox, married
SCREAM co-star David Arquette in June of 1999. But did you know that one of
David's earliest big screen roles was as "Benny" in the original BUFFY THE
VAMPIRE SLAYER movie, and that Courteney dated the original BATMAN, Michael
Keaton, for about six years? Courteney is also infamous for having been the
first person to say the word "period" on American TV (it was a Tampax
commercial), and David leads the band Ear 2000, whose single "The Race"
appeared on the SCREAM 2 soundtrack, and whose next single "Click Click"
appears on this film's soundtrack.
Neve Campbell recently admitted to having suffered a "nervous breakdown" at
the tender age of 14, which resulted in complete hairloss. Intensive
acupuncture grew it back.
When actor Patrick Dempsey got married in 1987, he was 21 years old. His
bride was 48.
Jenny McCarthy was Playboy Playmate of the year in 1994. In 1998, she had
her breast implants removed.
Remember when the producer of this film, Kevin Williamson, was the
screenwriting "toast of the town"?
Well, the latest kid on the block is the writer of this flick, Ehren Kruger.
He was the man behind the pen for last year's ARLINGTON ROAD (7/10) and he
also wrote the upcoming Ben Affleck thriller, REINDEER GAMES.
Two of the working titles for this film were SCREAM 3: GHOSTFACE KILLER and
the simpler GHOSTFACE.

Title
Review for Lost Souls (2000)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
You can't help but go into a movie like this one with low expectations. Here
we are, up to our umpteenth "devil" thriller of the past two years, and
still, Hollywood keeps churning them out like there's no tomorrow. But with
this film, we have reason to expect even less. It was originally supposed to
be released in October 1999, and has basically been sitting on the shelf
ever since. So is it as stinky as many of the others? Does it provide for
any type of entertainment value whatsoever? Stick around...
PLOT:
A best-selling author has apparently been chosen by Satan to become his
physical vehicle to return to earth. A young woman, who herself once went
through an exorcism of her own, takes it upon herself to try and convince
the skeptic writer of his oncoming doom. Will they be able to save the young
man in time or will Satan come back to earth and kick mighty human ass?
CRITIQUE:
Despite its lame title, general feeling of deja-vu and somewhat slow pace, I
enjoyed this film based on its interesting script, abundance of creepy
atmosphere, grungy look and neat-o ending. Yes, I'm as sick of "satanic
thrillers" as the next guy, but all things considered, this movie kept me
interested pretty much the whole way through, and that's a mighty big chore
at this point. It didn't have any major plot holes, it had a very believable
character in the lead, one Ben Chaplin, and it didn't bog the story down
with all kinds of biblical mumbo jumbo. The one thing that did surprise me
about this film was its lack of MTV-ness. I say that only because its
trailer makes it look like yet another thrill-a-minute, split-second edited,
soundtrack enhanced disposable horror movie, but that is far from what we
have here. This movie doesn't have any fake scares. It doesn't play the
latest "teen band" on the soundtrack and it doesn't feature any nutballs in
masks. It's eerie, features a dark look and muddled cinematography, saddled
up to an appropriately brooding score and exorcisms galore (nice timing on
the release, guys...just as THE EXORCIST is scaring up the youngens in the
theatres).
I liked this movie because it was able to pull me into its world and make me
a believer. Forget BLESS THE CHILD and END OF DAYS, movies featuring name
actors hopping around plot holes left and right. Ben Chaplin won me over in
this film. He turns out to be the poor chap who is about to be taken over by
Satan himself, and as you would expect, he's quite distraught by the
thought. A couple of scenes from this film even managed to stick in my mind,
especially one really great scene early on featuring a bathroom which
suddenly becomes...well, possessed of sorts. A highly stylized film. I
suppose that the story could've benefited from a few more "thrilling"
moments, and certainly been cut by about ten minutes in the middle, but all
in all, this late entry into the satanic world of Hollywood thrillers,
generally held my attention. Winona Ryder, I could've done without, but
kudos to Chaplin for convincing me of the possibility of his dilemma. I look
forward to seeing what director Janusz Kaminski will take on next. Not a
film that will win over the MTV generation, but definitely a decent creepy
thriller that'll keep you on your toes while cuddled under a blanket, late
at night, all by yourself. Far from being a classic, but decent as a
stylishly passable concoction.
Little Known facts about this film and its stars:
This is director Janusz Kaminski's directorial debut. He is best known as a
cinematographer. His previous work on SAVING PRIVATE RYAN and SCHINLDER'S
LIST have won him Oscars in cinematography. He is currently doing the
cinematography for Steven Spielberg's next project entitled A.I. He was also
the cinematographer on JERRY MAGUIRE, LOST WORLD and AMISTAD.
This film was originally slated for an October 1999 release but was held
back due to concern over too many similarly themed movies coming out around
that same time (STIGMATA, END OF DAYS, BLESS THE CHILD).
Alfre Woodard has an uncredited role in this film as the head nurse of the
prison.
Actress Meg Ryan is one of the producers of this film. How that happened is
beyond me!

Title
Review for Deceiver (1997)
For more reviews and trivia, go to http://surf.to/joblo
This film is reminiscent of two other films helmed by brother
writer-directors. The first would be 1996's BOUND (8/10) by the
brothers Wachowski, and the other would be BLOOD SIMPLE (8/10), by the
ultimate in brother-tandems in the film industry, Joel and Ethan Coen.
The twin Pate brothers have orchestrated a solid follow-up to their
first film THE GRAVE, which had debuted at the 1996 Sundance Film
Festival. 
PLOT:
A wealthy, arrogant, manipulative alcoholic by the name of Wayland gets
interrogated by two tough cops in regards to the murder of a prostitute
found chopped in two pieces. Wayland suffers from a serious case of
temporal lobe epilepsy, and has had a history of deception. The intense
officers also have their own demons, and struggle to determine the
truth and the identity of the real killer in this meandering murder
mystery.
CRITIQUE:
Dark, gritty, engrossing whodunnit, with strong performances by all of
its leads, effective storytelling by the way of the Pate brothers
(despite its convoluted plot) and a unique, if somewhat overdone, style
of directing. This film suggests film noir, but with its proverbial
femme fatale chopped in two, I suppose. The entire story basically
takes place in one interrogation room, with two uncompromising cops
grilling a wealthy suspect, but the superior performances by the
actors, the interesting story line, and the unique flashbacks from
directors Pate, make this film a suspense filled, original tale of
tantalizing inquisitiveness. 
It's the type of film that continues to leave you guessing as to the
identity of the perpetrator, even after the final frame of the film has
been faded out. And it's not in the nasty sense of the plot being too
complex, but in the good sense of being able to sit down and discuss it
thought-provokingly with others afterwards. If you are the type of
person who likes to have their films delivered fresh and clean on their
plate, then you will definitely not enjoy this film's unique sense of
serpentine narrative. But for all those who relish the idea of actually
paying close attention to a film, and utilizing most of your brain's
capacities to solve a well-developed mystery, then straddle yourself up
for a good time with this enigmatic confection.
Michael Rooker pulls off another convincing performance as the tough
guy with an attitude, and Penn demonstrates his capacity to act
decently, without having to resort to a swear word every two lines. Tim
Roth does come across as the strongest of the bunch with an excellent
portrayal of a man whose ambitions, dreams and hopes were lost a long
time before his extreme wealth and epileptic condition drove him to
psychologically deceptive distractions. The directing is also uniquely
envisioned to take full advantage of an otherwise dull setting, but the
twin brothers do tend to ambitiously overwork the camera at some
points. All in all, this film demonstrates an involved story line with
many twists and turns, solid performances by its leads, a unique
filming style and an all-around good time for all those looking to
untangle a quirky murder mystery.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Renee Zellweger met producer Peter Glatzer and the Pate Brothers at a
bus stop in the snow at Sundance in 1996. They had just seen Zellweger
in THE WHOLE WIDE WORLD and were so impressed with her performance that
the role of Elizabeth was written for her. Shortly thereafter,
Zellweger was cast opposite Tom Cruise in the critically-acclaimed hit
JERRY MAGUIRE (7.5/10).
Renee took her first acting class to ensure graduating from The
University of Texas with a literature degree, made her film debut while
still in Austin in Richard Linklater's DAZED AND CONFUSED (7/10).
Jonas Pate graduated from Princeton University in 1993. His twin
brother Josh graduated from Chapel Hill in 1992. The duo joined forces
with Peter Glatzer to create THE GRAVE, their first feature film, which
premiered at the Sundance Film Festival in 1996. 
Don't blink because you will miss Ellen Burstyn doing her best
impersonation of a "struggling, aging actress playing a bit part in an
independent production", as she portrays the bookie Mook in this film.
HENRY: PORTRAIT OF A SERIAL KILLER was Michael Rooker's first movie
which was filmed in 1986, but was not released until years later.
This film was originally titled LIAR.
This film was shot entirely in South Carolina, home of the Pate
brothers.

Title
Review for Green Mile, The (1999)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Five years after his directorial debut based on Stephen King's writings
called THE SHAWSHANK REDEMPTION (9/10), writer/director Frank Darabont
returns to the big screen with another prison film based on the famous
scribblings of Stephen King. Unlike the latter film, this one is a big,
long, laborious bore.
PLOT:
A seven-foot death row inmate is discovered to have secret healing powers.
CRITIQUE:
This film is slow, drawn-out, boring, uninteresting, unexciting, predictable
and topped with a couple of one-dimensional "evil" characters. Its only
positive attribute lies in its actors who all do credible jobs and its
message of hope and belief in miracles. The real miracle of my night was the
fact that I did not fall asleep during this straightforward, unimpressive
film about a guy with special powers who we never truly understand or care
about. Of course, much like all other death row cell blocks, this one is
filled with decent inmates who all happen to be "misunderstood", except for
one cookie-cutter crazy guy who is evil personified. And let's not forget
all the guards on death row, who also happen to be angels from the Heaven
above, except for one cookie-cutter crazy guard who is also evil personified
(and is there any reason why there are about six guards when there appears
to be no more than three inmates???). Am I supposed to identify with anyone
in this film? Or even more importantly, am I supposed to give a rat's ass
about anyone in this film? Well, if I was, I sure missed that boat, because
the only thing that I ended up caring about during this entire picture was
the obscene amount of fat that Tom Hanks has been able to burrow under his
loose chin.
Furthermore, there is absolutely no reason in the world why director Frank
Darabont needed to take three hours and ten minutes out of anyone's life to
present this story. In fact, the story is empty within itself. I truly did
not get anything out of the film other than the fact that there is a guy on
death row who has special powers to heal, and we are left wondering if he
should still be executed or not. Wow. How interesting . The plot's
utter predictability is also at fault here with one guess as to whom is to
get healed by the gentle monster in this film (we are told that one certain
lady has a tumor early on in the movie). Whip out those thinking caps, kids!
Hmmm, and I wonder what will happen to those two cookie-cutter "evil" guys
who have nothing in their system but hate and negativity. Hmmmm, now think
hard here, boys and girls. What a crock! I am guessing that this film was
supposed to be some three-hour exercise in spirituality, but unfortunately
for me, it was neither spiritual or the least bit engaging. In fact, it was
one big bore. I didn't see the point of the movie, I didn't see the point of
the story and I certainly didn't see the point in Tom Hanks' big
double-chin. All in all, a bad movie starring some great actors doing solid
work, especially Michael Clarke Duncan as the man of the hour, John Coffey.
Give that man an award or something!

Title
Review for Thirteenth Floor, The (1999)
For more movie reviews and screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
In what circumstance would you deem someone lucky to have been involved in
the production of the critically panned GODZILLA (6/10)? When the
circumstance is such that you are the second unit director on said project,
and big-time movie director Roland Emmerich decides to take a chance on you
in his next producing gig, which ultimately turns into this movie.
PLOT:
A virtual reality program in which one could consciously transport oneself
into another universe is at the heart of this story that begins with the
murder of the man who invented the simulation itself. When one of his prime
employees is accused of the man's murder, he must go inside the machine
himself, in order to find out who really killed his boss and how he ended up
on the most wanted list.
CRITIQUE:
It is very appropriate that the famous quote of "I think, therefore I am"
precedes this film's credit run, since "thinking" is the primary exercise to
which this movie will have you subscribe. To a certain extent, it is quite
unfortunate that this "virtual-reality" film comes on the heels of other
similarly themed ones such as THE MATRIX (7.5/10), eXistenZ (7.5/10) and
DARK CITY (9/10), since we cannot help but compare it to the others, and
depreciate from its originality which is diluted due to its repetitive
ideas. Having said that, I still did enjoy most of this film which actually
starts off feeling more like a BACK TO THE FUTURE movie than anything else.
Its grainy, vintage look also appealed to me, as did the murder mystery that
absorbed its first half.
Unfortunately for its creators, the film does seem to lose ground during its
second half, when everyone and their grandma seems to be moving from one
parallel universe to the other (One dude walked out of our screening
mumbling something about "not knowing what was real anymore"). The only
scene that confused me was the final one which did not seem to make sense to
me according to the explanations that had preceded it before, but alas, I
might've missed something. The actors were all pretty good with Mol and
D'Onofrio pulling off fine dual roles, and newcomer Craig Bierko (new to
me!) punching in his best poor man's George Clooney imitation (Nice 'burns,
tough guy!). All in all, the movie had enough mood and mystery to spark my
initial interest, enough plot to keep it going in the midsection, but
ultimately too similar in story to many of the better films specified
earlier to register in my mind as anything more than a virtual-noir sci-fi
leftover plate. By the way, if it's action or special effects you're looking
for, this film is not for you! It contains neither of the two, but does play
many a mindgame with your head, if that's your vibe.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
This film is based on the book "Simulacron 3" written by Daniel Galouye.
Producer Ute Emmerich is director/producer Roland Emmerich's sister.
MORE COMING SOON at JoBlo's Movie Emporium: http://www.joblo.com/

Title
Review for Virgin Suicides, The (1999)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Okay, so it's been years since movie critics ripped into the Coppola clan
for turning nepotism into a hobby, and by most accounts, ruining the third
Godfather film with the obvious parental choice of daughter Sofia as one of
the main leads, by lead Coppola member, writer/director Francis Ford. Of
course, that's all in the past now, and with Sofia making her directorial
debut with this film, we're all just glad that she's doing it all on her
own. What's that you say? Oops, sorry, the production company behind this
movie is actually owned by her daddy. Oh well, enough about the backdoor
shenanigans, let's talk about the movie...
PLOT:
Five very pretty sisters living under the roof of one really strict mom and
one really wussed-out dad, attempt to live normal lives among the gaggle of
young boys straddled around their ankles, asking for dates.
CRITIQUE:
In one word: boring. In two words: meaningless and boring. And in as many
words as I could come up with: this movie starts off real slow, sets an
intriguing mood, gets semi-interesting when the character of Trip Fontaine
enters the picture, but ultimately draws to a predictable and surprisingly
uninteresting close. I spent much of this film wondering what the heck it
was all about, and when the film finally concluded on that oh-so popular
open-ended "you figure it out" vibe, I was left caring even less about any
of its preceding moments. Incidentally, my thoughts as to the lingering
question of "why"-uhm, cause the parents were cold and unreasonable, that's
why! What a mystery. Not that any of the characters were developed enough to
begin with, most of the boys were just young and horny, all five of the
sisters were aloof and giddy (save for one), and the parents were just
unreasonably strict for unknown reasons (religion I suppose, but why so
strict?). Now whether or not the hidden message in this film had to do with
the "loss of innocence" or the "generation gap", God knows. In the end, all
the film managed to successfully bring up was more questions than answers.
But I suppose there is a certain type of audience for esoteric films of this
sort. Those who line the art-house circuit usually enjoy analyzing the depth
of such films, which on the whole, generate little to no entertainment value
for the rest of us.
Of course, I don't like to dismiss films completely due to their lack of one
or two elements, especially when other elements of the film do hit the mark.
In this movie, the actors were all spot-on, with special kudos going out to
the man with the big...IQ, James Woods, as the nerdy math teacher. Whatta
chump. He was excellent in this film. On the kids' side, Kirsten Dunst
certainly played the ideal hard-to-get teen queen to a tee, while Josh
Hartnett showed that he is more than just a pretty face (and abs...wow!). I
also commend Ms. Coppola on her distinct style, obvious to anyone who enjoys
the challenge of a filmmaker's eye, and the soundtrack, which scored heavy
points, with a special salute of the thumb going out to the sequence
featuring the "Magic Man" song and Hartnett. Well done. But other than that,
the film just bored me stupid. Very few laughs, even less memorable scenes,
and definitely not an "entertainment" film, by any stretch of the
imagination. I suppose that if you're the type of person who enjoys watching
films which don't say much, leave much to ponder afterwards, and create an
authentic enough mood, then this film might just be for you. For anyone
else, looking for an interesting story, an absorbing message or even just a
simple night of entertainment at the movies, I suggest that you skip this
offspring and check out the darkly comedic high school classic HEATHERS,
instead.
PS: I just read Roger Ebert's review of this film (which he loved
incidentally) and noticed how he used a quote from Tolstoy to make a point.
The quote itself is unimportant, but important is to point out that people
who generally go around quoting Tolstoy, are more than likely the type of
people who will enjoy this flick. Of course, that's only my cheezy little
observation, folks : )
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Actor Giovanni Ribisi, who does not act in this film, is nevertheless the
voice of the narrator.
Actor Danny DeVito, who acted under the guise of Sofia's dad Francis Ford in
THE RAINMAKER a few years ago, makes a cameo appearance in this film as a
psychiatrist.
This film was originally titled THE LISBON SISTERS.

Title
Review for Never Been Kissed (1999)
For more reviews and movie trivia, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Have you ever wanted to go back to high school and try to relive some of the
moments that you missed, knowing all of the things that you know now? Well,
Drew Barrymore gets that opportunity in this teenage flick that continues to
propagate Hollywood's love affair with all things young, beautiful and
teen-oriented.
PLOT:
Rookie newspaper reporter is placed undercover in a high school to write an
article about the "kids of today". Having been a major nerd in her high
school days, Josie (Barrymore) tries to adapt to the hip, young kids, but
finds the transition just as painful as it was in her original days.
CRITIQUE:
Generic, unoriginal, mildly amusing comedy, offers very little in laugh-out
loud humor, but does give us several dynamic performances, and some
surprisingly tender moments. Granted, there are only a handful of films
coming out nowadays that offer much in original thought (RAVENOUS (7.5/10)
is one of the few that plops right into my head), but a few wise-cracks
about Archie, Betty and Veronica, do not a hip and unique script make.
Fortunately for this film, it doesn't bore us, isn't too long, and it does
give us a somewhat original ending, with a countdown conclusion that is
definitely unique. Garry Marshall was also very funny in all of his scenes,
but regrettably, he's only in a few of them. David Arquette also steals some
thunder in his role as the older brother, and Molly Shannon has at least one
interesting sequence in a classroom.
Kudos go to Drew Barrymore for allowing herself to look this bad for this
movie (Except in the prom scene, in which she looks absolutely stunning in
that medieval dress). She is the ultimate geek, but I found her character to
be a little too unbelievable and dorky. It seemed like she was made to be
the ultimate loser, but I didn't buy it. I also didn't appreciate any of the
other "geeks" and "hipsters" in her high school, because they were all drawn
out of the same one-dimensional chalkboard that all of these teenage movies
seem to manufacture. And this is despite Leelee Sobieski's solid performance
as the head-geek. Add an upbeat soundtrack, a good-looking Luke
Perry-wannabee teacher by the way of newcomer Michael Vartan, and you've got
yourself another teenage high school movie of the week, with a sweet ending,
forgettable characters, and what seemed like more drama than laughs. Your
video machine will appreciate it, but your hard-earned bucks at the movie
theatre will not. Oh yeah, and if anyone in Hollywood is listening, I think
it's time to start slowing down the teen-flick machine. Me thinks it's
starting to bubble over.
NOTE: One thing that was truly original about this movie was its closing
credits. Alongside all of the names of the folks in the film, a high school
picture of their days of young. Cute, if you dig that kind of thing.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Actress Drew Barrymore also served as the executive producer of this film.
Flower Films is her production company. Her middle name is Blythe and she is
godmother to Courtney Love's daughter Frances Bean.
When not acting, actor David Arquette performs with his band Ear 2000. Their
song "The Race" is featured on the SCREAM 2 (7/10) soundtrack. He is
currently engaged to actress Courtney Cox.
Actor Michael Vartan was born in Paris to a French father and an American
mother. He grew up in the tiny Normandy village of Fleury (pop. 300) until
the age of 18 when he moved to Los Angeles to live with his mother. Soon
thereafter, he enrolled in acting classes and started working both here and
in France. He speaks both English and French fluently.
Garry Marshall, who plays Barrymore's boss in this film, is a film director
in his own right. His credits include PRETTY WOMAN (7.5/10), FRANKIE AND
JOHNNY (8/10) and THE FLAMINGO KID. His most recent effort was THE OTHER
SISTER starring Juliette Lewis.
Director Raja Gosnell's first shot at directing was the third installment of
the HOME ALONE series, after working as a film editor for over fifteen
years, editing both previous HOME ALONE movies.
This is the first full-length screenplay for writers Abby Kohn and Marc
Silverstein. They came up with the premise for this movie while attending
the Master's Program at the USC School of Cinema-Television.


Title
Review for Pushing Tin (1999)
For more reviews and movie trivia, visit http://www.joblo.com/
I was just telling one of my buddies the other day, about how there just
aren't enough air-traffic controller comedies out there, and the next thing
you know, boom...PUSHING TIN! Pretty amazing :) This film is director Mike
Newell's follow up to the critically acclaimed DONNIE BRASCO (8/10) and his
most popular film, FOUR WEDDINGS AND A FUNERAL (8/10).
PLOT:
Ace air-traffic control man, Nick, finds himself a worthy opponent, in
Russell, the new air-traffic kid on the block. But despite Russell's obvious
indifference to Nick's competitiveness, Nick suddenly finds himself obsessed
by the man's enigmatic superiority, and slowly begins to lose grasp of his
professional and personal life.
CRITIQUE:
Entertaining film that includes many funny moments, a roll of great actors
in top form, an original profession to dissect in air-traffic control, and
an overall feel of nothingness once finished viewing. I only saw this film a
couple of hours ago, and already, I don't remember much about it. That's
just the kind of movie it is. No huge moments, no huge laughs, but enjoyable
enough to see, and recommended on an even higher level on video. Now despite
its two-hour time clock, this movie never left me bored, and offered a great
mano-a-mano showing between the spry and cocky Cusack character, and the
cool and distant Thornton character. In fact, Billy Bob Thornton is the one
who really made this movie fun for me to watch. His character's ability to
thrive coolly under all of the pressure impressed upon him, was both
hilarious and inspiring to behold.
Kudos to Cate Blanchett for taking on a completely different role from her
previously Oscar-nominated turn as the Queen of England (She plays a perfect
Italian New York housewife in this one), and Angelina Jolie's breasts, who
put forth some of the greatest work by breasts in a film since the Jennifer
Tilly performances in BRIDE OF CHUCKY (7.5/10). I personally see a great
future for her pompons in the movie industry, especially when you consider
that they are attached to a truly great actress in her own right :) Cusack
is Cusack and jives perfectly as the fast-talking, smartass control man, who
eventually loses all control. The ending of this film was a tad cheesy, but
in a nutshell, its basic message expressed a need for external stimuli in
certain relationships, in order to jumpstart any stalled emotions. You'll
enjoy this movie if you're looking for something funny and less filling,
with an interesting insight into a profession that you don't know much
about, some fine actors, and a unique and humorous performance from Billy
Bob Thornton.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Coming soon to JoBlo's Movie Emporium (http://www.joblo.com/)

Title
Review for Messenger: The Story of Joan of Arc, The (1999)
MESSENGER: THE STORY OF JOAN OF ARC
RATING: 6 /10 --> Barely recommendable
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Director Luc Besson decided to give the lead role of Joan of Arc to a lesser
known actress named Milla Jovovich, a woman probably best known for her part
in Besson's own ode to science-fiction called THE FIFTH ELEMENT. A balsy
move on his part, especially when you consider the big budget of this movie,
but one which we could all respect, considering the director's obvious
support for unproven talent. Oops, did I say "obvious support for unproven
talent"...I meant, obvious support for his wife! They were a married couple
during the filming of this movie, but separated soon thereafter. Oh
well...on to the review.
PLOT:
Young, religious, carefree French girl turns into a confident, focused young
adult who feels the hand of God leading her into battle with the English in
the early 1400s. After confronting the soon-to-be King of France with her
visions from above, he allows her to fight his war and reap the rewards
thereof. Soon thereafter, Joan is left to waddle with the voices inside her
head whose divinity suddenly come into question.
CRITIQUE:
Stylish, overlong, uneven, ambitious battle drama features some excellent
fight sequences, good performances by all involved (except Dustin Hoffman as
Dustin Hoffman in a robe) and a lagging third act which essentially turns
the story of a heroine fighting the battle of the good, into a psychological
drama about whether or not Joan was just cooky! This film starts off slow
with Besson spending too much time on Joan's revelations, while drowning us
with his usual panache for the stylish shots. Unlike others, I personally
didn't mind the modernization of this tale and actually started enjoying
myself once Joan led her willing army into battle. I was however torn
between how I should feel about Joan as Besson presents her to us as a
strong-minded, confident, fighter woman while allowing his lead actress to
portray her as a constantly teary-eyed, confused, schitzo with a supposed
plan. I wanted to feel for her, but eventually, I just lost any compassion
for her within all the confusion of her character.
Mrs. JoBlo disagreed with me and wholeheartedly enjoyed this film. She
thought the character of Joan was shown in all her strengths and weaknesses,
lending a stronger credibility to her persona. I did not see that. I wished
that Besson would have stuck to one story line in this picture, instead of
forcing us to withstand his own interpretation of what might've happened, in
that, Joan might just have been a psychologically disturbed woman with a
penchant for the grandiose. The film basically just ran too long for me with
the last act dragging the whole show to a standstill. Were they just voices
in her head? Will they allow her to confess her sins? Whatever. Seemed like
another movie altogether. I think I'm being harder on this picture because I
truly was enjoying its middle half with a female heroine strong enough in
her will to kick any Hollywood bullcrap action star in the balls and walk
away with her head up high. Jovovich also played her part very well,
considering the struggles within herself that Besson's script needed her to
portray. I personally would rather not have seen so much of her schitzo
side, which I believed to take away from the film's momentum, and would have
cut about thirty minutes from its length, but all in all, some cool battle
scenes, a hip but confusing lead character, great direction and just too
much esoteric psycho-babbling.
Some may like it for its battles and dislike its conscience-grinding
moments, others may like its head games and dislike its fight scenes. If
you're lucky, you'll like them both, but if you're not lucky, well...this
movie just ain't for you.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Director Luc Besson's formative years were spent following his parents,
scuba diving instructors, around the world. His early life was entirely
aquatic, which explains his 1988 film LE GRAND BLEU, dedicated to the deep
blue sea. Word on the street is that he wrote the draft scripts for that
film and THE FIFTH ELEMENT during his days in high school. Ironically, he
planned on becoming a marine biologist specializing in dolphins until a
diving accident at the age of seventeen rendered him unable to dive any
longer. He then got into film, and the rest as they say, is history.
Milla Jovovich's middle name is Natasha. She was born in Kiev, Ukraine and
started modeling when she was only nine years old. She is also a singer and
was married and divorced at the age of eighteen to actor Shawn Andrews, her
co-star in 1993's DAZED AND CONFUSED.
Actress Faye Dunaway was married to Peter Wolf, member of the J. Geils Band,
from 1975 to 1979.
Co-screenwriter Andrew Birkin also plays a role in this film as Talbot.

Title
Review for Mad City (1997)
John Travolta third movie role of 1997 saw him playing the part of an
underdog schmuck caught up in the high stakes game of news, media and
ratings. 
PLOT:
Recently fired employee Sam Baily returns to his ex-place of work, the
museum, to attempt to get his job back. When his ex-employer doesn't
cooperate, he takes matter into his own hands by holding her, and
several kids visiting the museum, hostage. A predatorial reporter named
Max Brakett is also held hostage by Baily, and attempts to weave his
sincere concerns into an extravagant news story to his benefit. 
CRITIQUE:
This film wasn't really as bad as it was just plain boring. The film
goes on for a little under two hours, with nothing new to add to the
dozens of hostage films that Hollywood has spewed out over the years.
Yes, it does attempt to show us how harmful the media can be in many
such situations, but then again, don't we hear about that crap on the
nightly news every other evening? The umpteen shots of a "stampede" of
reporters/cameramen leaping onto innocent victims of a news story also
got boring quick (we get the point, Costa...). I also remember this
film being marketed as a "suspense, but trust me when I tell you there
ain't much suspense here, kids. Nothing new was learned by JoBlo, and
nothing original was attempted by veteran director Costa-Gavras. A
rehash of a rehash of a rehash. If you really want to see a great
hostage picture, go out and rent DOG DAY AFTERNOON (8/10) starring a
young Alfonso Pacino, and get ready for some nacho-chewing fun!
John Travolta actually surprised me in this film, by delivering an
excellent rendition of an unemployed, dumb, nervous Joe Everyguy. Never
thought he could pull it off with his extreme popularity as a
personality, but he did. Hoffman didn't surprise me one bit in this
film, and seemed to be walking through his role as the roving reporter.
I did however notice the beautiful eyes of Mia Kirshner of EXOTICA
(6.5/10) fame. 'Tis to note that JoBlo once had a crush on Mia while
she attended his alma matter in Montreal, and even thought about
meeting her in a hallway one day, and asking her out for a coffee.
'Twas not to be.
Overall, I wouldn't recommend this movie to anyone who has already seen
any other hostage picture. Nothing in this movie will surprise or
impress you. Its title spurts the flow of unoriginality, and it's
downhill from there. If you're a big Travolta fan, or you dig the way
he sported his sideburns in this flick (admittedly, I also dug the
burns), then by all means, rent it with your friends, and count the
number of things that you've already seen in other, better movies. If
not, then rent the film I recommended earlier, or for a funnier, more
upbeat hostage film, go out and rent another "dumb guy taking people
hostage" film titled CADILLAC MAN, and starring the sporadically-funny
Robin Williams. But don't ever say that I never warned you about this
film.
Little Known Facts: 
Travolta has married fellow actress Kelly Preston (JERRY MAGUIRE
7.5/10) twice. Their first wedding on 5 September 1991, by a French
Scientologist minister, was declared illegal. The couple met during the
filming of THE EXPERTS. Their son Jett was conceived during a weekend
at Demi Moore and Bruce Willis' house.
Richard Gere practically owes his film career to Travolta. Travolta
turned down the leads for DAYS OF HEAVEN, AMERICAN GIGOLO and AN
OFFICER AND A GENTLEMAN, all of which subsequently went to Gere.
Dustin Hoffman was paid $17,000 to star in his breakthrough hit THE
GRADUATE (6/10), and stands 5"5.
Alan Alda's real name is Alphonso Joseph D'Abruzzo.

Title
Review for My Giant (1998)
Michael Lehmann's follow-up to the funny and touching THE TRUTH ABOUT
CATS AND DOGS (7.5/10) doesn't come close to that film, or his
directorial debut of HEATHERS (8/10), one of JoBlo's personal
favourites. Crystal is also credited as one of the people who came up
with the "story" for this film.
PLOT:
Fast-talking agent from New York (Crystal) gets his life saved by a
gigantic man in Romania (Muresan) and decides to bring him back to
America for a shot at success in the world of entertainment.
CRITIQUE:
This film is anything but a comedy. Yes, it does have some funny
scenes. Yes, it does feature Billy Crystal, the successful host of the
Oscars, cracking us up from year to year. But no, unfortunately for all
those going into this film expecting a yuck-fest...'tis not to be, my
friends. This film is rooted in sentimentality and the manipulation of
emotions (in its characters and for the audience). Most of the film
involved a sub-plot about the "giant" coming to America to find his
long-lost love (nothing funny about that), and the fact that he may
have some health problems (nothing funny about that either).
As a general film, it does work on some emotional levels, but as a
comedy, it is definitely not something you would recommend to your
friends for a "good laugh". Muresan is excellent as the puppy-eyed
"giant" who doesn't want nor need much out of life. Crystal is generic
as usual, and does little to distinguish his character from every other
neurotic, wise-cracking Jewish yuppie that he's played over the years
(Did I just describe Crystal as a "person" or his "character"? Too
close to call. I guess the man's acting abilities don't necessarily
stretch from his own persona). Funny at times, overly sentimental at
others.
Overall, the movie doesn't deliver many laughs (one unique scene
featuring the real Steven Seagal is pretty cool, and pretty big on
Seagal's part, as the scene essentially makes fun of him-word on the
street is that Seagal originally turned the part down, but after
hearing that Van Damme might take it, he curiously reconsidered), has a
disappointing ending, and seems to use Muresan's pure innocence and
naivet to garner emotional attachment from the audience (worked a
little bit, but after a while....). The good points, well, not too
many, but I guess I was never really bored or angry during the entire
screening, so that's a plus. A flaccid recommendation indeed.
Little Known Facts: 
The film is dedicated to Andre. That's "Andre the Giant" to the laymen.
A scene featuring Mr. Muresan having to drink wine to get "tipsy", and
being hauled onto a horse by a crane, is based on an actual occurence
during the filming of Rob Reiner's PRINCESS BRIDE (8/10), when Andre
the Giant also ran into some problems attempting to mount a horse.
Billy Crystal stands 5"8, while Muresan towers at 7"7. Muresan's mom
was 5"7 and his dad was only 5"9. He wears a size 19 shoe, and plays
professional basketball in the NBA with the Washington Wizards.
Billy Crystal once studied film and television direction at NYU,
partially under the tutelage of filmmaker Martin Scorsese (TAXI DRIVER
8/10, GOODFELLAS 9/10 ).


Title
Review for Fly, The (1986)
For more reviews and trivia, go to http://surf.to/joblo
Canadian director David Cronenberg remakes the original 1958 Vincent
Price semi-classic film and warns all audiences to "Be afraid...be very
afraid." This film was followed by a supposedly lame sequel, FLY II,
starring the omnipresent Eric Stoltz, and directed by the man who won
the "Best Makeup" Oscar for this film, Chris Walas.
PLOT:
Cooky & brainy scientist invents a method of teleportation, wherein a
human being could be transported from one place to another in a matter
of seconds. While testing his own invention, el geeko scientist does
not notice the presence of an insect in his transportation pod, and
soon finds himself fusing into an amalgamate of two living creatures.
Geena Davis plays the roving reporter who begins to follow the story on
the grounds of historical posterity, but ultimately maintains her
interest by the strength of her love.
CRITIQUE:
Creepy, moody, and downright gory science-fiction horror flic that
generates many moments of utter disgust, revulsion, pleasure and
sympathy. This film was wonderfully stylized by Cronenberg, with a true
feel for the life of this poor soul, and the solitude that roomed with
his extreme intelligence. Goldblum seems to have finally found a place
for his stammering acting bit, and works wonderfully as the goofy, and
wildly intelligent, scientist with a plan. He brings caring to the
character, and allows you to give a crap about his future.
This film does actually contain a few extremely graphic scenes of
ickiness (which Mrs. JoBlo could've done without), and worked as a
complete slithering piece of pulp-sci-fiction. Many horror and
science-fiction movies have a tendency to overplay their fiction, while
dismissing the reality check that audiences look for in a credible
film. But this film moves along at a decent pace, always keeps you
informed on what and why everything is going on, and eventually turns
into a wild make-up fest that truly does make you feel and sympathize
with the Goldblum character (The horror, the horror!!).
Having said that, if nachos are your game for this one, I suggest you
salsa down during the first thirty minutes or so, because soon
thereafter, many of the gory scenes make their move. All in all, this
film does still manage to creep you out after all these years, with
kudos going out to Cronenberg's grisly mood setting, Goldblum's kickass
performance, the incredible makeup job and the solid plotline that
makes us all want to believe in this unbelievable scenario set forth by
this man.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Director Cronenberg has a small cameo in this film as the gynecologist
who delivers a "baby". He also had a small cameo as the "man at the
lake" in Gus Van Sant's TO DIE FOR (6.5/10) starring the ever-white
Nicole Kidman. He has frequent references to ``the flesh'' in his
films, and often uses explicit carnage. 
This film won an Academy Award for "Best Makeup" at the 1987 Oscar
ceremonies.
Jeff Goldblum and Geena Davis met on the set of this film, and fell in
love. They got married in 1987, and got divorced in 1990. Jeff stands
6'4 and his middle name is Lynn. Geena stands 6', her real name is
Virginia Davis, she speaks Swedish and is a proud member of MENSA
(Private club gathering smart people with extremely high IQ's.)
Ex-boxer George Chuvalo has a small part as the arm wrestler Marky in
the bar.

Title
Review for Johnny Mnemonic (1995)
For more movie reviews and screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
PLOT:
Set in the future, a courier has uploaded some data into a "hard drive" that
resides in his head, and must now escape the bad guys who are after that
very important information. Since he overloaded his "hard drive", he's also
racing against the clock before the information seeps into his brain and
kills him.
CRITIQUE:
Incoherent, boring, one-act drivel with no suspense, horribly unbelievable
futuristic environment, bad dialogue, career-defining bad acting by Keanu
Reeves and a hilarious ending. It's too bad because the premise of the film
was interesting, but unfortunately for my friends and I, this movie turned
out to be just as bad as everyone had warned us. It's one of those films
that makes you start laughing half-way through, when you realize that most
of the actors in it suck, the location shots are filmed in dark "junkyard"
type areas which they would like to have us believe to be futuristic
(whatever...), and all the sets look like....well, sets. There is also
absolutely no arc to this story. It basically starts off with Keanu
uploading info into his brain, and then a bunch of folks chasing him from
place to place until a laughable ending puts a stop to the former uneventful
proceedings. Gibson should stick to writing novels and "X-Files" episodes,
since his segue into the paranormal TV series was much more entertaining
than any of this garbage.
Some other hilarities of this film include Dolph Lundgren as some futuristic
Jesus character whose supposed to kick ass, Henry Rollins as a pumped-up
cyber-doctor or something, and Ice-T as some kind of a hobo dude with paint
all over his face (Don't ask). The ending is the funniest with some robot
dolphin and a stupid ghost-lady from inside the computer doing some stuff
that no one really cares about by that point. I'm ashamed to say this film
was shot in my hometown of Montreal, Canada, but sadly enough for us all, it
was. Some of the cyber-travelling special effects were okay (Hence, the
2/10), but overall, it's one of those bad movies that's just funny to watch
and cringe at. Thankfully for Keanu, he redeemed his sci-fi career with
1999's THE MATRIX (7.5/10). It's too bad that he has yet to redeem his lack
of acting talent.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
As of 1999, director Robert Longo never directed another full-feature film.
Hmmm...now isn't that odd? :)
Writer William Gibson immigrated from the US to Canada in 1968, after being
rejected for the draft. He lived in Toronto at first, but since 1972, has
made Vancouver his home. His 1984 novel "Neuromancer" and its sequels 1986's
"Count Zero" and 1988's "Mona Lisa Overdrive" are generally considered to be
the definitive works of the "cyberpunk" science-fiction sub-genre.
This film garnered Keanu Reeves a nomination in the "Worst Actor" category
in the 1996 Razzie Awards.

Title
Review for Jane Austen's Mafia! (1998)
For more reviews and movie trivia, visit http://www.joblo.com/
PLOT:
Parody film of mob movies, this picture basically laces the GODFATHER
storyline with that of Martin Scorsese's CASINO. A son of a big-time mobster
must take over his father's "business" after his dad's untimely death. He
does the right thing, and then whisks off to Vegas to handle the casino
business.
CRITIQUE:
Hit-and-miss comedy, scores some chuckles on certain parodies done well, but
falls flat on most of its sight gags, lame jokes and uninspired story line.
This is one of those "stupid comedies" like AIRPLANE and THE NAKED GUN
series, in which everything and everyone is used as a target for a gag or a
crack. I generally love those kinds of flicks, but this one just didn't
muster enough laughs for it to deserve a solid recommendation. And that's
besides the fact that it failed to recognize plenty of other mafia films
which could have made this movie all that more enjoyable to a wider audience
(Leaving GOODFELLAS out is just a sin). As it stands, this film might prove
itself worthy as a weak video night rental for fans of the genre, just to
enjoy a few lazy grins alongside a six-pack of beer (Another plus: It's only
83 minutes long). For everyone else, go out and rent either AIRPLANE I or
II, and prepare to double-over in idiotic laughter.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
This film is dedicated to actor Lloyd Bridges, who died shortly after
shooting this movie.
Originally titled JANE AUSTIN'S MAFIA!
Director Jim Abrahams also directed such stupid comedies as AIRPLANE!, TOP
SECRET! and HOT SHOTS! And HOT SHOTS! Part Deux.

Title
Review for Urban Legend (1998)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
PLOT:
Someone is murdering people on campus in various ways depicting true urban
legends. At first, people don't buy it. Then, people start believing. Then,
people get really scared.
CRITIQUE:
Good little premise with decent mood and a great opening scene, turns into a
muddled "teen horror flick of the day", with plot holes the size of my ass,
and a resolution that just blew away any suspension of disbelief that I had
left over. It's hard for me to describe my distaste for this film's tactics,
without giving too much away, but just let me say that I am personally not a
fan of horror films that leave too many questions unanswered, and this one
had me wondering all kinds of stuff. The fact that the killer wore a parka
in the dead of summer was weird enough, but to show various other members of
the cast with that same parka just for the sake of spreading out our web of
suspension, just didn't brew my beer (Yes, there is actually a girl who
wears a parka jacket inside a pool area. Hello!?!?!?). And you know a horror
flick's lost all sense of hope, when its killer NOT only confesses to the
whole thing whilst torturing a victim, but has a SLIDE SHOW to back things
up. That's right....a SLIDE SHOW!! You'll shit your pants, I'm telling you!
It's too bad because the film had a nice opening, some tense moments and an
interesting premise. And can we please do away with horror flicks in which
nobody in the case believes the main accuser, despite obvious evidence,
signs of foul play and good ol' fashioned proof?? I mean, c'mon people! That
kind of stuff doesn't scare us...it just pisses us right off!! Having said
all that, I suppose this film could be tolerated under certain
circumstances, like a dark, dreary summer night alone in your parka with a
beer in one hand, and a gigantic suspension of disbelief in the other. A
slide show........I still can't get over it !!! hahaha
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Originally titled, MIXED CULTURE and URBAN LEGENDS.
If you look behind Natalie and Parker in the auditorium, you will see the
writer Silvio Horta acting as a college student. Hopefully, he's taking
notes on the implausibilities lined within his own script.
When Paul and Natalie walk into the hidden room in Wexler's office, a puppet
of Freddy Krueger can be seen just before they see the axe. Robert Englund,
who plays Wexler in this film, played Freddy Krueger in the NIGHTMARE ON ELM
STREET movie series.
The book sitting on the desk in Professor Wexler's desk in his class is "The
Vanishing Hitchhiker," which is one of the premiere texts on urban legends.
When Joshua Jackson (Damon Brooks) starts his car before he takes Natalie to
"the spot" in the woods, the radio is playing Paula Cole's "I Don't Want to
Wait" from the TV show "Dawson's Creek" also starring Jackson.
There is another reference regarding a "girl in those Noxema commercials"
which is another subtle ribbing at actress Rebecca Gayheart, who appears in
those commercials. She is currently engaged to her boyfriend of nine years
director Brett Ratner (RUSH HOUR (7.5/10)).

Title
Review for Sliding Doors (1998)
For more reviews and movie trivia, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Gwyneth Paltrow continues to flaunt her knack for a British accent in this
dual role, under the wings of first time writer/director Peter Howitt, and
an original premise that is likely to have you pondering your future every
time you just happen to miss a bus, train or subway ride.
PLOT:
A woman gets fired from her job and runs off to take the London underground.
At this point, the movie separates into two parallel stories. The first
story shows us the life of said woman were she to have caught the subway,
i.e. she gets home in time to catch her boyfriend shagging another woman.
The second story shows us the consequences, were she to have missed the
subway, i.e. she doesn't catch her boyfriend cheating. The film juggles both
stories over time, and clearly nods its head to fate.
CRITIQUE:
Unique concept and plot execution, this movie offers many good points,
including solid acting, a painfully effective poppy soundtrack, humor,
romance, and many insights into the minds of women and the men who cheat on
them. With a touch of anti-maleness, this film is extremely fine is
presenting the male of the species in all of his immorality, and touching
upon many of the clues that women should look for, were they to suspect
their loved one of mowing another's lawn. Mrs. JoBlo actually felt the need
to stop this film on more than one occasion, in order to carefully dissect
yours truly in respect to feelings felt in relation to some of the slimier
actions perpetrated by the aforementioned men. I passed :). And that's the
kind of thing that makes this movie so different from all your other
romantic ditties. This one will have you thinking about the consequences of
many of the smaller events in your life, the role that fate has to play in
your daily rumblings, and your comparative thoughts versus some of the
actions of the players in this film.
Paltrow is charming in her double role, and finally seems to have passed
over her "pouting for emotion" acting stage. But over and above her, the
scene stealer in this pleasant flick has to be the man who swept many away
as the gay character in another wonderful British romance, called FOUR
WEDDINGS AND A FUNERAL (8/10), John Hannah. He's enchanting in all of his
scenes, and manages to lure you into his character and persona, despite his
obvious lack of physical beauty. His gig alone is reason to check this piece
out. The other guy on the other hand, John Lynch, is so-so in his part, and
makes you wonder why a beauty like Gwyneth would ever even look twice at
him. Jeanne Tripplehorn's character is also laughably one-dimensional, and
seems to be there solely as a necessary evil in the plot. Having said that,
the script is admirably crafted and fun to discover, with a surprise ending,
which ultimately, may not be that much of surprise after all. I did lose a
little track of some past events from one story to the other later on this
film, but all in all, this film managed to win me over with its unique
story-telling, wonderful and charming acting, and entertaining plot points.
Warm up those nachos and get in those PJ's, cause you and your lover are
about to have a fun time!
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Word on the street is that Gwyneth Paltrow apparently turned down the Kate
Winslet role in a little flick called TITANIC (7/10), to star in this
British tale.
Writer/Director Peter Howitt also plays the role of the "cheeky man" in this
film. It took him two and a half years to complete the script of this movie.
And not unlike the Gerry character in this film, he also went through some
periods of writer's block, and frustrations, "Certainly there were times
when the laptop would go across the room," he said. "I broke one laptop in
Ipswitch, near Suffolk, in a hotel room. It was really dumb, but I couldn't
get it to work so I threw it against the wall."
Before John Hannah decided on a career as an actor, he was an apprentice
electrician for four years. He gave this up after being accepted by a drama
school in Glasgow.
Actor John Lynch also directed a film in 1998 called NIGHT TRAIN, starring
John Hurt and Brenda Blethyn.
Actress Jeanne Tripplehorn studied drama at Juilliard School of Drama at
Lincoln Center in New York. She was born in Tulsa, Oklahoma.

Title
Review for O Brother, Where Art Thou? (2000)
For more reviews and movie wallpapers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
You gotta hand it to the Coen brothers. Even with the great success of FARGO
a few years back, they have still managed to maintain their integrity, their
quirky filmmaking nature and their innate ability NOT to sell out. This film
is yet another example of the original work that these guys have been
putting up on the screens for close to 20 years now, with an obvious passion
for their projects and very little priority placed on commercial success.
Don't get me wrong, their films surely pay back their investment and then
some, but much like Woody Allen and his successful streak of films year
after year, the Coen brothers seem to make movies primarily because they've
got a boatload of characters to share with the world, and quirky stories to
divulge. Blockbusters are not what these brothers are about.
PLOT:
Set in the South during the 1930s, three men have just escaped a chain gang
in order to retrieve the treasure which one of them buried before his
capture. On the way to their final destination, the bumbling threesome run
across various colorful characters including a fast-talking one-eyed bible
salesman, a black man who just sold his soul to the devil in return for
musical talent, a trio of sexy sirens, the KKK and many other quirky members
of the Deep South personnel.
CRITIQUE:
Another original piece set forth by the Coen bros, who continue to charm us
with their unique knack for poetic dialogue, quirky characters, musical
melodies and eerily authentic looks at the days of old. And despite this
film being a little slow at times, a little too long for its own good and a
little weak in the "romance" end of the story, it still managed to keep me
entertained for most its outing with plenty of peppered one-liners, a great
chemistry between the three leads, catchy tunes and a rock-solid performance
by George Clooney. Now when the heck did he suddenly become a movie star and
an actor?!? Wow. Here Clooney shines as the leader of this pack of con men,
with a twangy accent in tow, a great delivery of his overly literate
dialogue and a hilarious running gag about his hair. I just could not take
my eyes off this guy when he was on the screen. A great turn for Mr. Clooney
(and a nice Clark Gable-ish 'stache to boot). The other two scoundrels also
follow suit with top-notch performances of their own offbeat personalities
as do the rest of the cast, with plenty of fun and engaging moments of their
own. There was however at least one character for whom I didn't care much.
And seeing as the film did run a little too long, I think it would have been
a tighter flick with a little snip here and there.
But ultimately, much like any other Coen film, you either like it or you
don't. I did and despite many of its characters obviously having graduated
from the RAISING ARIZONA school of highly tuned dialogue (just not as
flat-out funny), I got into it and would recommend it to anyone looking for
something different. This film will doubtfully be a commercial hit because
it simply doesn't have much to say and doesn't entertain on a "general
audience" type of level. Its story isn't a grand one and its over-emphasis
on the use of musical ditties is unlikely to appeal to the masses, but the
film certainly will not disappoint Coen fans and/or anyone looking for a
little variety in their cinematic diet. I for one enjoyed the film on the
whole, thought it could've used a little more structure and one or two less
characters, but appreciated its overall creative outlook. I also can't seem
to get that darn hit song from the movie out of my head, so I guess that's
always a good sign. Love 'em or hate 'em, they're the Coen bros and they're
here to stay.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars: (taken from the IMDb)
The title of this movie is taken from the title of the film the director
wants to make in Preston Sturgess' Sullivan's Travels. Homage is paid to
that film via a scene in which a lot of chain-gang members are brought to
watch a movie in a theater.
This film is based on Homer's "The Odyssey" and several references can be
found throughout: The names of George Clooney and Holly Hunter's characters
(Ulysses & Penelope), the one-eyed Big Dan as the Cyclops, the three girls
by the river as the Sirens and the old-man disguises at the end of the film.
Stephen Root, who plays the radio station owner in this film, also played a
radio station owner in the TV show "Newsradio".
The character of Tommy Johnson is based on famed blues guitarist Robert
Johnson who, according to folk legend, sold his soul to the Devil at the
crossroads for his legendary talent.

Title
Review for Mystery Men (1999)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
What you get when take about a dozen name-actors and slap them into a
budgeted $85 Million comic-book movie with Oscar-winner Geoffrey Rush as the
bad guy, and first-time movie director of Taco Bell's infamous TV Chihuahua
ads, "Yo Quiero Taco Bell", at the helm? Mystery Men: The Movie, based on
the Dark Horse comic book is what you get. Is it any good? Well, let's find
out.
PLOT:
Captain Amazing, the popular superhero known to have abolished crime in
Champion City, decides to allow one of his biggest nemeses, Cassanova
Frankenstein, out of the penitentiary, because he is losing his sponsors due
to the lack of altercations left for him in the big city. Unfortunately for
him, Cassanova has plans of his own, leaving it up to several up-and-coming,
bumbling superheroes to attempt to save the day.
CRITIQUE:
Mostly enjoyable and colorful comic-book hero spoof, this movie was not as
funny as I anticipated, but did offer enough original material and pretty
eye-candy for yours truly to be amused during its entire showing. I am also
a comic book collector myself, and appreciated many at the potshots taken at
the comic-book genre (Most of the funniest stuff came from this premise). I
also liked the whole concept of "disco" being integrated into the bad guys'
theme, as well as the quirky special effects and the few surprises tossed in
and around. The actors were all passable, with William H. Macy sticking out
as the cream of their crop, but I did think Ben Stiller could have been a
little funnier. Also, what's with Lena Olin taking that complete throwaway
role as Cassanova's bimbo-du-jour (I still have dreams about here in ROMEO
IS BLEEDING... :) Garofalo was darkly humorous as per usual.
All in all, I suppose they could have done much better with such a parody
film, especially in the humor and action department, but then again, some of
the stories that I had heard before this screening, had me expecting the
worst as well. Geoffrey Rush for one, was a definite poor casting call,
simply boring me as the bad guy. They could have gotten someone with a
little more charisma. And surely the "identities" of each of the Mystery Men
was not as inspirational as they could have been...I mean, I know it's a
parody, but the "fork-guy"? C'mon! Having said that, I think that anyone who
has ever had an interest in comic books, superheroes, or even movies based
on either, will enjoy this movie for what it is: a goofy, wink-wink,
over-the-top, special effects-laden comic-book spoof starring a whole bunch
of name-actors having a blast! Not the best movie I've seen this summer, but
definitely far from the worst. Warm your nachos, and grind right into them,
cause these are the kind of movies for which nachos were indirectly
invented.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Director Kinka Usher is best known for having directed those cute doggie
commercials for Taco Bell ("Yo Quiero Taco Bell?").
Actor Ben Stiller and Janeane Garofalo once dated for about three weeks, but
stopped after they thought that it was getting "weird". They are now really
good friends, and seem to be in every other movie together. They even wrote
a book together called "Feel This Book: An Essential Guide to
Self-Empowerment, Spiritual Supremacy, and Sexual Satisfaction".
Janeane was offered the role of Gale Weathers in the movie SCREAM (8/10),
but turned it down to do a movie called SWEETHEARTS. Courtney Cox then got
her role and SCREAM went on to gross more than $100 million, where as
SWEETHEARTS went straight to video. Her production company is called "I Hate
Myself Productions". She stands 5'1".
One funny in-joke is contained in the line "I'm just a publicist, not a
magician!", delivered by Captain Amazing's publicist near the beginning of
the film. The actor delivering the line, Rickie Jay, is in actually, a
magician.
Greg Kinnear lived in Greece for sometime, and can actually speak Greek.
Paul Reubens (AKA Pee-Wee Herman) was born Paul Rubenfield. He was once
honorably discharged from the Marine Corps, and was arrested for
masturbating in an adult movie theatre in 1991.
Actress Lena Olin is born in Sweden, and had already made a successful
career as an actress before she came to Hollywood. Director Sydney Pollack
rewrote the scenario for his movie HAVANNA especially for her.
The "H" in William H. Macy's name stands for Hall.
Actress Louis Lasser, who plays Hank Azaria's mom in this film, was once
married to director Woody Allen for about three years in the sixties.
Fugee music star Pras plays one of the Disco Boys in this film.
Actor Wes Studi (The Sphynx) is an American Indian of the Cherokee Nation.

Title
Review for Toy Story (1995)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
PLOT:
Computer animated film features a behind the scenes look at all of the toys
which we've had the pleasure of playing with over the years. The story
centers around the main toy, Woody the cowboy, who fears his place among the
kingdom of toys being taken over by the latest and greatest action figure
plaything called Buzz Lightyear.
CRITIQUE:
Cute, inventive, entertaining little toy adventure for young and old alike.
Now despite the fact that computer animated graphics barely impress me
anymore, I did find much to like in this fun story about toys and their
apparent human personality traits and emotions. The fulfilling rivalry
between Woody and the newest toy in the room, Buzz Lightyear, was also quite
engaging, especially with the latter toy paying little attention to the
supposed competition. In fact, the best part about the movie was the whole
personality struggle which Buzz had to endure between his own belief that he
was an actual Space Ranger and Woody's constant reminders that he was "just
a toy". The action and the computer animation in the last half hour of the
film was the topper of it all, while the first half seemed more like a
build-up thereof. Overall, this movie should inspire many small children to
appreciate their lifeless toys on a more serious level (or at least not blow
them up!), while the bigger children, namely us adults, may just be
surprised to find themselves appreciating the sheer joy and childhood
reminiscences which this film aims to incite.

Title
Review for High Fidelity (2000)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, http://www.joblo.com/
I used to be a major comic book geek. I still am a pretty big movie geek.
The characters in this movie are music geeks. But unlike myself, they don't
have the patience to deal with "the rest of the world" who apparently don't
know as much about music as they do. Of course, this type of snobbery isn't
very cool, but gosh darnit...it's pretty funny! Tag that onto the fact that
this film is essentially about a guy dealing with the breakup of his
relationship, and it's sad to say that my life is definitely imitating this
art. Bummer.
PLOT:
A 30-something year old man unwilling to grow up suddenly has to come to
grips with his lifelong inability to maintain any sort of successful
relationship. He decides to revisit his previous relations in an attempt to
educate and invigorate his present state of life.
CRITIQUE:
A funny, original, small tale which kept me entertained me with its laughs
and intrigued with its universal relationship dilemmas, despite almost
losing me with its never-ending conclusion. If you don't like John Cusack as
an actor or a person (is there a difference?), I would suggest you scratch
this film off your list because he is everywhere in this movie! He speaks
into the camera, plays that same guy he seems to have played in half a dozen
other flicks and ultimately takes you through the adventure of his life's
most hurtful relationships, so if you don't like him...chances are, you
won't dig the film. I did enjoy him and his performance in this movie
because of a well-written script which belted out plenty of major laughs,
tossed a few decent "dialogue keepers" out there for kicks, and ultimately
entertained and secured my interest for most of its run. Granted, I had a
major problem with Cusack's girlfriend in the movie, one Iben Hjejle, who
seemed totally out of place, radiated very little charisma, and ultimately
just jostled my attention with her come-and-go accent and inconsistent
delivery. But I digress.
Thankfully for this film and Mr. Frears, the rest of the cast was rock solid
with a handful of "name" actors dropping by for small cameos here and there.
The great Tim Robbins seemed to be the one who had the most fun with his
character, and I certainly shared in that enthusiasm. But in the end, the
movie is about relationships, love, commitment and growing up. Do these
subjects matter or mean anything to you? Have you had your heart broken,
broken a heart, felt like nothing, felt like the king of the world...well,
if you have, then chances are that you will definitely share something in
common with at least one of the characters from this movie. The story is
sincere, Cusack is very good in his role, and more than anything, the film
is actually pretty funny, especially the first half. The last 20 minutes or
so seemed to drag a little, with certain scenarios slowing the pace down,
but all in all, I enjoyed this film.
So if you like relationship comedies with touches of drama sprinkled here
and there, this one should definitely make your "to do" list for the
weekend. Ironically, for a movie that is set in and around a record store,
featuring hundreds of references to music of all eras...the soundtrack was
actually pretty inconspicuous. Strange.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
According to John Cusack and Entertainment Weekly magazine, "no one liked"
the first screenplay draft of this movie as written by Scott Rosenberg. So
Cusack himself wrote a new version, with his collaborators from GROSSE
POINTE BLANK, D.V. DeVincentis and Steve Pink (Two of his high school
buddies, with whom he also runs a production company called New Crime
Productions). "Then the Writer's Guild screwed us and gave Scott credit,
too", says Cusack. Retorts Rosenberg: "I don't want to get in a pissing
contest, but having been burned by the [credit] arbitration, I did some soul
searching and decided to work with the system and get makeup credit."
The Boss, Bruce Springsteen, has a small cameo in this movie.
The film is based on a cult comic novel of the same name written by Nick
Hornsby. One major change from the novel has apparently angered a lot of its
fans, and it has to do with the film version taking place in Chicago, while
the book was set entirely in London, England.
John's love interest in this film is played by Iben Hjejle, a Danish actress
making her American debut in this film.
Lisa Bonet played Denise on TV's "The Cosby Show" and was married to rocker
Lenny Kravitz for about six years. They have one daughter together.
Director Stephen Frears is probably best known for his 1990 overrated film
called THE GRIFTERS, also starring John Cusack, and 1988's DANGEROUS
LIAISONS, an adult version of CRUEL INTENTIONS...'tis a joke! :)

Title
Review for Lethal Weapon 4 (1998)
After swallowing a $25-million paycheck for this movie, Mel Gibson
returns as the ever-lovable cop-on-the-edge Riggs in the fourth
installment of this popular series. This one sees the addition of the
hot comic of the moment, Chris Rock, as well as a script written by
Channing Gibson, and a fourth-time around directing effort by the
ever-reliable Richard Donner.
PLOT:
Riggs and Murtaugh uncover a slavery importation business established
by the Asian Triad. They are bent on terminating this activity, and
predictably, infiltrate and harass the Chinese bad guys, while managing
to support their loved ones (Lorna in Riggs' case, and Murtaugh's
daughter in Murtaugh's) during their pregnancies. 
CRITIQUE:
Fun stuff! This sequel can be considered the funniest of them all,
while still remaining faithful to the action genre which it regenerated
back in the late-80's. All of the familiar faces are back with more of
their infamous wisecracks and loveable idiosyncrasies, while a couple
of new faces, add some needed spice to the ol' recipe. One of the
newest spices, who is playing the ultimate bad guy in this film, is Jet
Li, the latest in the crop of martial arts exports from Asia (see
Jackie "I can't get this smile of my face" Chan, and Chow Yun Fat). Jet
kicks some major ass in this movie, adds some needed intensity to some
otherwise predictable and light suspense sequences, and certainly shows
more potential than either one of the previously mentioned martial
artists in regards to his acting and chop-chop abilities.
The rest of the cast was adequate, with standout performances by Chris
Rock as the funny, new cop on the block, and some funny scenes with Joe
Pesci (although he did get on my nerves at times...I think he might've
overdid this role a bit). Gibson and Glover continue their decent work
as the good buddy cop guys, while Rene Russo is pretty much wasted in
this film, and wears too much make-up.
The plot is very thin in this movie, but the film never gets boring.
There is always something funny or action-packed going on, and despite
the lack of any extremely suspenseful moments (the resolution of the
plot is one of the worst that I have ever seen...), the movie does keep
you interested at all times (especially if you've been a fan of its
prequels), and certainly does make for an excellent conclusion to this
fine series. The martial arts sequences with Jet Li are amazing to
watch, and so is the one long car chase scene in this film, which is a
credit to director Donner, who has actually been able to innovate this
sequence despite its extreme overuse in many recent action films.
Overall, this movie works on most fronts, has some funny and
action-packed scenes, and does deliver a pretty neat bad guy in Jet Li.
So turn off the brain, warm up them nachos, and get ready for a fun
time at the movies!
Little Known Facts: 
Mel Gibson was born in New York, and moved to Australia at the age of
12. He stands 5'9, has been married to the same woman since 1980, and
has sired six children with her. Her name is Robyn Moore, and she is a
former dental nurse. Mel is also a devout, traditional Catholic, who
once shared a room with fellow actor Geoffrey Rush in College. Mel took
up acting only because his sister submitted an application behind his
back. The night before the audition, he got into a fight, and got his
face badly beaten. That accident won him the role.
Richard Donner's real name is Richard D. Schwartzberg, and was born in
NY, New York. He has also directed two other Mel Gibson movies (besides
the three previous LETHAL WEAPON films), CONSPIRACY THEORY (5/10) and
MAVERICK (6.5/10), as well as SUPERMAN (8/10), uncredited for SUPERMAN
2, and credited for THE OMEN.
Jet Li's real name is Lian Ji Li. He was born on the 26th of April,
1963, in Beijing, China. He started training at the Beijing wushu
academy at age nine (Wushu is China's national sport, largely a
performance version of various martial art styles), and won five gold
medals in the Chinese championships. His first when he was only 11. In
his teens, he was already a national coach, and before he was 20, he
had starred in his first movie: SHAOLIN TEMPLE (Shao Lin Si), which
started the 1980's kung-fu boom in mainland China. He then relocated to
Hong Kong, and became one of the biggest stars of the early 1990's
kung-fu boom.

Title
Review for Mumford (1999)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Writer/director Lawrence Kasdan had a hand in penning some of the biggest
film successes of the 1980s. Yes, that's right, he co-wrote RAIDERS OF THE
LOST ARK (9/10), THE EMPIRE STRIKES BACK (8.5/10) and RETURN OF THE JEDI
(8/10). Now with this film, it looks as though he has decided to test his
skills at mediocre screenwriting and bland directing. And guess what? He
succeeds once again!
PLOT:
A man with a shady and regrettable past decides to run away and into a small
American town, where he pretends to be a licensed psychologist to an
open-armed swarm of people with problems. It isn't long before he befriends
the small-town billionaire, folks become suspicious and he falls for one of
his own patients.
CRITIQUE:
This film is not a comedy! It is a drama. I say this right up front because
from the looks of the trailer, you would think that this film secures its
base in humor, but unfortunately for us, it does not. It is a serious film
(seriously flawed if you ask me, but I digress) which offers a couple of
witty quips to keep you awake, but overall, just sits there. Now on to my
review. This movie sucks because it was slow and boring, starred an
uninteresting protagonist with an unbelievable past, included extremely dull
patients whose problems left me indifferent at best and pissed at worst, and
certified it all with many a predictable ending. I have no idea what
Lawrence Kasdan was trying to accomplish with this picture, but whatever it
was...he missed! Anyone without his name could never have made this film
because it is an extremely generic puff-piece, which on a good day, might be
described as predictably digestible. It's no wonder that the studio is
trying to sell it as a comedy! It sucks as a drama, and bored my movie
cohort right to sleep.
I've given it four points on four extremely shallow yet distinguishable
marks. First of all, I couldn't help but think about how much the lead
actor, Loren Dean, looked like a young Charles Grodin. He even acted like
him, save for the dry, sardonic wit. This kept me interested in watching him
at least. Number two, and this one is really shallow (seemed to be geared
that way as well), there were quite a few "titshots", as they would say back
in high school. And God help me if I can't get enough of those in an aimless
drama. And three, and this one surprised me the most, actor Ted Danson's
cameo (yes, he will always be Sam Malone to us real fans!) was the best part
about this movie and actually made me see him as a different person. A
different asshole, but a different person nonetheless. If ever you rent this
movie one day (promise you won't throw away your hard-earned money at the
theaters?!), wait for his scene because it's actually pretty good. Other
than that, drab, drab, drab and drab. Even Jason Lee, a personal favorite of
mine, was left out to dry with lame dialogue and one of the phoniest
romances to hit the big screen in a while. Well, at least he finally "came
out" and did some real skateboarding in this movie! Oh yeah, and I guess
that's the fourth point in my rating.
Anyway, if you enjoy watching boring patients babble on about their boring
problems to an uninteresting psychologist...this film's your bag! Otherwise,
skip it and see ANALYZE THIS (8/10) again...now there's a great shrink
movie!
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
"Three's Company" fans alert!!! Terri from the TV show, also known as
actress Priscilla Barnes, plays a small but pivotal part as the landlady in
this film. The scene is actually a fantasy sequence and does feature
cleavage, so stay tuned, kids! Also, it is to note that the actress was once
named "Penthouse Pet of the Month" in March of 1976. She was known as one
Joann Witty back then. She's originally from Jersey.
Who the hell is Loren Dean, the dude who plays Mumford in this film? You got
me, but all I know is that he was born in Las Vegas in 1969 and played the
character of Billy Bathgate in the 1991 film of the same name.
Jason Lee was born in the state of California in the year of 1971. He was a
professional skateboarder before his acting career took off after MALLRATS
(6/10), and even owns his own skateboarding company called Stereo
Manufacturing Corp. He's been in every Kevin Smith film except for CLERKS
(8.5/10).
Listen closely and you will hear the pharmacist in this film (the ballooning
actor formerly known as Pruit Taylor Vince) make a reference to the "lost
ark", which is obviously an in-joke, considering that it is the
writer/director of this film, Lawrence Kasdan, who co-wrote RAIDERS OF THE
LOST ARK (9/10). Kasdan also played the part of Dr. Green in 1997's AS GOOD
AS IT GETS (8/10).
Ted Danson also played the role of lawyer Peter Lowenstein in Kasdan's 1981
directorial debut BODY HEAT starring a sexy Kathleen Turner and William
Hurt.

Title
Review for I Still Know What You Did Last Summer (1998)
I STILL KNOW WHAT YOU DID LAST SUMMER
RATING:  6 / 10 --> Barely recommendable
For more reviews and movie trivia, go to http://surf.to/joblo
Kevin Williamson-less sequel to the US$107 million original I KNOW WHAT
YOU DID LAST SUMMER (7.5/10). This follow-up features the tightest
shirt in the West, Jennifer Love Hewitt, a dash of Brandy (the singer,
that is), and British director Danny Cannon at the helm, the man behind
the abominable JUDGE DREDD (5.5/10).
PLOT:
One year after the original summer murders in her hometown, Julie
(Hewitt) has yet to overcome her fears, but has managed to move onto
College, a new love interest and a new spicy roommate. After winning a
trip to the Bahamas, Julie and her newfound friends find themselves in
a similar predicament as the psycho fisherman with hook as hand, slices
and guts his way to their extinction. Screams and murders ensue.
CRITIQUE:
The paper-thin plot, the cheap thrills, and all of the clinging wet
shirts that you could shake a stick at, make this follow-up to the
slick original, a standard 90's horror fare without much to get excited
about. Jennifer Love Hewitt returns as the girl who can never seem to
button her blouse all the way to the top in this transparent sequel,
which never seems to take off from its predecessor's solid base.
Many of the killings in this film are pretty obvious, while the plot
seemed ridden with holes. For example, we are never told why the killer
is killing everyone in his path in this one. Or for that matter, how
everyone on the island suddenly disappears within a 24-hour period.
Then again, horror films weren't exactly known for their Oscar worthy
scripts, but this one just doesn't seem to bring anything original to
the table. The dialogue was standard and dull, the acting was there but
not fascinating, and the mystery of the killer wasn't as cool as it
could have been.
Having said that, I did enjoy some of the murders in this film, Jeffrey
Combs' standout performance as the pissed-off hotel owner, and the
continued creepiness of the killer's fisherman's outfit. Also, Mekhi
Phifer was funny as the horny guy who just can't seem to get laid, and
Freddie Prinze actually acts a little in this one. Also, I will admit
that I did not turn away at the umpteen shots of Jennifer Love Hewitt
in her cut-off tight shirts and bikinis. For further analyses of her
extremely ample assets, please visit this hilarious gentleman's
homepage at http://jenlovehewitt.simplenet.com/ who minutely breaks her
success down into a couple of specific prize possessions. This film
also delivered the most rain in any film since the stunning SEVEN
(8.5/10). All in all, it's okay as a generic piece of 90's horror game,
with the cheap thrills and fun kills for showcase. On the other hand,
it doesn't really attain any of the mystery of the original, but then
again, most sequels don't. See it if you're bored and want to turn your
brain off for a while and charge up your woodie, otherwise skip this
limp sequel and munch on some snacks with the original classics SCREAM
(8/10) and I KNOW WHAT YOU DID LAST SUMMER (7.5/10).
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Jennifer Love Hewitt once dated actor Joey Lawrence. She has released
two CDs, "Let's Go Bang" in 1995 and "Love Songs" in 1992 under Love
Hewitt. She also plays Sarah Reeves in TV "Party of Five" series,
alongside the SCREAM (8/10) queen herself Neve Campbell. Jennifer's
bust size is reported to be 36C.
Jennifer also has her own romantic comedy screenplay "Marry Me Jane" in
development at New Line Cinema. It's about a wedding planner who falls
for one of her betrothed clients.
Brandy also stars in her own TV sitcom called "Moesha". She went with
the NBA's Kobe Bryant to his high school prom. Kobe is best known for
jumping from high school straight to the NBA.
Both Hewitt and Brandy have reportedly signed on for a third
installment of Last Summer.
Freddie Prinze Jr. considers his big break to be his four-line part in
TV's "Family Matters" in which he played a punk kid who brought a gun
to school.

Title
Review for Can't Hardly Wait (1998)
For more reviews and trivia, go to http://surf.to/joblo
This film is basically a 90's retread of all the dopey 80's teenage
high school movies from the ultimate of all teenage films, BREAKFAST
CLUB (8/10), to the ultimate in all house-party-fantasy movies, WEIRD
SCIENCE (8/10), to all the geeks and geekettes in the all-American
black comedy classic, HEATHERS (8/10). Slap some Jennifer Love Hewitt
in a tight top into the mix, and you've got yourself a
testosterone-fest of beer, teenage heartaches, devirginizations and
love matches to which you could crack an egg. 
PLOT:
The high school's most popular girl gets dumped by her boyfriend, who
happens to be the most popular guy, on the last day of school right
before the last big party before College. Everyone who's anyone goes to
the party that night, from nerds to jocks, hipsters to poseurs, all
looking for that last real high before their life of actual
responsibilities takes off. Love is in the air, but so is a lot of
alcohol and music. Pour over ice, mix well, and drink up!
CRITIQUE:
Completely unoriginal idea for a film scores points for a great
soundtrack, a solid cast, a decent characterization of most every
stereotype, and a mostly funny, sometimes sentimentally nostalgic look
at the last days of the greatest days of most of our lives. Call me a
sucker for high school comedies that feature house parties, but this
film never bored me through its entire quick runtime, despite its
derivative nature, and generally kept me smirking and interested in the
lives of the characters presented therein. 
For this accomplishment, I must give the props up to two of the actors
that portrayed their characters with the most believability and
sincerity, that being Ethan Embry and Lauren Ambrose. But don't get me
wrong, the rest of the cast was also quite adequate in their roles,
with Seth Green acting out a great fly white-young black-wannabee (a la
Gary Oldman in TRUE ROMANCE (9/10), I might add) but these two stood
out amongst the plethora of cardboard cutouts plastered through most of
this film. Having said that, I think the marketers of the film did a
piss-poor job of marketing this film as a Jennifer Love Hewitt vehicle,
since first of all, she is barely in it, second of all, is not all that
good in it, and third of all, is one of the least interesting
characters in the entire picture. I think they might've gained a wider
diversity of audience, if they were to have introduced more of the
characters in the previews, but then again, who am I to argue against a
set of gazongas?
All in all, this picture is interesting enough to watch, funny enough
to laugh at from time to time, and nostalgic enough to drift your mind
off to the days of old for a second or two. Also, the soundtrack of
this film really blew me away with its eclectic mix of heavy rock, rap
and punk, and any film that has the balls to feature Guns 'n Roses
"Paradise City" as one of its flagship tunes (During one of the best
scenes in the film) is allright in my book! Cameos by Jenna Elfman and
a dead-ringing jock Jerry O'Connell top this tasty tart of emptiness,
and the epilogues of all the featured characters stamp this film as the
ultimate impersonation of all films teenage. 
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
This film was originally titled THE PARTY.
Macho-man Peter Facinelli had a baby-girl with 90210-famed actress
Jennie Garth in 1997. They named her Luca Bella.
Jennifer Love Hewitt was born in Waco, Texas. She has a cat named Don
Juan (She loves Johnny Depp), and also had a role in SISTER ACT 2: BACK
IN THE HABIT.
Some of you may remember fly-boy Seth Green from his part of Scott
Evil, son of Dr. Evil, in the shaggoliciously funny Michael Myers film
AUSTIN POWERS (7/10).
You might also remember Charlie Korsmo, who plays the nerd character
effectively in this film, from his earlier kid roles in HOOK, WHAT
ABOUT BOB? (7.5/10) and DICK TRACY, alongside Hollywood legend Warren
Beatty. He took a seven-year hiatus from acting to have a "normal"
teenage life and finish junior high and high school.
Actress Lauren Ambrose is also a classically trained opera singer.
Ethan Embry is one of the many actors to have portrayed Chevy Chase's
goofy son in the VACATION movies, as he was the one to portray Rusty
Griswold in 1997's VEGAS VACATION. His real last name is  Randall, but
he changed it to Embry because it was his grandfather's.
This is the directorial debut for both Harry Elfont and Deborah Kaplan.
Summer Phoenix, from the famed Phoenix clan (River and Joaquin) has an
unnamed part in this film.
The girl running around with the yearbook throughout this entire
picture is Melissa Joan Hart, better known for her TV role as "Sabrina,
the Teenage Witch".
Producer Betty Thomas also directed the Howard Stern vehicle PRIVATE
PARTS (7/10).

Title
Review for Buffy the Vampire Slayer (1992)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
PLOT:
A dim-witted Valley-girl is chosen to be the most recent inductee into the
centuries-long line of vampire slayers. Despite her initial skepticism, the
girl eventually settles into her role of kicking bloodsucker ass, with the
aid of a salty old mentor and a cute slacker boy.
CRITIQUE:
Flat comedy/horror flick that barely scratches the level of mediocrity in
either genre. Most of the jokes in this film were either recycled or
uninspired, while the horror aspect appeared to be entirely underdeveloped.
Kristy Swanson's breasts helped me ease through most of this film, as well
as the cheesy acting by the man with the beach forehead, Luke Perry, but
overall, it felt like a "good premise gone awry" at best. And even if camp
were to have been this film's prime motivation, it met its mark but only
slightly. That being said, I was never bored during the film (which only ran
for about 85 minutes or so), but felt as though the vampire-slaying scenes
could have been expanded further, as well as the bloodiness of the whole
thing.
Too much time was spent on the high school aspect of the script, which was
essentially a bunch of dumb-dumb kids talking over-written dialogue to one
another. Like CLUELESS (7.5/10) but without the wit or entertainment value.
Rutger Hauer was also the crappiest bad guy, using every single clich in
the book, including my all-time favorite, which consists of talking the ears
of your nemesis, instead of killing them off quickly as you should. Needless
to say, the final confrontation was a perfect example of an anti-climax, if
I ever saw one. See it if you like the premise, Swanson's breasts, Perry's
Caesar haircut, Affleck's two-second appearance, or Paul Reubens only other
real part since Pee-Wee "I love porno" Herman, otherwise, return to your
video store and rent a real fun vampire movie, like THE LOST BOYS (8/10).
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
If you don't blink, you may just catch actor Ben Affleck playing an extra as
a basketball player.
Rutger Hauer was the actor upon whom Anne Rice based her famous vampire
character Lestat. Rice had apparently hoped that Hauer would get to play
Lestat in the film version of INTERVIEW WITH THE VAMPIRE (8/10), but by the
time the movie was made, Hauer had passed the proper age by a decade or two.
The role eventually went to Tom Cruise.
Paul Reubens' real name is Paul Rubenfeld. Before Pee-Wee Herman, he was
honorably discharged from the Marine Corps.
This film spawned the successful television series of the same name, which
has been running since 1997, with Sarah Michelle Gellar playing the part of
Buffy.
Director Fran Rubel Kuzui went on to direct...uuhm...well, as of 1999,
nothing. Screenwriter, Joss Whedon, on the other hand, went on to write a
piece of TOY STORY and all of ALIEN: RESURRECTION. He claims that the studio
changed his BUFFY script, reportedly to make the movie funnier, and
presumably less scary.

Title
Review for Little Nicky (2000)
For more reviews and movie wallpapers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
There are two kinds of people in this world: those who like Adam Sandler
movies and those who don't. I dig his humor, have enjoyed most of his films
and consider HAPPY GILMORE as my personal favorite. I don't believe him to
be the messiah of comedy or anything, but the man makes me laugh, and that's
the bottom line. What I've never seemed to understand is all of those people
who claim to hate him but still go to see his movies. Uhhhhm, what's up with
that?! If you don't like the music, change the station, right? But crappy
trailer and initially annoying voice aside, this film continues the Sandler
tradition of comedy, so if you know that going in and enjoy that type of
thing, you might as well check this one out as well. And if you don't like
Sandler, well...just stop reading this right now.
PLOT:
Satan has three sons. Two of them betray daddy dearest and take their
evilness to Earth. The third son, the shy, timid boy, must now go to Earth
and bring back his siblings before they take over their father's reign.
While in New York, the third son meets a nice girl and begins to feel a lot
more human.
CRITIQUE:
Some of the juvenile, over-the-top, stupid humor in this movie is very
funny, and some of it is not. If you have never been a fan of "Adam Sandler"
movies, don't bother seeing this one, because it certainly won't make you
change your mind about the man or his humor. I personally enjoy most of his
films and his persona, and would rate this film as one of his more ambitious
endeavors, but far from his most entertaining. Add to that the fact that
this film has obviously been written by a few guys smokin' a lot of weed,
and you've got the added bonus of many major "head trip" scenes. In fact,
there are many things in this movie that are just so over the top, that
you're either gonna laugh your head off or dismiss it all as crap on a
stick. A man who grows breasts on top of his head. Adam Sandler breaking
apart and transforming into a million little spiders with little Adam
Sandler heads on all of them. A dog shown "doggying" another dog. For me,
some of it was pretty hilarious, and some of it...so-so. Overall, the film
did entertain me enough to recommend to Sandler fans looking for a little
variety from the guy. Here he's taken his sweet, man-child character that he
plays in all of his movies, and placed him inside a preposterous plot
involving his father Satan, a talking dog and the greatest product placement
advertisement ever used in film! But unlike all of his other films, this one
focuses much more on the special effects, which is why it might have lacked
more of the big laugh-out scenes.
Another aspect of the film which others may not like as much as I did, is
the soundtrack, which was filled, and I mean filled with heavy tunes. Not
everyone's taste, I know. I also really liked all of the cameos in this
movie, and boy, were there ever a bunch! It seemed as though almost every
member of the Saturday Night Live cast from Christmas past made an
appearance somewhere in this film (including Chris Farley, who gets a nice
posthumous homage near the end of the flick), and even some characters from
previous Sandler films. Rodney Dangerfield was tops as the father of Satan,
"Even in hell, I get no respect!" For the most part, I went with all of the
over-the-top stuff, but some of it just didn't work for me. I didn't think
the Quentin Tarantino character was funny at all, and the talking dog also
didn't pie my piper. I did really like the angels in Heaven, which was a
great scene, with kudos to Reese Witherspoon for taking such a small role
and having a lot of fun with it. She played it perfectly. So overall, I
guess I'm torn here, folks. I would definitely not suggest that any
non-Sandler fans see this movie, because deep down, it's still the same ol'
Sandler humor, but I would mildly recommend it to fans of the goof.
One thing that will definitely help you appreciate some of the more
outrageous happenings in this movie is the addition of Mary and Jane to your
person. The film is just soooooo out there at times! But sober or chemically
"enlightened", this film does have enough funny to make for some good times
for most Sandler fans. By the way, am I the only one who is hungry for some
Popeye's chicken right about now?

Title
Review for Men in Black (1997)
For more reviews, go to http://surf.to/joblo
The highest-grossing movie of the summer of 1997, and the film that
most recently (as of the 3rd week of August, 1998) surpassed PULP
FICTION (7.5/10) as the most rented movie of the 1990's, MEN IN BLACK
marked the second consecutive summer in which Will Smith helmed the
summer-blockbuster king (He starred in 1996's INDEPENDENCE DAY (6/10)
as well.)
PLOT:
About 1500 aliens looking like humans, live amongst us on Earth (Most
of them in New York. Who knew?) A top-secret agency called the Men In
Black (MIB) monitor and police these creatures' every movement to
ensure that the public never finds out about them. One day, a "bug"
alien lands on Earth, and suddenly, the destruction of our planet may
be near. 
CRITIQUE:
Light, plotless, easy-to-digest science-fiction comedy that continues
to show off the comedic talents of Will Smith, some great straight man
sense by Tommy Lee Jones, and the hip special effects of the group at
Industrial, Light and Magic. Steven Spielberg executive produced this
brain-munch, while the man behind GET SHORTY (7.5/10) and the ADDAMS
FAMILY films, Barry Sonnenfeld, directed this venture. This movie left
no definable marks on my intellect, but did manage to blow by me real
quick (90 minutes to be exact), keep me awake, mostly interested, and
generally amused throughout its entire runtime.
I was somewhat disappointed in the fact that I had already seen most of
the cool special effect shots in the film's trailer, but I guess the
one-liners from Will Smith still managed to keep me in the game. I also
liked the "feel" of the movie, which was never more serious than it
needed to be. Just fluffy enough not to take seriously, and never real
enough for anyone to complain about the lame plot. One thing that I did
find extremely irritating and overdone, was Vincent D'Onofrio's
exaggerated cramps, cricks and overall disgustingness. If this was
supposed to be funny, it sure didn't work on me. All it did was make me
nervous and feel like itching. Admirable in regards to the actor's
physical capabilities, but unfunny in regards to its cinematic outcome.
The cutest things in this picture were the little "worm" aliens that
spoke in Mexican accents and were last seen carrying cartons of
Marlboro cigarettes through the alien airport on their way back home.
They should have expanded their roles in the film. On a sad note, a
virtual tear was brought to my eye when I saw, the one time decent
respected actress, Linda Fiorentino, degrade herself in a throwaway
role that makes any other throwaway roles look respectable (see Little
Known Facts below to discover her "clever" way of being cast in this
movie.) She delivered her useless lines in a dry "only here for the
paycheck" kind of way, and had no problem showing off her gams for the
duration of the entire picture (Why Sonnenfeld felt the need to keep
showing her hanging from a tree in a short skirt over and over, during
the denouement of this kid's film, I'll never know....well, actually I
do know, but I digress.) Overall, the film is easy enough to watch,
short enough not to have you care about the lame 1-2-3 plot, and funny
enough to make you smile if you're feeling blue.
Little Known Facts: 
Linda Fiorentino won her part in MEN IN BLACK in a poker game from
director Barry Sonnenfeld (I would have forfeited the game if I had
been her.) Besides the part in the movie, she won around $1200.
Chris O'Donnell was first offered the role of J (Eventually played by
Will Smith.)
In this film, the "known aliens" visible on the screen include
Sylvester Stallone, Dionne Warwick, Newt Gingrich, motivational
big-jawed guru Anthony Robbins, George Lucas, and executive producer
Steven Spielberg.
The joke told by K (Tommy Lee Jones) at the restaurant that ends in the
ambiguous punchline, "...yeah, but this one's eatin' my popcorn!" is
the same strange joke told by the stand-up comic at the burlesque show
in 1973's THE STING (7/10).
Barry Sonnenfeld started his career directing porn films. He's quoted
in the January 26, 1998 Newsweek magazine (page 60) as saying that he
was depressed when he heard that BOOGIE NIGHTS (7.5/10) was being made
(a film about making pornos) because he had wanted to make a movie
about the time he shot 9 feature length pornos in nine days. Barry had
been offered the job of directing FORREST GUMP (7.5/10), but declined.
The job then went to Robert Zemeckis who won an Academy Award for it.
Barry Sonnenfeld was the cinematographer on three Coen brother movies
including RAISING ARIZONA (8/10), BLOOD SIMPLE (8/10) and MILLER'S
CROSSING (7/10). Other films in her arsenal of cinematographic
experience include WHEN HARRY MET SALLY (9/10), BIG (7/10), THROW MOMMA
FROM THE TRAIN (7.5./10) and MISERY (8/10).
Tommy Lee Jones received a B.A. in English literature and graduated cum
laude from Harvard, 1969. That is where he roomed with future
Vice-President of the United States, Al Gore, and according to author
Erich Segal, the duo were the models for the character of Oliver in
LOVE STORY. Tommy has never taken an acting class. 

Title
Review for Analyze This (1999)
For more reviews and movie trivia, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Serious actor Robert DeNiro lines up in another one of his
every-now-and-again comedy roles, satirizing a role that he knows all too
well...a mobster. This movie also co-stars every other mafia-looking actor
this side of Italy, and the seriously-looking-for-a-hit-movie actor, Billy
Crystal.
PLOT:
Mafia kingpin suddenly finds himself suffering from panic attacks, stress
and bouts of sadness during his everyday mob routines. He decides to help
himself, by seeing a psychiatrist. The shrink is not very willing to help
the renowned gangster during the week of his own wedding bliss, but a little
strong-arming by the kingpin's "associates", ultimately waives the doctor's
well-rooted reservations.
CRITIQUE:
This is a very funny movie, I mean, it's like...fuggeddaboudit! Whether or
not you enjoy mob movies, this film will have you laughing out loud during
several scenes, chuckling along to DeNiro's infantile blubbering sessions,
and re-appreciating Billy Crystal for the superior comedic actor that he is.
This movie takes a completely overdone film genre, the mob films, and mixes
it into a great script, some super performances, and an all-around good
time. It's never boring, striking jokes at every other line, and confirms
Robert DeNiro's stature as one of the greatest American actors of his
generation. The superb performance put forth by DeNiro in this movie, is one
of the main reasons that it works. You like to watch DeNiro. He has that
charisma, that look, that weighty presence that makes you want to see him in
each and every scene. He even convinces during his ultimate "breakthrough"
scene with his doctor. This man is truly an American acting legend.
The one thing that did surprise me about this movie was its excessive use of
obscenities. Not that I mind that one bit, it just threw me back a little
considering that it was a comedy. Having said that, another reason for the
script to work as well as it does, is because it doesn't overly parody the
mafia folks like in other comedies. It shows them as they are, violence,
swearings and all, with pointed humour laced throughout. This was the first
movie since THERE'S SOMETHING ABOUT MARY (7/10) that actually had me missing
many of its lines, due to the audience's over-the-top laughter. I personally
loved the whole "Freud" scene the best, along with the hilarious remake of a
very famous scene from a very famous mafia movie. Francis would be proud!
I'm actually looking forward to seeing this movie again on video, so that I
could catch all of the lines the next time around. The light tone of the
movie and its soundtrack are additional points to director Ramis, as well as
the upbeat pacing and the solid acting. The film might not go down as well
for non-DeNiro or non-Crystal fans, but everyone else should prepare to
strap on their giggle-belts.
This movie's got an original premise, some convincing performances by its
leads, especially DeNiro in an atypical role, and plenty of fresh humour
sprinkled throughout its spaghettilicious body of fun. Capice??
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Billy Crystal once studied directing under the guise of legendary director
Martin Scorsese (a man Robert DeNiro knows quite well) at New York
University. Crystal is also known to have played the first openly gay
character on a network television series, "Soap".
One of the producers of this film, Jane Rosenthal, founded the Tribeca
Productions company with Robert DeNiro. Bobby received US$8Million for his
role in this film.
Born and raised in California, Lisa Kudrow attended Vassar College and
graduated with a bachelor's degree in biology, intending to pursue a career
in medical research with her father, a renowned headache specialist.
But when she returned to California after college, her passion for
performing also came back. Encouraged by her brother's good friend,
actor/comedian Jon Lovitz, she began studying improvisation, and in 1989,
became a member of the famed Los Angeles improvisational group, The
Groundlings. She claimed to be a virgin until she got married in 1995 to
French advertising exec Michel Stern. She was 31 at the time.
Joseph Viterelli was a late bloomer in his acting career. For more than 25
years he had been offered acting opportunities from producers, casting
directors, and directors, including his longtime friend, filmmaker Leo Penn.
Viterelli declined them all until 1989, when Sean Penn called and said they
were having difficulty casting a character from the Lower East Side in a
film that was shooting on location in Viterelli's old neighborhood on Mott
Street. That screen test led to a major role in Phil Joanou's STATE OF
GRACE, Viterelli's motion picture debut.
CASTING FUN: The roles of Vitti's "people" were filled in a rather more
unconventional manner. "We sort of adopted the Martin Scorsese-Bob DeNiro
method of casting when it came to the Mob roles," Ramis says. "This consists
of Bob and Marty walking the streets of Little Italy, spotting a civilian,
saying, 'Hey, that guy would look good,' and signing him up.
Review Date:  February 20, 1999
Director:          Harold Ramis
Writers:           Peter Tolan, Harold Ramis and Ken Lonergan
Producers:     Jane Rosenthal and Paula Weinstein
Actors:            Robert DeNiro as Paul Vitti, Billy Crystal as Ben Sobol,
Lisa Kudrow as Laura, Joseph Viterelli as Jelly
Genre:             Comedy
Year of Release:  1999

Title
Review for Save the Last Dance (2001)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/

Here's a question for you: why should anyone care about what any critic
thinks of any movie? The answer: well, let's see. In my humble little
opinion, critics are basically just folks who happen to have soapboxes big
enough to voice their opinions onto the world. That's all that they really
are...people with pointed opinions. Opinions based on their own experiences
in life, their backgrounds, their demeanors on any particular day, their
personal preferences, etc... Okay fine, they are generally much better at
dissecting a film's particular strengths and weaknesses than most people,
but still...it's simply their opinion. Nothing more, nothing less (No
offense to critics, most of whom do good jobs, but my point is what it is).
So why give a rat's ass about my review vs that of any other person? Well, I
think it has to do with being able to read someone's review and deciding
whether or not to see the film, based on your previous
agreements/disagreements with said critic. All that to say that we have now
fashioned yet another way for JoBlo's opinion to mean something to you. The
new section is called "Where is JoBlo coming from?" and it will feature an
array of past films which are related to the one being reviewed, with
JoBlo's ratings attached. This is done so that you could read the initial
review, check out his previous ratings of other "similar" films which you
may have already seen, and determine whether or not JoBlo's opinion should
give you any reason to see/avoid the movie in question. Not sure if it'll
help anyone out there, but for some reason, it sounds kinda reasonable to
me.
Hope you all dig it! I know that I would LOVE to see this kind of thing on
all other critics' reviews as well. Let's hope that the rest of the world
takes a stitch of notice and my little idea spreads like wildfire (or at
least, a brushfire). Spread the love, people...spread the love!
PLOT:
A young white girl who just lost her mom to a car accident, must move in
with her dad in a predominantly black neighborhood. Having given up on her
ballet, the girl quickly integrates herself into the local hip-hop dance
scene, with the help of a young black boy whom she befriends at school. It
isn't long before the two get closer, other people get really uncomfortable
with their affection and the girl opens up to said dude.
CRITIQUE:
Surprisingly good. Other than the sucky title and the generally predictable
story line, this movie was actually interesting to check into, with
well-developed characters (for the most part), some fun hip-hopping, a cute
relationship and some tender moments? Yup, God knows I rarely shed a tear at
any flick, but when the dead-beat dad fixed up that room all right, I almost
broke the dam (when you see the movie, you'll understand). Then again, who
knows, maybe I was just a little "emotional" that day. But kudos to this
film's makers for avoiding the general stereotypical ventures of other films
based in the ghetto, and showing us that not everybody is addicted to crack
or busting caps up people's asses. Sure, problems like teenage pregnancies,
deadbeat fathers and gangs exist, but this film actually handles them with a
little humanity, and allows you to see some of the finer details beneath the
typical exterior. A great example is the deadbeat pop who is generally
portrayed as a straight-out A-hole in most other films. Well, in this movie,
and much like in real life, not everything is so cut and dry. As it was,
this film actually convinced me of most of these characters' humanity, and
that's what made this film work for me.
Sure, there is this whole "I gotta make it as a dancer" undertone going on,
which will likely keep the teens interested throughout, but believe it or
not, this film is much deeper than that. In fact, I think the trailer is
selling it too much like a simple hip-hop teen flick, when really it's
actually quite touching. And yes, the whole black/white relationship thang
is also handled pretty well, in my opinion. We see both sides of the issue.
Granted, a couple of the characters were a little stereotypical, like the
super-bitch at school and the gang-banger who can never seem to get out of
trouble, but then again, there are actually people like that in the world,
too. The film also might've wanted to cut out one of its few "side stories",
like the whole "sister having the child without the boyfriend sticking
around" thing, but that would only have been to trim some of the picture's
runtime, which went way past the general benchmark for these types of
movies. In the end, the better part of the film's story and personalities
captured enough of my attention for me to care about the movie as a whole,
and to wish most of the characters nothing but goodness in the end. Mind
you, I could see how some people might dismiss it based on its
predictability alone, but for me, the overall design clicked.
Note to Julia Stiles: Me thinks it's time for you to move beyond the teen
flicks and try to grab hold of some juicier parts. Don't follow the Freddie
Prinze Jr. route, girl!
Where's JoBlo coming from?
Jungle Fever (8/10) - Center Stage (6.5/10) - Dance with Me (6/10) - 10
Thing I Hate about You (7/10) - Boys in the Hood (8/10)

Title
Review for Net, The (1995)
For more reviews and movie trivia, visit http://www.joblo.com/
We've got a hot little commercial commodity in Sandra Bullock. "Good, that's
good." Yeah, and we've got this burgeoning new technological creation called
the Internet revolutionizing people's lives and changing the way they live,
right? "Yeah, yeah, and...?" Don't you see? Glamorous Ms. Hollywood actress
playing the little Ms. Loner character that everyone could identify with, in
a film based on a technology which more and more people are beginning to
fear?!? "It's brilliant !!!!". Green light.
PLOT:
Very pretty, loner computer programming girl gets caught up in a fight for a
sacred disk. She has it, the bad guys want it. As she struggles to lose said
bad guys, she ultimately loses her identity, her reputation and her past, as
these computer pirates erase her whole life via the new technologies
embedded in the Internet.
CRITIQUE:
See Sandra Bullock type real fast on a computer. Cute. See Sandra fall upon
a massive conspiracy to launch unexpected havoc onto the world. Not so cute.
See Sandra run away from the bad guys. Nasty. See Sandra run some more. Even
nastier. Hmmm.....oh yeah, and there she goes running again. Exciting, eh?
Not really, but you get the picture. Close to two hours of Sandra running
along, finding a place to hide for a few hours, and typing some more. It
gets to be a bit repetitive, but you don't know the half of it. She has this
friend see, and he's well, he's not known by the bad guys, and he's gonna
help her out, you know, I mean, he's her only friend, and oops, oh no...how
did that happen? Oh well, back to running, I suppose.
But there's tension, right? I mean, a film like this one sounds like it
could really grab you by the eyelashes and rip your interest veins right
outta you, huh?  Well, yeah, I suppose there is some tension. I mean,
I had to worry every time she ran away from the bad guys, cause I was never
sure if they were gonna catch her or not, and heck, what about her poor
friend, I mean, who knew what would happen to him? One-two-three. Can we all
count that high? Yes? Well, then you've solved the dilemma of this
screenplay (Which apparently took up to five guys to develop???) It connects
all the dots from A to Z, and leaves nothing to the imagination. The musical
score? Standard. The bad guys? Standard. The conclusion...the directing?
Standard, standard! I guess this movie wouldn't really hurt you if you were
dying and looking to kill some time before you knock, knock, knocked on
Heaven's door, but then again, it might just make your journey a little more
painful. If you're really interested in this film's valid premise, and
technology is really starting to scare the beejeezus out of you, well then
go check out ENEMY OF THE STATE (7.5/10), and enjoy a smarter script and a
wider array of stars. See Will Smith run. See Jon Voight run after him. Oh,
happy-happy, joy-joy! Now let's watch THE NET again. There's Sandra typing
so quickly. And running. Run Sandra, run!
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Sandra Bullock replaced Demi Moore for the role in WHILE YOU WERE SLEEPING
(7/10), and Lori Petty for the role in DEMOLITION MAN (7/10), opposite Sly
Stallone himself. She is allergic to horses, and was voted "Most likely to
brighten up your day" by her high school classmates. She's also a huge fan
of Dr. Seuss, and wrote and performed her own song "Heaven Knocking On My
Door" in the 1993 film THE THING CALLED LOVE (8/10).
There are no less than four members of the Winkler family in the cast of
this film. Good for you, Irwin, everybody needs a day job, right? :) Irwin
Winkler is better known as a producer of such great films as GOODFELLAS
(9.5/10), RAGING BULL (7.5/10) and ROCKY (8.5/10).
Screenwriters John Brancato and Michael Ferris went on to write the superb
thriller THE GAME (8/10) in 1997.

Title
Review for What's Cooking? (2000)
For more reviews, screensavers, trailers & more, visit http://www.joblo.com/
If this movie does not get released during the holiday of Thanksgiving, it
will be one of the worst cases of marketing/distribution decisions ever made
by a studio at any time. This is the ultimate American Thanksgiving holiday
movie. Jodie Foster's HOME FOR THE HOLIDAYS was a decent start but this film
basically takes all of the required elements from that movie, the touches of
humor, the emotions, the family issues and multiplies them across four
different cultures celebrating the holiday on the same day.
PLOT:
Four families from different cultural backgrounds (Jewish, Latino,
Vietnamese, African-American) celebrate the holiday of Thanksgiving in
respectively intertwining stories. Many issues are comedically and
dramatically discussed here including adultery, racism, cultural
ethnocentricity, teen accessibility to guns, homosexuality, mother-in-laws,
parental pressure, old school mentality, interracial dating and much, much
more.
CRITIQUE:
A well-rounded blend of stories combine to create an ideal picture for all
families to see in respect to the holiday of Thanksgiving. This movie has
many of the elements needed to create a good movie, including plenty of
humor, dramatic moments, confident directing and wonderful acting
performances. Alongside that are all the elements needed to generate
resonant feelings of Thanksgiving, including the cozy nature of the picture,
the light, agreeable soundtrack, the wonderful presentations of food and
drink, and the ultimate feelings of love and anger shared by family members
throughout. I truly enjoyed this movie because it didn't really allow me not
to like it. It presented me with four stories, each of which was as
interesting as the next, many engaging characters, most of whom shared
issues and tribulations to which I could relate, and a lot of cultural
differences, many of which are universally appreciated. The film is well
presented, easily understood and doesn't overdo the "sappy" stuff.
In fact, that is sort of related to the one thing which sort of disappointed
me about the film, and that was its lack of powerful closure. The film
cleaned up all of its stories by the final frame, but I honestly expected
more of an emotional punch from each. The conclusions were all generally
well-handled, but after spending so much time with each family, I was hoping
to feel a little more from their stories, but alas, t'was not to be.
Overall, the film worked on various levels including its humor, which seemed
to particularly rile up the older members of our audience, and its
characters, all of which were played admirably by its actors, none of whom
particularly stood out more than the others. And despite a little
stereotyping (to be expected since most stereotypes do derive from a little
bit of fact), all of the families were very evenly presented here and giving
more than enough opportunity to ingratiate themselves to the audience. A
perfect movie for the holidays, one that presents a universal theme of highs
and lows of family life within different cultures, this movie has the
laughs, the drama, the direction and the characters to complete its
interesting story presentations. Gobble-gobble and prepare to get real
hungry after seeing this film, as the dishes presented within are quite
droolable!

Title
Review for Pitch Black (2000)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Vin Diesel rocks! Harumph...well, now that I got that out of my system, I
feel it my duty to pre-announce how I enjoy different kinds of films
depending on my mood at times, and how I am generally prone to thumb up the
higher quality entertainment flicks, but also more than open to appreciate
an all-out, turn-your-brain-off-at-the-door cheezefest presentation of film.
And guess what...this film is just that!
PLOT:
A bunch of good folks, along with one bad mutha, fall upon a desolate planet
infested by crazy, alien monsters who hunt their prey exclusively in the
dark. Unfortunately, these folks apparently picked the worst time to have an
accident on this planet, since a solar eclipse is just about to take place,
and the chompin' critters are ready to take a bite out of any human left
unprotected by light.
CRITIQUE:
Vin Diesel rocks! Or did I mention that already? Fact one about this film is
that it doesn't truly stray into any original ground. Fact two about this
film is that most of its characters, mostly no-names, do little to allow
themselves to be given a shit about, except for the "bad guy", Vin Diesel,
who kicks major ass! And fact three about this film is that it includes one
of the coolest opening crash scenes that I have ever seen, is charmed with
an intriguing look of filters, yellows, blues and reds clogging the screen
one at a time, and simply pumps the last 30 minutes with enough tension,
cool alien freakazoids and dark undercurrents to register a "fun time" stamp
on my face. Is this the next sci-fi classic? Certainly not, but it also
doesn't pretend to be, with just enough one-liners from Diesel to vie for a
nomination into the cult movie favorite category of the year. This movie is
pure cheese with a touch of arty pretension, all draped under the banner of
a simple good time at the movie theatre. I thought that it started with a
bang, slowed considerably once they all settled onto the planet, but then
took off again when Diesel and crew took to shelter after the eclipse.
I mention Vin Diesel so often in my review because his character truly made
this film memorable for me. Where else could you see a buff dude with silver
eyes and slick sunglasses run around and knife-fight alien bat-thingies? Not
sure but this film delivers on the Diesel meter full-force! Unfortunately
the rest of the two-bit characters are one-dimensional at best, with a
contingency of Muslims and the proverbial Obi-Wanesque guy simply getting on
my nerves. However, on the whole the film did provide me with enough
thrills, money shots and cool moments with Diesel to warrant a full
membership to the club of enjoyment. The two elements which could have been
improved upon in my opinion, include the soundtrack, which was almost
non-existent and the quality of the rest of the characters in the crew. I
assume that this flick was on a low budget, but that doesn't really justify
the exclusion of any other interesting characters from the mix. But don't
cry for me Argentina, cause all in all the movie delivers its punches on the
targets of its choice, which include the fun special effect-laden aliens,
the slick stylings of director Twohy and the charismatic performance by Vin.
So if this "type" of film is your schtick, then wait no longer to catch this
dark son-of-a-gun in the theatres right now. But if you're looking for
something a little different and more intellectual, I suggest that you wait
a little longer and check into the two Mars movies still to come later on
this year. Either way, Vin Diesel rocks!
And if not for anything else, just see this movie in order to witness a
character go mano-a-mano with a friggin' alien! Very cool!
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
This film was originally titled NIGHTFALL.
So who the heck is Vin Diesel, you might be asking yourself? Well, you might
remember him from a small role that he had during the first 30 minutes of
SAVING PRIVATE RYAN (8/10) as Private Adrian Caparzo, his deep voice, which
was used as that of THE IRON GIANT (5/10) and his more recent role in BOILER
ROOM (7.5/10), a film which ironically opened on the same day as this film.
He's also written and directed two films of his own, MULTI-FACIAL and
STRAYS, which were screened at the 1995 Cannes Film Festival and 1997
Sundance Film Festival respectively. Not too shabby for a 32-year old.
No surprise is the fact that the "lead" lady in this film, played by Radha
Mitchell, hails from Australia. My buddy and I noticed an accent come and go
during the movie, which made us suspicious to this little known fact.
If any of you are wondering where the heck David Twohy, the director of this
film, comes from, well it's actually a pretty short resume. This is only his
second directing gig, his first being the under-achieving THE ARRIVAL
(7.5/10) with Charlie Sheen, and he is mainly known as a screenwriter to
such films as G.I. JANE (6.5/10), WATERWORLD, THE FUGITIVE and CRITTERS 2?
Yup.
The Wheat brothers, who are two of the writers of this film, also have a
sorted background writing unmemorable sci-fi and horror flicks including
SILENT SCREAM, AFTER MIDNIGHT, FLY II and IT CAME FROM OUTER SPACE II.

Title
Review for Austin Powers: International Man of Mystery (1997)
AUSTIN POWERS: INTERNATIONAL MAN OF MYSTERY
RATING: 7.5 / 10 --> Very good movie
For more reviews and movie trivia, visit http://www.joblo.com/
A few leans years after ingratiating such popular sayings as "schwing" and
"party on" into our modern-day American lexicon, real-life Canuck Mike Myers
returns to the big screen with another original shagadelic tale of unhip hip
characters with unique styles, tastes and one-liners of their own.
PLOT:
Austin Powers, the international man of mystery and hipster extraordinaire,
cryogenically freezes himself for 30 years in order to follow his nemesis,
Dr. Evil, through his frozen path into the year 1997. In the future, both
men soon discover that the simpler times of the 60s has been replaced by the
rapid-paced lifestyles of the 90s.
CRITIQUE:
In the infamous words of Dr. Evil, with his pinky finger diabolically
strangling off his mouth, this movie is frickin' clever, man...no need to
throw anyone a bone here, man! It's got plenty of kitchy-retro style, a
groovy soundtrack, a handful of over-the-top but humorous characters, Mike
Myers, who plays both of his characters brilliantly, and a sexy Elizabeth
Hurley, purring her way through one of the most purposely overdone and
sexist scripts ever to hit the big screen. I personally didn't find any
particular scenes laugh out loud funny, but did appreciate almost all the
humor in this film, which placed its tongue deep inside the cheek of our
favorite James Bond spy flicks from that era.
Will everyone like it? Certainly not. This film will only appeal to those
swingers that are "in on the joke" and who could appreciate such low-brow
entertainment tactics as jokes featuring penis-enlargement pumps and a man
peeing for close to a minute...on-screen. All in all, I was taken in by this
film's utter originality, unique dialogue, smashing characters,
self-deprecating attitude and Mike Myers' superb performances as both Austin
Powers and Dr. Evil. But most of all, I was taken in by this film's
infectious enthusiasm, which should lasso in most open-minded lovers of
Myers' earlier forays into the World of Wayne. The rest of you could either
take it or shag it, baby! Now does that make you horny??
My favorite line came by the way of Austin Powers himself: "Do you like to
wash up a bit before? Personally, before I'm on the job I like to give me
undercarriage a bit of a "How's your father."
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
This film contains two major cameos by actress Carrie Fisher, better known
to some as Princess Leia, and big goof Tom Arnold, better known to some as
the big goof. Other much smaller cameos include Will Ferrell (as Mustafa),
Cheri Oteri (as Flight attendant), Susanna Hoffs (ex-Bangle singer as Ming
Tea Member-note that she is married to the director of this film, Jay
Roach), Rob Lowe (as friend of Security Guard), Christian Slater (as Easily
Fooled Security Guard) and Matthew Sweet (as Ming Tea Member). Model/major
babe Cindy Margolis also plays one of the Fembots in this movie.
Mike Myers won two 1998 MTV Movie Awards for this film. One for the Best
Dance Sequence for "Some London Citizens", to which he dedicated his award
to his recently deceased friend Phil Hartman, and Best Villain, for his
portrayal of Dr. Evil.
One of the producers of this film is none other than the ex-wife of actor
Bruce Willis, and popular actress in her own right, Demi Moore.
In one sequence, a fashion photographer shoots '60s fashions, and the
clothes, which look like outlandish science-fiction fantasies, are in fact
identical to costumes worn during posing sessions in Michelangelo
Antonioni's 1966 film BLOW UP. The tuneful ring of Austin's picturephone is
the same as the hotline phone in the 1965 film OUR MAN FLINT.
Please note the obvious poke at the outrageous Bond girl name of Pussy
Galore, by the way of the femme fatale in this film called, Alotta Fagina.
Richie Cunningham, the name that Austin uses to introduce himself to Number
2, is actually Ron Howard's character name from the popular 60s-based TV
sitcom "Happy Days". Ron's brother, Clint Howard, also has a small part in
this film as Ritter, the radar operator.

Title
Review for Wo hu cang long (2000)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
The concept of wire-fu, a hyped up style of kung-fu using wires on film, has
been running rampant since THE MATRIX popularized it last year. The two most
prominent movies of this year to utilize the technique in their films were
ROMEO MUST DIE and CHARLIE'S ANGELS, who basically just used it as a
"charge" to distract from their lack of actual story. But with this film,
director Ang Lee wants to take the element of kung-fu fighting to another
level...that's right, fighting interspersed with an actual plot line!
PLOT:
A great warrior preparing for "retirement" decides to pursue one last
battle, as his legendary sword is stolen. Alongside his good friend, for
whom he restrains a secret love, he sets out to get the sword back and take
revenge upon the woman who killed his master.
CRITIQUE:
An epic in every sense of the word, this film combines some of the coolest
fight sequences ever put to the big screen with majestic cinematography and
an all-encompassing tale of love, honor and fantasy. And by fantasy, I mean
people literally flying across rooftops and fighting against one another
while standing on skinny tree branches. That's right, you can pretty much
forget about the concept of gravity in this movie! People fly while running,
walk across water and run up walls in this film. Real cool stuff if you get
"into it", but definitely unbelievable if you're not in on the spell. Which
brings me to the actual story of the film. A hundred times better than most
Hong Kong martial arts flicks, I can't say that I was mesmerized by this
sorted tale. In fact, I thought some of the scenes were a little boring,
especially the middle ones in the desert, which went on a little too long. I
also didn't really get emotionally attached to any of the characters, or
feel much for them by the end of the film. The story wasn't a bad one, it's
just that some of the plot points nagged at me somewhat. Here are these
great warriors searching for the evil Jade Fox, and even though she's the
governess of the girl they're quite familiar with, they don't recognize her?
And what about their relationship to the girl? Every time they see her, they
either fight or embrace her. A little too ambiguous for my taste. But maybe
that's just me.
I did however enjoy the overall story which effectively combined dramatic
elements with humor, action and even a touch of romance. For me, the best
parts of the movie were obviously the battle scenes, which just blew my
friggin' eyes away! In fact, I suspect that most people who see this movie
will find themselves staring at the screen and wondering how the hell they
managed to put together all of those cool moves. But again, if wire-fu
stunts don't do it for you, and fast-motion fight scenes ain't your cup of
tea, don't go into this movie expecting GONE WITH THE WIND. It's a
wonderfully photographed picture, with beautiful details in the settings,
its authenticity and the obvious language spoken (the film is in Mandarin
with English subtitles), but its wonder resonates most with its fight
sequences, and if that sort of thing doesn't impress you, this film likely
isn't for you. And for once, all of the actual fight scenes were filmed
flawlessly. Really believable. For me, those were the elements which worked
best in this film. Awesome, awesome battles, beautifully shot and an okay
story.

Title
Review for Saving Private Ryan (1998)
For more reviews and movie trivia, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Director Steven Spielberg takes us through another destructive time in our
human history. World War II is the setting, and the American Armed Forces
are the group sent in to fight for their country. This most devastating and
realistic portrayal of actual combat earned Spielberg an Oscar for Best
Director.
PLOT:
A troupe of eight soldiers is given a mission to rescue one James Francis
Ryan from the depths of the war. This order is trickled down directly from
the top, after it is learned that the Ryan family has lost their three only
other sons in the same war.
CRITIQUE:
Absolutely genuine, graphic, testament of the actual horrors of war given by
the way of skilled direction, a solid cast of performances, a genuinely
touching conclusion and an unapologetic portrayal of the humanity and
inhumanity suffered by all. Now despite having seen this film after all of
the hoopla was over, I still managed to be extremely impressed by its
gripping tale, authenticity and ultimate raw power. The first and last
scenes were the ones that had me clenched heartily to my seat, feeling the
intensity, the bravery and the insanity within all of the panic. While other
sequences had me literally crying for their pain, their loss and their lives
given away to free and save others. Unlike THE THIN RED LINE (6/10), this
movie actually had a plot and drawn-out characters to whom we could relate
and invest our attention.
Its biggest compliment relates to its extensive three hour run-time, which
didn't seem to phase me one bit. This film had me by the balls from the
get-go and kept pounding me with an interesting array of characters, solid
guidance and a cast that was primed for the occasion. Standouts included
Giovanni Ribisi and Tom Sizemore in my eyes, but all were extremely integral
to the whole of the story. I commend Spielberg for bringing out the best in
his players, and bringing to screen a variant version of "just another War
movie". I did find that the fast-action camera technique was a tad overused,
but who am I to argue with a genius of American cinema. All in all, an
engaging film about a bleak subject told via a simple story, great
characters, realistic and gruesome combat scenes, and a vision of a man
graced with the talent to direct it all into a coherent and emotional page
of human and cinematic history.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars: (Some facts courtesy of
the IMDb)
There is only one woman who has a speaking part in this film (Need
confirmation on this.)
Don't blink, or you may miss actor Ted Danson and Dennis Farina's very small
roles in this movie.
All the principal actors in this movie underwent several weeks of grueling
army training, except for Matt Damon, who was spared so that the other
actors would resent him, and would convey that resentment in their
performances.
Director Steven Spielberg considered casting Matt Damon only after viewing
his performance in 1996's COURAGE UNDER FIRE, but thought that he was too
skinny (Ironically, Damon had specifically lost 40 pounds for his role in
the film and become quite ill after the filming because of his newfound
weight). But after fellow actor Robin Williams introduced Damon to Spielberg
on the set of GOOD WILL HUNTING (8/10), Spielberg changed his mind, and cast
the hot, young star in the role of Private Ryan.
This movie is actually based upon the true story of the Niland brothers. One
was killed on D-Day while in the 82nd Airborne, one was killed on Utah Beach
with the 4th Infantry Division, and a third was killed that same week in
Burma. Mrs. Niland received all three death notification telegrams on the
same day. The fourth son was serving with the 101st Airborne and was pulled
out of the front lines.
The Edith Piaf song that the soldiers question the meaning of before the
final battle is the same song that the commandos of 1967's THE DIRTY DOZEN
question in their tents.
There was some uncredited rewriting done on Robert Rodat's original script,
by the director of THE SHAWSHANK REDEMPTION (8.5/10), Frank Darabont.
Rodat's previous screenplay was for the Jeff Daniels/Anna Paquin goose
story, FLY AWAY HOME.
Real amputees were used for the shots of people with limbs missing.
The last film that the three producers (Ian Bryce, Mark Gordon and Gary
Levinsohn) from this film produced together was HARD RAIN (7/10).


Title
Review for Tarzan (1999)
For more reviews and screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Disney takes another animated shot at a legend with the infamous
jungle-man's big screen release featuring the voices of Tony Goldwyn, Minnie
Driver, Glenn Close and Rosie O'Donnell.
PLOT:
Small child is abandoned in a jungle after his parents are killed by a
tiger, and eventually brought up by a pack of gorillas. Once matured, some
humans visit the island and attempt to lure the ape-man back to their
civilization, and capture said gorillas.
CRITIQUE:
Impeccably animated, this feature pulls you in with its incredible depiction
of a labyrinthian jungle tainted in emerald, majestic waterfalls and island
settings, a creatively scrawled Tarzan, and wonderful action sequences
featuring our main wild man frenetically swinging from vine to vine,
branch-surfing and roller-footing down limbs, and bellowing his way through
many a physical confrontation. The story, on the other hand, is one that we
are obviously all familiar with by now, and does little more to pull us in
further than any of its previous incarnations. All Disney animated films
generally take me over the top with a superior performance from either the
bad guy in the film (Jaffar from ALADDIN (7.5/10)) or the goofy sidekick
(Mushu from MULAN (7.5/10)). This film struck out on both counts, with a
less than compelling wicked character and no standout crony to speak of.
Having said that, I still found myself interested throughout most of this
picture because of its exquisite achievement in animation, with some
sequences eerily skimming the lines to reality, and other jumpin' jungle
shots suggesting three-dimensionality at their core. Pretty incredible up on
the big screen! If this was a live remake of the same story with the same
plot-line and characters, I probably would've dismissed it as hackneyed and
unimpressive in narration. But when you consider that it's a Mickey Mouse
Corp. feature starring many wondrous images and a familiar, yet oddly
original (in respect to its highly visual context), story, it has to be
appreciated on a much simpler playing field...that of a wide-eyed-child's
point of view. So I turn my head to its lack of overwhelming narrative and
the scary Phil Collins tunes, and applaud its ingenuity in animation,
musical numbers snub, fun action scenes and emotional effectiveness. Kids,
of course, will adore it!
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Glenn Close was the person who dubbed Andie MacDowell's Jane voice in the
1984 version of Tarzan called GREYSTOKE.
In 1912, Edgar Rice Burroughs first introduced the character of Tarzan to
the world. Since then, he has been featured in magazines, comic books, 26
authorized novels, radio and television programs, and more than 43 motion
pictures. Supposedly, Burroughs himself once toyed with the idea of an
animated version of his jungle hero, but nothing came of the project.

Title
Review for City of Angels (1998)
American pseudo-remake of Wim Wenders' classic film WINGS OF DESIRE,
spots Nicolas Cage as an angel, and Meg Ryan as a heart surgeon.
Director Brad Silberling's previous feature was CASPER in 1995.
PLOT:
Seth (Cage) is an angel placed on Earth to help those in need. One day,
he unwillingly "falls in love" with a heart surgeon named Maggie
(Ryan). Henceforth, he must decide whether or not he wants to remain an
angel, or "transform" himself into a human (the two are mutually
exclusive).
CRITIQUE:
Flighty angelic tale that never really gathers any steam, runs a tad
too long, and is just plain boring. This movie had no surprises
(correction, the film had one surprise...they didn't use the word
"angel" once during the entire picture...pretty neat), no visible
chemistry between the two leads, and no great insight into  Hollywood's
saturated topic of angels. On top of all that, the romance in this film
is weak, the narrative is slow and the folksy score is annoying. Other
than that...it was amazing !! (this is sarcastic, people).
Nicolas Cage is one of my favourite actors of all time, but I just
can't seem to understand his choice of roles since his incredible turn
in LEAVING LAS VEGAS (8.5/10). He's walked through a couple of
one-dimensional action roles, and now this! All he does in this flick
is walk around with a pasty face, glassy eyes, and "feel sorry for me"
look on his face. What happened to the guy we all learned to love in
RAISING ARIZONA (8/10) and VAMPIRE'S KISS (7.5/10) ? Meg Ryan is
allright, but all she has to do is smile and cry on cue, which
incidentally, she does extremely well.
Overall, this movie is quite slow, boring, and long in running time. A
couple of songs on the soundtrack are good (especially the Alanis
Morisette and GooGoo Doll tunes), but a couple of slick hits does not a
"romantic picture" make. Dennis Franz is also effective as the comic
relief, and there were a couple of nice panoramic shots, but then
again, who cares. The story never pulled me in, the drawn out scenes
never grabbed my interest, and the icky ending just stamped this movie
DOA. That's it. What can I tell you? Watch it if you're bored, and need
a rest or something. Otherwise, steer clear from this dog and go rent
Nicolas Cage's superb romantic comedy HONEYMOON IN VEGAS (8/10). You
won't regret it !!
Little Known Facts: 
Nicolas Cage's real name is Nicolas Coppola. He got Cage from Luke
Cage, the comic book character.
He's nephew to the director of the infamous GODFATHER trilogy, Francis
Ford Coppola (who incidentally once acknowledged JoBlo at the 1996
Cannes Film Festival with a wave of the right hand). 
Nic's one-time passion for method acting reached a personal limit when
he smashed a street-vendor's remote-control car to achieve the sense of
rage needed for his gangster character in THE COTTON CLUB. He also got
Johnny Depp his first acting job.
Cage proposed to Patricia Arquette on the day he met her in the early
80s. Arquette thought he was a bit strange but played along with his
antics by creating a list of things Cage would have to fulfil to win
her. When he started to work his way through the list, Arquette got
scared and avoided him. They met again many years later and later went
on to marry.
Meg Ryan's real name is Margaret Mary Emily Anne Hyra, she stands 5"8,
and is presently married to actor Dennis Quaid.


Title
Review for In Dreams (1999)
For more reviews and movie trivia, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Director Neil Jordan adapts the novel "Doll Eyes" into a film starring
Warren Beatty's wife, Annette Bening, Jordan's own acting alter-ego, Stephen
Rea, and the wonderboy of Hollywood excess, Robert Downey Jr. This film
takes another bloody stab at serial killers on film, and borrows hints of
other thrillers including the NIGHTMARE ON ELM STREETS, PSYCHO (6/10), SEVEN
(8.5/10), KISS THE GIRLS (7/10) and THE SILENCE OF THE LAMBS (7.5/10).
PLOT:
Woman prophesizes grisly visions in her dreams which ultimately transfer
into real-life fatal occurrences. She believes that a serial killer is
raping her mind, and dropping these dreams into her head. Eventually, the
woman psychologically deteriorates into a basket-case, but keeps fighting to
maintain her weak grasp on reality, and discover the truth behind her
unbelievable psychic apparitions.
CRITIQUE:
I had a dream about this film. I dreamt that it would be a muddled
psychological mess, pureed into several sparks of slick style, incoherent
and unbelievable plotting, and a deja-vu feeling of a deja-vu. I felt as
though the movie would be unoriginal in many ways, including its standard
ending, which would be close to laughable. I felt as though the first 25
minutes of the film would set a decent tone with some original camera work,
and a nice creepy mood, but that the second half of the movie would just
fall apart, and adhere to the blueprint of all other standard bogeyman
movies. I also dreamt that Robert Downey Jr. would barely make an appearance
in the film, despite his mug showing up all over the trailers, and float
through his role without an ounce of dedication to the art of original
character.
The dream continued with visions of a movie that seemed to have the
potential to break through all the standard serial killer movie barriers,
but did nothing less that run through an uninspired story line, with a
fast-cut editing knife, flashbacks, and a host of symbolism slapped in for
amusement. The apparitions that I had, also failed to fully explain any of
the real motives or methods used by the serial killer, consequently
disallowing me from understanding, or even appreciating his character on any
well-developed level.
The dream also allowed me to somewhat appreciate fellow movie critic Gene
Siskel's constant rants on the over-abundance of serial killer movies in
Hollywood, in that I am also getting sick and tired of seeing the same
subject done to death, without any unique or creative perspective. Rule #1:
If you reaaaaally insist on making a serial killer movie, please make sure
that it ain't a retread of a dozen better ones. All in all, the dream ended
on a somber note that remarked upon the film's lack of novelty, casual use
of child murders as a prop for a badly developed script, some very cool
style, and an overly typical ending which explained very little about the
actual mind of the killer, or his capacity to make unreal things happen.
It was only then that the house lights went on, the credit crawl began its
march upscreen, and I realized that none of it was a dream after all. I
clicked and clicked my heels, but I was nowhere to go. It was my reality,
and my chump change wasted on this piece of cinematic repetitiveness, which
turned out to be more of a nightmare than any state of dream.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
This film was originally titled BLUE VISION.
Robert Downey Jr. lived with actress Sarah Jessica Parker for seven years
during the 1980's. She is now married to fellow actor Matthew Broderick.
Since August, 1996, Robert has been arrested for heroin possession, remanded
to a secure drug rehabilitation center, revoked probation after continued
drug use, jailed 180 days after violating parole and treated for a cut over
his nose, after getting into a fight with a prison inmate. In 1992, he was
nominated for an Oscar as Best Actor for his role as Charlie Chaplin in
CHAPLIN (8/10). Natch!
Director Neil Jordan has used actor Stephen Rea in his last six movie
productions.
Strangely enough, the co-writer of this mediocre script, Bruce Robinson,
also co-wrote one of my favourite films from 1998, RETURN TO PARADISE
(7.5/10), and wrote and directed the British cult classic, WITHNAIL AND I.
Actor Aidan Quinn was Paramount's first choice to play Jesus Christ in their
production of LAST TEMPTATION OF CHRIST before a storm of controversy forced
them to cancel their plans for the movie. Actor Willem Dafoe scooped up the
posh part, after Universal picked up the film. He has been happily married
to actress Elizabeth Bracco since 1987.
Annette Bening received $3million for her role in 1998's THE SIEGE (6.5/10).

Title
Review for She's So Lovely (1997)
For more reviews, go to http://surf.to/joblo
Nick Cassavetes' second attempt at directing is based on a script
written by his late father, indie-actor/director John Cassavetes.
Nick's initial foray into the world of cinematic direction produced the
touching UNHOOK THE STARS (7.5/10) back in 1996, starring his mother,
Gena Rowlands.
PLOT:
Husband/wife Eddie (Penn) and Maureen (Wright Penn) are two poor, wild,
crazy kids in love. One day, Eddie's erratic and aggressive behaviour
goes too far. He snaps a twig in his brain, and is committed to an
institution for 10 years. When he gets out, Maureen has divorced him,
re-married another, had three kids, and resides in the suburbs. Eddie
wants her back. Joey (Travolta), Maureen's new husband, doesn't
appreciate Eddie's sentiment.
CRITIQUE:
This movie was hard to rate because I really liked the first half of
the film which dealt with the life and times of the young couple in
love. Sean Penn and Robin Wright Penn put on some amazingly gritty
performances (Sean received a best actor award at the 1997 Cannes Film
Festival for his role) during this first period, and truly transport
you into their loving eyes and hearts. The rest of the movie....well...
Unfortunately for all involved with this picture, the second half of
the film turns into a completely unrealistic and outrageous scenario,
in which we are meant to understand things which simply do not make any
sense, and given very little support by way of the script by
Cassavetes. I especially didn't care about the way the kids were
treated in this film ("drink your beer!" to a nine-year old?).
Admittedly, perhaps the success of the first half, left me with a
greater disappointment with the latter half, but either way, I would
say that the ending of this movie does rate as highly unbelievable and
unsubstantiated. Having said that, the first half was very good, and so
were the performances by real-life husband and wife team, Sean and
Robin Wright. Travolta was okay, but he is only in the movie for about
20 minutes or so, and does little more than smoke and swear.
Cassavetes' follow-up to the endearing UNHOOK THE STARS seems to have
been a great vehicle for the Penns to showcase their acting talents,
but lacks the solid finale or any realistic conclusions in the second
half. 
Little Known Facts: 
This film was previously dubbed SHE'S DE LOVELY and CALL IT LOVE.
Sean Penn was married to Madonna from 1985-89. He has since been quoted
as saying "I'm very fond of my ex-wife, but at twenty-four I didn't
realize the difference between a great first date and a lifetime
commitment." 
Sean's brothers include musician Michael Penn and fellow actor Chris
Penn. Sean and brother Chris used to hang out with Martin's Sheen's
sons, Charlie Sheen and Emilio Estevez, throughout their junior high
and high school years, occasionally dabbling in filmmaking with their
handheld Super-8 cameras.
When Robin Wright Penn was 15, she used to date Charlie Sheen. She was
also married to fellow actor Jason Patric from 1988-90.

Title
Review for Return to Paradise (1998)
For more reviews, go to http://surf.to/joblo
Vince Vaughn must've really liked working with his co-stars in this
film. Come autumn, Vince will be co-starring opposite Joaquin Phoenix
in CLAY PIGEONS, and come Christmas, he joins his other co-star, Anne
Heche, in Gus Van Sant's shot-by-shot remake of Alfred Hitchcock's
classic PSYCHO (Don't look at me, I didn't green-light this project.)
PLOT:
Three guys go down to Malaysia for some fun and relaxation. They smoke
hash. Drink a lot of rum. And bang a lot of girls. Money depleted, two
of the friends return home to NY. The remaining guy gets caught with
their remaining brick of hash, and is to be sentenced to death by
hanging, unless his two friends return to the exotic land of Malaysia,
and serve respective three-year prison sentences. If one returns, he
serves six years. What would you do?
CRITIQUE:
Solid premise filled with a plethora of moral dilemmas, this film rocks
you through the gamut of emotions on the strength of its superb casting
and genuine performances. If the plot line of this film does not
interest you, then you may or may not like this movie depending on your
mood. On the other hand, if the basis of this film does draw in you
some intrigue, get ready to enjoy the spoils of your emotional
interest. This is a not a film for the kids. Suffice it to say that if
you liked the Oliver Stone-penned MIDNIGHT EXPRESS (7.5/10), you will
most likely appreciate this film as well.
This movie is not a cut-and-paste moral drama that slowly places all
the right pieces in front of you as you strand along. It's a well
drawn-out story with interesting characters, real emotions, and several
unforeseen curves thrown in for a deeper search of the soul. The twists
keep the story from getting boring, but more than that, it is the
actors that come through in blazing colours. Vince Vaughn delivers his
best performance since his breakthrough role in SWINGERS (8.5/10), with
a character that could easily have been played without much care, but
instead, we find a well-rounded human being whose continually
interesting to watch, and a joy to deconstruct. Granting that I've
never been much of an Anne Heche fan should draw further notice to my
acclamation of her rock-solid performance, while Joaquin Phoenix plays
his part with a big heart and sensitive touch, likely to bring tears to
your eyes. 
The two negative points in this otherwise extremely compelling drama
would be Jada Pinkett Smith's appearance and performance as the
one-dimensional reporter with a dire need for acting lessons, and the
uninspired and trite budding of romance among a couple of the
characters. Other than that, make sure that you bring plenty of
tissues, if you're the type of person that cries (Mrs. JoBlo is guilty
as charged...again!), and prepare to be transported through some of the
darkest passages of your consciousness, while attempting to complete
the answers to some of the most personal questions rustling through
this fine film. A summer blockbuster it is not, but a thought-provoking
story, it is.
Little Known Facts: 
Previous titles for this film were FORCE MAJEURE (The title of the 1989
French film upon which the film is based), ALL FOR ONE, and A LONG WAY
TO PARADISE.
Born in Puerto Rico, Joaquin Phoenix changed his name to Leaf at the
age of four, but then reverted back to Joaquin in the early '90's. His
siblings' names include Summer, Liberty and Rain. He was also brother
to late actor, River Phoenix of MY OWN PRIVATE IDAHO (7.5/10), STAND BY
ME (7.5/10) and DOGFIGHT (8/10) fame. River died of an overdose of
drugs on Halloween eve, 1993, in front of the Johnny Depp-owned bar The
Viper Room in Hollywood.
Vince Vaughn stands 6"4, and was born in Minneapolis, Minnesota. 
Jada Pinkett Smith stand 5"0, and is married to film-star Will Smith of
MEN IN BLACK (7/10) fame.

Title
Review for Meet the Parents (2000)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
When I first heard about this comedy starring Robert DeNiro and Ben Stiller,
I was stoked. After DeNiro proved himself to be more than just a great actor
in last year's ANALYZE THIS, with a wonderful performance, and Stiller
continually solidifying himself as one of the best comedic actors of his
generation, the film could do no wrong in my eyes. But then I saw the first
trailer for the movie, and well...I won't mix words here: it wasn't very
funny. I was mortified, petrified! How could this be...DeNiro, Stiller, a
father-in-law comedy...how could it miss? But all of that anxiety quickly
dissipated as I sat to watch this film, a movie that has now become my
favorite comedy of the year. DeNiro is great in it once again, Stiller
perfect and the world is as it should be...
PLOT:
This is the story of young man who loves a young woman and wants to ask for
her hand in marriage. But before he does that, he believes that a meeting
with the young woman's father and asking for his approval would be a good
idea. They meet and things don't go too well. You see, the father loves his
daughter very much and isn't sure about this young man. The father is also
very good at psychological profiling...and he's quite paranoid. Let the fun
begin.
CRITIQUE:
A very funny movie that is able to combine a great premise with ideal
actors, laugh out scenes with a sentimental touch and over the top sequences
with a believable story line. Go see this movie and laugh! See it with your
parents and join in the fun. See it with your better half and remark on the
similarities. See it with your brother, your sister, you cat for God's
sakes, most "people" should be able to identify and appreciate this film.
And even though I love toilet humor as much as the next guy, I have to admit
that it was nice to see a movie that despite some "easy" dirty jokes (one
excellent running gag was the use of the Stiller character's last name
during the entire feature, spelled f-o-c-k-e-r), relied mostly on sight
gags, physical comedy and finely tuned humorous moments. Really well-made.
And kudos to director Jay Roach who came off his one-two punch of the AUSTIN
POWERS movies with a solid underrated uppercut a la MYSTERY, ALASKA and
TKO'd it all with this.
And DeNiro, boy-oh-boy, what can be said about Robert DeNiro? Is there
anything that this man can't do? Another one out of the ballpark for the man
best known for his dedication to the craft of acting, with one more
extremely effective comedic performance. Wow. Now let's see Pacino take a
few shots at the game of funny! Woo-haa, indeed! But I can't top off this
review without mentioning the great work done here by the incomparable Ben
Stiller. I love this guy! I love his whole persona, his nervous twitches,
his way of being sincere, funny and serious all at the same time. I really
do believe that he is one of the more underrated comedic actors of our time
and I sincerely hope that he gets more recognition after this. The rest of
the performers were also very well cast, notably Blythe Danner as the aloof
mother and Owen Wilson, set perfectly as the stinkin' rich ex-fianc. Gotta
love that crooked nose of his. I enjoyed this entire movie from start to
finish. It's funny when it has to be, hilarious when it needs to be and even
touching as it nears conclusion. Many memorable lines, many funny moments
with the cat (cat haters beware!) and an overall good time. Don't go in
expecting the world to bowl you over with this but do expect to be
thoroughly entertained. Thumbs way up, folks!
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Robert DeNiro is currently in Montreal, Canada shooting a film called THE
SCORE directed by Frank Oz, co-starring Marlon Brando and Edward Norton. Now
I mention this not necessarily as a "little known fact", but more as a "very
cool fact". Three actors greatly admired by their respective generations
starring in a film together. Wow. Pretty gosh darn cool.
Speaking of Ed Norton, he recently made his own directorial debut with
KEEPING THE FAITH, starring the always funny, and part-time director on his
own right (remember THE CABLE GUY?), Ben Stiller.
This is actress Teri Polo's "big break" movie, but fans of the TV show
"Felicity" know her as the recurring character Maggie. She also appeared as
Rebecca on the ABC sitcom "Sports Night".
Actress Blythe Danner, the mother in this movie, is Oscar-winning actress
Gwyneth Paltrow's mom in real life.
Besides playing the "goof" in many of his recent movie parts, actor Owen
Wilson is also a pretty decent writer as well. He co-wrote two critically
acclaimed movies with writer/director Wes Anderson, BOTTLE ROCKET and
RUSHMORE. He is currently playing a male model in ZOOLANDER, a comedy
written and directed by Ben Stiller, based on a character he came up with
for the VH-1 Fashion Awards three years ago.

Title
Review for Red Planet (2000)
For more reviews and movie trailers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
The Mars jinx continues. First, Tim Burton fired off an empty shell with
MARS ATTACKS, a film that managed to have a little fun with itself via the
goofy-looking alien creatures, but very little else. Earlier this year, many
of us experienced the stillborn child that was MISSION TO MARS, another film
which also managed to give us one very cool special effect (the sandstorm,
people...not the CGI alien!), but no real meat in its "story" department.
And now six months later comes yet another sci-fi flick hoping to achieve at
least one level of competency above the former films, but alas, once again,
we are all left holding our ding-dongs. I guess it's up to director John
Carpenter to bust out for the last hoorah. Expect GHOST OF MARS in theatres
sometime next year.
PLOT:
This movie takes place in the year 2025. A crew of astronauts is stranded on
the planet Mars with little hope of survival. Their situation is endangered
further by the presence of a guerilla robot out for blood. Will their
orbiting captain be able to help them get off the planet alive? Does anybody
care? Let's find out.
CRITIQUE:
Blah. This movie felt a lot like a big-budget episode of TV's "Star Trek".
Zero tension, a few cheap thrills (including a side shot of Carrie-Anne Moss
exiting the showers, thank you very much), a tiny bit of action and a hardly
noticeable story. They should have just called it STRANDED, since that was
basically all that this movie was about. It just so happened to take place
on the planet Mars, but they may as well have been stranded anywhere else
with cavernous mountains and orange filters, cause this planet seemed to
have no relevance to the actual story. What story, you may ask? Hmmmm, not
sure. Other than the fact that these folks are deserted on this planet and
looking for a way out, the film had very little else to offer. And is it me,
or does the plot sound a lot like what is turning out to be the best sci-fi
flick of the year, the low-budgeted PITCH BLACK? Who knew?!
Fortunately for us, that film actually had a bad guy, a charismatic lead and
some nasty alien muthas. This movie has got a "robot" who is supposed to be
scary, running around making some buzzing noises, plenty of shots of crew
members switching and clicking buttons in the cockpit and some nasty bugs,
who looked almost as CGI as the pathetic "alien" at the end of MISSION TO
MARS. The actors were all decent, but a couple, like Tom Sizemore and
Terence Stamp, seemed to be there simply to cash a paycheck. Kilmer was
good, but I believe he already played that very same character in THE ISLAND
OF DR. MOREAU. But I suppose much of my disappointment with the film
could've been resolved if they had actually spent some time building an
interesting story or developing their characters, but neither aspect
materializes here. The film was actually never boring for me, but neither
was it ever exciting. And I'm not sure if this was just the theatre that I
was in but damn, how about lowering the decibel level on some of those
"crash" and "explosion" sequences? Jeez-Louise, my eardrums were about to
bust out! A renter maybe, but nothing worth seeing in the theatres. This
movie is yet another missed opportunity to build a great story around all of
the mystery and unknown elements surrounding the red planet. This film had
very little to do with Mars, even less to do with entertainment and
contained yet another disposable sci-fi "romance". I certainly wouldn't
qualify it as a horrible flick, watchable to be sure, but one which will
undoubtedly be forgotten by most as they walk out of the theater.

Title
Review for Clay Pigeons (1998)
For more reviews and trivia, visit http://surf.to/joblo
This film is like U-TURN (8/10) without the big name cast, like RED
ROCK WEST (8/10) without the John Dahl touch of noir, and like BLOOD
SIMPLE (8/10) without the Coen brothers' overly stylish caress.
Director David Dobkin tackles this black comedy about a mysterious
small town killer in his feature film debut.
PLOT:
Small town America is the setting. Joaquin Phoenix is the innocent
young man who gets raveled in a tale of two suspicious deaths in his
town. He finds both dead bodies, and suddenly develops an instant
following within the FBI. Lester Long is the stranger in town who
befriends Joaquin, and oozes enigmatic. Dead bodies, twists, turns and
bitingly dark comedy ensues.   
CRITIQUE:
Quirky little small town murder mystery film, generates enough style,
plot and original characters to stand out among the umpteen other
movies that blazed its trail before it. This film also has an eclectic
little soundtrack, with several well-chosen Elvis tunes blaring during
some of the most gratifying scenes, but lacks the absolute
believability in its so-so ending. Some people may have a bigger
problem with its conclusion, but I bought it for the most part, because
of the way that the characters had been built up during the entire
film.
Vince Vaughn pulls off another dynamic performance as Lester the
self-proclaimed "molester", and spices his character up with one of the
honkiest laughs this side of Fran Dresher. Joaquin Phoenix also
delivers a solid performance as the nave country bumpkin caught in a
situation highly beyond his limited resourcefulness, and the female
vixen in this tale, actress Mary Lou, pulls off a great femme fatale
whose only reasons for living seem drenched in sex, cigarettes and
booze (did I mention sex?). Speaking of cigarettes, I don't think there
is one character in this film that doesn't smoke (except the clueless
deputy Barney, of course), but then again, I guess that's to be
expected from this genre.
The movie also starts off with a really cool tete-a-tete scene and ends
with a unique, unbelievable to some, but mostly Hollywoodian
conclusion. Overall, I thought the movie worked on most fronts,
delivering the ripped off stylish flair from various Coen and Oliver
Stone based films (But who doesn't rip off the greats anyway), great
performances by all of the main actors and their offspring, an
interesting plot involving murders galore, plenty of sexcapades, goofy
country folk, and a bizarre yet effective soundtrack to blend it all
together. If you liked any of the three films that I mentioned in my
introduction, you will most probably enjoy this fable as well,
especially if you dig any of the lead actors. Either way, a
nacho-chompin' treat indeed!
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Scott Free is the production company that produced this film. It is
operated by the Scott brothers, better known as directors Ridley Scott
and Tony Scott. An obvious wink to themselves in this film, comes by
the way of a scene where actress Janeane Garofalo is watching a movie
in her hotel room, while enjoying some pot and pizza. The film is ALIEN
(8/10)- directed by said Ridley Scott, and next to the television set
lie two other video tapes entitled: TRUE ROMANCE (9/10)- directed by
brother Tony Scott, and SWINGERS (8.5/10)- the classic Vince Vaughn
film that launched his career back in 1996. Nice touch, guys!
Director Dobkin acknowledged the influence of the Coen brothers' BLOOD
SIMPLE film, but also claimed that he was equally moved by the
adaptation of Truman Capote's IN COLD BLOOD. Dobkin, a native of
Washington D.C., comes from a commercials and rock-music video
background. He's directed videos for Elton John, John Lee Hooker,
Coolio and Tupac Shakur.
Janeane Garofalo originally passed on this script because she thought
there was a misogynist tone to it, but eventually folded, and loved
shooting the flick in wonderfully shot Utah. That's where she found her
dog, Dew. She prepped for her role by watching "a lot of cop TV" and
visiting a shooting range. 
This film was previously titled IN TOO DEEP.

Title
Review for Requiem for a Dream (2000)
For more reviews and movie trailers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Writer/director Darren Aronofsky was turned down flat when he approached
Artisan Entertainment about following up the success of his debut film, PIE,
with an adaptation of this 1978 novel by Hubert Selby Jr. Aronofsky's reply
was simple: "Well, you don't have a choice". The studio wanted something a
little more "commercial" from the up-and-coming auteur, but Aronofsky had
his heart set on this film since his early days at Harvard. The studio
finally agreed but only if they co-financed the film with another production
company, which they did. Aronofsky and Selby worked together off the
latter's own lost 1979 screenplay draft discovered in his mother's old
Brooklyn cellar to create the script for this film, and the rest as they
say, is history.
PLOT:
A deep, dark look at the conjoined lives of several people whose search for
love, happiness and their seemingly unattainable dreams, ultimately gets
caught up under the snag of addiction.
CRITIQUE:
A harrowing tale about the extreme damage associated with addiction and the
pursuit of happiness, this film should be applauded for taking such a
familiar subject matter and slapping it around with innovative visuals, a
haunting score, undeniably courageous performances from all of its leads and
a consistently gripping narrative. And despite obvious comparisons to both A
CLOCKWORK ORANGE and TRAINSPOTTING, it's obvious that Aronofsky has managed
to create a cult classic of his own here. Reaching deep down into his
arsenal of visual gadgeteries, the director makes use of every style
utilized by Scorsese, Tarantino, Fincher and Gilliam, and one-ups them all
with a visual melange of inspirational creations of his own. This is one
movie that you will never be able to forget. It sticks in your mind, no
matter what your impression of the final product. In the end, it's about
lost, disconnected people. Lonely, beyond belief, searching for an answer
within a quick fix solution, a solution, which in itself, can only take them
so far. And as their simple dreams get further out of reach, and their
addictions to external substances takes over, the film gathers a palpable
sense of impending doom, as each character respectively spirals down a
hellish experience of their own. All of this leads to one of the most
intense denouements that I have seen on screen in years.
The film is also optimized to the nth degree in sound and visuals, as every
move, scene, thought and circumstance is attached to an accompanying
symbolic effect or another, used to reinforce the chaos of each situation,
and to a certain extent, their repetitive and continuous nature. Think
addiction. This movie is also filled with unforgettable imagery and a
powerful score, which helps beat the film's cataclysmic sentiment right into
your brain. I still cannot shake that infectiously morbid sound. The film is
obviously sad and very depressing in a lot of ways, but still manages to
undoubtedly punch home the obvious anti-drug and anti-addiction message
underlying it all. To me, the film also ventured to comment on some of the
most obvious effects of alienation and anti-socialization in our society.
Everybody wants to be loved, but when you can not attain that love, what do
you do? Of course, all the camera tricks and music in the world could never
fool an audience unless the film itself stood on a solid script packed with
believable characters, and even more importantly, actors who allow you to
buy into their parts. This film managed to give us four very strong
performances from its leads, each of whom seems to have taken great care in
their interpretation.
Marlon Wayans has you completely forgetting about his TV antics after the
first five minutes of this movie, with a true dramatic performance deep in
symbolism and high on effectiveness. A guy trying to do good, looking for
that lost love from his mom, but just falling short every time. Leto also
surprised me as the overly industrious guy caught between the love for his
mother and his devotion to his girlfriend. Fullfilling the male void in both
of their lives, Leto is simply not able to satisfy their lonely patterns,
and subsequently succumbs to one of the most horrific separations of them
all. But for me, it was the women who held the even stronger cards in this
flick. Jennifer Connelly, with the performance of her career, manages to
look absolutely beautiful in one scene, and absolutely horrific in the next.
Her character's transition from uppity rich girl to down-and-out junkie is
remarkably portrayed, as Jennifer bares all for the role and her character's
ultimate degradation. A case can definitely be made for each of these
wonderful actors to receive a nomination of some sort by the end of the
year, but Ellen Burstyn is undoubtedly already seated at the Oscar events of
year next. A complete transformation of both physical and mental state,
Burstyn takes us through one of the loneliest characters to be showcased on
film, with an evocatory performance which lends itself to much pause for
reflection. Ultimately, it is the inability to reach their dreams and their
love that drives each of these characters into a nightmare of their own.
It goes without saying, that this film is not for everyone. It is sad,
depressing, confusing at times and extremely experimental in a lot of ways.
In other words, if you're looking for a 1-2-3 movie, this ain't for you.
This movie is for deep thinkers. It's also for those who themselves suffer
from an addiction of some sort. And yes, ultimately, it is for anyone who
has ever felt let down by a dream which they could not grasp, a love which
they simply could not attain, or a connection which they just could not seem
to make. The characters in this film make the mistake that many of us do
when we try to find the solution of our malaise on the outside of ourselves.
Almost every time, the solution lies within, but many of us are just afraid
to face up to that lonely place.
PS: I still can't get Ellen Burstyn's line of "I'm gonna be on television"
out of my head.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Director Darren Aronofsky asked a favor from two of the leads in this film:
Jared Leto and Marlon Wayans. Stay away from sex and sugar for a period of
30 days so that you could really feel that need for something you crave.
Wayans said that he was "cool" with it until he found out that "no sex" also
meant "no orgasm". Wayans was like, "You mean I can't even hump my pillow?"
Leto lost 25 pounds during this transformation and after the film wrapped,
shaved his head and checked himself into a monastery in Portugal to get his
head straight (Entertainment Weekly, #567, p. 46).
Ellen Burstyn's role was both physically and emotionally demanding. In
addition to having a camera mounted to her for certain sequences, Burstyn
spent four hours every morning being fitted with prosthetics, wearing four
different necks (both fat and emaciated), two different fat suits (a
40-pound and 20-pound suit), and nine different wigs.
Director Darren Aronofsky has been chosen to create the next BATMAN movie,
which according to him would be based on Frank Miller's "Batman: Year One"
graphic novel. The story details the first year of Bruce Wayne's life as
Batman, including the self-doubts and blunders he had to overcome in order
to emerge as a full-blown crimefighter.
A cool fun fact about this film is that the actual author of the book on
which it is based (and co-screenwriter of the film) has a cameo in the
movie. Seventy-three year old Hubert Selby Jr. plays the "laughing prison
guard" near the end of the film. Ironically, he is laughing at his own
characters.
Another cool thing to note about this film is its almost complete lack of
the color red. Aronofsky did this on purpose, with Sara's hair and dress
being the only places where you should find red in the movie. He said, "We
did this because the color red was at the core of Sara's dream. We wanted
the color to leap off the screen."
Aronofsky's mother Charlotte is also cast in this film as one of Sara's
yenta friends, and his father Abraham, as the man reading the newspaper on
the subway.
Most movies contain 600 to 700 cuts. This film contains over 2,000.

Title
Review for True Crime (1999)
For more reviews and movie trivia, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Clint Eastwood decides to support some of his own, including his daughter,
wife and ex-girlfriend, in a film that he directs, produces and stars in.
Based on the novel of the same name, this movie runs approximately 125
minutes.
PLOT:
An ex-drunk, wife cheater, bad father and newspaper reporter Everett, gets
assigned to a human interest story covering the execution of convicted
killer Frank Beachum at midnight. With a nose for the truth, Everett slowly
begins to uncover holes in the man's conviction, and sets out to prove his
far-fetched theories.
CRITIQUE:
No suspense. No tension. Little drama. This film provides us with believable
characters, great actors, and another super gruff-and-tumble performance by
the charismatic Clint Eastwood, within the confines of a snails-paced plot,
overly predictable development, and a hilariously convenient conclusion. If
you're looking for an interesting mystery that unfolds with intrigue,
obstacles and queries all around, this film is not the one for you. If
you're looking for a Clint Eastwood film, featuring him playing another
extra-cool character with very little redeemable qualities, and a pace which
provides you with extremely limited progress as it moves along, I would
suggest this film to you wholeheartedly.
Eastwood is charming, and there is no doubt about that. If it was anyone
else in this role, I might've conked out during the early chapters of this
floater. James Woods is also effective as the no-nonsense editor, and Isaiah
Washington as the poor, convicted sap, with the rest of the cast punching in
their time clocks with precision. Ultimately, there just isn't enough
happening in this movie, to recommend it as an entertaining piece of cinema.
Also, the complete 180 degree "change of heart" from a crucial character in
the film seemed falsely created, and left a bad after-taste in my mouth. The
whole film felt like a long day at a baseball game where the teams go into
extra innings tied at zero-it's that feeling when you know that you've been
there long and that time has passed you by, and yet the score is still tied
at nothing. In the end, the film downshifts into your typical "race for the
clock" scenario, and adds a taste of suspense into a film that could've used
much more early on. All in all, a great performance by Eastwood, in a
predictable, slow-moving, character study, disguised as an engaging,
crime-solving mystery.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Clint Eastwood's real-life daughter plays his cute-as-heck daughter in this
film. His ex-lover, and mother of one of his five children, actress Frances
Fisher, also has a cameo, as well as his current wife, Dina Ruiz, with a
small part.
Actor Sidney Poitier's real-life daughter also plays a role in this film.
Ironically, her real name is also Sydney Poitier.
Clint Eastwood got his first acting role in Rawhide while visiting a friend
at the CBS lot when a studio exec spotted him because he "looked like a
cowboy." He wore the same poncho, without ever having washed it, in all
three of his "man with no name" western movies.
MORE COMING SOON on JoBlo's Movie Emporium

Title
Review for Mallrats (1995)
For more reviews and trivia, go to http://surf.to/joblo
Kevin Smith follows up the insane success that he had with his first
film CLERKS (8.5/10), which incidentally he had personally financed for
about $27,000, with a $6Million Disney financed
pop-cultured-teenage-boys-wet-dream movie starring the 90210-famed
Shannon Doherty and skateboard sensation Jason Lee. This movie features
everything from video games, comic books, movie references and
GenX-based thoughts and dialogue, to early roles by big Ben Affleck and
Claire "I'm working with Brad Pitt now" Forlani. All that, and clean
boob shots of both CHASING AMY (7.5/10) star Joey Lauren Adams and
Terri from TV "Three's Company". Wow, what a man!
PLOT:
Best friends Brodie and T.S. both get dumped by their girlfriends on
the same day, and attempt to rejuvenate their lives by spending another
empty day in the nearby mall. The mall gives them plenty of time to run
into friends, trouble and get arrested, as their plans to win back
their girlfriends begin to crystallize. 
CRITIQUE:
Excellent written dialogue, plotless plot, and sporadically weak acting
qualify this film as a mediocre overly-juvenile teenage addition to the
umpteen better films made in its very homage. I will be absolutely
honest with you, and tell you that I hate to not love this movie
because I am actually a huge personal Kevin Smith fan, but I cannot
pretend that I enjoyed this flick much more than I really did. I will
admit that as per Kevin's usual style, his dialogue was impeccably
written, but spoken at too fast a pace by many of its actors, with too
many inside jokes for anyone to grasp within that time. Add that to the
fact that the Jay and Silent Bob roles seemed written just for the sake
of physical gags, and I can't say that this follow-up to the film that
inspired me to take my personal screenwriting seriously (CLERKS) is
worthy of much more than a late Sunday afternoon rent session. Although
the scene with the boys and the Easter Bunny is to die for!
Having said that, I did love the acting job by Jason Lee, who seemed to
relish his role of Brodie with great anger and furious appreciation.
You could tell that he really loved his delivering his lines, like one
of my favorite exchanges between him and his girlfriend Shannon
Doherty:
Doherty: "I've never met a person who lives in as much fear of his
mother as you do."
Lee: "You want I should tell my mother what we do in here at night?"
Doherty: "What...that you play video games and I fall asleep
unfulfilled?"
Classic Smith. Having said that, I thought the other main character in
the film as portrayed by Jeremy London was boring and played rather
unsuccessfully by said London. Forlani was also poor in her role as the
"always looking nervous" girlfriend, while Affleck pulled off his dance
as the macho A-hole magnificently. Now, despite the film having plenty
of funny lines, it did also contain many duds, while others seemed
scripted or just too literate to be uttered by the dudes in this film.
Having said all that, I did enjoy most of the lines, and the boatload
of movie homages (Off the top of my head, there were tender pokes at
JAWS, BATMAN, GODFATHER, STAR WARS, APOCALYPSE NOW, and many
others....) but was eventually bored by the ultimately anti-climactic
dating game show ending, and the lack of consistency in the movie. Fans
of Kevin Smith should check it out for fun, but others should watch it
only if they enjoy well-written dialogue, comic books and movie
references galore! Otherwise, get out there and rent one of the
funniest and best-written films of all time...CLERKS!!!
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Kevin Smith once personally helped me get going with one of my scripts
in Hollywood. On top of being a cinematic genius, the man is also a
generous human being. What else could you ask for?
Kevin Smith had auditioned over 600 hopefuls for the role of Brandi,
before he saw Claire Forlani. He was immediately taken with her spot-on
impersonation of a callow American youth, and promptly offered to hire
her. Only after they'd sealed the deal did he learn that the actress
whose mannerisms and delivery had so impressed him was British.
This film was shot on location in the Eden Prairie Center in Minnesota.
Producer Scott Mosier played a character named Roddy in this film.
Ethan Suplee, the fat kid who can never seem to see the images within
those 3D pictures, also starred as the fat skinhead in 1998's fine
motion picture AMERICAN HISTORY X (8/10).
The two main characters are named Brodie and Quint, an obvious
reference to 1975's JAWS (7.5/10).
The background music when T.S. and Hamilton are waiting for the
elevator is the same as in the elevator in THE BLUES BROTHERS.
T.S. Quint's initials were taken from T.S. Garp, the character Robin
Williams played in THE WORLD ACCORDING TO GARP (6/10). 
It was soon after this film that Kevin Smith and Joey Lauren Adams
started going out. Their relationship ended soon after the release of
CHASING AMY (7.5/10), in which she starred.
Kevin Smith thanks a lot of people at the end of this movie, but here
are some of my favorites:
"God- for another opportunity to tell my stupid stories."
"Jim- (producer James Jacks) for treating us like the Coens as opposed
to the twenty-something know-nothings we really are."
"Bob- (Miramax co-chairman Bob Weinstein) for laughing during the
pitch."
And lastly..."John Landis and John Hughes- for giving me something to
do throughout my youth on Friday nights."

Title
Review for Up at the Villa (2000)
For more reviews and movie trailers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
You know how every now and then, a film comes out that just blows the roof
of the entire movie industry? I'm talking a film that not only challenges
your mind, but one that completely sweeps you into a world that you'd never
even thought about before? Sparks of originality, chemistry all around! Sure
you do, and so do I, which is why I could say in full confidence that this
film is anything but that kind of a movie.
PLOT:
A rich, snooty woman living the "good life" in Florence, Italy, during the
late 1930s, suddenly finds herself caught up in a messy love triangle
involving a wealthy, older gentleman, a younger, more abrasive American, and
an Austrian refugee. When a murder takes place, the politics of the day take
over, and the film switches its romance gears into those featuring intrigue.
CRITIQUE:
This film is full of pretty pictures, nice decorations and beautiful
scenery, but lacks any palpable romance, tension or chemistry. It's just
sort of "there". It's a film which never really bored me at any point, it
was like being a voyeur at a rich guy's party, but never really managed to
get me excited about anything either. Sean Penn, who has always been one of
favorite actors, despite continually bashing the craft that consistently
feeds him, is actually pretty so-so in this film, underplaying the part and
appearing strangely out of place. Of course, Kirsten Scott Thomas invented
these movies, so she certainly fit her role like a glove, but unfortunately
her character, who is the lead in the film, doesn't really provide the
audience with any tangible reasons to like her. I mean, she's obviously very
pretty but am I supposed to feel for a lady that dicks around with every
Tom, Dick and Arnold, while making decisions on her life based primarily
around finances? Sure, the film offers some insight as to the deep-rooted
misappropriations of values which these people apparently subscribed to at
the time, but I could only invest so much of myself into folks with  whom I
obviously have zero in common (besides the fact that every guy seemed to
want to dick Kirsten Scott Thomas). The romance level is also pretty thin in
this film, with only a tiny shred of it showing up between Penn and Thomas,
a little more in Thomas' relationship with Davies, but generally
non-existent.
Of course, the film turns into more of a "political" game during its second
half, but none of that really interested me much either. No real tension,
just a little politics here and there, nothing we haven't seen before. And
when is Jeremy Davies finally going to play a character different from every
single one that he portrays in all of his other movies? Dude, it's pretty
obvious that you could play the "shy, nervous, twitchy guy", but how about
taking a shot at a role with a little more range? The ending of the movie is
also pretty weak and foreseeable, with much of what goes on, predictable and
tidy. Having said all that, I did enjoy looking at this film, the scenery,
the actors and the wonderful city of Florence, which were all quite
spectacular. I also loved Anne Bancroft's performance, which let her chew up
and spit out most of the scenery around her. Great job, Mrs. Brooks! As well
as Derek Jacobi's comical turn as Lucky Leadbetter. And yes, Scott Thomas
does deliver a decent showing, but somehow it all seems to be a little "old
hat" with her. This film might ultimately entertain those content enough to
sit and watch some really pretty and pretentious people prance around in
lush surroundings with little more than a simple story to tell. But on the
whole, the film didn't manage to entertain me enough to recommend it to any
of my friends. And yes, dear reader...I consider you my friend (fluttering
eyelashes) :)
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Anne Bancroft's birth name is Anna Maria Louisa Italiano (do you think she's
Italian?). She was born in The Bronx, New York in 1931, and has been married
to writer/actor/director Mel Brooks since 1964.
Kirsten Scott Thomas' younger sister Serena Scott Thomas, had a role in the
latest James Bond flick, THE WORLD IS NOT ENOUGH (7/10), in which she played
Dr. Molly Warmflash. Director Philip Haas also directed Kirsten in the 1995
movie ANGELS AND INSECTS.
Jeremy Davies' birth name was Jeremy Boring.
Actor Derek Jacobi was the mentor and acting instructor of fellow British
actor Kenneth Branagh. He also won a Tony in 1985 for "Much Ado About
Nothing", a play which friend Branagh turned into a movie in 1993. Also, Mr.
Jacobi was apparently one of the few runners-up for the part of Hannibal
Lecter in the original SILENCE OF THE LAMBS movie. Of course, that part
eventually went to fellow Brit Anthony Hopkins.
Director Philip Haas and screenwriter Belinda Haas are indeed husband and
wife.

Title
Review for Raiders of the Lost Ark (1981)
For more reviews and movie trivia, visit http://www.joblo.com
What do you get when you slap together a movie based on a story by the
legendary George Lucas, directed by virtuoso director Steven Spielberg, and
starring one of the biggest box-office stars in the world, Harrison Ford?
You get one hot-fudge-rockin' good time, that's what you get!!!
PLOT:
Professor/archeologist Indiana Jones sets out to find the long-lost mystical
Ark of the Covenant before the Nazis get their grubby fingers hands on it.
Adventures, snakes, romance and mucho action ensues.
CRITIQUE:
Astounding movie packed with non-stop action, stunts galore, an interesting
story line, great one-liners, a solid cast, a catchy musical score, and all
the fun and adventure that you could squeeze into a two-hour thrill ride. If
you don't enjoy this film, then you just don't like action movies, period!
If you're young, you'll enjoy its humor, its cool action sequences and its
gross-out factor at times. If you're a little older, you'll appreciate the
interesting plot line, the romance, and yes, the mountains of adventure.
Watching this movie made me feel like a kid again, dreaming and fantasizing
about fighting the bad guys, travelling to different countries, making the
impossible, possible! Harrison Ford is perfect as the every-man with the
brains of a scientist and the brawn of an outdoors adventurer, and Spielberg
manages to achieve the ideal balance of action, fun, adventure and humor.
Now if you really want to have a good time, check into this movie on the
same night as its two sequels, rent a jug of iced Coke, truckloads of nachos
and salsa, an adventure hat and whip, and prepare to gag yourself into a
world of action-movie heaven!
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
This picture was nominated for eight 1981 Oscar nominations, including Best
Picture. It lost that award to CHARIOTS OF FIRE, but did manage to win for
Best Art Direction, Best Special Effects, Best Film Editing and Best Sound.
Actor Tom Selleck was originally cast as Indiana Jones, but was committed to
his hit TV show, "Magnum P.I.".
In filming the Well of Souls sequence, the producers scoured every pet shop
in London and the South of England for every snake they could lay their
hands on. Hence there are snakes that are identifiable from many different
geographical areas. However, once all the snakes were on set, it became
clear that there were not nearly enough of them, so Spielberg had several
hoses cut into lengths, and these were used as well. Looking closely, you
can tell which are the real snakes and which are not.
An early draft of the script had Indy travelling to Shanghai to recover a
piece of the Staff of Ra. During his escape from the museum where it was
housed, he sheltered from machine gun fire behind a giant rolling gong. Also
in the same script, Indy and Marion flee the chaos caused by the opening of
the Ark in a wild mine-cart chase sequence. Both of these scenes were cut
from the script, but ended up in 1984's INDIANA JONES AND THE TEMPLE OF
DOOM.
This film begins with a shot of a peak in the jungle which is reminiscent of
the Paramount Pictures logo. The same type of opening is present in its
sequels.
Jock's airplane at the beginning of the film has the registration number
"OB-CPO". This is a reference to Obi-Wan and C-3PO from George Lucas' STAR
WARS (9.5/10). Also, the hieroglyphics in the Well of Souls include
engravings of R2-D2 and C-3PO. They can be seen on a post to the right of
Indy and Sallah as they remove the Ark.
The script originally included a long fight between a swordsman and Indiana
with his whip. As legend has it, actor Harrison Ford was suffering diarrhea
at the time, and asked if the scene could be shortened. Spielberg said the
only way he could shorten it was if Indy pulled out his gun and just shot
the guy. The entire crew laughed and that's how it was filmed.
When Indy first falls in the Well of Souls and is face to face with the
cobra, you can see the snake's reflection on the glass dividing it and
Harrison Ford, also some fingerprints and stuff like that.
When Indy is dragging along the ground, hanging onto the Nazi soldier's
truck with the Ark inside, you can see the pad that he's being dragged on.

Title
Review for Taxi Driver (1976)
For more reviews, go to http://surf.to/joblo
American classic deals with the effects of urbanization, loneliness,
and the lost American Dream. Scorsese's gritty urban drama was brought
even greater attention when real-life psychopath John F. Hinckley Jr.
attempted to assassinate President Reagan in 1981. He claimed that he
was committing the act in order "to impress Jodie Foster". 
PLOT:
Taxi driver Travis Bickle drives along the scummiest streets in the
world, New York City. He doesn't know "much about much", but he does
know that he does not like the continuing propagation of the pimps,
hookers, junkies and low-lifes in his fair city. He also likes a girl.
She doesn't like him back. He is lonely. He likes to drink. He gets
depressed. He gets angry... 
CRITIQUE:
Great urban drama accurately demonstrates the development of a
sociopath within a realistically portrayed city of hell. Travis Bickle
seems like a nice guy, who just couldn't take it anymore. Have any of
you ever felt the same way in your lifetime? Of course. We all have.
And herein lies the continuing popularity of this classic film which
despite some aging concerns, still stands up in time after all these
years.
On the surface, this film will not blow you away in one sitting, but
the symbolism used by Scorsese, the extremely effective acting by
Robert DeNiro, and the superb writing by Paul Schrader, turn this movie
into a cinematic adventure of many layers. The ticking of the cab fare
ticker representing Bickle's growing dissatisfaction with the world
around him (like a bomb), the red and green lights garbing Bickle's
moods, and the plethora of other symbols used to convey anger,
confusion and ultimate frustration.
The soundtrack is perfect (Mrs. JoBlo remarked that it set her into an
icky and depressed state...exactly what was needed to appreciate
Bickle's character), in that it allows you to feel the depravity of his
being. You understand the point that he's reached when he begins to
pour Peach Schnapps into his morning cereal (Bernard Herrmann wasn't
going to write the score for this film, but agreed to do it (his last)
when he saw this pitiful scene.) He is no longer very logical. His
anti-socialism has got the better of him. The direction is top-notch,
with Scorsese showing up in no less than two scenes. And the acting is
superb with DeNiro leading the way, Foster pulling off an effective
"12-and a half year old" hooker, and Keitel, well, being Keitel. The
scene where DeNiro and Keitel haggle for Foster's "services" is one of
my favourites in this movie. 
Many classic scenes and lines are now splashed across this film, such
as the infamous "Are you talking to me?" line (completely ad-libbed by
DeNiro, bien sur), the trademark Scorsese slo-mo's, and the green Army
jacket and penchant for pie and coffee (all used in an effective
hommage in 1993's TRUE ROMANCE (9/10) by writer Quentin Tarantino and
director Tony Scott.) I have always watched this film when I was
feeling down and out, and now I know why. As bad as anything gets in my
life, I could always count on Mr. Travis Bickle's life to be so much
more pathetic.
Keep an eye on the last scene of the film after Bickle drops his
passenger off and notices "his inner demons" quickly appear through the
rearview mirror. Some of the monster still remains... 
Little Known Facts: 
Robert DeNiro was married to the attendant at the porno theater in this
film (actress Diahnne Abbott) from 1976 to 1988. He has been quoted as
saying about his own films, ""I don't like to watch my own movies - I
fall asleep in my own movies." He stands 5"9.
Writer Paul Schrader had spent weeks sleeping in his car while writing
this script, when he realized that he hadn't spoken to another human
being in about three weeks (he was depressed and an alcoholic at the
time.)
Jodie Foster was second choice to play Princess Leia in STAR WARS
(8.5/10). 
Various studios considered producing this film...one had even suggested
Neil Diamond for the lead role.
Director Martin Scorsese claims that the most important shot in the
movie is when Bickle is on the phone trying to get another date with
Betsy. The camera moves to the side slowly and pans down the long,
empty hallway next to Bickle, as if to suggest that the phone
conversation is too painful and pathetic to bear.
Jodie Foster's real name is Alicia Christian Foster. She stands 5"4. In
1980 she graduated as the best of her class from the College Lyce
Franais and began to study English Literature at Yale University, from
where she graduated magna cum laude in 1985. She was nominated for Best
Supporting Actress at the 1977 Oscars for her role as Iris the
prostitute in this film (the award went to Beatrice Straight from
NETWORK (7/10).)
Before becoming director, Martin Scorsese had thought about entering
the priesthood. He has been married four times, including actress
Isabella Rossellini, and his sometime producer Barbara De Fina.

Title
Review for What Lies Beneath (2000)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
So where the heck has Robert Zemeckis been? Ever since 1994's Oscar triumph
of FORREST GUMP, the man only managed to deliver one other flick onto the
world via Jody Foster and her CONTACT with aliens in 1997. Now comes the new
millennium, and Bobby decides to spring two big flicks our way. The first is
this film, a thriller starring two major stars in Harrison Ford and Michelle
Pfeiffer and come Christmas, expect to see Zemeckis buddy Tom Hanks star in
the highly anticipated CAST AWAY. And if this film is any indication,
Zemeckis should always take this much time between movies.
PLOT:
The life of a happily married couple living in Vermont is suddenly jarred
from its foundation when an entity (yes, that's right people, a ghost!)
invades their home. The haunting is particularly geared towards the wife,
who just can't seem to figure out what the heck is going on. The workaholic
husband is also worried, but mostly because he thinks that his wife is going
bonkers. Together, the couple attempt to solve the mystery of their haunted
home.
CRITIQUE:
A well-crafted thriller, this movie delivers on various fronts including the
creepy suspense, the cheap scares via the excellent camerawork, the superior
score, the even better use of silence, the solid acting card punched in by
one Michelle Pfeiffer and the ending which grabbed me by the nuts and
refused to let go. Does anybody remember a director by the name of Alfred
Hitchcock? (sarcasm, folks). Well, Robert Zemeckis sure does and he's made
certain to watch every single one of his movies in order to recreate a lot
of that superb Hitchcockian feel, and by golly, it seems to have worked. But
before I unwillingly make this film feel like a thrill-ride, please
understand that it isn't one by any means, in fact, the only real "action"
in the film takes place during its final half hour. This film works in a
different way. It's slow, methodical and even a little longer than it should
be, but once it gets going, I was hooked with a line and a sinker. Even Ford
manages to make us forget RANDOM HEARTS for a couple of hours, and
effectively emotes more than one feeling in this film (hey, it's a start!).
And the story, you may ask?
Well, I can't honestly say that this film is original. In fact, it's not. I
recognized various elements from other suspense features roaming around in
this one, with the strongest vibes resounding from REAR WINDOW, FATAL
ATTRACTION and PSYCHO. Okay, the last one is probably because the "bathtub"
scene in this film is comparable to the shower scene in the latter, but only
because it might actually instill a fear in some people to take more baths.
Actually, there is a more than obvious homage to PSYCHO as well, so I don't
think Zemeckis is trying to fool anybody here. But unoriginality aside, the
film does work and work very well indeed. I personally am not a very jumpy
person, but Mrs. JoBlo was bouncing off the walls at every other "boo!"
moment presented in the film, and so were quite a few others. The film is
extremely effective in that non-teen horror flick kinda way because it
actually manages to creep you out before deafening the room with its deadly
silence, and then boom! Fun stuff. The last thirty minutes also slapped me
silly with appreciation for the work of the man behind the camera, and an
excellent ending which had its twists and turns, some very tense moments and
a satisfying resolution. But I would consider myself an ass if I didn't
mention the consistently great work continued here by Michelle Pfeiffer for
this film. This lady is bursting with talent, secures you in the film with
her appearance as an everyday woman, and is completely gorgeous to boot!
Wow. Give her an Oscar already, goddamit!
Don't go see this movie if you're the type of person who is gonna be asking
your cinema partner the same question every two minutes "why don't they just
leave the house if it's haunted?". Listen friends, this is a movie. Work
with a little suspension of disbelief (or naivete in this scenario) and
enjoy the movie for the creeps that it does manage to sway in you. It's
kinda like the movie that THE HAUNTING was billed as being, but wasn't even
close. And this one might actually scare you crapless if sitting at home
alone in the dark. Take a friend, squeeze an arm (or whatever else is close)
and enjoy the first great thriller of the summer.
PS: Pooh on the damn marketing people at Dreamworks for spoiling a good
chunk of this film for everyone. It would've been nice NOT to know some of
the things that they give away in the trailer, but alas, tis the business of
show, and I guess that's all part of the biz.

Title
Review for Faculty, The (1998)
For more reviews and movie trivia, go to http://surf.to/joblo
Director Robert Robriguez teams up with the new sensation in horror
films, screenwriter Kevin Williamson, for a mixed up movie which
mingles elements of many other films including THE INVASION OF THE BODY
SNATCHERS, THE THING (8/10) and THE BREAKFAST CLUB (7.5/10). This film
was also one of the first to be heavily sponsored by a clothing line
for its publicity, as Tommy Hillfiger decided to take a stab at the
movies himself.
PLOT:
Six unique students with their respective identities all agree on one
thing: they believe their teachers to be possessed by aliens. As the
story unfolds, we find that their far-fetched theory is not that far
off.
CRITIQUE:
Passable horror flic manages to steal from literally every horror and
science-fiction movie from the past (while acknowledging most with a
wink of the eye), while moving at a slower pace than I would've
anticipated from a Rodriguez film, featuring some solid performances
from all of its stars, and a scattered set of special effects that were
anything but out of this world. This movie was never boring, but never
really did manage to blow me away from my seat either. The multitude
and breadth of its cast was elaborate and fun to watch, featuring Usher
the rapper, Bebe Neuwirth from TV's "Cheers", Josh Hartnett from this
year's other scary movie H20: HALLOWEEN (7.5/10) and even Summer
Phoenix, sister of Joaquin Phoenix, and the late River Phoenix. Add to
that, the fact that the script also wasn't anything fantastic, and
neither was the directorial style from the eye of Robert Rodriguez, and
you've got yourself a semi-interesting peek into a genre that could
easily be improved upon in the future.
There were a couple of scenes that were cool to see, and some slick
lines, but all in all this film drove along the standard teen horror
terrain without a kink in the road, with many science-fiction elements
tossed in for effect. The length of the film might not have been such
an issue with me, were it not for the fact that the students seemed to
go on discussing their issues ad infinitum, explaining the film as it
went along. I would suggest this film to all those that have enjoyed
the rest of the recent crop of horror junkfilms that have passed
through their mutliplexes of late, but ask that you not expect too much
in regards to originality or style. For the rest of you, well, just go
out and rent the original SCREAM (8/10) for a real good script by
Williamson, or see John Carpenter's classic sci-fi movie, THE THING
(8/10). All in all, a believable tale of sci-fi horror with an
unnecessary cast of names who play their roles quite well, which
ultimately didn't astound me due to its deja-vu factor, and which
surely could've used some Christmas "trimming" of its own.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
One obvious nod in the script to his own previous hit films, has Zeke
selling black market videocassettes of "Jennifer Love Hewitt and Neve
Campbell with full-frontal nudity" out of the trunk of his car. As we
all know by now, each respective girl starred in the Kevin
Williamson-penned screenplays of SCREAM (8/10) and I STILL KNOW WHAT
YOU DID LAST SUMMER (7.5/10).
Harry Knowles, the man behind the infamous "Ain't it Cool" Web site at
http://www.aint-it-cool-news.com/ has an appearance in this film. He
apparently plays the "film teacher" in the movie, but just look for the
overweight gentleman with the red hair, who seems to hang around in the
faculty lounge.
Summer Phoenix, younger sister of Joaquin Phoenix and the late River
Phoenix, plays the girl who keeps smacking her boyfriend around for the
whole movie.
Piper Laurie, the scary-looking teacher with the fat face, also played
CARRIE's (7/10) overbearing mom in the 1976 classic Brian DePalma film.
Robert Patrick, who plays Coach Willis in this film, is best remembered
as the T-1000 character that he played opposite Arnold Schwarzenegger
in 1991's TERMINATOR 2: JUDGMENT DAY (8/10).
Clea Duvall, who plays Stokely in this film is not related to acting
legend Robert Duvall.
Salma Hayek has played a role in all of director Robert Rodriguez'
Hollywood pictures. She stands 5"2, was born in southeast Mexico, and
is the daughter of a Lebanese father and a Mexican mother. Hayek began
her career in Mexican TV soap operas in late 80's.
Famke Janssen was born in Holland, where she began her professional
career as a model.
Laura Harris, who plays Mary Beth in this film, also played in SUICIDE
KINGS (6.5/10). She was the sister who got kidnapped by the mobsters.
Director Robert Robriguez earned most of the $7000 it cost to make his
first picture EL MARIACHI (7/10) by subjecting himself to experimental
drug studies. He has a son named Rocket.

Title
Review for Thirteen Days (2000)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Am I the only one who's had it up to here (that's right...here!) with films
that start by either thirteen or six? Let's look at the past few years.
There was THE THIRTEENTH FLOOR, THE THIRTEENTH WARRIOR and now, THIRTEEN
DAYS. There's also been THE SIXTH DAY, THE SIXTH SENSE and SIX DAYS, SEVEN
NIGHTS. C'mon Hollywood...get original, dude! How about tossing some new
numbers in there? The SECOND DAY might've been just as good/bad, or what
about the EIGHTEENTH WARRIOR? I don't know, maybe I'm just a little cranky
cause it's that time of the month again and my memory sucks, but let's see
what Kevin Costner has to say about all this...
PLOT:
Based on a real life event. The Soviet Union is stockpiling nuclear missiles
in Cuba. The United States spots the warheads and considers them to be a
little too close for comfort. The President and the rest of the big wigs in
the government spend the next thirteen days grazing the possibility of an
all-out war breaking out against the USSR. Who's gonna blink first? Are the
Soviets bluffing? Will Marilyn Monroe save the day?
CRITIQUE:
Historians, patient moviegoers and those fascinated with the
behind-the-scenes goings-on of all things political are likely to embrace
this movie. I dug it myself. Certain elements from it reminded me a lot of
two other great films, namely NO WAY OUT and CRIMSON TIDE, although this
film focused more on the talkie-talkie stuff, rather than any action,
romance or humor. Of course, this film isn't about that anyway. It's about
tense moments, tit-for-tat strategy sessions and basically, one of the
greatest political chess games of all time. I thoroughly enjoyed this film,
never once felt bored during its two and a half hour runtime and was gripped
by its many strong performances. Ironically, the first utterance of Kevin
Costner's thick, thick Boston accent had me wondering if I had walked into a
comedy or what, but it only took five minutes for me to believe both him,
his accent and pretty much everything else that occurred in this movie from
there on out.
You see, the Cuban Missile Crisis took place long before my time and I
honestly didn't know all that much about it before seeing this movie (me no
Americanos), so every second on the clock was a captivating one for me. The
jargon wasn't too hard to follow, especially with the Kennedy brothers
sharply tag-teaming their way through most of the hard-liners, and all of
the main characters, very well drawn out. And what about those awesome suits
that the brothers and Costner were wearing? Very cool! All in all, this
movie is structured a lot like a play. Plenty of dialogue, lots of
characters interacting amongst one another and very few distinct locations.
One thing I didn't "get" or like about this film, was the director's
seemingly arbitrary use of black and white vs color scenes. He pulled a
couple of these babies early on and then stopped. Not exactly sure why. It
was just distracting. But on the whole, the movie grabbed by the cojones and
let me fly up on the wall during a pretty funky time of our history.
Granted, it didn't have me chomping fingernails the whole way through, but
the tension was present throughout, the dead-on performances by Bruce
Greenwood and Steven Culp infectious to behold, and ultimately, the movie
helped me achieve a greater understanding of the entire event as it took
place, and allowed me to put my little miscommunication issues with the
Missus in perspective.
You see, when the Mrs. and I miscommunicate, I don't get any nookie for the
night. But when JFK and Kruschev miscommunicate in this movie (couldn't
these guys just call each other direct?), the result could likely have
turned into World War 3. Makes the whole toilet seat up-or-down debate seem
pretty insignificant, eh?
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Note about this film (from the press kit): While this picture is based upon
a true story, some characters have been composited or invented, and dialogue
and a number of incidents contained in this film were fictionalized for the
purpose of dramatization.
PackBacker, this one's for you! This is screenwriter David Self's second
produced screenplay. His first was for 1999's THE HAUNTING. Yikes!
Director Roger Donaldson previously worked with Kevin Costner in the 1987
thriller NO WAY OUT.

Title
Review for Antz (1998)
For more reviews and movie trivia, visit http://www.joblo.com/
PLOT:
One ant living among millions of others doesn't feel right in just following
orders and not thinking for himself all day, and attempts to find more
meaning in his monotonous, everyday humdrum existence.
CRITIQUE:
Competent, adult computer-animated feature from DreamWorks, manages to draw
some great one-liners from star Woody Allen, a few chuckles here and there,
and a semi-interesting story line, but nothing too outstanding. It was also
fun in respect to all of the big names that had voice parts in this film,
but somehow the movie didn't blow me away overall. The special effects were
good, but nothing spectacular, the characters were interesting, but not
fully engaging, and the lack of songs made it feel as though it was missing
a certain "je-ne-sais-quoi". Woody Allen was essentially portraying his
standard, neurotic role that he does in all of his films (he must've
ad-libbed some of his lines) and was damn funny, but it might not be so fun
for people who don't care for his typical, whiny character. Also, I don't
see kids appreciating most of the adult humor laced through this film. The
cute homages to other films like PULP FICTION (7.5/10) and RAMBO (When the
Stallone ant is being interrogated) was also nice, but overall, the movie is
just a passable good time, with some laughs, a lot of big star voices, and a
short running time (about one hour and twenty minutes).
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Woody Allen recorded his part as "Z" in only 5 days.


Title
Review for Summer of Sam (1999)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Spike Lee decides to take a novel route through his latest joint, foregoing
his usual emphasis on the lives of African-Americans, and instead, taking a
deep plunge into the mishmash of activity in the late 70s of New York City.
The "Son of Sam" serial killer, the Italian neighborhood caught in its
paranoiac frenzy, the burgeoning punk rock scene, the New York Yankees and
their bid for the Championship, the last days of disco, and well, what
else...love.
PLOT:
This film takes a look at a certain group of people in an Italian
neighborhood during one of New York City's most turbulent times. The year
was 1977 and the "Son of Sam" serial killer was on the loose. Meanwhile, a
husband cheats on his wife, a good ol' Italian boy turns punk and turns
tricks to support his music career, the police ask the Mob for help catching
the killer, while the rest of the Italian boys scratch out their own list of
suspects.
CRITIQUE:
A slice of life movie. This film is not for everyone, and will most
certainly not be enjoyed by those who go in expecting a serial killer
thriller, or a story told via the traditional trajectory. This movie is for
those folks who enjoy an authentic look back at a time and place in life, a
story full of rich characters, a delectable shooting style reminiscent of
films like GOODFELLAS (10/10) and BOOGIE NIGHTS (8/10), a lively and
appropriate soundtrack, and a superb cast of actors banging out their
greatest thespian hits. I personally believe that this film represents John
Leguizamo's finest work on film yet, with a terrific portrayal of a man
being torn apart by his respect of tradition and his more primitive
yearnings. Adrien Brody plays another great character, managing to capture
all of Ritchie's punk-rock attitude and bravado, with plenty of charm and
humanity, to register his person as one to care about.
On the down side, I think that the film could've been chopped down by twenty
minutes or so, and certainly been improved upon if the distracting
appearance of Spike Lee as a nerdy reporter, had been left on the cutting
room floor. Having said that, Spike the director has stylistically outdone
himself with this picture, playing with everything from the lights, to the
film stock, to the quick cuts to the camera angles...Oliver Stone beware! I
personally have always been a sucker for style and an interesting story told
by the point of view of lively and authentic characters. In fact, the "Son
of Sam" killer angle in this film is simply a backdrop to the proceedings of
these people's lives. An external stimulus mixed in to add paranoia to their
overflowing vat of personal issues in the hot, dirty summer of New York
City. This film managed to make me feel like I was there during that period.
Feel the music, smell the piss on the floor, see the craziness. If you want
to know more about the killer, then this film certainly ain't for you, but
if you want to bask in a couple of hours plus of interesting characters
dealing with real issues during a serial killer frenzy in the late 1970s of
New York City, a groovy soundtrack and a visual style that never lets you
get bored for a second, try this one on for size! It's sure to fit just
right.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
The real "Son of Sam" (David Berkowitz) converted to Christianity about 11
years ago, and maintains his own Web site out of jail:
http://www.inetworld.net/hutrcc/david.htm
Mira Sorvino's part of "Dionna" in this film was originally given to
Jennifer Esposito, but she had to take a different part as "Ruby" when
scheduling conflicts prevented her from taking the lead.
Screenwriter Michael Imperioli also acts in this picture. You may also
remember him from one of his most infamous roles as "Spider" from Martin
Scorsese's classic mob tale GOODFELLAS (10/10), in which he gets shot in the
foot by the Joe Pesci character. He also plays a character named Christopher
on TV's "The Sopranos" who, in tribute to his earlier role, shoots someone
else in the foot. Ironically, co-screenwriter Victor Collichio also had a
part in GOODFELLAS, as one of Henry's 80s crew.
John Leguizamo claims that he is actually a better dancer than the film
portrays, since he had to wear high-heeled shoes for his dancing scenes with
Mira Sorvino, because the filmmakers felt as though their size discrepancy
was an issue. Leguizamo didn't really care about the size difference. He's
5'5", she's 5'11".
Leguizamo was born in Bogot, Colombia, and moved to America with his family
when he was four. He was accepted into Lee Strasberg's Actors Studio and
studied with the master for one day before Strasberg died.
The staple white guy in most Spike Lee films, John Turturro, makes a
surreptitious appearance in this film as well. Listen closely, and you may
just recognize his voice as that of the dog which speaks to the "Son of Sam"
character at some point in the movie.
Mira Sorvino is a babe who has degree from Harvard University, speaks fluent
Mandarin Chinese and once dated video-store clerk turned into director
extraordinaire Quentin Tarantino,
Boxing champion Evander Holyfield has a two-bit part as a "man in riot"
during one scene, while screenwriters Victor Collichio and Michael Imperioli
both make appearances as the characters of "Chickie" and "Midnight"
respectively.
Retired Det. Richard Paul was the Technical Advisor on this film. He was
involved in the first "Son of Sam" homicide. This film was originally titled
THE SON OF SAM.

Title
Review for Pearl Harbor (2001)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
PLOT:
Two best friends turned fighter pilots are put right into the action in 
1941, as WWII is swelling up and casualties are mounting. It isn't long 
before the Japanese conduct their surprise attack on Pearl Harbor, the 
American base in Hawaii, and the two boys are once again, put into the 
middle of things. Oh yeah, they've also both fallen for the same girl in 
the meantime...sheesh!
CRITIQUE:
The first hour of this movie was so-so. The second hour of this movie 
kicked some mighty ass. The third hour of this movie was so-so, with a 
weak ending. So, overall? Well, I'd say that this is an average flick 
that doesn't need to be seen in the theatres unless you really wanna 
check out all of its awesome visuals on the big screen. Otherwise, wait 
for video so that you could fast-forward through all of its boring "love 
triangle" shite. I guess I'm kinda half and half on this movie. Granted, 
the attack sequences were freakin' amazing! They lasted long, they 
delivered excitement, pain, frenzy and everything else you'd expect from 
a film trying to convey some of what went down in Pearl Harbor back in 
1941. But does that all that cool stuff make for a complete movie? Of 
course not...especially not a film which asks that you remain seated for 
three hours. That's usually up to its characters. So did the leads in 
this movie draw me into their plight, engage me as I expected to be 
engaged, make me cry when they cried, laugh when they laughed...well, 
you get the picture. Unfortunately, the answer to all of those questions 
is a resounding "no"! I didn't care for any of the main characters in 
this movie and I certainly wasn't interested in their phony-baloney 
three-way romance thingamajig.
I figure...the movie is called "Pearl Harbor", not "Love in the Skies". 
Of course, I wouldn't be making such a big thing about this whole 
romance aspect, if they had just made it a "small" part of the bigger 
picture (or if it had worked!), but sadly, it basically IS the picture! 
(unlike ENEMY AT THE GATES, which managed to slip in a little romance, 
but not without affecting the war movie aspect as a whole). In this 
movie, it basically just felt like the whole "war thing" was happening 
in the background, while this great ol' romance took center stage. But 
the chemistry just wasn't there, the emotions just weren't there and to 
be honest with you...it just felt tacked on! Like the filmmakers knew 
that they wanted to tell the story of Pearl Harbor, but believed 
audiences to be uninterested in such a film unless told through the eyes 
of some goofy romance. I don't know. Either that or they figured that 
their box-office grosses would be greater with a "love" thing happening, 
but whatever the case, it just didn't gel for me.
Which is why I don't blame the actors, who were just doing their jobs, 
but what can they do when the script that they're studying is missing 
one main ingredient...humanity! I remember weeping like a child when I 
watched TITANIC because I had actually started to give a shite about its 
characters. This movie amazed me with its visuals but pretty much bored 
me with its human interactions. Next time, how about taking some of that 
money from your gigantic budget and hiring some writers who can develop 
some real emotional attachment to their characters? But enough about 
that. Actor-wise, I was actually quite impressed with two thespians in 
particular, one being the almost unrecognizable Jon Voight as President 
Roosevelt, and the other, Alec Baldwin, who delivers across the board as 
the tough as nails Colonel James Dolittle (GLENGARRY anyone?). The 
directing and authenticity of the period were also quite impressive, 
especially during the war scenes, although I didn't particularly care 
for the "blurry vision" style utilized by Bay during the hospital 
scenes. It just frustrated me. And surprisingly, much like TITANIC, this 
film didn't really feel like three hours to me, although it did tend to 
slow down (or maybe that was just my disinterest) during its so-called 
"emotional" moments.
So is it an entertaining movie overall? No, not overall. Some of it does 
definitely entertain, but most of it just makes you wanna slap the 
filmmakers for ruining a good war flick with an overlong, sappy and 
uninspiring "romance" angle. Oh well, now let's see how much money it's 
gonna make...
Where's JoBlo coming from?
13 Days (8/10) - Armageddon (8/10) - Crimson Tide (9/10) - Enemy at the 
Gates (8/10) - Gladiator (8/10) - The Patriot (7/10) - Saving Private 
Ryan (8/10) - Thin Red Line (5/10) - Titanic (7/10) - U-571 (7/10)

Title
Review for 15 Minutes (2001)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
PLOT:
A media-savvy cop joins a young arson investigator on a case featuring two
nasty Eastern European immigrants searching for their fifteen minutes of
fame.
CRITIQUE:
A very original and timely movie which connects on various levels. Now I
know that I've said this before but here's yet another great performance by
Robert DeNiro, charismatic, funny and as intelligent as ever, an interesting
script which takes the "hot" elements of the day and turns them into a
digestible story and even a little bit of action and humor. In fact, I
probably wouldn't know how to qualify this movie exactly, but one thing that
I can say about it is that it'll definitely have you talking. It'll have you
talking about its meaning, its truth, its fiction, its message, its
reality...pretty much everything that the film tries to address. Unless of
course, you think the movie sucks, in which case, I doubt you'll care to
look over any of it... :)
You see, this film is basically about busting the balls of all the "good
folks" in the media who cannot seem to look past their ratings to ask
themselves if what they're doing is right. Is what they are doing the right
thing to do? Should they be setting couples up on an island filled with
pretty single people just to see if anything will happen? Should they be
showing live child-births on TV? (for journalistic purposes, of course) And
ultimately, what are we gonna do once things start getting really out of
hand? What are we gonna say to live executions on the air, a hostage
negotiations gone awry or maybe even the telecast of an actual murder. Is
that newsworthy? Perhaps...but does that mean that we need to show it on TV?
Has the media lost all sense of decency, morality and self-control? Well, I
won't bore you too much with my own opinion regarding all of this stuff,
other than to say that I am very much against the sacks of human garbage who
continue to propagate this type of sensationalistic so-called "journalism",
but that's another story and column altogether. 
This movie softly touches on all of these questions and concerns, and does
so in a very convincing and entertaining manner. It reveals all of the
hypocrisies by which most of these people live, and also exposes the
manipulative ways by which many of them achieve their goals. Sure, there are
a few weak spots in the script, with the impulsive "bad guys" always seeming
to be one step ahead of their "good guy" counterparts, despite their obvious
nonchalance, and a certain amount of farfetchedness in their ultimate goal,
but overall, I bought most of it with a mighty big spoon. Another great
thing about this movie was its element of surprise. There I was sitting in a
theatre and literally not knowing what would happen next. Quite the unusual
position to be in, let me tell you. It was refreshing to watch a movie in
which originality actually replaced cliches and the characters helped guide
you through their world of real emotions. What else can I say about this
movie? It's basically got a lot of different elements working within it and
most of them worked for me. There are touches of humor, some cool action
scenes, a genuine sense of unpredictability, a little romance, an undeniable
message and many questions left to be discussed. In fact, how many movies
can you name that are actually able to entertain and make you think and
engage in conversation at the same time? Not many, eh? Well, for me this
movie was one of this year's early nice surprises. You go, Bobby!!
Where's JoBlo coming from?
Broadcast News (7/10) - EdTV (7/10) - Fight Club (10/10) - Mad City (4/10) -
Ronin (8/10) - The Truman Show (6/10) - Wag the Dog (5/10)

Title
Review for State and Main (2000)
For more reviews, screensavers, trailers & more, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Probably not the best title for a movie about the behind the scenes
shenanigans of a Hollywood picture filming in a small Vermont town, but with
gifted writer/director David Mamet at the helm, who am I to question
cinematic decisions? I was one of the lucky few to check out the premiere of
this film at the Montreal Film Festival and even got a picture with Mamet
himself (A gentleman who was nice enough to wait patiently as I fumbled
through my duffelbag looking for my camera...doh!). The only question that
remained to be answered was to which one of Mamet's previous comedies this
picture most related: would it be WAG THE DOG, the comedy hit or WE'RE NO
ANGELS, the comedy disaster. Let's find out...
PLOT:
A Hollywood production crew comes to a small town to film a movie starring a
very popular actor and a whining starlet. The process becomes more difficult
as the script constantly has to be re-written, the star has his eye on a
local teen girl and the starlet refuses to do the topless scene that she
agreed to do in her contract. It isn't long before the small town values
begin affecting some of its visitors and the Hollywood phoniness affects
everyone.
CRITIQUE:
I enjoy watching movies that deal with Hollywood and its behind the scenes
goings-on, and this one was no different. It certainly didn't blow me away
with any of its humor, but it was a nice, light comedy filled with several
interesting characters, a few really funny lines and an infectious
easy-going score. In fact, the clever lines alone were an easy step up from
any typical Hollywood tart romp, but on the whole, it still rode in a little
under my Mamet expectation meter. I had hoped for a lot more "bite"! The
film ran a little too long for its own good and spent too much time on a
relationship between a couple of the characters, who really weren't half as
funny or interesting as anyone else in the movie. For me, two of the
funniest personalities in the film were Alec Baldwin, who played the aloof,
conceited yet charming star to a tee (nice to have you back, Alec!), and
David Paymer, who must've channeled the spirit of Joel Silver for his role
as the arrogant, no holds barred producer. These two guys had some really
hilarious lines in the movie and obviously loved the roles that they were
playing.
I also liked the director in this movie inhabited perfectly by William H.
Macy and all of his backdoor phoniness, but I didn't think that there was
enough time spent with these three characters. Mamet decided to focus more
on the screenwriter and his dilemma in this story, and despite being a
writer myself, I didn't particularly care much for his predicament. The
greater point of the film was predictable early on, so I would have rather
they focused more on all of the characters, rather than just the one. But
that's honestly just a minor quirk in an overall decent film which should
definitely be seen by all who enjoy the behind the scenes game of Hollywood.
It reminded me a lot of MUMFORD and LIVING IN OBLIVION, with it being much
funnier than the former but not as funny as the latter. In the end, I don't
think this film is gonna blow anybody's socks off, but it certainly is a
nice change from all the poop-joke movies that've been shot our way of late.
It's small, it's cute, it's David Mamet-lite.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Actress Rebecca Pidgeon has been married to writer/director David Mamet
since 1991. She has starred in his last four directing gigs including this
film, CATASTROPHE (TV), THE WINSLOW BOY and THE SPANISH PRISONER. They have
one daughter together.
David Mamet won the Pulitzer prize in drama for GLENGARY GLEN ROSS. He was
co-writer of RONIN under the pseudonym Richard Weisz.
Alec Baldwin is also the executive producer on this project.
This is actor William H. Macy's fifth film collaboration with director David
Mamet.
This film was filmed entirely in Massachusetts. The small town used in the
film is Manchester, Mass.

Title
Review for Perfect Storm, The (2000)
For more reviews and movie wallpapers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
"Money shots". I have to admit that I have always been a sucker for money
shots in movie trailers. Who can forget the tidal wave scene from DEEP
IMPACT a couple of years ago, or just recently, the shot of Catherine
Zeta-Jones slinking under a red laser with her butt sticking up in the air
for ENTRAPMENT. Money shots are those very scenes in a movie trailer that
make us want to see the film in question. This year, the top money shot for
me was the gigantic son-of-a-bitch wave featured for this film. What a shot!
What a wave! Here's my nine dollars and change...now let's see the movie!
PLOT:
Based on a true story, written about in a novel, this movie features an
atmospheric anomaly known as the perfect storm and the six men who happened
to get caught right in the middle of it while going out to catch some fish.
CRITIQUE:
This movie starts off slow, wanders into its own at about the halfway point
and gets really, really wet and wild after that! Are you one of those people
who is prone to seasickness? Well, if you are, I wouldn't suggest that you
see this movie, cause it really does make you feel like you're part of the
ride during its second half. Boats capsizing left and right, crewmembers
scrambling all over the deck, water crunching down on the little ship as it
keeps pushing itself further into the monster storm from hell! This movie
sure beat the crap out of my senses as it moved through the psychotic gale,
but I have to admit that it all did seem a little redundant after a while.
Okay, so here's yet another shot of George and Marky Mark guarding the fort
at the helm of the ship. And here's even more water splashing all over them.
Hmmm....okay! But don't mind my sarcasm too much, I did thoroughly enjoy the
second half of this film. It was tense, it was fast, it was furious,
godammit I'll say it...it was a whole barrel of monkey fun! And that's the
kind of thing that I look for in a summer action popcorn presentation.
Slap together a few interesting actors with decent skills. Set up an
engaging tale, and blow me away with a lot of cool effects and plenty of
action. Check, check and check! I would've preferred that the sentimental
crap at the beginning of the film was chopped of a wee bit. I would've
preferred that the lovely Diane Lane, whom I honestly do love, remembered to
brush up on her acting skills before her breakdown scenes. And I definitely
would've preferred that the whole side-story about the helicopter dudes
jumping into the water, was replaced by a rescue attempt by another ship, or
just more focus on the Andrea Gail, but then again, I'm just a dinky
audience member with a sharp opinion. Overall, I can't say that I didn't
enjoy the film. It provided me with just the right amount of mindless
entertainment that I needed over this hot, sticky, summer holiday weekend. I
was also very glad to see the return of the money shot from the film's
trailer, a shot which is definitely atop my list of most amazing things I've
seen on the big screen this year. What a scene! Add William Fichtner into
the mix, little screen time for Mastrantonio, and just enough character
development for me to give a rat's ass about most of the crew members, and I
thank Wolfgang for slapping together another decent nail-biter. Thank you,
my good man...I think I'm gonna go throw up now! (but in a good way)

Title
Review for Before Night Falls (2000)
For more reviews and movie wallpapers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
PLOT:
The life and times of Cuban poet/novelist Reinaldo Arenas, during the
revolution, and afterwards, as his homosexuality and art clash with the
government's oppressive regime.
CRITIQUE:
Not my cup o' tea. I was expecting to learn something from this movie. It's
obviously not a film that was made to "entertain", but one which I believed
would hopefully give me some more insight into the plight of Cubans back in
the day, some further insight into the life and times of poet/novelist
Reinaldo Arenas, and an all-out gangbusters performance from lead, Javier
Bardem (nominated for an Oscar for this role). Unfortunately, none of my
expectations were fulfilled. In fact, here's an example of one of the things
which simply didn't work for me in this film. You know how when you read a
poem, you don't really understand its full meaning right away, so you bask,
simmer on it a bit, reflect and then read it again to see where it's all
coming from? Well, this film actually inserts bits of Arenas' poetry
throughout, but the words don't really say much since they're generally
spoken over several shots. I mean, you sit there, one, trying to decipher
exactly what it is that Javier is pronouncing, since his accent is pretty
incomprehensible at times, and two, what exactly those words mean in the
context of what is going on in the movie. Of course, the movie doesn't
really give you much time to reflect upon any of these words, since the
story is moving on, and the moments, well...ultimately fall flat.
The story also wasn't very clear to begin with, and maybe this had to do
with the fact that I knew little about this man or the Cuban revolution
beforehand (although I doubt it), but can someone please explain to me how
Johnny Depp's character can be both a general in their army and a
cross-dressing man who helps some of the inmates out at the same time?
(without anybody noticing!) And how did Reinaldo finally get out of jail?
(another unclear scenario) And why did all of his boyfriends look so
similar? I could hardly tell them apart! And the length of the movie just
added to the general, yes, "boredom" of it all. Over two hours, and not much
new or interesting to say within. In fact, if it wasn't for the directing,
which was top-notch, I wouldn't have anything good to say about this film
(granted, it all looked pretty authentic as well). Bardem's performance?
So-so, but honestly nothing to crow about. In fact, his voice-overs were
particularly hard to understand. And his character's arc, not all that
impressive either. The stuff in Cuba, I pretty much already knew about (Cuba
bad, no likey freedom of expression and such), and the stuff in the States
was just too drawn-out and confusing...again.
Of course, this movie isn't supposed to be appreciated by the "general"
audience anyway. It's got that certain "art-house" feel about it and been
highly praised my many among that group. Personally, it did nothing for me!
In fact, it seemed to exude more energy into its pretenses than the actual
story. So can you tell that I didn't like this movie? Listen, I don't mind a
good artsy-fartsy flick every now and again either, but this one just didn't
offer me much to work with. Very little empathy for its lead character, very
little actual story-telling and lotsa poetry fluttering about like a rose
broken upon the concrete blocks that bear the breasts of the world inside
the cynicism which destroys its flowers upon creation. Yeah, whatever! A
pretty big bore. BTW, can anyone please tell me why Sean Penn shows up for
30 seconds as a Cuban horse-carriage driver, says a few words and leaves?
(other than so that we could point to the screen and say "Hey look, it's
Sean Penn in heavy makeup!"). Pass!
Where's JoBlo coming from?
Fear and Loathing in Las Vegas (7/10) - Happiness (3/10) - Man on the Moon
(5/10) - Quills (8/10) - Wonder Boys (8/10) - Your Friends and Neighbors
(5/10)

Title
Review for Big Kahuna, The (1999)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Don't go into this movie looking for a "good time", cause that's not what
this film is about. Of course, if they had billed this flick as the story of
three men going on and on about God, life and their jobs in a hotel room for
ninety minutes, I doubt the line-ups would be straddled around the block.
You can also forget the subtle hipness of GLENGARRY GLENROSS or the black
humor of AMERICAN BEAUTY, despite the commonality of the sales racket as its
setting, and the re-assessment of one's life, the main course on the menu.
PLOT:
Three salesmen, one quick and honest, one young and religious, and one tired
and fed up of the whole thing, prepare to spend a night entertaining clients
in a hotel room, while they await the arrival of the "big kahuna" (the big
lead). Despite this setup, the film is actually more about the interaction
between the three men, their inner thoughts, feelings and issues.
CRITIQUE:
Talkity-talkity-talkity...this film basically takes place in one room, with
three solid actors babbling away about a lot of stuff that's funny and
interesting, and other stuff that is just slow and repetitive. I actually
had to "tune out" for a few minutes while some of the conversation went back
and forth and back again, only to regain my composure, and re-establish my
connection to the characters. Admittedly, I saw this film while I was pretty
sleepy, so that definitely might've played a factor in the game, but this
certainly is no nail-biter or tension-filled piece, by any stretch of the
imagination. In fact, it's actually more like a play (based on one), with
three characters basically ping-ponging a diverse lot of subjects back and
forth, with the crux of the story centering around the one young man's
progression into the sales game/adulthood. The actors all do formidable
jobs, with Spacey clocking in his usual fast-talking, smart aleck with a lot
of the funnier written lines. Facinelli, definitely one to watch for in the
future, delivers a solid showing as the ultra-straight mid-westerner who's
still wading in a mini-pool of naivet. And DeVito, who I personally have
been pretty critical against over the past few years, essentially razzing on
his staple performances in various two-bit productions, actually stretches
his thespianatic muscles for a change, and delivers one of the deeper roles
of his career. You can't help but feel the poor bastard's pain all over the
place. Pretty rough.
The film on the whole is actually kind of uneven, with the first thirty
minutes or so concentrating more on the hip one-liners and straight-talking
sales bullshit, while the second half seriously switches into a high
existential mode. Psychology students could have a field day with this film,
with each of the prime players going through some kind of head-trip or
another during the film's quick ninety minutes. Of course, it is ultimately
DeVito's character who seems to anchor the gang's frustration, with just
enough resolve left in his heart to do something about the situation. But
even then, the game is played out mostly in the mind of the viewer. Plot is
actually secondary in this film, with the "big kahuna" dopplegangering as
the big client for whom the boys await, and the mid-life crisis which
DeVito's character is seemingly going through. All in all, this film is to
be suggested to those who enjoy the plotless, deep character studies rife
with conversations on top of conversations, on top of a few more
conversations. But I certainly wouldn't recommend this to anyone really
looking for an interesting "story", which this film only eludes to, or
tension, suspense and drama, three other noticeably absent members of this
film. Like actors and theatre in general? Then see it. Don't enjoy "talky"
movies and think theatre is "boring"? Skip this puppy or wait till video.
That way, you could fall asleep and nobody'll be the wiser.

Title
Review for Bless the Child (2000)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
You know that a movie has issues when most everyone in the audience comes
out laughing...and it's not a comedy! And what a strange career path for
director Chuck Russell. He starts his career off with a decent take on the
"Nightmare on Elm Street" series with his debut as director on installment
number three. He follows that up with THE BLOB the very next year, but waits
another six years to do his next piece, a little film called THE MASK
starring Jim Carrey, and then one more star vehicle in ERASER two years
after that. So then he thought, "Let me wait another five years, get a weak
script jammed with cliches and hope that Jimmy Smits and Kim Basinger could
pull it out of its ashes"?!? Strange dude and one crappy flick.
PLOT:
A six-year old girl is believed to be some kind of mysterious prophet sent
down from God. A Satanic cult wants the girl to switch over to their side,
while the girl's aunt wants to...well, save her from those damn devil
worshippers! Enter one occult expert agent, plenty of bobo cops and lots of
nuns praying, and you've just about got the gist of things here.
CRITIQUE:
With plot holes the size of my ass, this movie barely squeezes any sense out
of its clich-ridden plot, with wasted talent, cheezy effects, bad dialogue
and unintentional laughs to boot. What's good about this movie? Well, Rufus
Sewell is pretty fun to watch as the head of a creepy runaway children's
shelter/Satanist supreme, with seriously wicked eyes and just enough ham in
his performance to go with all of the cheese lying around. The little girl
is also pretty good but unfortunately her character doesn't really do all
that much. And believe it or not, I was actually enjoying some of the film's
first half hour, which starts off with some promise, but not before bonehead
moves after bonehead moves from our protagonist, Basinger, just drown the
film's entire basis of believability. For some reason, it takes her more
time than anyone to figure out that her niece is gifted, and even longer to
figure out that every move that she makes...is a dumb one! Add that to the
entire police force of incompetents, save for Jimmy Smits (whose talent
agent advised him that playing the exact same cop character from NYPD BLUE
would be a good career move? At least change the clothes, Jimmy!), zero
scares, zero thrills and even less actual drama, and you've got yourself a
pretty bad movie. And why would respected actors like Christina Ricci and
Ian Holm take bit parts in this movie? Did they owe the director a favor or
something? Together, they barely have five minutes of screen time, but I
suppose that Ricci's hospital room scene might be worth a look for some of
you horn-dogs.
The worst part about this movie is its hilariously unbelievable ending,
which features police officers coming up with the brilliant idea of
"sneaking up" on a man's house, who they know to be guilty of a crime!
Uuuhmm...how's about knocking on the door and arresting his sorry ass,
officers?! Anyway, I don't usually inscribe spoilers in my reviews but the
stupidity of some of these characters is just too difficult to describe
without validating it with solid idiotic proof (and there was plenty to go
around). And did Basinger lose some of her acting "talent" during her hiatus
from the profession after her 1997 Oscar win? Difficult to say if it was her
lines that were really bad, or if she just delivered them poorly. Either
way, little originality, very obvious computer effects, little thrills,
little drama and very little entertainment value, certainly bestow the honor
of one of the worst movies of the summer upon this film. But if you really
don't mind a rehashed gobbledygook of various Satanic and "kid"-based
thrillers, and enjoy watching films that don't bring anything new to the
table...well, drink some beers, smoke some beans and rent this video,
because it may just be one of the funnier thrillers of the year.

Title
Review for Wild Wild West (1999)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Based on the 1960s TV series that I had never seen or heard of before this
movie (Be happy, I won't bore you with any lame and unnecessary
comparisons), this film allows Will Smith to take a third stab at the
Independence Day weekend box-office, after scoring huge successes with MEN
IN BLACK (7/10), directed by the same man who controlled this one, and
INDEPENDENCE DAY (6/10). Can you say...the third times NOT a charm?
PLOT:
James West and Artemus Gordon are chosen by the President to find the man
responsible for the kidnapping of the Nation's top scientists, and
threatening to take over the United States within a week.
CRITIQUE:
I did not laugh once during this entire picture. When you consider that this
film is a part-comedy, that's not a very good sign. I also did not tense up
or particularly enjoy any of its unenergetic action sequences which provided
me with little more than a few minutes time to think back to the lovely
Salma Hayek scenes. When you consider that the other "part" of this film is
geared as an action/adventure, I would say that this another negative sign.
And when you consider that the first hour of the film was boring and a
little slow, the story-line tired, reminiscent of Swiss cheese and
uninvolving, and the special effects interesting but worth very little
inside a plot filled with lame one-liners, weak characterizations and an
anti-climactic end, you pretty much have the gist of my impression of this
"big" summer blockbuster. It blows. Or as they say in French, "Eet blows".
Could it be that the script was crappy because it took four people to write
it? Maybe. Could it be that most of the special effects don't show up until
the last half hour, and even then, we don't see anything that its trailers
hadn't already given away? Perhaps. Or could it be that we have come to
expect so much more from Will Smith and Hollywood big-budget movies, that we
cannot help but evaluate them on a scale onto their own? Naaaaaaah! A bad
movie is a bad movie. On a positive note, I could honestly say that I did
very much enjoy the lovely performance by the adorable Salma Hayek, who
seemed underused (In my humble opinion), and lit up every bubbly scene that
she was hardly in. Branagh was also fun as the scenery-munching,
over-the-top bad guy, but that's pretty much where the entertainment-buck
stopped. Smith and Kline were static at best, the plot full of holes, and
the score insignificant and derivative of a dozen others. I would strongly
advise anyone not to see this movie. Then again, there is that one scene
with the lovely Salma Hayek tied up in a cage...huh...oh yeah, but the rest
of the movie sucked.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Will Smith has starred in two of the ten all-time top grossing films
worldwide: 1997's summer blockbuster MEN IN BLACK (7/10), for which he also
recorded the Grammy-winning title song, and 1996's INDEPENDENCE DAY (6/10).
He once turned down a scholarship to MIT to pursue his singing career.
Kevin Kline is a graduate of the Juilliard School of Drama, and has been
married to the cute-as-a-button actress Phoebe Cates since 1989. They have
two kids together, Greta Simone and Owen. One of the buildings that gets
blown up in this film has "Kasdan" written on it. Lawrence Kasdan is a
director known to have worked with Kevin on five of his movies, including
THE BIG CHILL, SILVERADO, I LOVE YOU TO DEATH, GRAND CANYON and FRENCH KISS.
Salma Hayek gave up a successful career as a major television star in Latin
America and moved to the United States to start over, even though she spoke
no English. She made her feature film debut as an actress with a small role
in Allison Anders' MI VIDA LOCA (No, not the Rickie Martin video!) and
played her first starring role in Robert Rodriguez's DESPERADO opposite
Antonio Banderas. Since then, she has made an appearance in each one of
Rodriguez's films. She stands 5'2", was born in southeast Mexico, and the
daughter of a Lebanese father and a Mexican mother.
One of the actresses cast as Branagh's lovely but lethal beauties includes
Bail Ling, a stage and screen star in her native China who was last seen
starring opposite Dick Gere in RED CORNER (7/10). Another is Dutch-born
Frederique Van Der Wal, who is one of the world's most recognized
supermodels, having graced the cover of Cosmopolitan numerous times, as well
as Harper's Bazaar, Vogue and Mademoiselle.

Title
Review for Varsity Blues (1999)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
PLOT:
Good ol' Texan kid suddenly gets to play first-string quarterback on his
high school team's football team, in a town where football is considered
religion. The coach is just about the biggest A-hole you'd ever want to
meet, who will do practically anything to win. The good ol' Texan boy does
not approve of said man's methods.
CRITIQUE:
A fun football movie. This film was obviously geared towards the teen
market, with MTV behind its production, a big TV star actor in the lead
role, rockin' hip music galore, and plenty of T&A. Having said that, I
enjoyed the look and feel of the movie, thought James Van Der Beek gave a
solid performance, loved the slick sounds, and yup , loved
that T&A! I actually thought this was a comedy going in, but overall, it
plays more towards the dramatic, than a comedy. I also enjoyed Jon Voight's
performance as the stubborn dick coach, as well as many of the other
character players on the team. This is not a classic film by any stretch of
the imagination, but it might teach some kids the hard lessons behind the
"fun" game of football, or just allow them to have a good time for about an
hour and forty-five minutes in the movie theatre (Or in the comfort of their
own home, depending on where you watch this stuff.) All in all, I would
definitely watch this movie if you like football, play football or want your
kid to succeed in high school football. You could also watch it if you like
teen flicks with a lot of cute guys and girls running around doing their
stuff.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
James Van Der Beek actually started acting after a concussion stopped him
from playing football in real life. He is the oldest of three children, and
his father is a cellular phone salesman while his mom runs a gymnastics
studio. He's born in Connecticut and received $200,000 for his role in this
film.
Actor Scott Caan, who plays football player "Tweeder" in this film, is the
son of famed actor James Caan in real life. That's right, he's Sonny's son!
Actress Amy Smart, who plays Van Der Beek's girlfriend in this movie, also
played the main star's girl in the 1999 film OUTSIDE PROVIDENCE (6.5/10).
Screenwriter W. Peter Iliff also had a part in writing the screenplays for
the 1992 Harrison Ford film, PATRIOT GAMES, and the Keanu Reeves surfing
flick, POINT BREAK.
Director Brian Robbins might be best remembered as the "cool dude" from the
TV series "Head of the Class". His name was Eric Mandrian and he generally
wore a long, black trench coat on the show.
The book Mox (James Van Der Beek) is reading on the sidelines in this movie,
hidden inside the team's playbook, is "Slaughterhouse-Five" by Kurt
Vonnegut, Jr.
The high school fight song played at the pep rally is the Texas A&M War
Hymn.

Title
Review for Emperor's New Groove, The (2000)
For more reviews and movie wallpapers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
PLOT:
A stuck-up emperor with an evil advisor gets turned into a lama after some
of his selfish behavior gets out of hand. Stuck in the middle of the jungle,
the great leader must ask for assistance from a lowly peasant. The duo
attempt to get back to the palace, so that the emperor could be returned to
his former self.
CRITIQUE:
Not as ambitious as many of Disney's other animation flicks, but definitely
one of its funniest. It's not the animation that will blow anyone away with
this movie, it's actually very basic, and it's not the music or the score,
both of which are also very standard. It's the four lead characters that are
a blast and despite a ho-hum story, the charm and humor built into these
characters, draws you in and allows you to have a mucho good time! First
there's David Spade, perfectly cast as the sarcastic emperor with an
attitude to kill. No doubt that Spade used some of his own improvisational
skills to make this character even more cold-hearted (Bu-bye!). The
commoner, voiced by John Goodman, a great ying to Spade's yang. A nice guy
with a cute family to whom anyone should be able to relate. Not an
over-the-top character, but one with enough morals to balance the lack
thereof in Spade's emperor. A great straight man. There's also the evil
Yzma, who actually plays out a complete person, with humor, thoughtfulness
and more than the usual one dimension. And the best surprise of all, and
easily the second funniest character after the lead, Kronk, the dumb-guy
side-kick, who looks exactly like Bruce Campbell from the EVIL DEAD movies,
and delivers many of the film's most uproarious lines. I just couldn't help
but laugh at everything that this guy did and said. They could make a movie
out of this guy alone!
The film also includes plenty of pratfalls for the kids (a la Road Runner),
sarcastic adult remarks for the parents joining the young ones in the
theatres and no musical interludes at any point...yes, that's right, no one
breaks out into a Broadway tune every five minutes. There's also a
self-referential narration by the lead character that works and is original.
Very unexpected to see a Disney film being stopped halfway by a character
wanting to make a point about something. Funny shtuff. The film doesn't have
any major action scenes either, but the last twenty minutes should give
everyone a hoot and a holler to take home. And it's like I said earlier,
very little ambition in this movie. The story is a very simple one, the
emperor gets turned into a lama and he now wants to get back to the palace
to return to his old self, end of story. But every other line in the film is
laced with sarcasm or dry wit and I just love that kind of humor. This film
may definitely not be for everyone, much like Spade's own humor, but I
certainly thought it was worthy of its quick 75 minute runtime. Go with the
kids, I doubt that you'll regret it. Not a classic, not a keeper but
definitely a very funny movie with great new characters. The title still
stinks though.

Title
Review for X Files, The (1998)
Popular FOX TV series makes its big screen debut helmed by a veteran
director of at least 25 of the small screen episodes, Rob Bowman. The
paranormal vibes. During this year's last episode, the X-Files were
shut down by the FBI. That's pretty much all the intro you need to know
before you see this film.
PLOT:
A bomb blows off a big chunk of a federal building in Dallas, Texas. As
Mulder and Scully step up their investigation into the bombing, they
begin to uncover many zany theories and cover-ups about the puzzling
explosion. While delving further into the case, the defiant duo find
themselves trapped in an international game of intrigue, mystery and
extra-terrestrial politics.
***Understand that my critique comes from a solid streak of experience
with the show. Having said that, an inexperienced viewer can also enjoy
this critique, since you need not have seen one episode of the TV
series, to truly appreciate this well-developed movie***
CRITIQUE:
Mysterious, moody, exciting at parts, this movie succeeds in bringing
the spookiness and interest of the television series to the big screen.
Having said that, the film did at times feel like one big television
episode, with a larger plot line and greater special effects. Also, it
did seem to go on for a tad too long. 
The plot of the film is interesting, the characters are believable, and
the action is exciting and scary at times (The scenes with the aliens
are very cool and exciting). Mulder and Scully have no discernible
problems tackling the big screen, while adding words like "shit" to
their vocabulary. While the suspicions about their possible romantic
entanglement in this film are also answered, they certainly will not be
given away by JoBlo here. Also, there did seem to be a touch more
humour on the big-screen than the show, which helped many long-winded
and jargon-filled scenes move along at an easier pace. The creators of
the film also took the time to "piss" all over the greatest box-office
science-fiction success from 1996, INDEPENDENCE DAY (6.5/10), in a most
interesting and "subtle" way.
Overall, the movie worked for me as a thriller and a science-fiction
fable, but somehow seemed to run a little too long, and lacked the
earth-shattering ending that I was expecting. Having said that, they
have now added many new elements to explore in the TV series, which
will most certainly pick up many new viewers after this slick film.
Warm up your nachos and cuddle up with your love-bunny on this one,
folks...it's gonna be a bumpy ride!
Little Known Facts: 
David Duchovny once played a transvestite detective on the Twin Peaks
television series, and read for the replacing role for Val Kilmer as
Batman in BATMAN AND ROBIN.
David William Duchovny stands 6", was born in NY, New York, and earned
an undergraduate degree from Princeton University and a graduate degree
in English Literature from Yale University. While at Yale, he began
commuting to New York to study acting and was soon appearing in
off-Broadway plays. In 1987 he abandoned his doctoral studies at Yale
to pursue acting full time. Duchovny means 'spiritual' in Russian.
Gillian Anderson stands 5"3, was born in Chicago, Illinois, and has a
daughter named Piper. She was married to husband Clyde Klotz on the
17th hole of a golf course in Hawaii by a Buddhist priest, and claims
her favourite film to be the 1993 English animated comedy THE WRONG
TROUSERS.
Chris Carter worked for 13 years as writer and senior editor for
"Surfing" magazine.

Title
Review for Entrapment (1999)
For more reviews and movie trivia, visit http://www.joblo.com/
The trailer worked. I would bet dollars to donuts that the infamous "money
shot" of Catherine Zeta-Jones curving her precious bottom under a laser
beam, pulled in at least half of this film's opening weekend box-office
numbers all on its own. That being said, ol' man Connery probably didn't
hurt the numbers with his Scottish charm and rugged good looks. And what
about the story, you say? Well, two out of three ain't bad.
PLOT:
Rich old guy/career criminal hooks with a beautiful young insurance
agent/undercover thief, to pull a couple of huge international heist jobs.
They train together, look good together, and mistrust each other together.
CRITIQUE:
Entrapment is well, okay...I guess. Its plot is paper thin and packed with
implausibilities, its style is so-so, its acting is so-so, its action scenes
are so-so, in fact, the only thing that makes this film graze the mark of
mediocrity is its two great looking and charming leads, Catherine Zeta-Jones
and Sean Connery. Allright, so we don't really buy the supposed attraction
between Cathy and her 40-year senior Connery, but both actors are so filled
with conviction and charisma, that we don't seem to mind it all that much,
or the fact that the story itself offers very little in originality, action
or suspense. In fact, I'm even afraid to refer to this film as an actual
thriller, seeing that barely a thrill crossed my path until the film's
ultimate finale sequence.
Looking back, I suppose I was never really bored during this film, but never
really impressed by anything either. There were actually a couple of twists
and turns that I didn't foresee, but all of the action in this film was
based on so many preposterous ideas, that it was hard to care about the
story at all. And while the two leads were used effectively in this film,
Ving Rhames and Will Patton were side-players in roles that could've easily
been juiced up to the levels of each talented actor. The film did lack a
certain amount of style, but offered a good international feel, charming
leads and an easy-to-follow, despite being filled with holes, storyline. All
in all, a so-so kind of a movie.
PS: Someone please confirm to me that I did not see a razor-thin mustache
gracing Catherine Zeta-Jones' lovely upper lip throughout this movie...the
horror, the horror.... :)
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Despite her Latin look, Catherine Zeta-Jones is actually Welsh and born in
Swansea, Wales, UK. She stands 5'8". She was apparently handpicked for this
role by actor and producer on this film Sean Connery.
In 1953, Sean Connery entered the Mr. Universe contest, finishing third in
the tall man's division. According to his friend and fellow actor, Michael
Caine, he is a bit of a hypochondriac. He stands 6'3".
THE REPLACEMENT KILLERS (6.5/10) director Antoine Fuqua was originally set
to direct this film. He was eventually replaced by Jon Amiel.
Screenwriter Ron Bass won an Oscar for Best Original Screenplay for 1989's
RAIN MAN (8/10), starring Tom Cruise and Dustin Hoffman. Among many other
screenplays, he's also written MY BEST FRIEND'S WEDDING (7.5/10), STEPMOM
(6/10) and WAITING TO EXHALE.

Title
Review for Simple Plan, A (1998)
For more reviews and trivia, go to http://surf.to/joblo/
Champion of the camera pyrotechnics, director Sam Raimi reins himself
in for this film, and takes on the impression of the Coen brothers on a
date with Alfred Hitchcock, in this good old fashioned small town
thriller that has everyone asking themselves the same question..."Would
I keep the money?" 
PLOT:
Two brothers and a friend find $4.4 million on a crashed airplane in a
nearby snow-ridden forest. The boys agree to hang on to the money until
the spring, and see if anyone comes looking for it. If nobody claims
for it by them, they agree to share the spoils among themselves, and
never tell anyone else about it. Somewhere along the line, their
"simple plan" goes awry and the plot thickens. 
CRITIQUE:
Magnificent film blends all the best elements of a suspense with a
solid cast of players, a beautiful landscape a la FARGO (7/10), and a
labyrinth of twists and turns that will have you gnawing at your
fingernails in anticipation of the next morally-questionable
booby-trap. Sam Raimi has crafted one of the best thrillers of the past
few years, and does so without the aid of his wonderfully creative
camera tricks. This film works on all cylinders because Raimi, and
screenwriter Smith, groove the characters out of real people with real
problems and real concerns on their minds. The people in this film are
just like you and me, and that is what makes this thriller so much
deeper and grittier than most. It's based in the reality of the moment,
and the consequences that each and every one of us could face in the
advent of a simple, everyday cover-up. One thing leads to another in
this film, and then another, and then another, until the dark reality
of the situation finally succumbs the group, at which point,
well...you'll see!
All of the actors in this movie are amazing, but Billy Bob Thornton
pulls off another fantastic showing, as the hick brother who lacks in
the brainpower but makes up for it via his abundancy of conscience.
This movie is for all those people who love to sit in a theatre, watch
a movie magically unfold before their very eyes, and chew on the stream
of questions rattling off in their brains..."What's gonna happen
next?"..."What would I do in a situation like this?"..."How the hell
are they gonna get out of this one?"
This movie is fun and entertaining to watch because it doesn't give us
all the answers up front. It slowly unveils the layers of the story as
the minutes of the film tick by, and the tension from the suspense
sinks in. The cinematography of this movie is lush and creamy, the
actors are rock-solid and the plot is a wonder in the science of
twisting and turning. Forget all of those crappy big-budgeted,
big-starred Hollywood pictures that are coming out this winter season,
and go see a movie that truly embraces all of the good old-fashioned
notions that make up a great suspenseful film. This film is a tasty
delight for all those who love the mystery and the fascination of a
cool thriller, and who enjoy watching real characters live out
extraordinary circumstances. 
So would I keep a sack of $4.4 million if I found it in the middle of a
forest tomorrow? After seeing the degradation of human values that
crossed the lives of every single person in this movie, I would say
"no". 
Unless of course...I had a simple plan to get away with it all.....  :)
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Ben Stiller, John Dahl and John Boorman were three other directors that
were at some point associated to the making of this film.
A scene with Billy Bob Thornton and Bill Paxton was lost by Northwest
Airlines in January 1998 while in transit from Minnesota to Los
Angeles. The missing scene had been shot in Minnesota. The film was
insured.
Sam Raimi requested some advice from his old friends who once helped
him on his EVIL DEAD movies, the Coen brothers, in regards to the
shooting of this movie in the snow. When Raimi isn't directing or
writing, he's busy as the executive producer of the blockbuster
syndicated TV series "Xena: Warrior Princess" and "Hercules: The
Legendary Journeys." He also co-wrote two films with the Coen brothers.
The first was CRIMEWAVE (5/10), and the second was THE HUDSUCKER PROXY
(6/10).
Bill Paxton's father plays the part of Mr. Schmitt in this movie. 
"A Simple Plan", the novel also written by Scott Smith, spent seven
weeks on the New York Times best-seller list in 1994. Smith originally
conceived the project as a screenplay before choosing to write it as a
novel. Smith wrote A SIMPLE PLAN while living in New Orleans. The
kernel of the idea for the novel was something he first came up with as
a graduate student in a screenwriting course at Columbia University's
writing program. 
This film was filmed in the early months of 1998 in Delano, Minnesota.

Title
Review for Desperate Measures (1998)
For more reviews, go to http://surf.to/joblo
Director Barbet Schroeder takes a wide-turn at the genre section of
movie-making, and trades in his permanent place-card from the human
drama division, and punches up a DIE HARD (8/10)-type thriller for the
intellectually-challenged. 
PLOT:
A feisty police officer's nine-year old son has fallen gravely ill and
needs a bone marrow transplant in order to survive. The only donor
compatible to the child is Peter McCabe (Keaton), multiple murderer
locked up in jail. Agent Conner (Garcia) convinces Peter to redeem
himself by helping his son live longer. McCabe agrees. Once in the
hospital, McCabe escapes, and mayhem ensues. Ironically, detective
Conner must catch the fugitive, but not kill him, for his son's life
hangs in the balance. 
CRITIQUE:
Rudimentary thriller containing some suspenseful moments, many
implausibilities, a standard car chase, a solid performance by Keaton
as the highly enlightened killer, and a cool final scene. This movie is
not extremely original in any way, shape or form, but it does offer an
interesting launch premise, a relatively short run-time, and an even
pace of suspense and interest throughout. Michael Keaton's performance
is also very over-the-top and fun to watch, and of course, the
proverbial Andy Garcia playing "the suit" (I may be mistaken, but I
think Andy's last seven films have him garbed in a suit. Perhaps even
the same suit! Stretch your acting muscles, Andy! Loosen the tie,
dude!!).
Schroeder does not bring anything overtly stylish to the film, but does
maintain a non-stop pace of twists, turns and action scenes. The film
could've used a stronger "reality check" (Garcia asks other police
officers not to shoot Keaton's character in order to maintain his son's
chances of living, while sacrificing the lives of other officers in the
process.), as Garcia's character seems to break every law in the book
by the end of the film (Why couldn't you just shoot the guy in the legs
to slow him down? Just a thought.)
Overall, this film would not be a highly recommendable one by any
stretch of the imagination, but I guess it was some fun for what it
was, and it sure wouldn't hurt if you crashed out after a long day's
work, and needed something to join your brain in shut-down mode for an
hour or so. Keaton's performance is also enjoyable to watch, as is the
"suit's". Also, the final scene of this movie is one of the coolest
that I've seen in a while, so I guess you could always look forward to
that little tidbit of hipness. Otherwise, this film is like a wet fart
on a hot day. Satisfying as it goes along, but ultimately empty and
forgettable when it's over. 
Little Known Facts about the film and its stars:
The article "Inside the Mind of a Sociopath" that the Captain is
reading during the trip to the prison is written "by Michael Keaton".
Andy Garcia was born in Havana, Cuba, under his full name of Andres
Arturo Garcia-Menendez. Upon his birth, Andy apparently had an unusual
growth on his shoulder. It turned out to be a twin that hadn't fully
developed. "They just snipped it off, apparently," says Garcia. He's
been married to Maria Victoria (whom everyone calls Marivi), a fellow
Cuban migr, since 1982, and vigorously guards her privacy and that of
their three daughters, Dominik, Daniella, and Alessandra.
Director Barbet Schroeder is a man. He was nominated as Best Director
at the 1991 Academy Awards for THE REVERSAL OF FORTUNE (7/10), and
played the French President in the Tim Burton movie MARS ATTACKS!
(6.5/10).
Writer David Klass' first produced screenplay was KISS THE GIRLS
(7/10).

Title
Review for Family Man, The (2000)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
I could relate to the main character in this movie. No, I am not a family
man (yet), but I am presently going through a period in my life, where work
has taken precedence over much else, and despite most of it paying off,
certain sacrifices are being made to succeed on a professional level.
Nicolas Cage's character in this film begins as quite the successful
businessman. The sacrifices that he made earlier on in his life obviously
paid off for him on a professional level. But would his life have been
better if he had not given up his love all those years ago?
And in that same vein, will I, the sad-sack movie critic, also find myself
looking back years from now and regretting many of the things that I am
presently giving up, in order to thrive in this one area of my life? God
knows. But this movie allows Cage's character to live the life he would have
had, if he hadn't given up his love way back when. Sadly, this is just a
movie and the only way that I will ever know if my present decisions being
made are the right ones, would be to "pretend" to be the main guy in this
film. Yeah, that's right...I'm the lead character...yeah, yeah...that's it!
PS: Me thinks I'm working too hard.
PLOT:
A wealthy man gets the chance to live his life as he would have, if he had
made a certain decision 13 years ago. You see, this guy had the opportunity
to either go to England for a posh new job or stay at home with his honey.
He chose to go to England, made it big, but never loved again. Now, he's
getting the fantastical opportunity to live his life under the former
circumstances. Would it be a better life? Would it make him a better person?
Would it make for an entertaining picture? Let's see.
CRITIQUE:
The feel good movie of the holidays? You bet! This flick is sure to be a
crowd pleaser. It's basically a rehashed mish-mash of several other
successful Christmas movies including IT'S A WONDERFUL LIFE and SCROOGED,
with touches of humor, solid acting all around, a nice, cozy feel, a cutesy
story and Nic Cage back in the saddle again. It's real nice to see the big
lug moving back towards the ol' Nicolas Cage that we all knew and loved
before those darn action-blast-'em-ups stole him away from us. You go, girl!
Harumph...but let's get back to the movie. Now despite my general sense of
appreciation for this film, I did think that it ran a little longer than it
should have. I believe a little 15-minute nip and tuck job would have made
it just right. Not that it ever got boring. The film is actually quite
upbeat, grabbing the audience immediately with insight into the one big
secret that nobody in the film seems to know about. Which is always cool. In
fact, the entire film ain't nothing but a sweet thang. Not necessarily an
original piece or one that'll have you tap-dancing on sidewalks on your way
home, but definitely one which deserves a lot of credit for treading over
familiar territory, and coming up with fresh twists and enjoyable material.
In fact, the film reminded me a lot of REMEMBER THE TITANS in that sense.
Both movies seemed to include material that we'd seen in other films before.
Both movies carried in them characters in whom we'd invested ourselves
before. And both movies seemed to make the story line quite predictable from
early on. But in end, both films worked because the characters in each one
and their respective plot lines were solid across the board. You believe
Cage's story. You really do see him coming into his own as this "new"
person. You really do find humor in many of his newfound responsibilities,
from which much of this film's humor is derived. But the movie also works as
a romance, a drama about relationships. A cutey-patootie Christmas movie. I
personally liked the way that they ended the film (which I won't spoil
here), but I think others might be a little disappointed. A personal call.
One thing that I do think most people won't be able to deny is the quality
entertainment that this film is able to provide. The movie's got a big
heart, plenty of humor, a dash of romance, a nice score from Danny Elfman,
an interesting story and well-developed characters. And what is it that they
say about snowflakes? They all look alike from afar, but up close, each one
is actually very different. This film is not original but it works. Warm up
the blankies, people, this one is made for the chestnuts, the open fire and
the corny holiday lovers in us all.

Title
Review for I Know What You Did Last Summer (1997)
Another chilling slasher flic from the mind of the horror-meister
himself, Kevin Williamson (writer of SCREAM (8/10) and SCREAM 2). Hip
cast, hip soundtrack, hip movie.
PLOT:
Four high-school friends accidentally run over someone with their car
and kill him. They decide to dump the body into the water, and not tell
anybody their "incident of the summer". One year later, someone in
their town mysteriously begins to taunt them about what they "did last
summer". And that's when the haunting and scaring begins... 
CRITIQUE:
Engaging horror thriller that was very reminiscent of SCREAM, and packs
a lot of thrills and chills, within its slick MTV-ized packaged
product. And even though the first hour is more mystery than anything,
don't be fooled into believing that the last half of the film doesn't
contain the many gruesome bloody murders to which we have become
accustomed. Because plenty of them do transpire (although many less
than in SCREAM). 
I was never bored by this story, since it unfolded as it went, and
allowed the viewer to continually keep guessing on the perpetrator's
identity. That puzzle was fun, as was the costume in which the murderer
exterminated his victims (fisherman's outfit, complete with
hook...always seemed kind of eerie to me). The young, hip cast was
adequate, with Hewitt doing her best Alyssa Milano impression, and
Heche pulling off an excellent hick from the boonies. I must say that I
was surprised to find no blatant T&A shots present in this movie,
although the two female stars did sport enough tight shirts to cut the
circulation in any movie-watcher's system.
The down side was that much like in SCREAM, the murderer did just seem
to be around when the main cast was present, and always seemed to
disappear (a bit too conveniently at times) when anyone else appeared.
That aside, the movie intensified as it went on, charged through a
quick 90 minutes, and left enough room for one and all to look forward
to another hip, young sequel in the future, tentatively entitled I
STILL KNOW. Warm those nachos...here I come !!!
Little Known Facts: 
Sarah Michelle Gellar studied Tae Kwon Do for five years, and now she's
taking kickboxing, boxing, street fighting and gymnastics.
Kevin Williamson was born to a fisherman and a story-telling mother in
New Bern, North Carolina. He set the film in a town close to his
boyhood home, Southport, because it seemed like the "ideal place for
the setting" (based on the book by Lois Duncan). The movie was actually
filmed there as well.
Williamson's dedication to writing is revealed in his daily habits.
Reportedly, he only gets four hours of sleep on a "very uncomfortable
couch, so I won't sleep too much," and then wakes at 4 am to begin
writing.


Title
Review for Ghost Dog: The Way of the Samurai (1999)
For more reviews and movie scripts, visit http://www.joblo.com/
I'm gonna be honest here and tell you that I just wasn't a big fan of Jim
Jarmush films before I saw this movie. Okay, so I had only seen two of them,
MYSTERY TRAIN, which I barely remembered liking or not, and DEAD MAN, which
is pretty much the movie that I use as a benchmark to compare all other
movies that are crap on a stick. I truly, truly hated that movie. Besides
being boring, pointless and slow, it oozed of pretentious symbolism which I
personally found to be uninvolving, uninteresting and just plain
unentertaining.
So as you could imagine, I was carrying plenty of baggage when I entered the
theatre, but surprised was I to find myself truly, truly diggin' this son of
a bitch flick! Original, witty, engaging (okay, so he still hasn't learned
to move things along quickly, but somehow, the slowness worked in this
movie) and just plain cool.
PLOT:
The life of a loner, black, samurai hitman for the Italian mafia is uprooted
when the mobsters decide that they don't exactly want him around any longer.
CRITIQUE:
A quirky, unique fable featuring the most original character to hit the
screen in years, a kickass, groovy atmospheric hip-hop soundtrack, funny,
absorbing characters, all spread underneath a comforting layer of deep
philosophical Samurai gospel. Sound interesting to you? Well, like I said
earlier, initially this film didn't appeal to me either, but having seen it,
I feel like going out and buying myself a goddamn Ghost Dog T-Shirt! That
guy rules! And if you think Vin Diesel rocked in PITCH BLACK (7/10), wait
until you see this mutha! He's a mix between Travis Bickle and Jean Reno's
character from THE PROFESSIONAL, all spliced beneath an entertaining layer
of Zen-like philosophies. He's also a wee bit mysterious. Of course, this
film isn't for everyone. I could see how this wouldn't really "play" in the
big houses, with its deliberately slow pace, unusual tactics (one dude
speaks French the whole movie with subtitles) and overbearing soundtrack,
but it's like I said...it all seemed to work for me!
Maybe it's because I am really sick of all the same formula granola that
I've been served for the first couple of months of this movie season, or
maybe I just really haven't seen a character this cool in a long, long time,
but no matter what the reason, this film just grew on me despite having its
slow moments and symbolic undertones. Did I really understand all the
flashcards spouting samurai parables between every other scene? No way, in
fact, I didn't get most of them, but strangely felt compelled to listen
closely and ponder over every one. Am I losing it? Perhaps. Some might say
that I am "growing", since I actually liked a "Jim Jarmush" film (mind you,
it's a watered down Jarmush). All's I know is that this movie had a
compelling little tale to tell, one bad mutha as its lead, Forest Whitaker
and his lazy eye performing admirably, and surprisingly, plenty of humor to
pepper along the way. I especially loved all of the third rate mobsters,
obviously spent and past their prime, but still acting very much their role.
And let's not forget the bloodshed, kids. Okay, so it's not a Schwarzenegger
body count, but considering that our Mr. Ghost Dog is, in fact, a
hitman...plenty of murders do take place. All of which are handled with
great style and technique. Of course, the man is extremely serious about his
job (when he's not talking to pigeons that is), likes to live his life
according to the ancient teachings of the Japanese samurai and even swishes
his gun into his holster, just as a seasoned samurai would his sword.
All in all, a refreshing new gangster film featuring a standout performance
by Whitaker, many funny moments, the original stylings of Jimmy Jarmush and
an extra cool soundtrack. A soundtrack that will be making an appearance in
my collection any day now.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
The flashback sequences featuring the young Ghost Dog getting his butt
whupped feature none other than Damon Whitaker as said youngens. Of course
he looks a lot like Forest...cause he's his little brother.
The soundtrack for this movie was composed by RZA, of Wu-Tang Clan fame.
Real name is Robert Diggs, and he also makes a cameo appearance in this film
as the camouflage Samurai.

Title
Review for Bachelor, The (1999)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Actor Chris O'Donnell took a two-year hiatus from showbiz after his last
disastrous cinematic entity, better known to many as BATMAN & ROBIN, and
dedicated most of that time to getting rid of his own designation as
bachelor, by marrying his long-time love, Caroline Fentress. They recently
had a baby daughter, named Lily Ann, so Chris is just about ready to become
a bachelor again...well, at least on film.
PLOT:
A lifetime bachelor cannot seem to get the proper motivation to ask his
three-year girlfriend to marry him. Unfortunately for him, his grandfather's
will provides him with only 24 hours to get married in order to receive his
$100 million dollars fortune. If he does not get married within that time
frame, he will get nothing.
CRITIQUE:
Add this film to my list of "not good enough to recommend" romantic comedies
from the past year which includes YOU'VE GOT MAIL, NOTTING HILL and RUNAWAY
BRIDE. Every one of these films seemed to include a tailor-made script idea
which might've read nicely on paper, but ultimately lacked the proper
"oomph", once produced and presented onto the big screen. Big stars and a
catchy concept do not a romantic comedy make. A film would require romance
and humor for that designation. This film essentially suffers from a
lackluster script which actually starts off on a fun note, but quickly
dissolves into many unfunny scenarios featuring the "bachelor" in question
chasing after his ex-girlfriends in the hopes of marriage. Very little humor
shows up in any of these scenes. Isn't it also interesting how every single
one of his ex-girlfriends apparently had completely different qualities
about them? Usually folks tend to go out with people with reasonably similar
characteristics, but not our boy! Toss that in with a distracting 10-second
cameo from singer Mariah Carey, whose part is all but shown in the
commercials of this film, and Brooke Shields attempting to be funny, and you
see where I'm going with this.
It's too bad because O'Donnell is actually pretty good in this film as your
standard Joe Schmoe "afraid of commitment" guy, and some funny scenes do
make an appearance near the end of this film (I'm sorry but the sight of all
those brides in the church was pretty funny...). But all in all, the film
lacked the overall comedic elements needed for a hearty recommendation for a
visit to the theatres. O'Donnell's sidekick Lange is just as annoying in
this film as he was as the sidekick in LOST & FOUND (5/10) and DIRTY WORK
(5/10), and the romance element is also quite weak. This is nothing more
than your typical "video movie", the type you'd rent on a slow night, after
a hard day's work when you and your love-hubby just want to sit around, shut
off your brains for an hour and a half and snicker at a couple of clever
moments. It's also the type of movie which leaves very little to discuss
once done, and might actually be appreciated more by men who themselves are
afraid to commit (the whole Mustang horse analogy was kinda funny).  Light,
safe, funny in some moments, tired and unfunny in others, recommended on
video only.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Chris O'Donnell's friends call him "OD", and his middle name is Eugene. He
also co-executive produced this film (his first) and garnered his first role
on the big screen in 1990's MEN DON'T LEAVE. He got his start in a
McDonald's commercial.
Renee Zellweger's friends call her "Zelly". I suppose this fact is widely
known by now but Renee does bear an uncanny resemblance to singer Jewel.
Renee's mom is Norwegian and her dad, Swiss.
Near the end of the film, a woman who wants to marry the bachelor claims to
have a "degree from Princeton, just like Brooke Shields!". A cute reference
to the actress who plays Berkley in this film. Speaking of Princeton, word
on the street is that Brooke once dated TV's "Superman" Dean Caine, while
both were attending the prestigious University. Her full name is Christa
Brooke Camille Shields.
It is through the help of the Internet, that costume designer Terry Dresbach
stumbled across one Phyllis Kelley's "Brides to Be," a retail bridal
consignment store in Glastonbury, Connecticut. Phyllis had over 800
different wedding dresses stored in her home that she was ready to sell off
for one lump sum.
This film is a remake of the 1925 Buster Keaton silent film called SEVEN
CHANCES.
This is screenwriter Steve Cohen's first produced screenplay.

Title
Review for Insider, The (1999)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Al Pacino reteams with director Michael Mann after their 1995 kickass film
HEAT, to tell the real-life story of the behind the scenes goings-on of one
particular episode of the CBS news magazine show "60 Minutes". Ironically,
this film seems to go on as long as three episodes of that show.
PLOT:
Cigarette company Vice-President gets fired after he disagrees with company
policy on how to produce their cigarettes. When his firm begins tossing
veiled threats towards him, the man gets angry and thinks seriously about
exposing his industry's lies about nicotine addiction to a worldwide
audience on TV's "60 Minutes". This movie documents the entire events of
this true-life historical case.
CRITIQUE:
Interesting story...great actors...well-developed characters...unique
style...do not an overall great film make. This film suffers from something
that a lot of major films from big name directors have been suffering with
over the past year or so: it runs too long and is not engrossing enough to
warrant our attention for that lengthy amount of time. It's too bad because
the story told here is definitely one that has all the elements of an
engaging drama set in place, but when spread across a canvas so vast, it
seems to lose any emotional power or deeper resonance. Another thing which
I've only recently noticed in Michael Mann's last two films is his lack of
female character involvement. It's strange because he seems to have plenty
of women in his films, but along with questionable casting calls, they do
little but stand around and appear on screen.
The main actors in this film are all in their top form, with Christopher
Plummer finally getting a decent role from which he could orchestrate his
talent. Pacino is perfect as the idealistic producer who realizes early on
that all he's truly got in his corner is "his word" and he doesn't intent on
losing it. Give the man an Oscar just for keeping his acting decibel level
on an even keel! (Hoo-hah!) And then there's Russell Crowe pulling off
another powerful performance as the pudgy whistle-blower, whose real-life
counterpart apparently commended Crowe of his portrayal (Click here to see
picture of real-life counterparts). Having said all that, the story told in
the film was really just another behind the scenes movie about an industry
and a specific "story gone bad", but nothing more dramatically effective
than that. I'm not sure if people are equating this film's greatness with
the grandeur of its actual ramifications (which eventually led to a court
ruling of approximately $250BILLION against the tobacco companies), but I
thought the drama in the film was simple and interesting, but nothing more.
I would suggest you see it if you love any of the main actors, or if the
story line is of particular interest to you, otherwise, you could wait for
video and fully appreciate the reason why fast-forward buttons were created.
C'mon Michael...how 'bout cutting out some of those lingering slo-mos for
God's sakes!!
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Actor Al Pacino has dated all kinds of actresses. Besides his current
girlfriend, Mrs. Griswold herself, Beverly D'Angelo, he has reportedly
maintained relationships with Kathleen Quinlan, Diane Keaton, Debra Winger,
Penelope Ann Miller and Tuesday Weld. His dad was an insurance agent named
Salvatore Pacino and his mom, Rose Pacino, died when Al was just 22. He's
also been known to have turned down some big roles including KRAMER VS
KRAMER, BORN ON THE FOURTH OF JULY, APOCALYPSE NOW, PRETTY WOMAN, CRIMSON
TIDE (The Gene Hackman part) and STAR WARS?? (Apparently, he was offered the
role of Han Solo, which eventually went to an unknown actor named Harrison
Ford).
Actor Russell Crowe was born in New Zealand but grew up in Australia. Not
surprisingly, he has been smoking since he was 10 and acting since he was
six.
Actor Christopher Plummer's full name is Arthur Christopher Orme Plummer. He
was born in Toronto, Canada and is probably best remembered as the loveable
anal-retentive father of those nutty Von Trapp kids from 1965's THE SOUND OF
MUSIC, Captain Von Trapp.
For anyone who still doesn't know, director Michael Mann began his career as
a writer on the popular "Starsky and Hutch" TV series. His greatest TV
success came when he created and produced the even more popular "Miami Vice"
series. His feature film directorial debut was the 1981 James Caan film
THIEF.
The man who plays the Sheikh Fadlallah is in this movie is Cliff Curtis, the
same actor who played the excellent role of drug dealer Cy Coates in Martin
Scorsese's BRINGING OUT THE DEAD (6.5/10).
The real tobacco whistle-blower Jeffrey Wigand says this movie took some
liberties with his story, but is essentially accurate. In one scene, the
former Brown & Williamson executive is portrayed as hitting golf balls at a
driving range while a burly man watches him. "Did that happen? No." Wigand
said. But Wigand said the movie accurately portrays the kinds of threats he
and his family faced after publicly addressing health and smoking issues in
1995. "Its fidelity to the actual facts is acceptable," Wigand said. Wigand
is in Nebraska giving speeches on his experiences. He said he is donating
his speaking fees to his nonprofit organization, Smoke-Free Kids, based in
Charleston, S.C.
This film is based on the Vanity Fair article written by Marie Brenner
entitled "The Man Who Knew Too Much".

Title
Review for Matrix, The (1999)
For more reviews and movie trivia, visit http://www.joblo.com/
What is The Matrix? The Matrix is a movie that splices plot elements from
the superior DARK CITY (9/10) and STRANGE DAYS (8/10), slaps in plenty of
computer mumbo-jumbo and some AI (Artificial Intelligence) and mixes it all
into a healthy bowl of snazzy special effects and tremendous fight sequences
that will make your eyes bubble over in supersonic amazement.
PLOT:
It is the year 2199, and the world is now being run by an artificial
intelligence. It has constructed a computer-generated dreamworld, called the
Matrix, in which human beings live their daily lives, without any knowledge
of their false existence. Some rebel humans discover this horror, and
recruit the help of computer hacker Neo (Keanu Reeves), hoping that he will
be "the one" to rescue the world from this cyber-slavery.
CRITIQUE:
The last thirty minutes of this movie just kicks ass all over the place! It
combines special effects, with crazy fights featuring freaky Hong Kong
action and unbelievable strengths, and a non-stop pace to a chase that
seemed inevitable from the start. Unfortunately for my taste, this film's
second act ran into a major slow-down when it delved too minutely into the
intricate details of the explanation behind this "matrix". This muddled
back-and-forth wasn't improved upon by the set of questions that seemed to
answer the previously presented set of questions. Anyway, that aside, the
film starts off with a bang-a-gong that will set anyone's taillights ablaze.
The Wachowski brothers obviously have an eye for style, and fully take
advantage of their respected talent during much of this film's progression.
The slick action shots, decent suspense, and awesome cinematography
accentuate this flash, and feed us with plenty of excitement to let slide
the less interesting, and more standard scenes within the "real world"
outside of the matrix.
The acting is solid all around, with Fishburne making a fine showing,
despite the excessive unflattering close-ups of his once pretty face, and
Reeves pulling off a decent performance as the hacker caught in and over his
head. Whoa! One guy that did standout in my mind, was the head of the "bad
guys", Australian actor Hugo Weaving, who fed us with a fine dish of
confidence, terror and an awfully annoying chatter style. All in all, this
movie could have been trimmed a spot during its over-elaborate second act,
but comes through on all cylinders in respect to style, vision, mood, and
premise. But the biggest selling point of this film, a detail not gone
unnoticed by its own overzealous marketing team, is the visually stunning
special effect action sequences which trounce your pre-existing notion of "a
great fight sequence", and present all future filmmakers with a new
benchmark for fun and excitement. Kung-fu, crazy special effects, a girl in
a black rubber suit, John Woo-esque slo-mo action shots, and Keanu Reeves in
a shaved head. What is The Matrix? Cyber-kinetic futuristic fun for the
whole family!! :)
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
The four main actors including Keanu Reeves, Laurence Fishburne, Carrie-Anne
Moss and Hugo Weaving had to endure four months of martial arts training (9
to 5 every day, but Saturday and Sunday), under the auspices of Hong Kong
Kung Fu master Yuen Wo Ping, before any of the principal photography on the
film had even begun.
This film was filmed on location in Sydney, Australia. On soundstages and,
for two months, on Sydney's streets and rooftops and in warehouses.
Actor Keanu Reeves was born in Beirut, Lebanon, but brought up in Toronto,
Canada. His name means "cool breeze over the mountains" in Hawaiian. He
dropped out of high school when was 17 to become an actor. His father is
part Chinese, part Hawaiian. He was a geologist, but is now serving time in
prison. His mother is English. She was a costume designer for such rock
stars as Alice Cooper. He also plays bass guitar in his band "Dogstar".
Actor Laurence Fishburne began acting at the age of 10, and was only 15
years old when he won the role of a young G.I. in Francis Ford Coppola's
Vietnam War epic APOCALYPSE NOW (7.5/10).
And where did the black-rubber-suit-wearing actress Carrie-Ann Moss come
from? Well, she was born in Vancouver, British Columbia, Canada. She began
her career as a model and moved to Europe, modeling in Japan and in Spain.
While working in Spain, she landed a regular role in the television series
"Dark Justice," which was produced in Barcelona for its first season. Moss
moved to Los Angeles the following year when the series switched locations.
In the six years since her acting career began, Moss has appeared in more
than 60 hours of television as well as two television series prior to her
present role in THE MATRIX. Ironically, in 1993, she starred in a TV series
called "Matrix".
Bad-ass Hugo Weaving is one of Australia's most acclaimed actors. You may
remember him from his part as Tick/Mitzi in 1994's THE ADVENTURES OF
PRISCILLA, QUEEN OF THE DESERT. He has also voiced the animal voice of "Rex"
in both BABE movies.
And here's what the official MATRIX web site says about the Wachowski
brothers. Larry and Andy have been working together for 30 years (They are
actually in their early 30s). Their most recent feature film was 1996's
BOUND (8/10), which they wrote and directed. Little else is known about
them. We do know that they were born in Chicago, Illinois  :)
Producer Joel Silver is one of the most successful producers in the motion
picture industry today. The combined gross of his films is near $3 billion.
He was behind all four LETHAL WEAPON films, the first two DIE HARD films,
COMMANDO, PREDATOR, THE LAST BOY SCOUT, DEMOLITION MAN, and many others.

Title
Review for Pay It Forward (2000)
For more reviews and movie wallpapers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
What would you expect if you put together a cast featuring an Oscar-winning
actor in Kevin Spacey, an Oscar-winning actress in Helen Hunt, an
Oscar-nominated actor in little Haley Joel Osment and an Oscar-nominated
Musical Score guy in Thomas Newman (AMERICAN BEAUTY)? An Oscar winning movie
perhaps? Well, things don't always turn out the way we want them to, right?
PLOT:
A young boy is challenged to make the world a better place by his teacher
and comes up with a revolutionary idea about helping those who can't help
themselves. If you become a recipient of said good deed from another, you
must in turn, perform an exemplary favor for three other people, and so on,
and so forth. It isn't long before the young boy draws his teacher and
mother into the world of "paying it forward".
CRITIQUE:
Great concept, top-notch acting and a nice try but this film ultimately
fails because it tags convenient situations on to its second half and gives
us one of the most uninspiring endings that I have seen in years! Don't they
have test audiences for stuff like this? Why anyone would think that this
finale "completes" this picture in any way is beyond me! But enough about
the crappy ending. On the whole, the film was actually working for me until
about the halfway point. That's when things started to get a little sloppy
with various clichd/unbelievable character moments. One character
conveniently relating an exact replica story of his past to identify with a
problem situation of the present...a little farfetched. Another completely
artificial and one-dimensional character showing up for only one
purpose...because the script needed someone to show up and mess things up at
that point. And yet another character conveniently becoming a relation to
someone else in the film because it served the script, and nothing else (is
this a soap opera?). All very convenient circumstances which might've been
interesting if they had been made believable. Unfortunately for me, they all
rang false and those three phony moments combined to draw me away from any
attachment that I had developed with the lead characters to that point. Of
course, the film's horrible conclusion also helped solidify my
disappointment in a story which seemed to be aiming for so much, while
ultimately bullseying so little.
The movie also ran on for too long with not enough time spent on the most
interesting aspect of the film...duh, the whole concept of "pay it forward"!
The idea itself was captivating, but just seemed to become more of a
backdrop to the sentimental festivities in the foreground as the movie moved
onwards. I really loved the "pay it forward" moments between people and
would've liked to have seen more of them in the film, perhaps even developed
further. And it's all really too bad because the talent assembled here is as
good as they come. Spacey delivers, as does Hunt, while Osment proves to
everyone that THE SIXTH SENSE was no fluke. But the script, boy-oh-boy, what
the heck happened to the script? It felt like someone else came in about
halfway and reduced it down to this melodramatic slosh pile of faux
circumstances. And even though I was getting a certain "message" from the
film as it progressed (the world can be a better place), the ending just
seemed to flush any enthusiasm that I had for that concept out of me. Also,
the score was way too similar to the one in AMERICAN BEAUTY. C'mon folks,
try a little harder next time, will ya? All in all, a misfire, a decent
attempt at reaching for that higher goal but coming up short. Catch it on
video for the strong performances and try to figure out yourself when
exactly things started going wrong in this film. And yes, you can "pay this"
review forward on to three other people if you like...in fact, please do.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Actor Gary Werntz, the attorney who is one of the first people in the film
to "pay it forward", is in real life, director Mimi Leder's husband.
Not to my surprise, the man who scored the music for this film is also the
same man who scored the music for the Oscar-winning picture AMERICAN BEAUTY.

Title
Review for Road Trip (2000)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
The question that you must ask yourself before stepping into the theatre to
see this movie is, "what do I really want to get out of this film?". If the
answer to that question is that you want to encounter well-rounded
characters involved in an intriguing plot about the trials and tribulations
of college life, well...chances are, this film ain't exactly what you're
looking for. If, on the other hand, you're looking for sex jokes, fart
jokes, people making fun of one another, titties flashing around here and
there, and Tom Green actually putting a live mouse into his mouth...chunk
down the change and get ready to laugh your big ass off! This movie is funny
shite!
PLOT:
Some dude in college accidentally mails a videotape of himself dicking
another girl to his girlfriend in Texas. Upon this realization, the boy
heads out on a road trip, with buddies in tow, in order to retrieve the tape
before his long-life girlfriend does.
CRITIQUE:
Many funny moments, many gross moments, many flashes of breasts and sexual
situations, and many a good tune qualify this movie as the first big comedy
hit of the summer. I think it's been said in other places before, but allow
me to re-iterate the obvious. If you liked AMERICAN PIE last summer, and if
you laughed at THERE'S SOMETHING ABOUT MARY the summer previous, this film
is more than likely to churn your humorous butter. The characters are having
a lot of fun, the movie is poking a lot of fun, and by golly, we as an
audience, are supposed to take it all as "fun", and not much else. And
unlike other "safer" teen flicks of yesteryear, this movie doesn't hide
behind the forbidden glass door either. It shows these folks having sex,
cheating on their mates, smoking the good weed, drinking the good drink, and
ultimately just living the high life of their college years. And my-oh-my,
whose idea was it to put T&A back into "teen" flicks? Whoever it was, allow
me to shake your hand, cause a fan I was not of those "pretend" movies which
brought everyone to the brink of the sexual situations, only to pull the rug
right out from under us at the last possible moment.
Giving the ladies a bit of the Tom Green ass was also a good idea. Spread
the perversion, Hollywood, women want to see some of that, too! Speaking of
Green, that was the one thing which did kind of disappoint me about this
movie. NOT that he wasn't funny, no-no, not at all. In fact, he was one of
the funnier characters in the film, only that he's barely in the 95-minute
hummer! You see, he doesn't actually join his friends on the road trip, so
we only get to see him from time to time, which was sort of disappointing,
since he really does have a huge presence. All this to say that if you're
looking for a very funny, mindless, sexist and most likely every other -ist
type of film, this one is sure to fit your bill. It's funny as heck, it's
got a great, hip soundtrack and it moves along at a quickity-quick pace. So
wipe that smile onto your face, wash your balls, get your mind into the
gutter, and prepare to enjoy watching a bunch of goofballs getting into all
kinds of trouble. And oh yeah...there's also a moral to the story...if
you're gonna cheat on your partner...try not to send them the actual
videotape of the event!
PS: Any movie that includes Twisted Sister's classic anthem "I Wanna Rock",
is allright in my book.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Actor Seann William Scott played a similar role in last year's AMERICAN PIE,
and also had a decent part in the underrated thriller from earlier this
year, FINAL DESTINATION. He was also featured in Aerosmith's "A Hole in My
Soul" video, and set out on a 1-month road trip of his own to Australia,
after completing this picture.
And who can forget Breckin Meyer's performance in last year's awesome GO, as
the character of Tiny. And if you don't remember him in that flick, you may
remember his Spicolli-esque skateboarder performance in 1995's CLUELESS, or
his days on the TV show "Wonder Years", his first big break. His first movie
role was in 1991's FREDDY'S DEAD: THE FINAL NIGHTMARE.
DJ Qualls got the part of Kyle after auditioning for a one-line part at the
film's Atlanta casting office (where most of this film was shot). The
director invited him to meet executive producer Ivan Reitman, and poof...he
was cast! In addition to his professional accomplishments, DJ is also a
cancer survivor, and an advocate for cancer research and awareness.
This film marks director Todd Phillips' first major studio release. He
previously directed the smaller films HATED and the controversial FRAT
HOUSE.
Actress Amy Smart shows her boobies in this movie.

Title
Review for Kid, The (2000)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Even if you don't like Bruce Willis as a person, or think that he sucks as
an actor, you gotta give the guy credit for this much: he sure does like to
diversify his roles! In the past two years alone, he's played an action hero
saving the world in ARMAGEDDON, a general in THE SIEGE, a quirky car
salesman in the very trippy BREAKFAST OF CHAMPIONS, second fiddle to a kid
who saw dead people in THE SIXTH SENSE, an aging husband in THE STORY OF US
and a comedic hitman in THE WHOLE NINE YARDS. So what's missing on his list?
Well, howsabout a good ol' fashioned sugary sweet children's Disney movie?
Check! Phew...okay, now let's dust John McLane out of the woodworks and get
ready to die some more!
PLOT:
An aging image consultant with a huge chip on his shoulder, a frigid
attitude, and little love in his life suddenly finds himself confronted with
his 8-year old self. Why his younger counterpart has all of a sudden become
a part of his present reality is unknown to the man, but he is certainly
going to do his best to find out.
CRITIQUE:
A kid's movie presented by Disney, this film makes no bones about itself.
It's a simple tale offering a predictable but important life lesson, a
handful of laughs via the latest cute kid in town Spencer Breslin, a
happy-go-lucky booming score, but certainly nothing more than an above
average Disney Sunday Night Movie of the Week starring Bruce Willis in a bad
hairpiece. In fact, if it wasn't for the adorable performance put forth by
the kid in this film, or the final act's resolution of said fantastical
situation, I wouldn't have recommended this film at all. But something about
the film's conclusion "got me" (read: I wept openly within myself... :), and
despite it being an obvious pull at the ol' heart strings via the most
powerful corporate company in the world of entertainment (M-I-C-K-E-Y
etc...), I still appreciated the sentiment and credited the film for that
much. I also happened to see this film with a few kids in tow (not my own),
and they all seemed to truly enjoy it. They cracked up at the kid on the
screen, made fun of Bruce and hopefully picked up a bit of the message
contained within (and a free toy plane given away to all kid attendees), so
target audience-wise, the course is certainly set to be flown.
Bruce was okay in the film, but he honestly didn't have much to do. He just
stood around as the straight man and acted nasty to just about everyone. The
romance angle of the film also didn't work for me, with a lot of it feeling
manufactured, a convenient device for the entire setup. In the end, this
film certainly isn't going to break any new ground (see BIG to know what I'm
talking about) or knock anybody over their ass in appreciation of its
entertainment value, but as a parent, you certainly can't go too wrong with
this film. In fact, it is more than likely that many adults will also see a
bit of themselves in the Willis character and hopefully take a little
something away from the film themselves. So if you've already seen CHICKEN
RUN, and need a safe, cute, sentimental fluff piece to present to the kids,
this film might just be the one for you.

Title
Review for Empire Strikes Back, The (1980)
For more Star Wars reviews and screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
PLOT:
Darth Vader is pissed at, and in search of, Luke Skywalker, in the hopes of
swaying him over to the dark side. He does so by chasing his friends, Solo,
Leia and Chewie, into his lair, while Luke is off studying the ways of the
Jedi from Yoda, the Jedi Master. The Force continues...
CRITIQUE:
Great follow-up to the original tale of a galaxy far, far away, this film
has plenty of action, one-liners, special-effects, good vs evil rivalries
and a pleasantly dark ending. This is the episode that also features one of
the biggest revelations from the trilogy (mum's the word), and a very good
snow battle scene in the very beginning of the movie. Watching the digitally
re-mastered version of this flick, I did notice several fake-looking special
effects, especially in the explosions, and an obvious blue screen scenario,
but overall, fantastic! The budding romance between Leia and Solo also
worked in this film, while the whole Yoda training sessions with Luke left
me a tad dry, feeling long-winded at times. The latter complaint may come
from having seen this film too many times, so don't pay it much attention.
All in all, a fun times in the world of the stars and droids, packed with
humor, action and romance, a superb score, excellent battle sequences, and
Darth getting as nasty as he wants to be. Now if I could only use the Force
to levitate my TV remote control and nachos right next to me by my
pillow...the Empire would be in serious trouble.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars: (Most facts gathered from
the IMDb)
Unbeknownst to many people, George Lucas only directed the first of the Star
Wars trilogy. This one was directed by Irvin Kershner, the man who went on
to direct such "classics" as NEVER SAY NEVER AGAIN and ROBOCOP 2.
Screenwriter Leigh Brackett, a noted science fiction/fantasy author who was
prolific in science-fiction and other pulps in the 1940's, died of cancer
after writing the first version of the script of THE EMPIRE STRIKES BACK.
Because it was an unfinished script George Lucas revised her draft and
engaged Lawrence Kasdan to finish the screenplay. It was Lawrence's first
film writing credit, as he went on to write and direct the 1981 hit BODY
HEAT with Kathleen Turner. He returned to the Force in 1983's RETURN OF THE
JEDI, which he helped co-write with Lucas.
In his early twenties, George Lucas was in a severe road accident and spent
many months in the hospital. It was during his time in the hospital that he
created the concept of the Force.
On the planet Hoth, General Rieekan says "Send Rogues 10 and 11 to sector
38," a veiled reference to THX 1138, one of Lucas' earlier films.
The character of Boba Fett is never referred to by name, except in the
credits.
In the asteroid scene, one of the asteroids is actually a shoe. The rumor is
that Lucas asked the SFX people to redo the scene so many times that they
got annoyed and one of them threw in their shoe.
Security surrounding this movie was so intense that George Lucas had regular
reports about "leaks" from actors. Lucas was so determined that the ending
be kept secret that he had actor David Prowse (Darth Vader) say "Obi Wan
Kenobi is your father" ("Obi-Wan killed your father" by some reports), and
dubbed it later to be "I am your father".
An extra fell sick, and Jeremy Bulloch (Boba Fett) was called in as a
replacement. He can be seen as the Imperial Guard who pulls Princess Leia
into the elevator after she screams "Luke! It's a trap!". He can also be
seen as the Imperial Guard who is captured by Lando Calrissian's men.
Denis Lawson plays Wedge Antilles. Wedge was not originally scripted to
appear in this film, but intense fan interest prompted Lucas to include him.
This is Carrie Fisher's favorite movie of the trilogy. The scene where Han
Solo (Harrison Ford) was to be carbon frozen was a long and complex scene
which required many takes. Eventually, Leia says "I love you" to Han Solo.
Ford had heard this line so many times that he changed the scripted "I love
you too" to "I know". Lucas didn't want to film the scene again, and thought
it read much better that way, so it remained.

Title
Review for Grease (1978)
Originally launched in 1978, this popular film was re-introduced in
1998 to a whole new generation of moviegoers. Based on the mighty
successful musical from Broadway, GREASE was followed in 1980 with the
less stellar GREASE 2 (6.5/10), starring a young Michelle Pheiffer in
one of her first feature film roles.
PLOT:
High-school musical set in the 1950's showcasing the relationship
between the cool Danny Zuko of the T-Birds (Travolta) and the innocent
and pure Sandy Olsen (Newton-John) from Australia. The film follows the
couple and their vivacious friends during their last year at Rydell
High through song, dance and humour.
CRITIQUE:
Fun-loving, energetic and innocent look back at times much simpler.
This movie effectively juggles a thin romantic story line and the
overall experience of the 1950's, with a superb soundtrack and some
great dance numbers. Admittedly, I am somewhat biased in this opinion,
since this film blasts me into my past as a rebellious youth (GREASE
was one of Schmoe's first big-screen experiences, and every other scene
sends me reeling into the times of my elaborate GREASE bubble-gum card
collection), and the lesser responsibilities that I possessed at that
time. But apart from the nostalgic vibe, I was still extremely
impressed by this film, as it continued to amuse me, despite my
previous dozen or so viewings.
This film took John Travolta from a dim-witted "Sweathog" on TV's
Welcome Back Kotter, and transformed him into a movie-star of
spectacular proportions (SATURDAY NIGHT FEVER (7.5/10) in 1979
confirmed that sudden popularity). Unfortunately for the rest of the
cast, his popularity was not terribly contagious, despite their
effective showings in this classic movie.
On the down side, some of the absolute innocence in this film might
bore or turn people off (like when Sandy sings about "drinking
lemonade" and "staying out until 10" with Danny in "Summer Nights"),
and the plot isn't exactly the most elaborate story-line ever created,
but despite these small reservations, this movie carries enough great
music and high energy to keep anyone amused through its rapid 110
minute running time (And believe me...I am not a fan of the
musicals!!). Make sure to look for a young Lorenzo Lamas in the static
role of the brainless football player, as well as the National
Bandstand dance contest as one of the film's absolute highlights. And
don't forget to buy the popular soundtrack afterwards, so that you
could listen to its peppy tunes whenever you're feeling a little blue. 
 Little Known Facts: 
Henry Winkler, of TV's Happy Days' Fonzie fame, turned down the part of
Danny Zuko because he did not want to be typecast for the rest of his
career.
Both Travolta and Conaway were smitten by Newton-John during the
filming of this picture. Conaway eventually bowed out of the woo-fest,
and married Newton-John's sister a year later (divorced after five
years).

Title
Review for One False Move (1991)
For more reviews and movie trivia, go to http://surf.to/joblo/
Carl Franklin's breakthrough directorial film, joined Billy Bob
Thornton and his then-roommate Tom Epperson's critically-acclaimed
script, to become one of the best rated movies of 1992.
Thumb-rater-critics Roger Ebert and Gene Siskel respectively
acknowledged this film as the number one and number two rated film on
their annual top 10 best movies of the year list.
PLOT:
One white-trash huckster, his girlfriend Fantasia, and a cold, black
College grad are on the run from the police after they dispense of some
folks in a drug-related robbery. Headed towards her childhood town,
Fantasia and the quibbling duo, take every precaution to avoid
detection, but their respective weaknesses soon draw the L.A. police
and a local small town Sheriff, right onto their butts. 
CRITIQUE:
Gritty, engaging, enjoyable and laced with spurts of graphic violence,
this film presents us with several well-drawn out characters from
different backgrounds, and recounts a tale of greed, drugs and
accountability. The star of this film is definitely the script and the
characters so well portrayed by the respective actors in this film. The
story is evenly-paced and easy to handle, with the plot leading you
down several paths at once, twisting and turning when need be, and
adding several elements of the ol' small town humour. I really enjoyed
this movie because it was an original plot that had me extremely
interested in the characters and their eventual outcomes. 
Bill Paxton was the standout in my mind as the perfectly nave, but
enthusiastic small-town hick cop who reveled in the mere presence of a
couple of more seasoned L.A. cops. There is one particular scene in
which the out-of-town cops are speaking about him, without their
knowledge of his presence nearby, which will always be stapled in my
mind as an uncomfortable classic. Paxton's reaction after that scene
was superb, and left you feeling deeply for the man by the end of the
movie. Billy Bob was also excellent as the "good ol' boy" without the
deepest of consciences, and Michael Beach as the coldest, most ruthful
character that I have seen drawn to screen in a while. All in all, this
movie was an amazing achievement in the genre, and matches the Coen
brothers' classic BLOOD SIMPLE (8/10) and even John Dahl's RED ROCK
WEST (8/10). Even the ending was semi-ambiguous as to leave us with our
own conclusion. The characters are rich and lively, the script highly
involved, and the movie a solid piece of entertaining cinema.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Billy Bob Thornton and Cynda Williams (who plays Fantasia in this film)
were a married couple during the filming of this movie, but divorced
soon therafter. As of 1998, Billy Bob has been married and divorced
four times.
Bill Paxton does not particularly like being recognized as "Chet" from
1985's WEIRD SCIENCE (7.5/10). I wonder if it has anything to do with
the fact that he's transformed into a piece of turd by the end of film?
Director Carl Franklin was an actor by profession, before taking his
shot at directing. He had bit parts in various movies, and a handful of
TV shows including "The A-Team", "MacGyver", "Roseanne" and "The
Streets of San Francisco".
Michael Beach (who plays Pluto in this film) also played a cop named
Wurlitzer in 1993's TRUE ROMANCE (9/10).
Billy Bob Thornton and Bill Paxton re-teamed as costars in yet another
great small-town thriller, in 1998's A SIMPLE PLAN (8/10), as directed
by Mr. Sam Raimi.
Among the formative events of Billy Bob Thornton's childhood was the
forging of a friendship with Tom Epperson, with whom he would later
collaborate on several movie scripts, including this one. In 1977,
after quitting College after two semesters, and convinced that he had a
future in rock music, Thornton hooked up with his pal Epperson, who'd
become an aspiring novelist, and the two of them went seeking fame and
fortune in the Big Apple, where they managed to stick around almost
long enough to unpack before fleeing back to Arkansas in terror. By
1981, Thornton and Epperson had nerved themselves up for a second shot
at the big time, and, mindful of their lately discovered aversion to
East Coast living, headed for Los Angeles. Thornton scraped together
$200 to make the trip by driving a truck to Slidell, La., after his
supernaturally insightful mother helpfully prophesied that he would
"have some business" in a town of the same name. The pair worked odd
jobs and wrote scripts, and, two years after their arrival, Thornton
turned a serious eye to performing for the first time since high school
and began taking acting classes (He had a part in 1989's CHOPPER CHICKS
IN ZOMBIETOWN). A long dry spell ensued, and by 1984, the aspiring
actor was living so lean he suffered a near-fatal malnutrition-induced
heart failure brought on by weeks of eating nothing but potatoes. After
receiving high kudos for the script of this movie, Billy Bob finally
broke through in 1996, with his directorial debut of SLING BLADE
(6.5/10), which he also wrote and starred in.

Title
Review for American Psycho (2000)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Satire: n. a literary genre in which ridicule is thrown upon something by
stressing its worst features, often by the use of irony, thus assuming or
affirming a norm by which aberrations are judged. You must appreciate the
definition of a satire if you truly want to experience this film on the
level upon which it is presented. Many satirical cinematic presentations
have flopped, others flourished. This one...works!
PLOT:
Patrick Bateman is a typical Wall Street yuppie who worries more about what
brand of suit to wear in the morning, than he does about hurting anyone's
feelings with his contemptuous attitude. Well...actually, there is one thing
that does set him apart from the rest of his ilk...Patrick also has an
uncontrollable desire to kill people. And did I mention that he loves 80s
pop music?
CRITIQUE:
Sick. Funny. Horrific. Charming. Unsettling. A delight. A film that can have
you laughing out loud one minute, and freezing up horribly the next. A
definite original, one that should have people talking for some time to
come, and most definitely not for everyone! I loved the humor in this film,
I loved the many great lines in this film, I even loved the whole point of
the film, about a time and place in our society in which people and material
objects transcended one another and became one in the same. And with
materialism, greed and objectification running rampant, what is a guy like
Patrick Bateman to do? Well, he essentially does what everyone in that world
was doing from day to day...hiding their secrets on the inside, while
maintaining a mask of serenity on the outs. The only problem with Patrick is
that his "secret" is just a little more damaging than that of anyone else.
Yeesh...is it ever! But if there's one reason to see this movie, one reason
that I would have to pick to see this movie again, and one reason why the
casting of Leonardo DiCaprio just seems totally ludicrous right now (even
though he is a great actor in his own right)...two words...Christian Bale.
I hope that this film will catapult this solid thespian to greater heights,
cause he doesn't just play the role of Patrick Bateman in this movie...he
becomes it! A wonderful caricature of an intelligent, charming, outgoing man
teetering on the brink of insanity. His look, his clothes, his eyes, his
smile, his sweat, his toned body...Christian conquers this character's
sardonic manner, his abundant charisma and most definitely...his killer
instinct. If it sounds like I'm in love with Mr. Bale, well, you may be
right (not that there's anything wrong with that). Simply an awesome
performance...nominate the guy for something, for God's sakes! Of course,
the story itself really isn't a story as much it is a slice-of-life movie
featuring one really bizarre character head-tripping through some very odd
situations in his life. I enjoyed the performances, which were all blessed
by a tongue and cheek, loved the directing, Harron showing the world that
she is more than a one-trick pony, and in the end, I was simply entertained
and excited by the entire film. I guess you can't really ask for more than
that when seeing a movie, right?
Add to that the fact that the ending is kind of ambiguous (but in a good
way), the powerhouse performance by Christian Bale and the many, many funny
lines and over-the-top sexual situations, and this film is a complete
success on its own terms. Of course, it also manages to offset much of that
humor with a few pretty gruesome moments with respect to Patrick's dirty
little secret, a task handled quite admirably, it must be said. And for all
you poor saps who've apparently been robbed of a 10-second bit during one of
the film's menage-a-trois sequences, well, let me just say from the
perspective of someone who did see the missing snippet (I'm Canadian,
eh!)...no big fuss, folks. Just a guy doggying a girl in front of a mirror.
You gotta love that MPAA! "Harumph....no, no, no...we can't have this sexual
position in the movie...it's disgraceful!! What...a decapitated head in the
refrigerator? Oh, that's no problem...that could stay."
A very cool satire featuring one messed up dude portrayed splendidly by one
awesome actor.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Born in Wales, Christian Bale made his major film debut starring in Steven
Spielberg's epic EMPIRE
OF THE SUN, as the lead kid. His next role will be in this summer's remake
of SHAFT, in which he plays the villain.
Director Harron's first choice for the role of Patrick Bateman was Christian
Bale, despite rumors which had Leonardo DiCaprio with the part early on in
the pre-production. Bale took his role very seriously. He prepared for
months, transforming himself physically through diet and a heavy exercise
regimen. He even trained with a voice coach to perfect the right preppy,
Wall Street accent.
This is Harron's second picture. Her first film, I SHOT ANDY WARHOL, was
nominated for Best Picture at the 1996 Independent Spirit Awards. She began
her filmmaking career creating documentaries for British television, as well
as short films, including one called HOW TO MAKE AN OLIVER STONE MOVIE.
Before working in film, Harron was a rock journalist. She helped start
"Punk," the first punk magazine, and was the first writer from an American
publication to interview the Sex Pistols when they were a hot new London
group. She is a native of Canada and graduate of Oxford University. She is
also the daughter of Don Harron, the much-loved Canadian actor and comedian.
She is married to filmmaker John C. Walsh who directed ED'S NEXT MOVE.
This film is based on the controversial best-seller by Bret Easton Ellis
(who also wrote the novel LESS THAN ZERO). The screenplay was written by the
director of this film, Mary Harron, and Guinevere Turner, who also plays the
character of Elizabeth in this film. Guinevere has also held various other
film roles including parts in CHASING AMY and DOGMA. In fact, her friendship
with director Kevin Smith runs pretty deep, as he apparently named the
character of Gwen Turner in MALLRATS after her.

Title
Review for Me, Myself & Irene (2000)
For more reviews and movie trailers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
What's the recipe for a great comedy film? Well, I guess there really isn't
one simple answer to that question, but slapping Jim Carrey, one of the top
comedic actors of our day, alongside the Farrelly brothers, one of the top
comedic writer/directors of our day, is a pretty good start, right? Well,
you'd think so. But after seeing the so-so trailer for this movie, I can't
say that I was very impressed. And now that I've seen the entire film, I
think I know why. It's just not that funny.
PLOT:
An emotionally challenged Rhode Island state trooper is suddenly altered
into two split personalities when all of his unresolved feelings break out
into an aggressive personality of their own. This disorder comes into major
play as he escorts a young lady out of state, and suddenly finds both of his
personalities fighting over her.
CRITIQUE:
Jim Carrey's three black sons in this movie are hilarious, but the rest of
the film is bland at best, with a couple of laugh-out loud scenes, many flat
and obvious jokes, a lame story which goes nowhere, and Carrey seemingly
trying too hard to make us laugh. I can't really put my finger on the exact
thing which didn't work in this movie, but after the first 20 minutes or so,
I just sort of sat there and smirked sporadically. Most of the time, I was
annoyed by the lengthy musical interludes between scenes, the Zellweger
factor, which we'll get into later and the "forced" comedy, especially all
the gross jokes and the physical comedy by Carrey, which just didn't seem to
work for me this time around. Mind you, I did hear a lot of others in the
audience laughing, and God knows this is the kind of movie which someone
either "gets" or not, but with its lengthy run-time and a surprisingly
distracting character in Carrey as his second personality Hank, the film
just left me feeling sort of blah. Of course, many people thought KINGPIN
sucked, and I totally loved that film, so perhaps this movie might jiggle
your funny bones, but for me, the buck stopped here. I'd rather watch DUMB
AND DUMBER over this any day.
Now I don't know whether or not my disinterest in this film has to do with
me having reached my saturation level on gross-out jokes (although I highly
doubt it...I'm a pretty messed up guy), the fact that the movie actually
tried to focus more on the story than any previous Farrelly film, or the
fact that the leading lady, Renee Zellweger, was just plain ol' boring. But
whatever the reason, I can't honestly recommend that you see this movie in
the theatres, unless you did actually find the trailer somewhat amusing,
since most of the jokes run around that sort of gamut anyway. The corny
name-calling didn't really work for me, the rehashed "crazy" dude that they
pick up didn't really work for me, and Carrey's irritating Dirty Harry voice
didn't really work for me. The one thing that did really work for me was the
first third of the film (before Zellweger got in there), with its comforting
feel, funny jokes, and three black sons. Unfortunately, the rest of the film
lost that same feel inside an idiotic plot which I honestly didn't really
care about, and Carrey's physical gags, which just left me with a strong
sense of deja-vu. Mind you, I didn't hate the film by any means, in fact, I
was thinking about recommending it even slightly for the black son scenes
alone, but in the end, the film just sort of disappeared from my mind after
a couple of minutes, and it certainly can't be put in the same category as
any of the big hits from any of its prime participants.
In the end, there was something about this movie that just didn't work.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Several previous actors from Farrelly films are back in this one, including
Roy Munson's dad from KINGPIN, actor Danny Green, who plays the "bad guy" in
this film. Rob Moran (husband of TV's "Entertainment Tonight" reporter Erin
Moran), who played the rich, eccentric bowler in KINGPIN, and plays a local
trooper in this one. And Lin Shaye, who played the wonderfully ugly landlady
in KINGPIN and the old tanned woman in THERE'S SOMETHING ABOUT MARY.
Some sports stars also make cameo appearances in this film, including none
other than the sexy tennis star, Anna Kournikova, who has a line as the
motel manager. Retired hockey star Cam Neely also reprises his role as
Seabass in his one (although I didn't notice if he had any lines), and even
current hockey star Brendan Shanahan shows up as a trooper.

Title
Review for Rivires pourpres, Les (2000)
For more reviews and movie trailers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
PLOT:
One cop is investigating a murder in which the victim was found hanging off
the side of a mountain in a fetal position, with his hands mutilated and
eyes removed from their sockets. Another cop is investigating the
desecration of a mausoleum in the local cemetery. The detectives do not know
each other but their cases are somewhat interrelated. To find out what
happens next...see the movie!
CRITIQUE:
And just when you thought that the serial killer genre had been beaten to
death, the French grab a hold of it and spice it up with a little bit of
their own "je ne sais quoi". Tres bien, mes amis! Here's a movie that takes
the conventions of a typical serial killer thriller, the cops on the
investigation, the gathering of the clues, the close calls, the chase, the
gory details and smacks it all in the ass with an original story, a creative
way of unfolding the plot line and excellent showings from its two leads.
And the film doesn't hide its inspirations either, as the obvious
comparisons to SE7EN are pre-empted by various homage shots to the David
Fincher classic, such as the scenes in the library, the infamous door kick
and an "interesting" confrontation with the killer. But the small French
town locale, the snowy mountains instead of the dreary rain and the concept
behind the killings, make this one a pretty fresh ride of its own. This film
certainly doesn't have the same impact as the latter, nor the ultimate
chilling conclusion (then again, who could ever top the ol' "head in the
box" thang), but it did manage to string me along for most of its way with
an engaging story and two tenacious cops. I will say that the entire story
ends up being a little complicated, and I honestly didn't "get" all of its
finer details, but the movie still worked for me on many other levels. In
fact, it's the kind of movie that I look forward to seeing again, just so
that I could decipher it all again. I also had a little bit of an issue with
the ending, which was a little far-fetched in my opinion, but not enough to
dismiss it as ridiculous. It's somewhat believable under the circumstances
by that point, but some may see it as a stretch.
But what starts out as a routine murder investigation (think X-FILES),
jam-packed with some of the goriest displays of carnage put to the screen
since the aforementioned SE7EN, ultimately turns into thrilling little
movie. We get a very cool chase scene between two characters literally
running after one another to the point of exhaustion. We get an avalanche
that will rock your world, a goofy but fun Mortal Kombat-ish fight sequence
and a lot of bumpin' and jumpin' with cars. But the first half of the film
is strictly investigative and the two actors, Jean Reno and Vincent Cassel,
are the glue that hold the film together through that period. Reno is
perfectly cast as the no-nonsense loner cop who goes by the book and Cassel
works as the cooler, hipper, funnier end of the law enforcement spectrum.
You believe their characters, you believe the world which they inhabit and
you're constantly curious about what's gonna happen next. This film is
definitely one for fans of the genre, although most will likely have to see
it twice to get the exact details of the plotting, and certainly advisable
to all others who enjoy a neat mystery with gory specks, set in a beautiful
setting. And yup, this film is definitely not for the squeamish!
Where's JoBlo coming from?
Seven (10/10) - The Bone Collector (7.5/10) - Kiss the Girls (7/10) - The
Professional (8/10) - Ronin (7.5/10)
Read JoBlo's interview with actor Jean Reno here:
http://www.joblo.com/interviewreno.htm

Title
Review for Mickey Blue Eyes (1999)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
There are good mob dramas and bad mob dramas, just as there are good mob
comedies and bad mob comedies. ANALYZE THIS (8/10) with DeNiro and Crystal
sure proved to be a great mob comedy earlier this year, so could Caan and
Grant strike gold for the second time with Hugh's sexy girlfriend, Elizabeth
Hurley, producing this Englishman-getting-caught-up-in-the-mob romantic
comedy? Howsabout readin' on to finda out...
PLOT:
An English auctioneer proposes to his Italian-American girlfriend, only to
find out that her family is heavily involved in the mafia. Despite her
reservations, he convinces her that he will not allow himself to get
involved with their illegal activities, but slowly finds himself drowning
into their seedy underworld.
CRITIQUE:
Likeable comedy felt like a pretty good video rental idea, but lacks the
added oomph to highly recommend on the big screen. This film has the right
look, great music, and all the usual suspects from all the other mob movies,
but didn't consistently offer a rat-tat-tat of laughs or a genuinely
believable romance. There were however several scattered funny moments, a
superb performance from Burt Young as the mob boss (This dude gave me the
chills just lookin' at him!), and an enjoyable score which kept all of the
proceedings on an upbeat level all the whole way through. Caan was
surprisingly underused in my opinion, while Grant tacked in another decent
job as the comic lead, with plenty of endearingly goofy moments, alongside
his ever-present puppy-dog look, which apparently, most folks seem to like?
The story itself was 'sarright, but I didn't personally buy into all of the
goings-on during the film's finale, with certain people suddenly shifting
loyalties like nobody's business. I mean, it was like...foggetaboutitt!
Small plot holes aside, most of the film was enjoyable enough to watch, due
to the interesting premise, but a classic romantic comedy, or mob comedy for
that matter, it is not. Don't expect to find the same level of humor as in
ANALYZE THIS (8/10) because that film's comedy was an uzi compared to this
movie's shotgun. But if you really like any of the principals in this one,
love catchy Italian music, don't mind a reasonably light romance, and don't
have a problem with Hugh Grant's moping, then by all means, see this movie.
Either way, my recommendation of this film ranks higher on a video level,
than an actual pay-full-price cinematic release. Badda-bing...badda-boom!!
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Despite the fact that James Caan has been known to play many Italian roles,
and the fact that he was twice voted "Italian of the Year" by unspecified
Italian-American organizations, he actually comes from a Jewish-Irish
heritage. He was born in Queens, New York, where he used to be known simply
as "Shoulders". Caan has five children from four marriages, and once lived
in the Playboy Mansion for a long period of time during the 1980s, after his
sister passed away from cancer. He claimed to have lost all passion for
acting at that time, and dove right into the cocaine and alcohol. He's
feeling much better now.
Before production began on this film, Grant's English auctioneer character
had been a neurotic Jewish lawyer. Two script doctors later...voila!
Hugh Grant actually filmed some additional scenes for this movie (With
DGA-sanctioned director Carl Gottlieb supervising), when director Makin's
wife was having a baby, and he could not return for re-shoots. Gottlieb
wrote the script for the original JAWS movie directed by Steven Spielberg.
Seeing that director Makin also directed THE KIDS IN THE HALL motion
picture, along with a few of the actual "Kids" TV episodes, it shouldn't
surprise anyone to find "kid in the hall" Scott Thompson with a role as an
FBI agent in this movie.
Jeanne Tripplehorn once had a long-term relationship with actor/director Ben
Stiller.

Title
Review for Blade (1998)
For more reviews, go to http://surf.to/joblo
Take some SHAFT (7.5/10), toss in a couple of pieces from the original
CROW (8.5/10), slap in some special effects a la SPAWN (6/10), and top
it off with some LOST BOYS (8/10) and BATMAN (8/10) wanna-bees, and
you've got yourself this summer's dark superhero flic via New Line
entitled BLADE. 
PLOT:
An underworld of vampires is living amongst us, and they are no longer
satisfied with being second-best. They are ready to take over the
world, and only one half-man/half-vampire named Blade can stop 'em. 
CRITIQUE:
Regurgitated plot line from a dozen better pictures, superb action
sequences, half and hour too long, and one bad-ass mutha' as the
superhero carved by way of Wesley Snipes, makes this comic-book based
movie bearable, but far from highly recommendable or rewatchable. If
you like the martial arts and the crazy special effect action
arrangements, this movie might be moocho enjoyed by you. If on the
other hand, you are one of those rare people who still likes to sink
their teeth into a little plot once in a while, you might as well wait
for the video version of this toothless story.  
Having said that, Wesley Snipes was totally kickass in this role, and
rocked the house in every scene in which he appeared: cool and f-ckin
scary! Unfortunately for the audience, Kris Kristofferson joined the
fray as some wise old fart there to help Blade or something, but God
knows Blade didn't need help from some boring actor with a fake bum
limp (And aren't we all sick of these superhero movies that always seem
to contain the proverbial sensible ol' saps there to aid our hero in
their quest for goodness? I know I am.) Add that to the contrived
over-acting by Stephen Dorff, whose career is going nowhere and slow,
the uncharismatic N'Bushe Wright who can't seem to muster any interest
into her unnecessary character, and the rest of the no-names who
delivered their cheezy lines much like the dead bodies on which they
gorged. 
Luckily for us all, Blade does spend a lot of time kicking people's
ass, and splattering blood wherever he roams, so that pretty much
dragged me over the more tedious moments in this overly long film.
Snipes was super-cool, and much like Shaft, I'm not afraid to admit
that he was one bad mutha! (Shut your mouth!) The style of the film was
basically in MTV mode, with all the required flashing lights and
electro music following close in tow. I thought the soundtrack could
actually have been much better, instead of what seemed to be the same
electronic beat dancing through all of the action scenes (see THE CROW
soundtrack for a much better mix). All in all, this film is lightly
recommended on the action scenes and Wesley Snipes' performance alone.
On the other hand, if you do not like blood, Snipes or action
sequences, skip this dull knife, crack open a couple of cold ones, and
dunk your fat face straight into a pile of nachos, and call it a night.
Your primordial senses will thank me in the morning.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Wesley Snipes practices Capoeira, a Brazilian form of martial arts. He
is also a 5th Degree Black Belt. 
This film was originally titled BLADE, THE VAMPIRE SLAYER.
Writer David S. Goyer also half-penned the mysterious DARK CITY (8/10)
and the putrid follow-up to the original tale of the black bird, CROW:
THE CITY OF ANGELS (4/10).
Stephen Dorff was born on the 29th of July, 1973. His father is
musician Steve Dorff, and his brother is also a musician named Andrew
Dorff. Stephen appeared in Aerosmith's "Crazy" video opposite the
soon-to-be-cutey-pie-of-the-year actress Alicia Silverstone.
Starting at the tender age of 15, Traci Lords is known to have appeared
in over 80 porno flics by the time her life chime struck lucky 18.
After shooting one more skin flick on her 18th birthday, Traci tossed
in the ol' nutmunch, and pursued a career in the "serious" world of
acting. Her real name is Nora Louise Kuzma.
One of the executive producers of this film is the creator of the
Spiderman and Fantastic Four comic series, and mainstay at Marvel
Comics for over sixty years, Stan Lee.

Title
Review for 102 Dalmatians (2000)
For more reviews and movie games, visit http://www.joblo.com/
I'm a big believer in that not every movie reviewer should be critiquing
every film that passes through the cinema. Does it really make sense for a
50-year old man to write a review about a "kid's movie"? I personally don't
think so. If Roger Ebert hates AMERICAN PIE, does it mean that its target
audience of teenagers will not appreciate the film? I highly doubt it. I
personally try to skip those films to which I do not believe I could truly
inject an insightful piece of criticism.
I didn't see RUGRATS IN PARIS and I will not see Russian epics, because
chances are that I will not be able to bring up anything constructive in my
reviews. In other words, I doubt that my opinion would help a reader decide
on those films either way. Also, it isn't really fair to the filmmakers to
review a movie that is simply NOT made for you. With all that in mind, I'm
writing this review as a test of sorts. Will I be able to bring up anything
that might change the minds of anyone out there in this film audience's
target market? (i.e. 4-10 years old kids) Let's see.
PLOT:
Cruella De Vil is getting out of jail, rehabilitated. She no longer loves
fur, she no longer hates dogs, and she is no longer a mean and all-around
nasty human being. That's until her good "spell" disappears and she returns
to the cruelty by which we have all grown to love her. It's now up to her
cohorts to round up 102 dalmation dogs, so that Cruella could make a nice
fur jacket out of them.
CRITIQUE:
A slow start, a stringy romance and strong English accents shouldn't
dissuade many children from loving this movie, due primarily to a
scene-stealing parakeet and its last thirty minutes of uproarious fun. I
can't really say whether or not this was a good movie or not, because you
can only rate this type of film according to what it is trying to achieve.
This movie wants to make kids ooooh and aaaaah, and most of the cute dogs
and funny lines from the parrot work to do just that. Unfortunately, the
first half of this film moves a little too slow. It concentrates a little
too much on the dinky romance between the two leads, which will likely bore
kids, and doesn't give us enough good ol' fashioned cruelty from Cruella!
Thankfully, it is the film's final thirty minutes or so which pack all of
its punch, with dogs being snatched, people getting hit in the head and
Cruella going all out to get what she wants! You gotta hand it to Glenn
Close on this one, she is absolutely perfect for the part. She looks the
part, she acts the part and she obviously loves to play the part. Cruella
wasn't necessarily as nasty as she could have been in this film, but despite
that observation from big ol' adult me, I did still manage to hear a little
kid bawling his eyes out during one of the final dog-catching scenes. So who
knows...maybe she's a monster to these kids?!
On the whole, the film works mostly because of its use of cute dogs doing
neat tricks, the talking parrot, who is absolutely hilarious (Go, Eric
Idle!) and the last half of the film, which combines all the pratfalls from
other kiddie movies, and a finale straight out of this summer's CHICKEN RUN.
Just think: chicken pies. Wink-wink! So if you're looking for a film to
bring your youngens, I don't think you can go too wrong with this flick.
It's harmless and it doesn't necessarily "change" a modern American
classical tale or give the reigns to a comedic genius who turns the lead
role into something other than what the role was meant to be...uuuhm, but I
digress. What movie were we talking about again? The Grinch? Oh no, 102
DALMATIANS. Either way, I don't think my little review or you, as a parent,
trying to talk your kids out of seeing this movie is gonna work, so why
bother. If your kid wants to see this movie, let 'em go see it...it
certainly won't hurt. If you're an adult and you wanna see this movie,
well...uuuhmmm, grow up! :)
Actually, it's more than likely that most adults will also appreciate the
parrot and Glenn Close's performance. Mrs. JoBlo loved it! Scored it an
8/10. What's up with that? Do I hear 103 Dalmatians, anyone? Disney will
definitely let us know after the weekend box-office tallies.

Title
Review for Snatch. (2000)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
PLOT:
Wow, this is gonna be a tough one. Okay, there are these two boxing
promoters who get caught up in a diamond heist gone awry, in which a young
gambling addict gets kidnapped by these guys who were hired by a Russian
gangster to retrieve the stolen diamond in question. Still with me? Okay,
the promoters also lose their prize fighter, who ends up being replaced by
an unintelligible bare-knuckle gypsy boxer, and suddenly find themselves at
the mercy of a ruthless gangster who's strong-arming them to fix the fight
or end up at the bottom of a river. All of these cool folks eventually run
into one another and rage plenty of more crime, violence and heavy accents
onto our laps. Got all that? Aaaaah, forget it...just see the movie, dammit!
CRITIQUE:
Definitely a major feeling of deja-vu round these parts, but not enough to
spoil yet another solid Guy Ritchie (also known as Mr. Madonna) British
underground gangster funfest. The accents are heavy, the characters are
colorful and the style is all over the place, and perfect for a movie as
such. Yeah, yeah...I know you've probably read this elsewhere, but I can't
review this movie without mentioning LOCK, STOCK & TWO SMOKING BARRELS at
least once. What I wanted to say was that if you liked LOCK, you will more
than likely enjoy this movie. They've got similar overall premises, wild and
crazy characters, funky soundtracks, over-the-top style shots, etc, etc...
If that film wasn't your bag, I highly doubt that you will appreciate this
film either. Vinnie Jones kicks arse!!
The few issues I did have with this film were actually pretty small, but
I'll mention them anyway. The breadth of characters was just a little too
much for my taste. I loved Del Toro's character, Brad Pitt's, Dennis
Farina's and Vinnie Jones', but at some point, there were just too many of
them to juggle. So when the story would switch over to the two boxing
promoters, I wasn't as "into it" as I was with the hipper characters. Same
with the story lines, which took a little too long to get going because of
this very fact. I also missed a few lines here and there due to the accent
thing (no, not Brad Pitt's twang, I understand that he was supposed to be
incoherent!), and the said feeling of deja-vu, but all those smaller issues
aside, I enjoyed the flick and that's the bottom line. I especially loved
the first 15 minutes with the original credit sequence and freeze-frame
title card intros and only wish there was more of Del Toro to spread
around...like in his own movie or something! Anyhoo, chalk it up to yet
another highly stylized caper spitting out rounds of violence, humor and
fun-loving criminals for the MTV masses looking for good times and bad
muthas. The film's tag line of "Stealin' Stones and Breakin' Bones" is a
good one.
Note to Guy Ritchie: You've proven yourself to be quite adept in this genre
of film, but it would be nice to see you take a shot at something completely
different for your next film. Then again, let us remind ourselves that I am
but a simpleminded critic typing out words in the basement of the house in
which my parents still reside. Sigh.
Where's JoBlo coming from?
Lock, Stock and Two Smoking Barrels (7.5/10) - Pulp Fiction (7.5/10) -
Reservoir Dogs (9/10) - True Romance (10/10) - The Usual Suspects (7.5/10)
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Pay close attention and you will hear Madonna's "Lucky Star" playing during
a scene in which Vinnie Jones drags a certain someone by his car with his
head tucked in his window.
Incidentally, that "certain someone" is none other than Ewen Bremner, a man
some of you will remember for having played the loveable character of Spud
in TRAINSPOTTING.
The working title of this film was DIAMONDS.

Title
Review for Art of War, The (2000)
For more reviews and movie trailers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
This movie was doubly interesting to watch for me since I was one of the few
to see an early test screening of the film back in January. The original cut
of the film that I was shown didn't include any special effects, lacked a
score and needed a bit of tightening up. All in all, it was an okay popcorn
flick, and after having seen the completed version, I must say that I stick
close to my original interpretation of the film. It doesn't cut into any new
ground, gets a little convoluted and serious at times, but overall, gives us
plenty of action for the sake of action, and if that's what you're looking
for, you will likely get a pop out of this corn.
PLOT:
An undercover UN agent who is an expert at expediting "international
relations" gets caught in over his head when a Chinese ambassador's
assassination leaves him as the ultimate fall guy. Running away from
everyone including the Chinese triad and the FBI, the fugitive hooks up with
a translator girl who attempts to help him find the real masterminds behind
the slaying, and clear him of all wrong-doings.
CRITIQUE:
Despite its pretentious title, convoluted plot and overly serious tone, I
chose to enjoy this film as an action-packed popcorn ride starring badass
Wesley Snipes kicking butt all over the place, and by God...it worked! I do
wish they would have cut about 20 minutes from this film and maybe even cut
some of its dreary political dialogue, but I liked the movie despite some of
its shortcomings, because it delivered a typically intense Snipes as a
pretty cool James Bond/Ethan Hunt wannabe. So don't go into this movie
expecting an terribly interesting plot (you forget it all minutes after you
walk out of the theatre), Oscar-caliber acting (Anne Archer walking the fine
line between acting and over-acting) or unpredictable happenings (I guessed
the "bad guy" about 12 minutes into the film). Go into this movie with the
intention of seeing some pretty cool action scenes, plenty of gun play,
Wesley kick-boxing everybody in sight and Maury Chaykin thankfully present
as the much needed "comic relief".
This film is violent, packs a punch and doesn't really let up, save for a
couple of downtimes in the middle. The director's style is slick, very
lively, a man who obviously enjoys the over-the-head shots and doesn't mind
utilizing the infamous MATRIX bullet zoom effect for added wattage either.
The high tech game is another one that generally appeals to me, so enjoy I
did the many cooky technological gadgeteries utilized by Snipes in his
pursuit of the bad guys. It's funny because I actually feel like I'm
defending this movie in my review and I guess that could only mean one
thing...yup, guilty-pleasure syndrome!! Perhaps it's because I know that
deep-down inside the film won't hold up under closer scrutiny, doesn't leave
much room for unpredictability and washes its clothes in the same machine as
many of the others, but what can I tell you...I enjoyed it! So if action is
what you're looking for, this flick should just about cover your bases. And
the reason I haven't mentioned either Michael Biehn or Donald Sutherland in
this review is because either one doesn't really have much to do in this
film. But love it or leave it, I think we can all agree that Wesley Snipes
is one charismatic actor who continues to hold your attention, no matter
what the circumstances. And the Art of this Review is coming up with a
typically idiotic play on the title way of finishing it off... :)

Title
Review for Million Dollar Hotel, The (2000)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Australian Mel Gibson has a small but important role in this picture shot by
German director Wim Wenders, from a story by the lead singer of the Irish
band U2, starring Mila Jovovich, the Ukrainian-born actress who was married
French director Luc Besson for about a year, and American Jeremy Davies. And
as much as you may think that those people are diverse...you ain't seen
nothing yet!
PLOT:
A billionaire media mogul's son is purported to have killed himself by
jumping off the roof of the Million Dollar Hotel, a downtrodden shelter
which houses insane people abandoned by the health care system. The kid's
father sends a FBI agent in to find the killer of his son, not willing to
accept that his son would ever commit suicide.
CRITIQUE:
This was a difficult movie to rate. If I had to rate it on its story alone,
I would give it a 3/10. It starts off as an interesting murder mystery but
slowly disintegrates into an uninteresting melange of TWIN PEAKS meeting the
good folks from the CUCKOO'S NEST, and ultimately falls flat in most
categories except that of arty pretension. If I were to rate the soundtrack
of this film, I would give it a 9/10. The music and sounds filled in this
picture seem perfect for its environment of symbolic poetic chaos, and even
manage to liven things up during the film's many dull moments. Now if I were
to rate this movie on its acting alone, I would have no problem in handing
it a 7/10, with Mel Gibson pulling off one of his weirdest, coolest and best
roles ever. I wish they had made a movie about his one very peculiar FBI
agent alone. The guy is as crazy or even crazier than all the real loonies
in the building, and Gibson obviously made the most of his unfamiliar
secondary role. Jeremy Davies also played a perfect nutjob, although I am
starting to get a little tired of seeing Jovovich always playing her weirdo
roles...I think a "normal" role for her would be "different" at this point.
Peter Stormare is also unrecognizable and brilliantly funny as the insane
man who talks with a Liverpool accent and truly believes that he wrote all
of the Beatles' songs.
The rest of the cast is not as brilliant or original, with many of them just
rounding out the cast for kicks sakes. Of course, as a black dramatic
comedy, which I am assuming it is, the film did manage a few decent
one-liners, but ultimately it is the so-called drama that was just too
boring, existential and long-winded. The film also outstayed its welcome by
about half and hour, and ultimately solved the mystery of the murder, only
to leave me feeling emptier and less inclined to care than when I came in.
Is this movie about egos, love and suicide, or is it just a convoluted
script made to look like it's about those very subjects when really it's
about a bunch of crazy people acting nuts and talking shit for over two
hours? For me, it was more of the latter, and when you consider that the
story is generally the most important part of a movie, I can't truly
recommend this film to anyone out in the common audience. Of course, if you
love U2, want to see Mel Gibson in a great, gritty, indie role or enjoy neat
camera tricks every now and again, well, by all means, check into the hotel.
For everyone else who doesn't really appreciate art-house fare, don't really
like stories that pretend to go somewhere but ultimately end up going
nowhere, and have just about had enough of movies featuring the insane
passing off as "interesting eccentrics", well, buy the soundtrack and save
yourself the grief.
Pay me a million bucks and I wouldn't see this movie again...okay, okay, I'm
just kidding, but you get my drift.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Jeremy Davies birth name was Jeremy Boring. Wow. I wonder why he changed it?
He  was born in Iowa.
This movie is based on a story by the lead singer of the Irish band U2,
Bono, and Nicholas Klein, the same man behind the screenplay of this movie.
The film was originally titled THE BILLION DOLLAR HOTEL and based on a
real-life L.A. hotel called "The Rosalyn Million Dollar Hotel" which was one
of the great hotels during the Golden Age of Hollywood in the 30s, but which
now stands as a halfway house where a lot of outpatients from mental
hospitals live. Needless to say, good ol' Boner (pronounced Bono) himself
makes a two-second cameo appearance in this flick as a dude with sunglasses
in the lobby.
Tim Roth also has an uncredited cameo role in this movie which lasts a
little less than a minute.
Actor Sean Penn was originally cast as the lead in this picture, a role
which eventually went to Jeremy Davies.
Some of you might recognize one of the loonies in this film as none other
than Ellen Cleghorne from TV's "Saturday Night Live" (1991-1995).
This movie won director Wim Wenders a Silver Berlin Bear Jury Prize for
directing at the 2000 Berlin Film Festival.
This film was produced by Icon Productions, Mel Gibson's production company,
the same people behind PAYBACK and BRAVEHEART.

Title
Review for Negotiator, The (1998)
Oscar veterans Samuel L. Jackson and Kevin Spacey star in yet another
hostage film that rakes the coals over last year's dismal MAD CITY
(5/10), while getting close to the nail-biting ambience of the 70's
classic DOG DAY AFTERNOON (8/10). 
PLOT:
Hostage negotiator extraordinaire Danny Roman (Jackson) suddenly
becomes suspect number one in a fellow cop's murder. Sensing a setup,
Danny decides to take matters into his own hands, and holds a couple of
hostages of his own. Enter negotiator number two, named Sabian
(Spacey), who climbs into the picture to talk our man Danny and the
hostages down safely from their plight. The tension builds...and
there's your movie.
CRITIQUE:
Entertaining thriller that grabbed me from its first few minutes,
generated some genuine interest despite its lengthy runtime, and
continued to accentuate the incredible charismatic acting abilities of
one Samuel L. Jackson. Now this positive review comes despite the fact
that this film's plot line seemed to have been completely given away by
its "morons for hire" marketed movie trailer. So even though I pretty
much knew what to expect going into this movie, I must say that the
tension and thrills were still there for me, so kudos go out to the
director and the notable actors in that regard.
This movie always seemed to keep me interested in its direction, and
despite a couple of slower moments in its midst, the "I wonder what's
gonna happen next?" vibe never left my back pocket. It reminded me a
lot of the walkie-talkie conversations that Bruce Willis and Reginald
VelJohnson had in the original DIE HARD (8/10) movie, but on a much
larger scale, with more tension and less action. Having said that, I
must admit that some of the plot points did escape me in this one, but
matter not, since the film as a whole worked on the tray that it was
prepared, which was a fun, action thriller. 
Points to Pig Vomit from Howard Stern's PRIVATE PARTS (7/10), Paul
Giamatti, for scoring nicely as the comic relief in this thrilling
tale, as well as a posthumous tip of the cap to J.T. Walsh who
delivered icicles as the implicated internal affairs rep. But for the
most part, I think that it's the continuing great work by Sam Jackson
that makes this film stand out as much as it does! I mean, the plot
doesn't necessarily revive the genre by any stretch of the imagination,
but Sammy always seems to keep us interested in his character, and
curious as to his next outcome or action. Mr. Jackson's genuine aura
oozes from the screen and into your psyche, as he continues to staple
himself as one of the most gifted, and watcheable actors of this
generation. Overall, this film delivers great acting, consistent
thrills, a mediocre plot line, and a solid nacho-muncher of a good time
at the movies.
Little Known Facts: 
This film was dedicated to actor J.T. Walsh, who passed away at the age
of 53, after the production of this film was completed. He died on the
27th of February, 1998 of an apparent heart attack while on a holiday.
He received further posthumous recognition when Jack Nicholson
dedicated his Best Actor Oscar for AS GOOD AS IT GETS (7.5/10) to him. 
Sam Jackson played one of Eddie Murphy's uncles in RAW (7/10), and
Stacks Edwards in Martin Scorsese's masterpiece of the mob GOODFELLAS
(9/10). Sam's middle name is Leroy, and he was an admitted drug user
until he completed drug rehab two weeks before playing a drug addict in
Spike Lee's JUNGLE FEVER (7/10).
Kevin Spacey's real name is Kevin Fowler.

Title
Review for BASEketball (1998)
For more reviews and movie trivia, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Dude, why on Earth do you think Premiere magazine picked us to be one of the
films that would gross over $100 million in the summer of 1998? Dude, I have
no idea, but another politically-incorrect comedy, THERE'S SOMETHING ABOUT
MARY (7.5/10), made over $150 million! Dude, are you for real? Dude, our
film kicked that film's ass all over the place!! Dude, ours didn't feature a
couple of bra-shots of Cameron Diaz, or a shot of cum in her hair. Dude,
where can I rent that video, dude !?!?
PLOT:
Two losers with little hope or ambition, create an amalgam-sport which falls
somewhere between baseball and basketball, called baseketball. The sport
rises to popular new heights, and tests its original non-commerciality
promise, and the friendship of a couple of air-headed dude buddies.
CRITIQUE:
Sophomoric comedy barely curves a few laughs over home plate, pops up a lot
of corny and repetitive jokes, but hits a homerun for originality and strong
performances by the new kids on the block, Matt Stone and Trey Parker. This
movie starts off with an original premise, a healthy cast of campy actors,
but slowly deteriorates into a "one-joke" movie, with a weak plot line and
flat sight gags. Don't get me wrong, I chuckled at quite a few of the jokes
in this film, but unfortunately for its makers (The Zucker Brothers of
AIRPLANE and the NAKED GUN series fame), there weren't enough to carry the
weak story in which they were stirred. I mean, how many times can you show
the audience cheering, the "sexy" cheerleaders leading, and the players
trying to "psyche each other out", before you look for a little more? I
would recommend it to anyone who's looking for a cute basis for a comedy,
with a little zing, but not much zang.
Also, if you're a fan of TV's "South Park", I'm sure you'll want to see it
for the big-screen debut of the creators of that show, Stone and Parker, who
actually work perfectly in this film, and really seem at ease and very
natural before the camera. So if you don't think the premise of this movie
is cute, and you don't care for either one of these two individuals, I
suggest you skip this hit-and-miss comedy, and check out the funnier THERE'S
SOMETHING ABOUT MARY. Also, keep in mind that most of the humor in this film
is based in the pool of "stupid humor", which I personally enjoy, but others
might not. All in all, a so-so time at the videostore. By the way, if you do
get to see this film on video, there are about 15 minutes worth of outtakes
at the end of the film, which you could definitely skip out on. They are
absolutely NOT FUNNY, and actually carved away from the little smile that I
had at the end of the movie. Dude, why would you even put those unfunny
outtakes there to begin with? Dude? Duuuuuuuuude ????
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Kato Kaelin, of OJ Simpson Murder Case fame, has a small cameo as a
driveway-game announcer.


Title
Review for Eye of the Beholder (1999)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
A woman serial killer thriller? Sure sounds interesting on paper, doesn't
it? Ashley Judd as the sexy, noir lead, prancing around in all her goodies,
with "nice guy" detective Ewan McGregor fast on her tail. Toss in ex-90210
staple Jason Priestley in a role which was given to my good friend "The
Arrow" before the Priest got the gig, playing a smelly psycho with a bad
attitude, and it seems as though all systems were ready to go. But then
again, I guess quality is all in the eye of the beholder, isn't it?
Hehehe...
PLOT:
A sultry woman with a dark past is tailed by a British Intelligence agent
who can't get over the loss of his daughter, and suddenly finds himself
obsessed with his investigative subject. And while the path of her murders
begins to cover several cities, the man's obsession with the mysterious lady
starts to take over his entire life.
CRITIQUE:
Ashley Judd is one purty lady with some significant talent as an actress and
sexy seductress, but this movie bites as a whole. Few thrills, even less
action, a loud soundtrack and over-the-top symbolism don't make up for the
fact that the script has very little substance or anything interesting and
new to say. Thankfully, I am a fan of style and this film has got plenty to
spare. It's also got a pretentious air which prevents it from becoming
anything more than a second-rate surreal "thriller" with some solid
performances from the leads, decent locale shots and a bogus ending. Did I
believe or buy into any of the simplistic motivations that the characters
expressed as their raison-d'etre in this film? Absolutely not! And having
Ewan's lost daughter float in and out of scenes as a reminder of why he is
the way he is, wasn't exactly subtle or entertaining. Now does Ashley Judd
"work" as a jet-setting femme fatale with a propensity for the ol'
knife-in-the-back scenario? Absolutely, in fact, she's one of the strongest
points in this muddled movie, which expects you to tag along with some guy
who becomes obsessed with a serial killer, and then care about what happens
to either one of them!
Problem with films like this is that despite their many bad points,
including plot holes which just seemed to make matters worse, they do
sometimes contain serviceable qualities. Which is why I never tend to favor
the inclusion of many 0/10's in my reviews. Much like the philosophy in my
real life, I like to judge all films according to the merits of its final
product, but not without acknowledging the separate parts that go into
creating that compilation. In other words, I try to see some good in
everything, and despite not enjoying this movie as a whole, I liked some of
the camera-work, truly enjoyed Jason Priestley's spirited cameo, was never
really bored and definitely toss kudos the way of Judd and McGregor. Does
the ending suck? Yes. Does the movie try too hard to be cool, dark, sexy and
deep without having much to say? You bet. All in all, I would say that this
cinematic mess is a nice try, but no cigar. See it for Judd, her sexy
character, McGregor playing the shy guy, the shot of Judd's boobies, or K.D.
Land trying to act. But don't see it if you're looking for a deep character
study or thrills, cause the only reason you'd find yourself at the edge of
your seat in this flick, is to beat a hasty retreat to the exits.

Title
Review for Eyes Wide Shut (1999)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Director Stanley Kubrick passed away in his sleep only four days after
handing in his final cut of this film. Lovebirds Tom Cruise and Nicole
Kidman spent close to two years of their lives shooting this film with the
infamous perfectionist. Harvey Keitel, well...let's just say that everyone
got really stressed. Now, let's see what all the fuss was about...
PLOT:
A wife, upset by her husband's lack of jealousy, begins to flirt around and
admit to having thoughts of adultery. Her husband, shaken by his wife's
forthrightness in this respect, spends the night wandering from one very odd
sexually induced circumstance to another.
CRITIQUE:
This film is not for everyone. It is a complex, overly symbolic,
turtle-paced, dramatic sexual investigation, which features some great
acting from Tom Cruise, a consistently intriguing eye from director Kubrick,
a creepy score and plenty of beautifully photographed sequences. Did I fully
understand the whole movie? Certainly not. Would I be willing to watch it
again after discussing its complete potency with others? Certainly. But
understand that if you are the type of viewer who likes a film's meaning
handed to you on a silver platter, certainly, this one ain't for you. This
film is basically a big-budget art-house flick starring the Cruises and
directed by a legend in the field of movie creation. It's also very nice to
look at, with some solid acting, but much like many other art-house films,
there is way too much that is left to interpretation, leaving you feeling
somewhat hollow immediately after the film's conclusion. The film's message,
much like any other piece of art, is left to be quite subjective, and
certainly better understood after several viewings, or at least some
coaching.
Having said that, I do believe that the film moved along at too slow a pace,
with many coupled conversations seeming to go on far beyond their interest
point. And this is all despite the fact that the subject matters at hand,
jealousy and sex, struck a nerve with me. I personally would have
appreciated a much deeper insight into their rooted interplay, as opposed to
the larger emphasis paid to one very particularly strange scenario featuring
a lot of naked people. I don't think I've seen this many breasts parading
around in a movie since the last porno that "a friend left at my house." The
film's brighter points feature a superb presentation of sights and sounds
through a grainy-gaze, plenty of joyous Christmas lights sprinkled all
around, and a typically memorable score by the man named Kubrick (Despite
its obvious use for dramatics at certain points.)
All in all, much like many of Mr. Kubrick's other films, this is not the
kind of movie that can be fully digested in one sitting. If you are the type
of person who likes to decontruct puzzles, loves naked people and has a
hard-on for either Tom Cruise or Stanley Kubrick, then check this one out,
you might truly enjoy its uniqueness. If, on the other hand, you don't like
long, generally slow and esoteric films, featuring Nicole Kidman laughing
way too much, then I suggest you skip out on this one altogether, and maybe
check back into it in a couple of years. Who knows...your eyes might be
willing to be much more wide open by then :) (Sorry, but it's been a long
day, and that's the only cheezy pun that I could come up with at this late
hour...)
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Believe it or not, infamously reclusive director Stanley Kubrick actually
makes a cameo in this film. Look for him sitting at a table in the cafe
where Bill gets Nick's address.
Actors Harvey Keitel and Jennifer Jason Leigh's scenes had to be deleted
when both actors could not return to London to re-shoot some of their
scenes. Director Kubrick respectively replaced the duo with actors Sidney
Pollack and Marie Richardson.
A VHS copy of the Tom Cruise movie RAIN MAN (8/10) can be seen in Alice and
Bill's bedroom on top of their entertainment stand during their
marijuana-enhanced argument.
A 65-second sequence during the film's orgy scene was digitally altered.
Kubrick, apparently suspecting he'd have trouble getting past the MPAA
ratings board in the U.S., authorized an edit of the scene which consisted
of superimposing objects, and people, over the exposed genitalia of some
actors. The film did indeed receive an R rating, rather than the dreaded
NC-17. European versions of the film will be uncensored (natch!).
The paintings hung on the wall of the Harford's apartment are the work of
Kubrick's widow, Christiane, and their daughter Katharina.
Leelee Sobieski, the teen actress who plays a key role in the film, has told
reporters that she got along beautifully with the reclusive Kubrick, and
asked him for a lock of hair for her collection (apparently she collects the
hair of famous people she works with). An amused Kubrick complied. Sadly,
Tom Cruise did not.
Astonishingly, the budget for Eyes Wide Shut, despite a 15-month shoot, came
in a relatively modest $65 million.
The streets of Manhattan where Cruise walks were re-created, in meticulous
detail, at Kubrick's Pinewood Studios outside of London, where the entire
movie was filmed.
Kubrick retained tight control of the film through the end, including its
marketing campaign: He personally selected the teaser clip and trailer
images to be shown. And he had strong feelings regarding the press, with the
New York Daily News reporting that the director had left instructions that
only five publications were to be granted interviews: the New York Times,
the Los Angeles Times, Premiere, TIME, and Newsweek. Kubrick also wanted to
ensure that the teaser and trailer were shown on the Internet.

Title
Review for Miss Congeniality (2000)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
I love movies, but every now and again, a stint of films comes along and I
just wonder why it is that I love movies so much. This past week was a
little like that, as I sat to watch THE EMPEROR'S NEW GROOVE, WHAT WOMEN
WANT and MISS CONGENIALITY with very little enthusiasm invested in any of
the three films. But surprise, surprise, I really loved the Disney animated
movie, and an even bigger surprise, I didn't completely hate this movie
(okay, so two out of three ain't bad). So why is it that I continue to love
movies so much? Well, it's simple. When even the lesser films can actually
entertain me from time to time, the joy of movie-watching is reinvigorated
once again, even if it is just on a very, very fluffy level. Bottom
line...entertainment. This movie was just that...fluffy, cute entertainment.
PLOT:
A smart but clumsy female FBI agent, who happens to be a huge tomboy, has to
go undercover in a beauty pageant in order to investigate a serial psycho
case. Opposed to the idea at first, the "ugly duckling" eventually begins to
appreciate some of the finer points of being a lady during her
transformation, while continuing to work on the case.
CRITIQUE:
This movie is all about Sandra Bullock. If you like her, like her
personality, her vibrancy, her humor, her goofiness, then you will more than
likely enjoy this fluff-piece. She's extremely adorable in this movie as she
trips over stuff here and there, kicks guys butts there and here, and
actually has us forgetting about the incredible dumbo plot-line of the
movie. It's actually the perfect "Sandra Bullock" role. She fits the
character like a glove. And don't you think that I will try to defend this
film's "Scooby Doo" mystery here, folks, because I will leave that chore to
anyone else who cares. I was cracking up pretty consistently throughout this
entire movie, so ho-hum plot-line aside, this movie worked for me. In fact,
Bullock pretty much had me at "hello". But before I continue to gush all
over her some more, allow me to try and make some more sense out of this
movie. Granted, the basic story's been seen a million times. First of all,
there's a crazy psycho out there who sends cops enigmatic clues about his
next big crime. Woo-hoo, unoriginality police...lock these guys up! Then of
course, you've got the whole "ugly duckling" transformation scenario, with
every possible "fish out of water" joke that you could imagine, topped off
with the typical beauty pageant jokes. But what can I tell you, little ol'
Sandy had me the whole time. But to be fair, I also enjoyed Benjamin Bratt's
performance, who is great as usual, but is now in definite need of a "real"
role to show the world his range. I mean, all of these "great looking guy
with a heart" roles are fine to pay the bills, dude, but you gotta break out
of that mold. Show us what you're really made of, you sexy bastard!
I'd also like to tip my cap to Michael Caine who glides into this goofy
comedy and actually comes out smelling pretty gosh darn sweet. Here's an
"Oscar" winner delivering some really hokey lines and pulling it
off...completely! I really liked his character, he was sincere, assertive
and even more importantly, funny! This movie is actually a perfect "video
movie". One of those films that you check out for the evening, turn off your
brain, sit back and laugh out loud. And please don't try to dissect this
goofy movie's mystery because it's so obviously NOT about that! The
"villain" in this movie is so ridiculous, that you just want to slap the
screenwriters silly for having watched too many Saturday morning cartoons.
This film is about Sandra Bullock and her cuteness...end of story. This
movie is also funny and a crowd-pleaser. It's got a lot of easy laughs and
plenty of well-intentioned hilarity all around. I usually lace into films as
such, especially when it's so obvious that not much ambitiousness was put
into the project, but you know what, this movie is a comedy and the bottom
line is...was it funny? Did it make me laugh? And the unequivocal response
to both of those questions is a resounding "yes", so if you take this movie
on its light, fluffy, cutesy, poopsy level, you will more than likely enjoy
it as much as I did. But please Hollywood (whoever you are), no more beauty
pageant comedies!!! For the love of God...

Title
Review for Remember the Titans (2000)
For more reviews, screensavers, trailers & more, visit http://www.joblo.com/
It seems as though mega-producer Jerry Bruckheimer is stretching his wings a
little this year with two follow-up films to his typical summertime macho
fest flick GONE IN SIXTY SECONDS. The first was COYOTE UGLY, a T&A film
disguised as a "woman's story" (or the other way around), and the second is
this movie, a real-life drama based on the forced integration of blacks and
whites in the early 70s.
So you're probably asking yourself, "What do you mean? No T&A? No loud
booming soundtrack? No hyped-up editing jobs? Es tu, Bruckheimer?" It's sad
but true, my friends, Mr. Jerry Bruckheimer has slipped over to the other
side of filmmaking and finally decided to make a movie that actually means
something! Bravo, sir! PS: Just don't ever forget your bread and butter,
Jerry... :)
PLOT:
Based on a true story set in 1971, a black coach is hired to take over a
newly integrated football team of black and white students. The old white
coach is kept on as his assistant, while everybody from the players, to the
coaches, to the townspeople have trouble adjusting to the forced racial
integration. Racism and intolerance follow as the coach attempts to whip
everybody into shape as one team working towards the same goal.
CRITIQUE:
A well-packaged, well-acted, well-intentioned feel good movie that brings
nothing new to the table yet still manages to pull you into its wonderful
world of harmony. It is important to note that as with all films of this
nature, there is always a very fine line between sappy melodrama, selling it
all on the "TV movie of the week" mentality, and a real story with an honest
to goodness message. This film manages to ride that fine line very well for
most of the way through, primarily due to its solid cast, steady pace, no
major lulls or sermons delivered here, and Denzel Washington, who once more,
checks in with another outstanding performance. Of course, many will say
that Denzel isn't exactly stretching his acting muscles here, playing the
straight-talking leader-man once again, and surely, all of these people will
have a point. But the bottom line is the bottom line and the bottom line in
this case is that the charisma and talent combined in this one man is what
make this entire story stick together to such a greater extent, and that's
really all that matters.
Of course, the story itself is also an important one. Such extreme racial
divide still prevalent in the 70s. Who knew? Certainly not me, at least not
to this sad-sack extent (Segregated restaurants? Yikes!). And despite most
of the basic plot points of the film having been seen a thousand times
before (too many clichs to enumerate here), I was totally "into" this movie
because I cared about the people in it and the situations presented within.
Why, you might ask? Simply put, the director seems to have perfectly molded
all of the ideal elements needed to create an entertaining picture. He took
the cliches and mixed them in with a great cast. All solid actors across the
board, many of whom are given a three-dimensional quality for you to care
about. Added some needed humor, a quick pace, which may have otherwise
dulled people to death, captivating football scenes, sympathetic characters
on all sides, and ultimately, a profound message which you can't help but
root for in the end. "It's not the outside of a person that counts...it's
the inside". Sappy, right? You've heard it a million times, right? Well, so
had I, but this film still had me sogging up my nachos, an event that occurs
only once or twice every year.
Ultimately, I think this film was helped by the fact that it was based on a
true story because of that added sense of security, knowing that it all
really happened, investing more in the characters. And as per most true-life
movie tales, and my personal favorite part of all these films, an excellent
"where are they now" summary completed the presentation of this movie. I
love that! Woo-hoo! Great move, Boaz! So if you're a parent, bring the kids.
And if you're a kid, bring your parents. And if you're a jaded movie geek
just looking to rip into a movie that doesn't really offer much originality
but does more than make up for it with an outstanding cast and message, I
say...stay home. Don't ruin this one for the rest of us.

Title
Review for Random Hearts (1999)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Random snores? Not for me, but my buddy to the left who, admittedly was
surviving on only two hours of sleep, did happen to nod off from time to
time during this film's two hours and fifteen minute run. I managed, but did
find this to be a passable film at best, with Ford offering us the worst
haircut of his career, and proof that "range" is not his strongest suit as
an actor.
PLOT:
A police sergeant's wife dies in a plane crash. As if that wasn't bad
enough, he soon finds out that she was on the plane with a man with whom she
was having an affair. For closure's sake, the cop decides to track down the
widowing wife of the man who she was banging. It turns out that the widow, a
congresswoman, was also unaware of their secret relationship, and would
rather just leave it under wraps. Over time, the grieving duo find more than
just betrayal in common and begin to "console" one another.
CRITIQUE:
Do you really need 133 minutes to tell a pretty standard story? The answer
is no. This film goes about half an hour too long, offers a solid
performance by Kristin Scott Thomas, a stoic showing by Ford and his
goofy-looking earring, a completely forgettable subplot, but ultimately,
didn't bore me. The closest film to which I could compare this one would be
MESSAGE IN A BOTTLE (6.5/10) with Kevin Costner. It's about grieving,
getting over someone, needing closure, and yes, finding love in places which
you'd least expect it. I liked MESSAGE a little better because of the
Costner factor (Ford lacks the charm and the romantic appeal of a
better-looking Costner), and the more believable romance scenes. On the
other hand, I did appreciate the ending to this film much more than the one
offered by the BOTTLE, but enough about the comparisons!
The two things which could have easily made this film so much better is 1)
If they had gotten completely rid of the ridiculously obvious plot device
involving Ford and his job as a cop, which was not only uninteresting, but
ultimately swayed our interest and made the film 20-25 minutes longer, and
2) Given the part played by Ford to a better looking man, a bigger charmer
and an actor who would have been able to convey a little more emotion than a
simple raised eyebrow every now and again. If you pay close attention to
Harry's "crying scene", you will note that it actually lasts less than three
real seconds (Don't hold back, Indy!). Very weird. Kristin Scott Thomas, on
the other hand, managed to hold a decent American accent for the most part
of the movie, and did convey a deeper sense of loss and grieving, two
feelings which seemed completely absent from Ford's "despondent" (?)
character.
So why am I still recommending this film, albeit barely? Well, the premise
is interesting, the development is well done, Sydney Pollack is really good
in it, and the lightly surprising ending kind of helped levitate this film
past my basic cinematic recommendation line. No need to see it in the
theatres though. Definitely a lazy night rental with the loved one, so that
you could forward the parts which should have been cut out. And remember,
this is a character-driven film, not plot. If the characters don't seem
interesting to you, skip this adult drama and drum up a romantic evening of
your own. You can never have too many of those!
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Ironically, director Sydney Pollack lost his own son in a plane crash in
1993. Sydney was born in Lafayette, Indiana.
Harrison Ford is listed as one of 50 people barred from entering Tibet.
Disney clashed with Chinese officials over the 1997 Martin Scorsese film
KUNDUN which Ford's wife, Melissa Mathison, wrote. She also wrote the
screenplay for the worldly popular Steven Spielberg film, E.T. the
EXTRA-TERRESTRIAL.
Over the past 15 years, at least five different screenwriters, two
directors, James L. Brooks and Ivan Reitman, plenty of actors, including
Dustin Hoffman, have been connected to this film based on Warren Adler's
1984 novel. Of Adler's 25 published novels, ten have either been bought or
optioned for films. His novel "War of the Roses" became a film starring
Michael Douglas and Kathleen Turner.
Screenwriter Kurt Luedtke won an Academy Award for Best Screenplay based on
Material from Another Medium for his work with Sydney Pollack on OUT OF
AFRICA, which also won Best Picture, and Best Director for Pollack.
Nepotism-alert: As we see director Sydney Pollack let brother Bernie Pollack
take care of the costume design for this picture. To be fair to ol' Bernie,
he has a reputation of his own in this industry. He also dressed the cast of
MESSAGE IN THE BOTTLE, SABRINA (Sydney Pollack film) and HAVANA (Sydney
Pollack film), amongst others... :)
This film had a reported budget of $54 Million.

Title
Review for Fear and Loathing in Las Vegas (1998)
Film adaptation of Hunter S. Thompson's infamous semi-autobiographical
hallucinogen-fueled book of the same title. Director Terry Gilliam of
TWELVE MONKEYS (8/10) and BRAZIL (7/10) fame, took over the helm of
this project after fellow director Alex Cox (SID AND NANCY (7.5/10))
"apparently alienated everyone associated with the movie", according to
Gilliam.
PLOT:
Writer Thompson (Depp) heads down to Las Vegas with his attorney Dr.
Gonzo (Del Toro) to cover a motorcycle race. During their trip, they
systematically consume "two bags of grass, seventy-five pellets of
mescaline, five sheets of high powered blotter acid, a salt shaker
half-full of cocaine, a whole galaxy of multi-colored uppers, downers,
screamers, laughers, a quart of tequila, a quart of rum, a case of
beer, a pint of raw ether and two dozen amyls. The movie presents us
with the results of that heavy drug use.
CRITIQUE:
I have given this movie two separate ratings because I believe that the
enjoyment of this psychedelic picture is highly correlated with the
amount of drugs or alcohol that would be floating around in the
viewer's own mind, whilst inhaling this cinematic vision of excess. If
you are prepared to get high or intoxicated before watching this film,
I would say that this is one picture that you will thoroughly enjoy on
a multitude of colorful levels. If, on the other hand, you decide to
stray from the addition of nefarious elements to your system, I could
not imagine you truly appreciating much of this drug-induced picture's
entire ride (5.5/10 for all those sober dogs). Note: I have not read
Thompson's book.
Having said that, JoBlo did engage in an alcohol-based consumatory
session before (and during) the viewing of this film, so his critique
of the film should be appreciated on that level. This movie relies
heavily on style and peculiar humour, rather than substance or plot. It
moves admirably from one scene to the next, without much basis of their
being, while presenting us with the two days in the life of writer
Hunter S. Thompson during which he seemed to consume more drugs and
alcohol than anyone could ever imagine. It was 1971, and the times were
apparently "a' changing" in the States.
Johnny Depp chews into his role like an overgrown child sucking on a
chocolate lollipop. During the filming, Depp apparently become fast
friends with real-life writer Thompson, and was known to wander off the
set from time to time, for the sake of checking out the newest barmaid
at the local watering hole. I thought he did seem to exaggerate his
walk a little bit too much, but then again, this movie is supposed to
be a wild exaggeration of everything and anything, so who am I to talk.
The one thing that did blow my mind was the actual physical
transformation endured by actor Benicio Del Toro for his role as Dr.
Gonzo. I couldn't believe that this fat, Samoan lawyer, was the same
guy who played the slick mumbling criminal in THE USUAL SUSPECTS
(7.5/10). Word on the street is that gained over 40 pounds for this
role, and I must say that his look was deliciously reprehensible.
Plenty of cameos also pepper this kaleidoscopic moving picture in the
form of Ellen Barkin, Christina Ricci, Tobey Maguire and Cameron Diaz,
along with a bunch of others.
Other than that, the soundtrack was expectedly eclectic, the style was
not as wild as I thought it would be, and the ending was certainly not
much of a barn-burner, but then again, who really noticed. This movie
is about visions of bats floating through your head, Johnny Depp
looking goofy and being bald, and the cornucopia of drug-ravaged scenes
filling your own intoxicated system with ideas of anarchy, rebellion
and the lost American Dream. And for all those who plan on seeing this
movie without the partnership of a mean drink or a mighty doobie, I
suggest you move further down the aisle, buy yourself a ticket to
GODZILLA (6/10), and enjoy the visual fabrications manufactured for the
unstimulated mind.
Little Known Facts: 
Depp and Del Toro snorted plenty of powdered milk instead of cocaine.
Bill Murray also portrayed a Thompson-based character in the film WHERE
THE BUFFALO ROAM.
Johnny Depp turned down roles in THE THREE MUSKETEERS, SPEED (7.5/10),
and LEGENDS OF THE FALL (7.5/10), for smaller and quirkier roles in
BENNY AND JOON (6.5/10) and WHAT'S EATING GILBERT GRAPE? (7/10).
In 1988, Depp told Rolling Stone magazine that he'd tried every drug by
the age of 14.
Johnny hung out with some of the members of Oasis while filming the
uncompleted DIVINE RAPTURE in Ireland, and later played some slide
guitar on the 1997 album, Be Here Now.
Johnny was born in Kentucky, is a high-school dropout, has nicknamed
himself "Mr. Stench", has been engaged to four women until now
(including actress Winona Ryder, whose "Winona Forever" tattoo had to
be altered to "Wino forever" after their breakup), currently plays
guitar in a band called "P", and owns The Viper Room nightclub in L.A.

Title
Review for Crew, The (2000)
For more reviews and movie trailers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
A great premise that shoulda been done a long time ago: so what happens to
all of these mobsters once they make it past their salad days and wander
into the realm of senior citizen? What would Tony Montana be doing in his
late 70s? What about Henry Hill, Jimmy and Tommy from GOODFELLAS? Would they
still be "busting" each other's balls, foggeding abouddit and talking about
whacking out this and that guy? Great premise for a comedy, right? Well,
unfortunately these old-timers only succeed about halfway.
PLOT:
Four mobsters have run into an enemy that they could never turn back: old
age. Past their mafioso prime and living in a condo down in Miami Beach,
these four friends just don't know what to do with themselves anymore. But
when faced with an eviction from their comfortable little abode, the
four-some decide to wrangle up some of their old school techniques so that
they could stay in Florida. Deed done, the crew fall back into their mobster
ways, but not without many blunders, whoopsies and screwups.
CRITIQUE:
A cute movie featuring some fun performances from its stars which gives
plenty of nods to its primary source of inspiration, GOODFELLAS, but not
enough full fledged humor to complete its intriguing premise. I was hoping
that this movie would be funnier, more interesting and better paced, but the
whole of the film provided for a few good laughs, an unnecessarily
convoluted plot and way too many characters for its own good. For example, I
loved Burt Reynolds' character. The guy was a badass in the day and older
now, still refusing to allow his age dictate his way of being.
Unfortunately, we don't get enough of the guy. A few cutesy scenes of him
getting pissed at people and that's that! I wanted more Burt!! (I never
thought I'd ever hear myself say that). I also liked the Columbian drug
lord, played delectably by Miguel Sandoval, a man who knows that he's a
walking clich of a drug lord and even says so in the movie! Funny stuff.
But most of the humor in the film is just too sporadic and weak. I was
waiting to laugh, but the laughs did not come, as the film involved itself
in way too many shenanigans and characters. There was no real need to put in
a shmaltzy "dad looking for his long-lost daughter" side-story (that's
another movie, fellas!) and waste more time with a couple of cops bickering
about the mistakes that were made in their past relationship. The film is
called THE CREW and I wished the filmmakers had stuck more with them, and
tried to make the script funnier and tighter for the audience. But enough
wishing! For what it was, the film did have a nice feel, some groovy "old
school" tunes, solid performances from the top four, some funny jokes,
plenty of cool camera tricks, and enough GOODFELLAS references to put a
smile on my face (see below for specifics). On the downside, the film didn't
live up to its potential, slowed down at several points and didn't provide
enough "funny" for the money. In the end, I would say that this is the
perfect "video movie" for those who appreciate the gangster genre, want to
see Jennifer's Tillies as a stripper and enjoy easy-going humor. In fact,
the older generation will more than likely enjoy this one more than the rest
of us, since many of the jokes are somewhat generational. And with the
success of SPACE COWBOYS, who knows...this might just be the perfect timing!
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Maybe it's because GOODFELLAS is one of my favorite films of all time, but
here are only a few of the obvious references/nods that I noticed in this
film:
1) The film starts off with a voice-over from one of the characters telling
us about how "from as long as he could remember, he always wanted to be a
wiseguy". Check!
2) One of the characters in this film mentions how he's now turned into a "9
to 5 schnook", a person who Henry Hill (the lead in GOODFELLAS) never wanted
to become. Check!
3) A character mentions the Luftansa heist at one point in this movie. That
heist is the one performed by the GOODFELLAS gang back in the 70s. Check!
4) The film is packed with several of Scorsese's trademark camera moves with
freeze-frames and swooping camera shots galore. Check!
5) Frank Vincent, better known as Billy Batts in GOODFELLAS (the guy who
gets the crap beat out of him by Tommy and the gang) shows up in this flick
hawking guns. Also to note, Reynolds' character is nicknamed "Bats". Check
once more!
6) Finally, and easily the most obvious homage to Scorsese is the scene in
which the crew slip a guy some dough to get into a restaurant and are taken
through an entire kitchen with us following them the whole way with a
hand-held camera. Very cool. Checkmate! The screenwriter obviously knows his
GOODFELLAS.
If you know of any others, please let me know and I will add them to this
list.

Title
Review for Arrival, The (1996)
For more reviews and screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
PLOT:
A paranoid radio astronomer stumbles across some aliens talking across his
airwaves and is immediately relieved of his duties from his superiors. After
finding his partner murdered, the suspicious man follows the
extra-terrestrial signal down to Mexico, and finds something beyond even his
spectacular imagination: an apparent alien invasion preparing to take over
the world.
CRITIQUE:
Think John Carpenter's THEY LIVE mixed into a less-pretentious version of
CONTACT, and you've got yourself a pretty neat ALIEN thrill-ride featuring a
pretty solid story, good special effects and enough twists and turns to keep
you interested all the way through. I will be the first to admit that I
never thought I'd see the day that Charlie Sheen would ever make a good
movie again, but boy was I wrong, because this movie is actually quite good,
and intelligent! It's one of those movies that fell through the cracks in
the theatres (Unfortunately it graced the big screen right around the time
that the vastly inferior INDEPENDENCE DAY made its tragic debut), but should
definitely be caught on video, if you are any kind of sci-fi fan. Charlie
Sheen is perfect as the "guy caught in over his head" in a story which moves
along at a decent pace and actually provides some real suspense. It probably
could have used a more powerful ending, but all in all, I had a pretty cool
time watching this flick. If you dig science-fiction, want to see Charlie
Sheen in a good role for once and enjoy the X-Files and their alien
conspiracy theories, there is no reason why you should not be thoroughly
entertained by this intense thriller. But don't take my word for it, Siskel
& Ebert also gave it "two thumbs up!" : )
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
This film is director David N. Twohy's directorial debut. Before this
picture, he was primarily known for having penned a couple of Hollywood's
most infamous screenplays including 1995's WATERWORLD and 1993's THE
FUGITIVE. His career began in 1988 with a much less-ambitious script called
CRITTERS 2: THE MAIN COURSE.
Charlie Sheen's real name is Carlos Irwin Estevez.
Actress Lindsay Crouse starred in the 1987 directorial debut of
playwright/screenwriter David Mamet called HOUSE OF GAMES. The couple were
married at one time and have two daughters together.
This film was originally titled SHOCKWAVE.

Title
Review for What Women Want (2000)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Can Mel Gibson ever do any wrong? Even when he stars in a goofy picture such
as this, he still manages to come out smelling like a rose. Unfortunately, a
solid performance by Mel, charming as usual, and the great shots of him
without his shirt, you can bounce quarters of that six-pack of his, still
don't save this film from saying very little about anything. It's a very,
very "surface" kind of movie...with lots of songs packed into its
best-selling soundtrack-to-be. Great performance by Mel, enjoyable overused
tunes and a few funny moments and you've got yourself a perfect example of a
"video date movie".
PLOT:
A macho, rich, jerk suddenly gets the power to read women's minds and
decides to use it to help him make his life better. He wants to better his
job, better the relationship he has with his daughter and better the way
that he treats the women in his life. Will it work? Will it fall apart? Will
we be suffocated by the many cute "Mel" moments before being treated to an
actual story? Find out below.
CRITIQUE:
See Mel Gibson dance around by himself to Sinatra tunes. Hear Mel do his
best Sean Connery impression. See Mel walking around shirtless half the
movie. Hear Mel sweet talk women and become a sensitive guy overnight. See
Mel relate to his daughter over a loud montage featuring Christina
Aguilera's "What A Girl Wants", as she tries on different prom dresses.
Sigh. See women swoon as all of this takes place on the big screen. Hear men
moan as they sit there next to their ladies. This one ain't for us, fellas.
In fact, I wouldn't even recommend this to any women either, unless they
were just looking for a fluffy ol' time. This movie has a great premise, and
I mean a GREAT one! Here's a man who by some crazy fluke of an accident, can
actually hear what women think. Wow. Isn't that a great way to start a
movie? Yup, sure is. Unfortunately, the makers of this movie decided to
concentrate more on the number of musical interludes that they would have in
the film, rather than any actual story! Let's add another Sinatra number
here, and another cool song from the soundtrack there, and wouldn't it be
cool if we added a montage with another song playing as Mel moves from place
to place here? Uuuuuhmm, I guess someone forget to tell the filmmakers that
they were actually producing a movie...not a soundtrack!
Ugh, one of the most blatantly commercial movies to come down the pike in a
long time. And by commercial, I mean a film so OBVIOUSLY created for a
certain target audience. We've got the sad sack emotionally vulnerable
character drifting in and out of the movie, for the sake of depth.
Disposable secondary characters based on their obvious proclivity to the
target audience (females 30-45). Remember who women chose as the most
sensitive guy back in the old days? Alan Alda, that's right, he's in this
movie! And what's any "chick flick" without Bette Midler. Oy vey, is right!
I don't know, maybe I've seen too many of these types of movies in my day
and the whole schtick is getting to be a little too see-through for me, but
even without the obvious manipulative stuff going on behind the scenes, the
story here is really quite underdeveloped. Mel gets this great power and
does barely anything with it. He makes a few cute remarks to the ladies
around his office, he uses it for obvious relationship reasons, he uses it
to suck up to his daughter's friends...very flighty stuff.
And despite several cute and funny moments, especially the whole scene in
bed with Marisa Tomei (tough shoot, hey Marisa?), the film just never really
does much with its initial great concept. In fact, the wrap-up of Mel's
newfound "power" is handled in an extremely clumsy way. Things just never
seem to go under any type of surface in this movie, but if that's the kind
of film that you're looking, then you might just enjoy this fluff piece. And
no offense to Helen Hunt, whom I consider to be a solid actress, but am I
the only one that's a bit Helen-ed out? That's four movies with her in the
past six weeks! Phew. At least she had a "tan" in this one, despite the lack
of color in her character's persona. This film is a study into the art of
Nora Ephron romance movies gone awry!

Title
Review for There's Something About Mary (1998)
The Farrelly Brothers' third film, after DUMB AND DUMBER (7.5/10) and
KINGPIN (8/10), brings together the real-life couple of Cameron Diaz
and Matt Dillon, some nasty humour, a cute dog, and a mix of love, fate
and romance.
PLOT:
High-school nerd Ted gets lucky when the cutest girl in his class asks
him to the prom. Unfortunately for Ted, he accidentally gets a part of
his male anatomy (ouch!) caught in his zipper, and misses the big
night. Thirteen years later, Ted still can't get Mary out of his mind,
and hires a private detective (Dillon) to find her. Once found, it
turns out that Mary has more than one suitor, and that's when the real
fun begins.
CRITIQUE:
Likeable comedy with a few extremely funny scenes, some funny looking
people, and a plot that won't ever put you to sleep. Having said that,
I must admit that I did like the Farrellys' two previous films more
than this one, but that is saying a lot, since I really did love those
earlier pics. This one is also quite funny, but it didn't really blow
me away like the others. Then again, maybe my expectations were too
high. Then again, maybe I should shut up, and write a little more about
the film, and less about my supposed subconscious reasons for
liking/disliking the film.
Continuing where their other pictures left off, the Farrellys' create a
cutesy world of people with strange and endearing qualities, and a
simple plot by which to tie them all together. This one also includes
plenty of toilet humour, but also some borderline fun-making of the
disabled and mentally-challenged. I must admit that I really wasn't
sure whether to laugh at some points or not. Not a good place to be.
Having said that, the scenes that did tear through the audience, and
yours truly, were extremely hilarious, and went on for several minutes
after the punchline. The laughter practically killed out the next scene
for one of the best ones in the movie (something to do with hair gel).
On the negative end, I did not like the musical interludes of Jonathan
Richman that ran through the entire picture. I found them quite
useless, unfunny and distracting. Also, I found that a lot of the
funnier scenes had already been shown in the film's trailer. And of
course, I never quite buy the fact that these beautiful, intelligent,
single women still can't seem to find the "right guy" (see KISS THE
GIRLS (7/10). I did really like all of the actors in the film,
especially Ben Stiller, who appears to be solidifying his mark as a
great comical actor with this picture and one of my favourites from
1996, FLIRTING WITH DISASTER (8/10). I also liked Matt Dillon with his
big teeth, and Lee Evans with his superb faux-sympathy British accent.
Funny stuff. Also, make sure that you stay for the credits, because
there is an entire montage of outtakes from the film that plays under a
lip-synched version of "Build me up buttercup", which is really cool.
Overall, a cute comedy with a decent premise, and a few particularly
hilarious scenes.
Little Known Facts: 
The Farrellys big break came when they somehow got a copy of their
script "Dust to Dust" into the hands of Eddie Murphy via Murphy's
neighbour. They only found out about Murphy's interest, when they saw
Eddie mention the script on the David Letterman show one night.
Matt Dillon is a high school dropout. In between acting gigs, Dillon
has branched out into the restaurant business. Close to home in his
native New York, he co-owns both a bar called the Whiskey and a swanky
uptown eatery called the Falls.
Cameron Diaz stands 5"9, started working as a model at the early age of
16, and loves cats.
Ben Stiller's father is Jerry Stiller. He played George Costanza's
(Jason Alexander) father on TV's "Seinfeld".
Peter Farrelly has written a novel entitled "Outside Providence" which
is currently being filmed starring Alec Baldwin.
Rob Moran, who plays the cop in this film, also played the millionaire
bowler in KINGPIN, and the bartender in DUMB AND DUMBER. He is old
friends with the Farrelly Brothers from College, and is currently
married to Entertainment Tonight anchor/correspondant Julie Moran.
Harland Williams, who plays the nutty hitchhiker in this film, also
played a state trooper in the Farrelly's earlier DUMB AND DUMBER, and
was the star of the unfortunate ROCKET MAN.


Title
Review for Monkeybone (2001)
For more reviews and movie trailers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
PLOT:
A cartoon artist falls into a coma and drifts into a nether world of
nightmares. In this place, the cartoonist meets the character that he
created, called Monkeybone, and attempts to return to the real world.
CRITIQUE:
Take one part annoying monkey, one part Brendan Fraser playing his "goofy"
character once again, one part cool nightmarish visuals and one part lame
story and you pretty much get the gist of this picture. But let's not forget
to mention Whoopie Goldberg as the character of "death" (or should I
say...the "kiss of death"? hehehe). Anyway, it all adds up to something
that's generally pretty interesting to look at, but ultimately unsatisfying
and a little schytzophrenic. One of the film's main problems seems to be
that it doesn't really know what it wants to be. Is it a movie for adults,
kids, a tear-jerker, romance, comedy...a little bit of everything? Probably
the latter, and trying to please everyone at the same time is generally not
the best way to create a solid picture. For me, the whole thing just seemed
a little off-kilter (and not necessarily the way in which they were trying
to achieve off-kilterness). The first half of the film didn't particularly
reserve any laughs for me or anything, but did display many an eye-catching
item in the "nightmare" world (oh yeah, and Rose McGowan, too...growl!). But
the second half of the film moved away from all that, and tried to slip some
romance and broad comedy bits in there, and despite some of it being
somewhat amusing, the general nature of it was pretty hum-drum.
And ironically, one of the last scenes from the movie featured one of the
worst blue screen effects that I've seen in any film for some time. How is
that even possible? It's almost as if they ran out of ideas or money in the
second half, and relied more on Fraser's over-the-top monkey acting and
Fonda's tears to keep things going (and I'm not insulting him here,
dudes...he's supposed to act like a monkey!). Granted, Chris Kattan was
really funny during his few moments on-screen (think D'Onofrio from MEN IN
BLACK), but the overall product was just too confused and unsubstantial.
It's especially sad when you consider that the movie does obviously have an
original concept, a great visual style and a pretty cool soundtrack, but the
characters aren't very developed and the story rather thin, so you really
aren't left with much to chew on. Of course, if you like to smoke the cheeba
and watch this kinda stuff, this might just be the movie for you, or even if
you just wanna see one of the coolest rollercoaster rides in any movie, but
for most, this picture will likely not entertain. An altogether dark movie
or a lighter, fluffier all-out comedy might've worked, but as the film
stands now, it's just too diluted to be appreciated by anyone.
Where's JoBlo coming from?
The Cell (8/10) - Edward Scissorhands (10/10) - Men in Black (7/10) -
Nightmare before X-Mas (10/10) - South Park (9/10)

Title
Review for Life (1999)
For more reviews and movie trivia, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Two of my personal favorite funnymen, Eddie Murphy and Martin Lawrence, join
together in a prison comedy that starts out in the 1930s and moves its way
into the 1990s, with plenty of foul language and makeup for its stars. The
duo was last teamed up in 1992's BOOMERANG.
PLOT:
Two innocent black men get sentenced to life in the South, after they are
found hovering over a dead man's body. All of their time in jail is spent
trying to get out, and attempting to be funny.
CRITIQUE:
A disappointing film for the two main stars, this movie offers a few
chuckles here and there, no laugh out loud scenes, a lot of retreading
scenarios involving prisoners trying to escape, rape one another, and ending
up in "the hole", alongside an unimaginative plot and a cast of unbelievably
wholesome jailbirds. I kept waiting for this film to "break out" in one
scene or another, but it never really did. In fact, it actually went the
other way, and decided to add a few touching scenes near the end, just to
let us know that "Hey folks, jail isn't all that funny in real life!". Yeah,
well...whatever. Note to Eddie Murphy: Enough of the prosthetics,
dude...stop hiding behind all of that make-up and start choosing some
scripts that truly bring out your innate humor.
Much like the rest of the night's audience, I still could not resist
chuckling along to Murphy and Lawrence's foul mouths (especially when they
were in their old men makeup), but obviously, you do not base a complete
comedy on stars talking about "mutherf**ker this" and "mutherf**ker" that! I
couldn't have cared less about the characters or the story line, and most
certainly would not recommend this film to anyone looking for interesting
characters, an interesting story line or an original idea. Even the final
scene was contrived and unbelievable, just for the sake of the conclusion.
My gut instinct always tells me to stay away from comedies whose trailers do
not even make me crack a smile. This film's trailer had me wondering if it
was even a drama or not, so I guess my sixth sense came through on this one.
Having said that, if you actually do find the film's teaser to be appealing,
and really love Murphy or Lawrence, you may just want to catch this
movie...on video. All in all, this life sucks.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Look closely, because the "bad guy" in this movie, Spanky Johnson, is played
by none other than musician Rick James himself. That's right, the man who
sang "Super Freak"!
Martin Lawrence was born in Frankfurt, Germany and received $8,500,000 for
his role in this film.
The man who plays Sgt. Dillard in this film is Nick Casssavetes. You may
remember him from his role in John Woo's FACE/OFF (8.5/10), in which he
played a drug dealer. He is also a director in his own right, having filmed
UNHOOK THE STARS (7/10) and SHE'S SO LOVELY (5/10).
The two screenwriters' (Robert Ramsey and Matthew Stone ) last collaboration
was the ill-fated DESTINY TURNS ON THE RADIO. The idea for this film was
actually Eddie Murphy's.
In case you're wondering where you've seen the actor who plays the character
of "Can't Get Right" in this movie. His name is Bokeem Woodbine, and he
recently starred opposite Mark Wahlberg and Lou Diamond Phillips in THE BIG
HIT (6.5/10).
The hooker with the big breasts in this film is the ever-popular Lisa Nicole
Carson, currently presenting her acting chops on TV's "ER" and "Ally
McBeal".
Actress Poppy Montgomery's middle name is Petal (She played the pretty,
white girl in this film.) In real life, her four sisters are also all named
after flowers: Rosie Thorn, Daisy Yellow, Lily Belle and Marigold Sun.

Title
Review for Shaft (2000)
For more reviews and movie wallpapers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
This film is not a remake of the original 1971 film starring Richard
Roundtree as the baddest mutha on the streets of New York, but an update,
starring the ultimate cool man, Sam Jackson, as the nephew of the original
Shaft character. By now, I think we've all heard the reports about director
Singleton messing around with the extras on the set and playing loud music
(how about lightening up a little, Mr. Rudin...the man knows how to enjoy
life, give him a break!), and the supposed rifts between Jackson and the
director, with everyone and their uncle having an opinion on the script. But
all that aside, the real question is...does the film entertain? Simply
put...f**kin' aye!
PLOT:
Detective John Shaft quits the police force after the system fails to put
away a rich, white boy who committed a racially motivated murder. He decides
to take the law into his own hands, roaming the streets of the city in
search of his own brand of justice.
CRITIQUE:
Is this a "bad" movie? You bet it is! "Bad" in the good sense, of course.
Take a hip character, a decent story line, a bit of violence, a bit of
action, an awesome score and some great performances from Wright, Bale and
the bad mutha himself, Sam Jackson, and enjoy this film as the gritty urban
crime drama that it is. I just loved the whole mood of this flick, with its
dark city shadows, its cool scene transitions, and its rapid pace, all of
which switched my gear to "fun" about two minutes in. In fact, about halfway
through the movie, I was already looking forward to sequels from the man,
which would definitely be a welcome addition to the sorry ass state of black
heroes in Hollywood today. Let's get Shaft to fly to Europe and kick some
French ass or something! The possibilities are endless. And who better than
Mr. Samuel L. Jackson in the lead role? Wow. If there ever was a role made
for anyone, it is the role of Shaft made for Jackson. The wicked fu-manchu
mustache, the slick clothes, the whole black Dirty Harry attitude, all
seemed to fit Jackson like a tight, leather glove. In fact, it is his
charismatic performance, along with those from Bale and Wright, which
actually take this movie a couple of notches above its standard TV cop drama
plot line.
Don't get me wrong, the story was actually pretty interesting, but not
really anything to get worked up about. In fact, there were even a couple of
plot holes which I let slide because of the whole kickass attitude of the
film itself. I gotta give it to Singleton, who seemed to have been slacking
according to crappy media reports from the set, he managed to create a fun,
quick-paced film here, although more reminiscent of last year's PAYBACK than
the original SHAFT film. In fact, like most everyone who saw this flick, I
was quite disappointed with the lack of girl-play for Shaft, and certainly
would've appreciated more sexual innuendo and even more profanity. I mean,
this is Shaft for God's sakes...the baddest mutha on the streets! Let him
loose! But those are just little qualms within the bigger picture which
truly did keep me entertained throughout. In fact, the performance from
Jeffrey Wright alone is worth the price of admission. He pulls off one of
the most over-the-top Tony Montana impressions since Pacino ate it up
himself in 1983's SCARFACE. In fact, his character makes the Benicio Del
Toro character from THE USUAL SUSPECTS actually sound coherent.
All in all, a fun reincarnation of a classic blaxploitation film whose
funky, slick score is as big a part of the movie as the action itself. Now,
shut yer mouth and go see this movie!
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Some of Samuel L. Jackson's earlier film roles include "Gang Member No. 2"
in 1981's RAGTIME, the "black guy" in SEA OF LOVE (ironically, the
screenwriter of this film, Richard Price, also wrote that film), and "Stax
Edwards" in the classic Scorsese mob drama GOODFELLAS. His breakthrough role
came right after his kicked his own drug habit, when he starred as a
strung-out dope fiend in Spike Lee's 1991 movie JUNGLE FEVER.
Richard Roundtree, who played Shaft in the original 70s movies, returns as
Uncle John in this film. The original SHAFT film was followed up with two
sequels: SHAFT'S BIG SCORE and SHAFT IN AFRICA. There was also a short-lived
1973-74 TV series featuring Roundtree in a tamer incarnation.
The man behind the hippest score of the year, Isaac Hayes, is the same man
who did the score in the original film, and is better known nowadays as the
voice of Chef in TV's "South Park". He also performed the song "Chocolate
Salty Balls" on the 1999 South Park album.
All the cool clothes worn by Samuel L. Jackson in this picture were provided
for by a little stylish company named Giorgio Armani.
This film was originally titled SHAFT RETURNS.

Title
Review for Chill Factor (1999)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
I heard actor Skeet Ulrich discussing this film in a couple of interviews,
and in both instances, he felt the strange compulsion to compare it a little
series of films called LETHAL WEAPON. Now, I personally remember those films
as A) starring a major motion picture star B) being funny C) having great
action sequences D) great chemistry E) decent character development.
Hmmm....okay...now on to my review of CHILL FACTOR.
PLOT:
A graveyard shift regular working Joe and ice cream truck driver fall onto a
malicious plan by an ex-Army general, to propose a nuclear device to
international prospects. When the device suddenly falls into their reluctant
laps, they must keep it cool on ice, and rush it over to an Army base,
before the contraption ticks over 50 degrees Fahrenheit, and kills millions
of people.
CRITIQUE:
"SPEED on an ice-cream truck" is probably the pitch that was used to sell
this one-tone movie to its backers, but unfortunately, the only way that
anyone could compare this film to that tension-filled, original two hours of
cinema, is in its distinct honor of being the complete opposite of what that
film, and the LETHAL WEAPON movies, stood for. This film is seasoned in
cliches, with plenty of badly written dialogue, over the top acting from
Cuba Gooding Jr., zero chemistry between the two leads, and horribly tacky
bad guys, tossed in to complete an overall bad movie recipe. My friend and I
enjoyed watching this movie to a certain extent, because some of the lines
in it were so bad and obviously "written", that we just had to crack up.
That, and the formula for the film's script which followed the proverbial
1-2-, and you guessed it...3 scenario! And what about all those catchy, hip
names to get us to relate to the characters...."Elvis" and "Nighshift", oh
what talent lies in the minds of these screenwriters (And yes, it actually
took two guys to come up with this regurgitated drivel).
It is unfathomable to me as to how actors Skeet Ulrich and Cuba Gooding Jr.
got involved in this one-week-old-blue-cheese-smelling project. Did they
actually think that it would boost their careers, or did they know that the
script sucked, but discounted any fall from grace, knowing full well that
the stack of cash in their back pockets would pad their fall? Most probably
the latter. Have you seen either FLED or  BULLETPROOF? Well, despite the
slight differences in plot, the essentials are basically the same here. You
get a black guy and a white guy being chased by a bunch of people, having no
choice but to work together to get somewhere, hating each other at first,
but over time, learning to respect one another as individuals. Yawn. Add to
that, the fact that our film actually has bad guys who are all dressed in
black, drive black cars and black vans, and run around with all kinds of
telecommunicative devices sprinkled around their head. Not too conspicuous,
eh? Call me a party-pooper, but as much as I like a nice cheezy movie as
much as the next guy, this film just doesn't even try to do anything
original or reasonably entertaining. One cool scene with a boat careening
down a mountainside, and another with a nuclear device obliterating
everything on an island, do not a fun, buddy-action flick make.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
This is NOT a little known fact or anything, but damn, is it just me or does
Skeet Ulrich look an awful lot like great-looking actor Johnny Depp? Skeet's
real-life nicknames include Chester, Skeeter and Mosquito. He stands 6'1",
was born in North Carolina, and got married in 1997 to that sex-kitten
actress from CLAY PIGEONS (7.5/10), Georgina Cates. They own a farm together
in Virginia and seven dogs. Skeet has a long scar on his chest from
open-heart surgery done when he was 10 to correct a ventricle defect.
Actor Cuba Gooding Jr. was born in the Bronx, New York. In 1984, he
break-danced during the closing ceremonies of the Olympic Games in Los
Angeles. He stands 5'10".
Actress Hudson Leick, who plays one of the "bad guys/girls" in his movie, is
better known from her role as "Callisto" on the popular TV series "Xena:
Princess Warrior".
This film reportedly had a budget of $40 million?? I'm not exactly sure
where all this money went, but it certainly did not register onscreen.
Interestingly enough, director Hugh Johnson, who makes his big screen debut
with this film, was the cinematographer on the 1996 film WHITE SQUALL and
the 1997 Demi Moore vehicle, G.I. JANE (6.5/10).

Title
Review for Shining, The (1980)
For more reviews and movie trivia, go to http://surf.to/joblo/
Terrifyingly, amazing achievement in filmmaking and the art of terror,
this movie classic graces us with one of director Stanley Kubrick's
sporatic directing gigs, only 5 years after his last acclaimed feature,
BARRY LYNDON, and 10 before his timely masterpiece CLOCKWORK ORANGE
(9/10). This movie is based on author Stephen King's best-selling novel
of the same name, and stars the always-interesting Jack Nicholson.
PLOT:
A nice man, his wife and young boy, take on the task of overlooking a
winter resort during its off season. The nice man is there for peace
and quiet, as his profession as a writer requires just that. The boy
has a special skill called "the shine" which allows him to hear and see
things that others cannot. As their time in the grand hotel ticks away,
the mansion begins to exude thoughts of the past and chills of the
present. In time, the nice man transforms into a "not-so-nice" man, and
begins to terrify his own flesh and blood.
CRITIQUE:
Chilling, majestic piece of cinematic fright, this film combines all
the great elements of an intellectual thriller, with the grand vision
of a director who has the instinctual capacity to pace a moody horror
flick within the realm of his filmmaking genius that includes an eye
for the original shot, an ice-cold soundtrack and an overall sense of
dehumanization. This movie cuts through all the typical horror movies
like a red-poker through a human eye, as it allows the viewer to not
only feel the violence and psychosis of its protagonist, but appreciate
the seed from which the derangement stems. One of the scariest things
for people to face is the unknown and this film presents its plotting
with just that thought in mind. The setting is perfect, in a desolate
winter hideaway. The quietness of the moment is a character in itself,
as the fermenting aggressor in Jack Torrance's mind wallows in this
idle time, and breeds the devil's new playground. I always felt like
the presence of evil was dormant in all of our minds, with only the
circumstances of the moment, and the reasons given therein, needed to
wake its violent ass and pounce over its unsuspecting victims. This
film is a perfect example of this very thought.
And it is within this film's subtle touches of the canvas, the
clackity-clacks of the young boy's big wheel riding along the empty
hallways of the hotel, the labyrinthian garden representing the mind's
fine line between sane and insane, Kubrick's purposely transfixed
editing inconsistencies, continuity errors and set mis-arrangements,
that we discover a world guided by the righteous and tangible, but
coaxed away by the powerful and unknown. I have never read the book
upon which the film is based, but without that as a comparison point, I
am proud to say that this is one of the most terrifying films that I
have ever seen. I thought that the runtime of the film could've been
cut by a little bit, but then again, I am not one of the most acclaimed
directors in the history of film, so maybe I should keep my two-cent
criticisms over a superb film, to myself. All in all, this movie
captures your attention with its grand form and vision, ropes you in
with some terror and eccentric direction, and ties you down and stabs
you in the heart with its cold-eyed view of the man's mind gone
overboard, creepy atmosphere and the loss of humanity. 
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Jack Nicholson has been recorded as having really "lost it" during
several filming scenes of this movie, as Kubrick's meticulously
over-precise filming manner, apparently led to many takes (he demanded
127 takes from Shelley Duvall in one particular scene) and plenty of
mind games. Jack apparently had to be physically restrained after one
particularly famous scene, in which he was chopping into a door with an
axe. Nicholson apparently ad-libbed the now-infamous line "Here's
Johnny!" 
Jack Nicholson has also been quoted as saying about Kubrick: ""He gives
a new meaning to the word meticulous". Kubrick apparently had Nicholson
do fifty takes of a scene where he "simply" walks across the street.
Author Stephen King was known to have disliked Kubrick's version of his
novel, to the point where he himself decided to write a 6-hour
made-for-TV version of it in 1997, starring Stephen Webber, of TV's
"Wings" sitcom. King was never allowed to publicly denounce Kubrick's
interpretation of his work, due to contractual clauses, but his version
didn't fare much better with critics either.
During the making of this movie, director Kubrick was known to have
called author Stephen King up at 3am and ask him questions like "Do you
believe in God?"
Background on film: Stanley Kubrick had a large stack of books that he
was looking through to find a movie project. For a couple of hours, his
secretary could hear him pick up a book, read it for about a minute,
and then hurl it into the wall. She then noticed that this hadn't
happened in a while, so she went in to check on him, and found him
reading Stephen King's "The Shining". King says that this is really
strange, because the start of the book is very slow, and doesn't have
much to do with the rest of the story.
A fun site that some of you may want to visit, is the Ultimate Simpsons
Stanley Kubrick Reference Archive at
http://www.nh.ultranet.com/~mcollier/kubrick.html The many writers on
TV's "The Simpsons" apparently follow and admire many of Mr. Kubrick
greatest cinematic works. 
And is "The TITANIC an homage to THE SHINING?" Go to
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Theater/3181/titanic.html to find
out.
Timberline Lodge on Mt. Hood in Oregon, which was used for the exterior
shots of this film (but not the interiors, which were all specially
built), doesn't actually have the infamous "Room 237" from the movie,
as the lodge owners' specifically requested the number 217 used in the
book be changed to a nonexistent room number.

Title
Review for Bone Collector, The (1999)
For more reviews and movie trivia, visit http://www.joblo.com/
The Montreal Film Festival is where I happened to catch the premiere of this
film last night. I got kinda lucky because producer Martin Bregman, director
Phillip Noyce, and the main man himself, Denzel Washington sat in the crowd
alongside the rest of us. I got even luckier when it turned out that the
film was not just another rehashed serial killer thriller, but a rather
effective moody/creepy murder mystery, starring a couple of New York City
forensics experts.
PLOT:
An expert in the field of crime scene forensics suddenly becomes a
paraplegic after a horrible on-the-job accident. Four years later, a serial
killer is on the loose, and our top cop suddenly develops a high interest in
the mysterious case. Seeing that he cannot go to the crime scenes himself,
he recruits the help of a young forensics hopeful, enter Angelina Jolie.
Together, they attempt to piece together all of the clues in the puzzle,
which once resolved, will nab them a killer.
CRITIQUE:
Fantastic style, this film spices itself up with some great shots, unique
points-of-view angles, an effective chilling mood, and some excellent
performances put forth by Denzel Washington and Angelina Jolie. I must admit
that ever since the plethora of "serial killer" films that came flying out
after the great success of SEVEN (9/10), I have become harsher and harsher
in respect to my criticism of these movies. This film passed my test with
flying colors, because it managed to pull me into its game of thrills, with
an interesting mystery, some pretty gruesome murder scenes, an engaging
score and a nice build-up. Originality in the film's actual premise might
not be its strong suit (A serial killer is on the loose...leaving plenty of
cryptic clues...let's find him!), but the chemistry between Jolie and
Washington make this film much more interesting and captivating to watch.
I also enjoyed a couple of the sidebar performances by Queen Latifah (Don't
laugh, she's pretty good in it) and Ed O'Neill (Al Bundy to some of you), in
particular. I could have done without Michael Rooker playing the badass cop
role. Michael should really start looking into stretching his talent across
some characters which aren't bordering on the psychotic. Another thing that
I didn't fully appreciate about this film, was the fact that the killer
would purposely leave clues at each of the crime scenes. This function was
to allow his pursuants a better "chance" of identifying the person, but only
if they pieced together a bunch of far-fetched parts of a grand puzzle,
which in my opinion, seemed a little extravagant. Having said that, this
minor detriment to my enjoyment of the story didn't really seem to bother me
as much as I thought it would. And for that, I praise the director's unique
vision, the actors' wonderful performances, and the film's creepy feel,
which in combination allowed for an entertaining film to unfold. And despite
the obvious commonality to Hitchcock's REAR WINDOW (Both protagonists are
incapacitated during the entire film), I did find myself feeling like I was
watching a 90s version of a Hitchcock movie at times.
If you love murder mysteries, you will most likely love this movie,
especially if you don't mind gory crime scenes, gruesome details about
horrendous murders, and loved SEVEN and SILENCE OF THE LAMBS. And watch for
this one very cool camera shot which begins on the downtown streets of New
York, and pulls back real quick and up and into the room where Denzel spends
all of his time in this film. Very slick!
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Did you know that Denzel Washington played Dr. Chandler on NBC's TV medical
series "St-Elsewhere" for about six years beginning in 1982?? I sure didn't!
He has four children with his wife of close to twenty years, Pauletta. He
has also learned to develop a much tighter private life, after he uttered a
few regrettable words during a 1993 TV interview with Barbara Walters,
"Being a star and all of that, temptation is all around, it's all around,
you know, and I haven't been perfect. I'll be quite candid about it."
Angelina Jolie's full name is Angelina Jolie Voight. She is the daughter of
famed actor Jon Voight. "Jolie" means "pretty" in French. Angelina has also
appeared in several music videos, including such artists as Meatloaf, Lenny
Kravitz, Antonello Venditti and The Lemonheads
Queen Latifah's real name is Dana Owens. She was born in Newark, New Jersey,
and also has a musical career as a rapper. Her older brother Lance Owens,
who was a police officer, died in an accident on the motorcycle that Queen
Latifah had bought for him as a present. She still wears the motorcycle key
around her neck.
Actor Michael Rooker studied the Japanese martial art of Akido before ever
establishing himself in Chicago theatre.
Director Phillip Noyce makes a small cameo appearance in this film. Watch
for him standing inside the library when Angelina Jolie's character makes
her trip there. He is standing upright and reading a book. Tall drink of
water, he is. He is originally from Australia.
And if you didn't think this film reminded you of SEVEN enough, director
Noyce has also brought a member of that cast along for this ride as well.
Actor Leland Orser, who plays the "crazed man in the massage parlour" in the
earlier film, returns as a good buddy of Denzel's in this film.
Actor Ed O'Neill is best known for his years of service as the idiot father
in the popular FOX sitcom, "Married with Children". What less people know
about him is that he once tried out, but was cut by the NFL's Pittsburgh
Steelers. He also made his uncredited feature film debut in the 1972
classic, DELIVERANCE, starring Angelina Jolie's dad, Jon Voight. Ed played
the "highway patrolman".
Producer Martin Bregman has produced five of Al Pacino's movies including
SERPICO, DOG DAY AFTERNOON, SCARFACE, SEA OF LOVE and CARLITO'S WAY.
The original music in this film comes from two sources: Craig Armstrong, who
has composed music for a few other films, and Mitsou, a Quebec-based pop
singer, who receives her first movie composing credit with this film.
This film is based on the novel by the same title, written by Jeffrey
Deaver.
This film was shot in both Montreal, Canada and New York, New York.

Title
Review for Scream 2 (1997)
Successful follow-up to the ever-popular SCREAM (8/10) which
regenerated the horror genre back in 1996, and has since parlayed the
genre into a couple of lame copycats, and one other neat success with
I KNOW WHAT YOU DID LAST SUMMER (7.5/10). 
PLOT:
Sidney finds herself in college two years after all of the murders
went down in Woodsboro back in the original SCREAM. A movie called
"Stab", based on the events of the small town, as written in the book
by Gale Weathers, has also just come out, and sparked what appears to
be a "copycat killer" on the campus grounds. Who can this wacky person 
be? Scary stuff ensues.
CRITIQUE:
Some thrills. Some chills. But overall, just a basic scary movie that
does little to improve on the elements tiled down in the first, and
more effective, SCREAM. Ironically, one running theme in this film is
how movie sequels generally don't surpass their originals in regards
to quality, and SCREAM 2 is a perfect example of that well-founded
theory. Mind you, this is not a bad film by any stretch of the
imagination (some pretty neat murders, and another pretty decent "who
donnit?" premise), but it just doesn't live up to the first. 
Having said that, I think that this statement has less to do with the
actual content and quality of this picture, and more with the
sensitized nature of its audience during this second time a go-go. I
guess we all just need something a little more spectacular to impress
us, now that this genre is back "in" again (And while the addition of
every other Joe and Mary "young, hip Hollywood" actor might bring in
some box-office bucks for the first and second weeks of release, it
sure does little to impress us once they (on the most part) waste
their jolly time on the big screen.) 
The acting was fair in this picture, but I saw the Campbell character
as a little too nerve-wrecked for my taste. The film references by
writer Williamson were extremely well-sprinkled, and enjoyed mucho by
yours truly (For the record, I definitely agree with the man's theory
about ALIENS (8/10) being a much better film than its predecessor,
ALIEN (7/10)). Also, I liked the fact that most of the African-American
characters in this film seemed to be much wiser to the whole carnage
scenario, as opposed to most Hollywood pictures, in which there
always seems to be a convenient "murder seat" reserved for the token
black characters. The cameraman in this movie was especially funny and
enjoyable.
Another thing that really didn't compare to the first movie was its
ending. I was thoroughly surprised and amazed by the ending of the
original SCREAM, as opposed to this one, which just left me kind of
shrugging my shoulders in indifference. Also, even though I am
reviewing this movie as a person who has already seen and thoroughly
enjoyed the first movie, I thought it might be harder for those
non-original SCREAM viewers, to fully comprehend the many references
to the first film. Oh well. 'Tis life in the big city, I suppose.
Overall, I guess this flic is a good scary movie for a long, dark,
lonely old night with your loved-nacho by your side. But for your
complete enjoyment faculties to truly savour all the delicacies in this
decent spook-fest, I suggest you rent the original before popping this
pepper into your VCR, and then of course... don't forget to scream !!!
Little Known Facts: 
SCREAM AGAIN and SCREAM LOUDER were two titles that were also
considered for this sequel's title.
Neve Campbell won the 1997 MTV Movie Award for Best Female
Performance for her role in this film.
Jerry O'Connell played the fat kid in STAND BY ME (7.5/10), who
majorly puked over the audience during a pie-eating contest. After that
movie, Jerry went back to school, and did not become a full-time actor
until he graduated from NYU with a degree in film and television.

Title
Review for Brothers, The (2001/I)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
PLOT:
Four young, successful, black professionals are closing in on the big "30"
and contemplating the direction of their respective love lives.
CRITIQUE:
Yet another early year puff piece which doesn't try to innovate, give us
anything new or blow us away with anything out of the ordinary. In other
words, check it out on video, if interested. This movie's got a few laughs,
one or two clever lines here and there, but mostly just the same ol', same
ol'. In fact, now that I look back at the film, I can't remember anything
especially distinct or interesting about it. And that's despite the fact
that I could relate entirely to all of the lead characters' issues in the
film, seeing as I'm going through most of the exact same things right now.
But the story just didn't do much for me. It's basically just a bunch of
scenes spliced together to make "a movie". Some mediocre acting here and
there, some groovy tunes tossed all around and a few shots of sweet boot-ay,
but nothing to write to momma about. In fact, even though most of the lead
characters in the film are played pretty well by the boys who are "the
brothers", you simply don't get attached to any them because there are just
too many characters in the film as a whole. And seeing that the dramatic
scenes in the movie don't work as well as the comedic ones, with many of the
transitions feeling forced and awkward, you're essentially left with a film
which looks and feels like an okay comedy, but delivers one too many "corny"
moments as a drama. But I will give it up to the many jokes which did work
in this movie. D.L. Hughley's scenes alone cracked me up throughout,
especially the ones in which he and his wife went back and forth on
blowjobs. Now that was funny! But the development of their relationship, the
separation and their eventual resolution all felt kinda distant to me.
Mostly cause we just didn't get to know the characters all that well.
A perfect example of the film's unevenness is during one scenario in which
one character is shooting a gun into a house, and even though it's initially
treated as a joke, it's suddenly turned serious, and the whole thing just
feels "off". And the final resolutions for all "the brothers" are just
resolved too swiftly, like the screenplay couldn't go over a certain amount
of pages, and they needed to wrap them all up. Director Gary Hadwick has
dubbed this film "Refusing to Exhale", an obvious play on the very
successful drama "Waiting to Exhale", but I'm not sure that's entirely a
good thing (check out the similar posters too). This movie's got some nice
elements going for it, like Shemar Moore's awesome six-pack, many laughs
sprinkled throughout and a few clever insights. But unfortunately, all that
doesn't make up for the fact that the film basically covers a lot of the
stuff we've already seen a thousand times, the fact that the drama/comedy
balance is not played out well and the fact that the ending is wrapped up
too quickly. I certainly wouldn't tell you to stay away from this one on
home video, but even then, don't expect the messiah to come out of your TV
screen and change your life. A sub-par entry into the growing market of
black professional films, this one doesn't come across as a step up as much
as it does a simple step sideways.
Then again, I ain't really this film's target audience, so don't be afraid
to tell me to piss off, if this is your cup o' tea... ;) And hey, if you
wanna go see it just to google all over Shemar Moore and Morris Chestnut's
rippin' abs, don't let me stop you. In fact, both muscular regions scored
very high in my books. Damn, I wish I worked out more...
Where's JoBlo coming from?
The Bachelor (4/10) - Beautiful Girls (9/10) - The Best Man (8/10) - High
Fidelity (7/10) - Save the Last Dance (7/10) - Very Bad Things (8/10) -
Whipped (7/10) - Your Friends and Neighbors (4/10)

Title
Review for Watcher, The (2000)
For more reviews, screensavers, trailers & more, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Hmmmm...seems like a couple of strange career moves on the part of Keanu
Reeves. One summer after starring in one of the freshest new films of the
past few years, THE MATRIX, Keanu returns with two very humdrum roles in two
very humdrum movies. I mention this only because even before THE MATRIX,
Keanu generally seemed to be choosing scripts that were a little "skewed",
if you know what I mean. But much like their titles, THE REPLACEMENTS and
THE WATCHER have both proven themselves to be two very generic films. Maybe
he's just saving himself up for those MATRIX sequels, eh?
PLOT:
Another nutty serial killer is on the loose. Another FBI agent is chasing
him down with no luck. That is until the serial killer decides to make a
game out of his killings and send pictures of his next victim to the agent
24 hours before he commits each murder. That way, the Feds have a whole day
to locate and save his next target.
CRITIQUE:
A serviceable serial killer thriller that actually improves as it moves
along but ultimately can't escape the pool of basic contrivances in which it
wades. The movie starts a little slow, establishing a sorted background on
both the killer and the agent bent on apprehending him early on, but does so
with a particularly annoying overemphasis on style, in my opinion. The
director takes slo-mo and strobe effects to a new level here and doesn't
really add much to the film with either effect. In fact, I found most of his
"stylish" endeavors to be quite distracting and would have rather seen a
more straightforward approach to the movie. The "Reeves" factor, with Keanu
taking a stab at the "bad guy" role, was actually much better than I
expected. We all have to admire Reeves for at least trying to stretch his
acting abilities with this part, but I suspect that his character would have
benefited greatly from a change of appearance from the typical "Keanu" look.
Don't get me wrong, overall I thought that he gave a pretty credible
performance, but at some point these super-star actors have to recognize
that their familiarity could well take away from their characters' full
potential. In this case, a goatee, a beard, bleached hair or anything
different might've added that little "something" to his overall performance.
But enough about Keanu.
The story of this film is pretty standard in the serial killer genre. The
murderer who insists on giving his burnt out tracker clues with the hopes of
making a "game" out of his killing spree. I never really understood why they
do that, but whatever! The action is also pretty standard, with one basic
car chase but a surprisingly few decent moments of suspense. I also enjoyed
the background development on the James Spader character, despite the
overuse of flashbacks to do so, but didn't get enough out of the bad guy's
motivations. All we know is that he's nuts and likes to kill? Pretty weak.
But the film certainly doesn't suffer from any major plot holes, and does
give us a nice deliberation between the two men sometime near the end of the
film, with another solid performance from underrated actor James Spader. Now
I'm not exactly sure where Marisa Tomei was for the past few years or why
she chose to take this very bittie part after all that time, but for what
she had to do...I guess she was alright in the movie. Overall, like many of
this year's other films, this movie doesn't really bring anything fresh or
innovative to the genre, but does present us with an "okay" time for an hour
and a half.

Title
Review for Hanging Up (2000)
For more movie reviews and free screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Are you like me? Do you get annoyed seeing people talk on their cellulars in
public places, shouting out loud, not giving a ratt's ass about anyone
around them, and basically just wallowing in their own self-importance? Well
if you are, than you will most likely agree with my rating of this film
since it basically features a trio of annoying ladies bickering away on the
phone for an hour and a half...only to make up and hug in the end.
Aaaaaaaahhhh...
PLOT:
Three grown-up sisters living their own separate lives, begin to
re-establish their communication lines when their dear old dad falls ill.
CRITIQUE:
This would be a good movie if it wasn't for the fact that it's got very
little to say, features uncaring people sharing annoying phone
conversations, is chockfull of bad acting moments and provides less
emotional satisfaction than any third-rate after-school special. And I'm
being nice! How junk like this gets made is beyond me, but happy am I that
the Ephron sisters will finally be dealt a professional blow, considering
the regurgitation level of their material had just about reached its limit.
The only true emotional moment demonstrated between Meg Ryan's character and
her dad in this film is when he hugs her and swings her around at a
Christmas tree lot. Wow...how deep. Of course, the same Christmas tune
that's played in every Ephron flick chimes out in the background, while
characters continue to build "bonds" among one another by making reference
to old, quaint movies or movie stars. Stop me...I'm gonna cry again! This
film is a mess. The characters are boring and irritating to watch, the plot
has something to do with three selfish sisters talking on the phone a whole
lot, kind of liking their father (but not really) and then finally realizing
the error of their ways, while sharing an "emotional" moment about movie
stars from the 50s.
Admittedly, I was not expecting much from a film whose television trailer
features Meg Ryan screaming every two seconds and a big dog rolling its
eyes, but even I was surprised at the level of ineptitude when it came to
some of the acting efforts put forth in this film. Meg did fine as the
sister who cries a lot, looking as adorable as ever, but someone please put
Lisa Kudrow inside a permanent home of limited range, cause this woman
basically IS that very same character that she plays in every single
movie/TV show that she's in. Enough already! And Diane Keaton must've spent
more time thinking about her role behind the camera in this one, cause her
acting was amateurish at best. Neither one convinced in "emotional" scenes.
Granted, they gave Walter Matthau the best lines in the film and that's
probably where my rating of three points comes from. All in all, this movie
is not funny (unless you're one to chuckle at train wrecks), provides zero
drama (unless you consider loud phone conversations moving), generates
absolutely no emotion (although I did tear up when Meg hugged a coffee
machine) and ends on a perfectly pretentious note ("Oh no, please don't get
any flour on my Donna Karan dress!). Ugh.
I suggest that all ladies take their husbands/boyfriends to see this movie
if they are pissed off at them about something! That'll teach 'em to mess
with you! Oh and incidentally, Mrs. JoBlo also likened this movie to a piece
of cow dung flailing in the wind, so there! Then again...maybe you'll like
it. : )

Title
Review for Drowning Mona (2000)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Don't let the ads fool ya, folks...the main star of this movie is none other
than Ben Affleck's baby brother, Casey. Sure Jamie Lee Curtis' big boobs
look good bouncing up and down in the trailer, of course Neve Campbell and
Bette Midler will bring in their respective demographics, and surely the
inclusion of ol' faithful, Danny DeVito, will bring to mind many other
funnier comedies of which he's been a part. But the one character that
really drives the story is little ole Casey, and I for one, enjoyed his
performance...and his cute, little teeth! Oh, and the movie you say?
PLOT:
Mona Dearly is a woman hated by practically everyone in this quaint, little
hick town. Fortunately for everyone, she dies in a car accident early on in
this film...well actually, t'was no accident...Mona's brakes were tampered
with. Unfortunately for everyone, the local police are on the hunt for the
murderer, with no less than everyone in town targeted as a suspect.
CRITIQUE:
A fun, diverse cast, some solid laughs, many other chuckles and smiles don't
take away from the fact that this movie lacks the consistent humor to
sustain a crowd filled with angry, young whippersnappers looking for an
all-out comedy fest. The movie starts off strong with plenty of successful
jokes, a bevy of colorful characters (most of whom just act dumb and goofy)
and a cool premise which rapidly establishes the murder mystery as the
film's prime source of business. But ultimately the film doesn't gather much
steam, lulls from point to point, and basically just bounces around from one
decent joke to another lame one and then back again. So why am I still
recommending it? Well, the cast is quite a hoot with every member firmly
grinding their teeth into their backdoor roles, and some of the one-liners
were pure hilarity ("You snooze, you lose"). Well, you had to be there.
Actually, the film's great cast is one of the things that holds it back from
even greater success, since its 90 minute prescription is barely enough time
to truly get to know any of them real well. It felt like there was a lot of
potential in the cast, the premise and some of the jokes, but in the end,
the story and the laughs just seemed to come up a little short.
Danny DeVito was one of the standouts in the cast, playing an excellent
straight man in a town full of ninnies. Others in the cast weren't so lucky,
with Jamie Lee Curtis and Neve Campbell playing deadbeat parts that didn't
necessarily seem to require their specific talent. And despite her early
departure from the film, Bette Midler gives us some superb mean-spirited
shtuff via the consistent flashback sequences sprinkled across this movie.
And then there's Casey Affleck. Yes, Casey...not Ben. Here's a dude whose
probably best known for his dinky "friend" role in his brother's GOOD WILL
HUNTING movie, but here he is coming through as the nice, little, nave dude
with a heart. Of course, his bleach, blonde awful haircut helps him look
cute and innocent, but all the same, thumbs up for little brother. And last
but certainly not least, let's not forget to mention the pathetically funny
character portrayed by William Fichtner, who kicked mighty ass in last
year's GO as the cop with a penchant for homosexual innuendoes, and does
another credible job as the sad-sack, loser husband in this one. All in all,
the film might provide some of you with the type of entertainment that
you're looking in your night (some laughs, quick runtime, easy story), but
it could also disappoint many others. I would offer a stronger
recommendation for viewing this film on video, or simply advise you to lower
your expectations for this movie, and try to enjoy it for all of its
smaller, better points which include a solid cast, plenty of laughs that do
work, and well...the fact that Bette Midler is killed in it! Happy now?
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Actor William Fichtner only got his first role in the movies in 1992, when
he played a cop in Spike Lee's MALCOLM X. His next role only came about in
1994, when he portrayed a stage manager in QUIZ SHOW. Since that time, his
movie roster has been much more active, including turns in STRANGE DAYS,
HEAT, CONTACT and ARMAGEDDON. He began his career as a soap opera actor
starring in AS THE WORLD TURNS for about six years (1987-1993).
Actor Marcus Thomas, who plays Bette Midler's idiot son Jeff in this movie,
was born in Brussels and raised in Switzerland. He moved to America in 1992
and attended the prestigious Strasberg Institute for a year. This film is
his first big break.
This film is writer Peter Steinfeld's (no relation to Jerry Seinfeld...hehe)
first produced movie screenplay.
In order to purchase the required dozen or so Yugo cars for the filming of
this movie, the producers had to actually do a search on the Internet to
find dealers that still sold the models. They were lucky enough to find two
who actually still had them-one in New York and the other in Denver. Living
up to their reputations as the lemon of the automotive industry, the cars
needed their own set of handlers to tune prior to each scene.
Danny DeVito isn't merely one of the stars of this movie, he is also one of
its executive producers. This is the third acting collaboration between
Bette Midler and himself, who previously starred together in RUTHLESS
PEOPLE, a film in which they only shared one scene (just like this movie),
and GET SHORTY, a film which never showed them on the screen at the same
time.

Title
Review for Road to El Dorado, The (2000)
For more reviews and movie news, visit http://www.joblo.com/
PLOT:
A map leading to the city of gold is what ignites two con men buddies in
their quest to find El Dorado. Once discovered, the duo are thought to be
Gods by the locals, and must keep up the ruse until they figure out a way to
get the gold, and themselves, back to Spain.
CRITIQUE:
I enjoyed it. I didn't go nuts over it...I didn't hate it...in fact, I don't
particularly remember any grand sequences from it...but all in all, I
enjoyed it while I was there, and I suppose that's the most important thing.
The two leads were actually very amusing, with much of their repartee
striking my own fancy on more than one occasion. The rest of the cast,
including Rosie Perez as the very shapely Chel, were also pretty good, but
no standouts a la Mushu from MULAN (7.5/10) or the Genie from ALADDIN. Of
course, the best animation films always feature the greatest "bad guys" and
despite this one teasing us with one very mean-looking son-of-em-bitch early
on in the flick, the main baddie ultimately oozed very little threat, so on
that front the film could be faulted slightly. Action-wise, the movie
generated a couple of cool puffball sequences early on, one big ass blowout
scene during its last few minutes, and generally managed to keep me
entertained throughout.
Were the songs any good, you ask? Well, personally I have never been a huge
fan of films which rely solely on their songs to do the talking for them,
but thankfully for this film, that wasn't the case. Sure there were a couple
of musical montages here and there, all to be expected, but all in all,
nothing over-the-top or crappy either. I do think that Elton John/Phil
Collins should put a cork in their animation song-writing schedules from now
on, since their voices generally propel my attention away from these films,
but then again, maybe that's just me! If you're gonna put songs in a film,
how 'bout having the characters and their voices sing 'em and forget these
over-the-hill Englishmen (no offense, gentlemen :). I did really love the
whole look of this movie with its magnificent array of color strokes lining
every frame just right, the city of gold exuding its powerful odors of
paradise and the characters all emitting a strong sense of personality.
Overall, I would suggest this film to all kids and certainly to most adults
who like these kinds of movies. Mind you...it's no FIGHT CLUB! :)

Title
Review for Double Jeopardy (1999)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Okay, so you've all read my plot point by plot point "prediction" before I
went to see this movie (If you didn't, see the bottom of this review), which
I basically compiled to bring attention to the fact that the marketing on
this film, was one of the worst that I have ever seen! A trailer is supposed
to entice a viewer to want to see a movie, it is not supposed to give away
every single meaningful plot point! Having said that, I still went to see
this film, and confirmed the fact that I would have enjoyed it much more,
were I not to have seen their crummy giveaway trailer.
PLOT:
Woman gets convicted of killing her husband and spends six years in jail.
While in prison, this woman finds out that her husband is still alive and
well, and living under an assumed name with her son. Once out of prison,
this woman makes it her mission in life to find her "dead" husband and get
her son back. Double jeopardy refers to the fact that one cannot be tried
for the same murder twice, so in her case, she could now kill her husband
and get away with it.
CRITIQUE:
A "video movie" is a film which doesn't have enough oomph to recommend as a
"going out of the house and to a theater night", but can suffice as a lazy
evening of lounging around in the apartment. This film is exactly that type
of film. It offers very little thrills for a thriller, close to zero
suspense, considering that everything is already given away in the
stupid-ass trailer, and a couple of bogus action scenes. It did however
supply us with an Ashley Judd in her acting best, Tommy Lee Jones in his
acting the same, and an extremely interesting premise, which had many women
foaming at the mouth (Count Mrs. JoBlo as a guily party). Another good thing
about this film was the pacing which was pretty fast. Considering that a lot
of stuff actually does transpire, we are thankfully led through many of the
basic scenes at a rapid pace, in order to get to the meat of the story,
which basically has Judd chasing her "dead" husband.
The biggest problem with this film is that it offers very little in
excitement and more importantly, very little in surprises or thrills. There
were also a few plot holes here and there, which I can generally forgive in
cheezy thrillers, and certain implausibilities, but all in all, they didn't
really gnaw at me as much as the fact that I definitely would have enjoyed
this film so much more, had I not seen Paramount's inane movie trailer. I am
still recommending this film because on that level, and the level I speak of
concerns cheese and lazy Sunday afternoons and videotapes, it can be deemed
as an enjoyable trip through known territory. For others, you may want to
see this flick because Ashley Judd is in it, and she is damn cute and a fine
little actress in her own right. As for the rest of you, who don't
appreciate camp, hate the Judds and hate thrillers which don't offer you
many thrills, I suggest you skip this turkey and go rent another small, yet
effective, Tommy Lee Jones thriller called THE FUGITIVE (8/10).
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
In reality, the legal theory of "double jeopardy" DOES NOT exist. According
to Harvard Law School professor, and infamous member of O.J. Simpson legal
"dream team", Alan Dershowitz, "The crime is killing a person at a certain
time and place, and if she killed him at a different time or place, it would
be a different crime" (Entertainment Weekly, Sept. 24, 1999). Wow...that
sucks.
As many of you may already know, Ashley Judd's sister and mom are the
country singers known as The Judds. Ashley has also made quite a reputation
of dating celebrities including actors Robert DeNiro and Matthew
McConaughey, and singing has-been, Michael Bolton.
Here's another fact which I think most people know by now, but if you
didn't, then know full well that actor Tommy Lee Jones once roomed with
Vice-President Al Gore during his College days at Harvard, and has never
taken an acting class. In 1994, he co-starred with Ashley Judd in another
picture called NATURAL BORN KILLERS (8/10), but unfortunately for the Judd,
her court room scenes were left on the cutting room floor.
Much of this film was shot in British Columbia, Canada, which may explain
the presence of Canadian actor Bruce Greenwood in one of the main roles.
Bruce is born in the province of Quebec, Canada.
Director Bruce Beresford is born in Australia and once directed an Oscar
winning picture called DRIVING MISS DAISY in 1989.
Here is my plot point by plot point prediction which I made BEFORE seeing
this film, just by checking out the film's trailer.
1. Husband, Wife, Kid = happy family
2. Boating trip, husband appears to have been killed by wife
3. Wife gets nailed on murder, goes to jail
4. While in jail, finds out that husband is still alive, feels set-up
5. Gets out of jail, wanting her son back, and realizing that she can now
kill her husband, because she can't be convicted twice for the same murder
6. Tommy Lee Jones, snoop extraordinaire, finds out about this and goes to
stop her
7. He catches her at one point, but she floors the gas on his car on a ferry
and escapes
8. After much research and woop-dee-do, Judd finds her husband's whereabouts
9. She finally explains the whole story to Jones, who now sympathizes with
her plight
10. They both find the husband, and she confronts him with a gun and
threatens his life, with Jones watching on. She wants her son back.

Title
Review for Gingerbread Man, The (1998)
For more movie reviews and screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
PLOT:
Philandering hotshot Southern lawyer takes on a simple case of a father
stalking/harassing his daughter (whom said lawyer is sleeping with), and
succeeds in getting the man put away. Unfortunately for all involved, the
nutty father escapes and begins to make the lives of his daughter, the
lawyer and his family a living nightmare. His band of religious hillbilly
followers help him along his twisted path.
CRITIQUE:
Picking up steam like a snowball barreling down a mountainside, this film
starts off looking like your basic Southern Grisham "lawyer flick", but
slowly crafts itself into a tension-filled thriller, with interesting
characters, some relevant and unique stylings via the watchful eye of
veteran director Robert Altman, and many stormy scenes succinctly
paralleling the film's own brewing tension. Understand that this film is not
your everyday thriller, and does take some time to get going, but I
personally found the setting, the players, and Bobby Duvall's nutty
character interesting enough to keep me tuned into its two-hour stretch. I
will admit that I saw the film's "twist" coming up 5th Avenue from frame
one, but nonetheless, a couple of curve balls managed to keep me in the
game. Downey Jr. also plays a pretty neat supporting jokester, and Branagh
drops his British accent for a near-perfect Southern drawl. All in all, this
film's got great atmosphere, strong performances, interesting characters,
nice style, despite the predictable but enjoyable plot line. Check it out on
video, and bring an umbrella...you'll need it.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Word on the street is that director Robert Altman rewrote this film's
screenplay so much, that the only recognizable John Grisham story elements
left seem to be the loathsome Southern lawyer at the center of a crisis and
a sleazy detective following his beat. Grisham only ended up with a "Story
by" credit in this film, with the screenplay going to the pseudonym Al Hayes
(really Robert Altman).
Mary Jo Slater was the casting director of this film. She's actor Christian
Slater's mom. Stephen Altman was the production designer of this film. He's
director Robert Altman's son, and was also credited for the same on at least
six other films by dad.
Embeth Davidtz's real name is Gretta Milano (Don't ask me why she changed
it?? Very odd choice).

Title
Review for Drop Dead Gorgeous (1999)
For more movie reviews and quizzes, visit http://www.joblo.com/
The accents and exaggerated stupid characters from FARGO meet a mockumentary
type film featuring a black comedy look behind Teen America beauty pageants.
PLOT:
A faux documentary film featuring a glimpse behind the scenes of a small
Minnesota town's teen beauty contestants and their overly competitive
families.
CRITIQUE:
Some people may find stupid, over-the-top, stereotyped characters from a
small town to be extremely funny, and I myself have been known to subscribe
to this group from time to time, but it was obvious from the first frame of
this film that its only source of comedy would come from its idiotic
characters, goofy accents and ignorant statements. For me, that just wasn't
funny! It's unfortunate because the premise of the film seemed ripe for
parody with some funny characters brewing within, but for me, only a few
chuckles trickled out here and there, but mostly I was shaking my head and
thinking "this is just stupid". It didn't  help that most of the main
characters seemed to go in and our their accents from time to time.
Besides its lack of consistent humor, I also found that the film ran a
little too long, had one really exaggerated and unfunny retarded character
who was just embarrassing, and many, many missed opportunities, including a
flat ending. I did enjoy two smaller characters in the film, one being the
father of Denise Richards character and judge#2 with his penchant for "young
girls", but overall, most felt tired. Two characters which were way
underused were Ellen Barkin, who could've been so much more, and Denise
Richards, who appeared to be the star of the film from the look of its
trailer, but actually only played a small part within a diverse cast of
characters.
Overall, the film didn't do it for me, offering very little in real humor
and relying more on the easy, let's make fun of the trailer-trash-folk-type
of comedy. And if you're expecting T&A from Richards, forget about it. Any
which way you look at it, missed opportunities all around.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Kirsten Dunst has gone on record as saying that she will remain a virgin
until she meets the "right guy", and once dated Dustin Hoffman's son. She
also beat out Christina Ricci for roles in INTERVIEW WITH THE VAMPIRE (8/10)
and LITTLE WOMEN.
This film is director Michael Patrick Jann's feature debut. This film is
also screenwriter Lona Williams' first produced script. She was once first
runner up in the National Junior Miss competition. She also plays Judge#3 in
this film.
Denise Richards stands 5'6", has been nicknamed "Fluffy Girl", and made her
feature film debut as Gladys in 1993's LOADED WEAPON.
In 1995, Ellen Barkin dated actor David Arquette. She was also married to
actor Gabriel Byrne
This film was originally titled DAIRY QUEENS.

Title
Review for Anna and the King (1999)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
And believe you me when I tell you that I was NOT looking forward to seeing
this movie featuring a British Jodie Foster going over to Siam to teach some
King's spoiled brats to speak English. Somehow, it didn't tickle the JoBlo
fancy. But I went, I saw and by golly, I'll say it, I liked it. I really,
really liked it!
PLOT:
A widowed British schoolteacher is summoned by the King of Siam to his
country in order to teach his children about the language of English and the
world outside their own. The independent woman begins her teachings with
reluctance, but shortly settles into her own, and inevitably learns much
about herself as well. No songs. No dance numbers.
CRITIQUE:
A beautifully photographed motion picture. Wow. This is the kind of movie
that makes you want to travel the world's most exotic places, until you
realize that you will most likely bunk in two-bit hotels with no indoor
plumbing, as opposed to Jodie Foster in this flick, who was put in a King's
palace. It's only then that you will also start to realize that she's a rich
Hollywood actress, while you're just an overweight, pseudo-movie critic
who's still afraid to walk down his own street. Uhm, but I digress. That
aside, this film was wonderfully shot in all of its majestical glory,
exquisite cinematography, lush locations with plenty of exotic flair and
original costumes. Truly of epical proportions. The actors in the movie were
also right on, with a surprisingly rock-solid performance by Chow Yun-Fat.
My God, who ever thought this dude could act? I've seen him roll down a
stairwell with two guns blazing without losing the toothpick from his mouth,
but go head to head with Jodie "I can make you cry at the drop of a hat"
Foster, and kick arse? Yup.
Of course, that's not to take anything away from Foster, who as per her
usual talents, comes through with all kinds of colors-a-blazin'. Much like
Meryl Streep, Jodie always seems to be a consistent hitter, batting 1.000
whenever called upon. Even more importantly for the audience, the chemistry
between the two thespians works in this film and that is extremely important
for this tale, when you consider that much of the film is essentially a
character study between these two strong individuals. Add to that some funny
moments, some touching moments and a bit of history for ya'll, and this is
one fine film. And what didn't I like? Well, I didn't think the story was
rich enough to take up the entire two and a half hours that it filled, with
a couple of ho-hum moments here and there. I also didn't appreciate the
clean ending and the way everything was so simply resolved, but you know,
after the visual feast that accompanied my eyes during the film's first 120
minutes, I was willing to forgive even that. All in all, a very good picture
worthy of attention by the man named Oscar in at least a couple of his
nominated categories at the end of this fine year in film. Oh yeah, in case
you're not "into" subtitles, this film is loaded with them! I had no problem
with this, in fact, I thought it helped further my appreciation of the
story's authenticity (even though I know that many of the facts in this
interpretation were slightly tweaked, but that's another story altogether.)
Think SOUND OF MUSIC without Julie Andrews, maaaaaaany more kids and no
songs :)
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Jodie Foster's full name is Alicia Jodie Foster. Besides an overly
accomplished career as an actress, Jodie also majored in literature at Yale
and graduated magna cum laude in 1985. Fun trivia includes the fact that
Jodie is fluent is French and was apparently the second choice for the role
of Princess Leia in STAR WARS. She reportedly received $15,000,000 for her
role in this film. One really tragic moment in her life came on March 30th,
1981 when John Hinkley Jr. attempted to assassinate President Reagan.
Hinkley claimed to be obsessed with Jodie and the movie TAXI DRIVER (9/10)
in which Travis Bickle, played by Robert DeNiro, tried to shoot a
presidential candidate. Hinkley is rumored to have said that he was doing it
in order to "impress" Jodie Foster.
Well, it turns out that Chow Yun-Fat does have some experience in receiving
praise for his acting chops as his three Won Hong Kong Academy "Best Actor"
Awards have shown. He received his awards for his roles in 1987's A BETTER
TOMORROW, 1988's CITY ON FIRE and 1990's ALL ABOUT AH LONG. Furthermore,
CineAsia, the Asian Theatre Owners Convention, recently named Chow the "Star
of the Decade".
Director Andy Tennant's last two films were EVER AFTER (7/10) and FOOLS RUSH
IN (5.5/10) respectively. He began his career as a dancer moved on to become
a writer and now likes to direct. Interestingly enough, two of his bigger
roles as an actor/dancer were in the two GREASE movies. He played a "dancer"
in the original GREASE and a "boy greaser" in the second.
And yes, you are right, that is producer Laurence Bender's name in the
credits of this film. The man behind such movies as RESERVOIR DOGS, PULP
FICTION, KILLING ZOE and the DUSK TILL DAWN trilogy, also likes to do some
"normal" films every now and then as well. He also played a "young cop" in
Quentin Tarantino's first film RESERVOIR DOGS.

Title
Review for You Can Count on Me (2000)
For more reviews, screensavers, trailers & more, visit http://www.joblo.com/
A touching character drama about a brother and sister questioning the ways
of their life and spirituality from the guy who wrote ANALYZE THIS and ROCKY
AND BULLWINKLE? Yup, believe it! This film tied for the Grand Jury Prize at
this year's Sundance Film Festival with another fall release entitled
GIRLFIGHT, and features a breakout performance from actor Mark Ruffalo.
Remember the name. Of course, you already know the name of the executive
producer on this project...one Martin Scorsese.
PLOT:
A carefree brother comes back home to visit his morally upright single mom
sister and decides to stay awhile. Their day-to-day goings-on is what fills
our time together with brother essentially trying to "find himself" while
making friends with her young son, and sister trying to figure out which
fella she'd rather keep dating while simultaneously not losing her job at
the bank. Slowly but surely, their respective traits begin to rub off on one
another.
CRITIQUE:
A small movie set in a small town delivers various big elements including
top-notch performances from its two leads, extremely effective character
development all around and a poignant message dipped with the importance of
love, family, relationships and spirituality. This is obviously not a
typical Hollywood picture and surely not for everyone, but definitely one to
see for anyone who appreciates superior character studies, feels confused,
overwhelmed or bored about their own life, and is curious about the familial
foundation which supports this entire movie. This isn't a very upbeat film.
It does contain a handful of lighter moments, but is basically a movie that
feels sort of somber all the way through but doesn't ever really get boring.
The force of the writing is the main reason for that, with the superior
performances set forth by all, straddling in as a close second. Major kudos
go out to Mark Ruffalo, who completely inhabits his role as the loose
younger brother with the knack for getting into trouble, as well as Laura
Linney, playing the full role of mother, sister, lover and employee to a
tee. The excellent rapport between the two leads also makes you glad to be
spending some time with them.
The film also offers a solid outing for Rory Culkin in a pivotal role of the
son in the movie, and Matthew Broderick delivering yet another small but
effective performance on his end (dude, it's time to put films like GODZILLA
and INSPECTOR GADGET behind you once and for all!). The film isn't really
about anything in particular, plot-wise that is. It moves from moment to
moment, sort of like a "week in the life of" you or me. But the crux of the
story is really simmering under the covers, the relationship between brother
and sister, an emotional attachment that isn't really discussed much in film
nowadays. The two kids grow up as orphans and maintain different standards
of living, one very opposite from the other. The truth is that neither one
of them really knows exactly what they're doing (perhaps because of the lack
of parental guidance), but the love between them is never in doubt. This is
one of those smaller pictures that I really love balancing off against those
big, loud, smack-down Hollywood flicks. It's insightful, it's emotional and
it actually means something! Okay, so I might not be selling this film as
best as I could, but all I know is that it touched me with its solid
performances, great insight and universal message. One to see.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Writer/director Ken Lonergan also plays a small part in this movie. He is
the priest. He is primarily known as a playwright but has written several
screenplays including a co-writing stint on ANALYZE THIS and a full-blown
screenwriting credit on ROCKY & BULLWINKLE. His wife, J. Smith-Cameron is
also in this picture. She plays Mabel.
Actress Laura Linney is probably best remembered for playing Jim Carrey's
wife in THE TRUMAN SHOW. Clint Eastwood picked her for the part of Kate
Whitney in his movie ABSOLUTE POWER after seeing her performance in PRIMAL
FEAR.
Long-time Martin Scorsese producer and ex-wife, Barbara DeFina, is one of
the producers on this project. Martin Scorsese is also one of its executive
producers.
This is 11-year old Rory Culkin's second movie. He played the "young Richie"
his brother Macauley Culkin's RICHIE RICH movie. He also has another acting
brother named Kieran.

Title
Review for Braindead (1992)
For more reviews and movie trivia, visit http://www.joblo.com
Invite George A. Romero, Sam Raimi and Terry Gilliam over for a night of
Zombies, Bloody Mary's and some great conversation, secretively slip a few
dozen hits of orange-moon-pied acid drops into their respective drinks,
stir, serve on the rocks, and you will only be slightly prepared for the
bloody onslaught of style, horror, annihilation and gruesomely decorated
psychosis that director Peter Jackson has bestowed upon this world in the
form of this film. This movie is essentially for the 90's, what NIGHT OF THE
LIVING DEAD was for the 60's, and EVIL DEAD 2 (7.5/10) was for the 80's. An
all-out disgusting bloody mess of a horror show! All I could say is "wow".
PLOT:
A man who has always lived under the oppression of his own mother, suddenly
finds himself taking care of her, after she gets bitten by a rare rat-monkey
at a local zoo. It turns out that the bite from the animal actually turns
people into flesh-eating human zombies, and so his mother slowly but surely
crumbles into that state herself. As more and more people get bit, the man's
house turns into an absolute slaughterhouse for the dead, the living, and
the undead. Blood, carnage, decapitations, and did I mention blood...ensue.
CRITIQUE:
A fantastic cinematic achievement, this film has the greatest horror special
effects that I have ever witnessed in my entire life. It also has the most
gore, the most guts, the most blood, the most style and the most
mutilations, that I have ever had the privilege to be completely repulsed by
as well. This movie starts off slow, and looks like a highly stylized film
ready to thrill you with its eye for the quaint shot, but sadistically turns
into one of the most disgusting horror movies to ever greet the screen. This
film is gross beyond belief, with bloody murders after bloody murders,
followed closely by bloody decapitations, bloody maimings and dozens of
other novel shots of zombies killing, chomping and gnawing their way into
others.
THIS FILM IS NOT FOR THE FAINT-HEARTED!
This gorefest is filled with shots of body parts being ripped apart from one
another, limbs flying all around, and human insides taking on a life of
their own. Mrs. JoBlo could not take the whole film, and had to be relieved
of her duties as shotgun watcher, as the film progressed with only me
holding a barf bag to my side. I really do not know enough about this film's
background to know of Mr. Jackson's technique in this film's regard, but
suffice it to say that the man does an excellent job of coming up with a
plasma-infested horror spectacle that will not leave anyone lest an opinion.
Timothy Balme also does an excellent job of playing the straight-guy within
this mess of butchered torsos, even as he literally mows through them by the
end. His character was just like Bruce Campbell in EVIL DEAD 2. A chunk of
straight man material, plenty of black humour and a whole lot of
psychological head-trippings. Which reminds me, this film is not meant to be
a straight-forward horror extravaganza. It's got its tongue firmly placed in
cheek with a lot of off-humour pieces as well, like the one that has the
priest kicking some crazy zombie butt in the graveyard, and another one that
features our protagonist taking the baby zombie out for a carriage stroll in
the park.
This film will never leave your mind once you have seen it, and will most
certainly make a sickening impression on you, at first glance. You might
change your mind afterwards and respect its style, wondrous craft of
filmmaking and overall gruesome effect (as I did), or decide that it's one
of the sickest and vile things that you have ever had the indecency to
witness in your entire lifetime as an adult on this planet, and regurgitate
your appetite for ever taking in another horror movie. But even with a
fabricated absence of this film from your memory, you will never be able to
forget the fact that you were one of the lucky ones to have witnessed one of
the bloodiest, sickest and campiest fiestas of murder ever presented on
film!! Trust me, you'll feel better in the morning :)
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
BRAINDEAD was the original title for this movie, but Vidmark changed it to
DEAD ALIVE.
The mad funeral director's assistant is played by director Peter Jackson
himself. He was born in New Zealand, and also directed 1996's THE
FRIGHTENERS (7/10). He is presently working on all three parts of THE LORD
OF THE RINGS trilogy, which will be shot back-to-back. New Line Cinema has
apparently committed more than $130 million to produce this live action,
special effects-packed trilogy of films based on J.R.R. Tolkien's
internationally renowned fantasy novel. The filming is scheduled to begin in
May 1999 in New Zealand, with the first episode due for Christmas 2000
release.
Peter Jackson's favorite scene, in which the "baby" is taken for a carriage
ride in the park, was shot on the last two days only, because there was some
money left in the budget. The film apparently only cost $3 million to make,
with the director not making one cut from his original script.
Peter Jackson was one of the first people approached to script the JASON VS
FREDDY movie, but had to decline due to other commitments.
During the lawnmower scene in this movie, blood was pumped at five gallons
per second.

Title
Review for Dinosaur (2000)
For more reviews and movie wallpapers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Disney has gone on record saying that it actually built a "secret lab" in
order to create this film, which combines photo realistic CGI dinosaurs and
actual background footage. They also claim that the film cost around $130
Million, while others speculate that cost to be much higher. Of course, none
of that would really matter if the film turned out to be an entertainment
bonanza, right? Uhhh, well...time to get back to the "secret" drawing board,
fellas. You forget to spend enough money on a good script! (having four
writers never helps)
PLOT:
Set in the prehistoric times, this story tells the tale of a baby dinosaur
brought up by monkeys (lemurs, to be exact). But when a meteor shower sends
them wailing onto another island full of sorted dinos, the family must keep
up with a herd of the giant beasts, in order to survive and make their way
to the nesting grounds.
CRITIQUE:
Hey, I thought kid's movies were supposed to be fun?! This one is downright
dark, with very few laughs, zero songs and dances, a lame script,
computer-generated-looking monkeys, and granted, some excellent special
effects here and there. Top that off with a 80-minute runtime (although I
must admit that it felt much longer), an extremely strong overall sense of
deja-vu, and this film certainly didn't do much to bowl this critical dude
over. Granted, the film starts off okay, with some awesome visuals of the
dinos, the landscape, and definitely the whole meteor shower scene, but once
the monkeys begin their long journey in the desert alongside the dinosaurs,
the film really doesn't go very far. Sure, they've tossed in a couple of
bogus "bad guys" here and there, but with such little charisma or excitement
being generated from any of the main characters, it was hard to actually
give a crap about anything that was to happen to them. Having said that,
impressed was I with the few battle scenes which did liven the film up a
bit, even though I will admit that are probably a little too realistic, even
harsh, for kids. The TOY STORY movies worked because they combined many
factors, prime among them being awesome scripts, fun and interesting
characters and an overall sense of joy and excitement.
This film just felt dry. It honestly didn't entertain me much, save for the
fight scenes, and it most certainly didn't convince me to recommend it to a
friend. Of course, kids might like it because of the whole dinosaur angle,
but geez Disney, why did you have to make it so boring? I'm not asking for a
Robin Williams appearance or anything, but slap a few funny jokes in there,
ixnay all the death scenes, and for God's sakes, give us some characters and
a story which actually generate a little pizzazz. So perhaps your children
will enjoy it, but even then, more than likely because of the film's
generally spectacular visuals or powerful battle scenes (although smaller
children might actually get scared), not the story. I doubt that many kids
will want the toys associated with any of the lifeless characters in this
film...or remember their names, for that matter. All in all, some great
visuals (except for the phony-looking monkeys), cool action scenes, but the
lame story and uninteresting characters just drag any fun out of it. I
honestly don't know why this would excite anyone after seeing the JURASSIC
PARK films. Unless of course, you're in the mood for a dinosaur documentary
or something.
Note to studios: Enough with the dinosaur movies!

Title
Review for Head Over Heels (2001)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
PLOT:
A down-and-out girl moves in with some over-the-top models and falls in love
with a goofy-but-loveable guy from across the street. Aaaaaaaaah! Then one
day, she sees him knock a woman upside the head with a baseball bat.
Ooooooooh! She must then join together with her model-friends to find out
whether or not this guy is really goofy-but-loveable, or a psycho killer.
Aaaaaaaaah!
CRITIQUE:
Completely idiotic. Okay, so maybe I'm being a little too nice. This movie
starts off dumb, moves into the ridiculous and eventually graduates to
idiocy. There...that's more like it! And how, you may ask? Well, it's simple
really. Four of the dumbest stereotypical models in the world (oh my God, I
just found out that the actresses playing the parts are models in real
life...yipes!) join Monica Potter (in a role which can only be described as
an obvious cry for help) and Freddie Prinze Jr. (not the actor, but the
character better known as Freddie Prinze Jr.), in a plot so stupid and
far-fetched, that you have to wonder once more, how crap like this gets by
the Hollywood bigwigs. This thing stinks to high-heaven. It's just plain
embarrassing for everyone involved. I even felt my IQ dip below its usual
low as toilet humor somehow worked its way into this so-called
romantic-comedy-action movie? Ugh. What a pile of dung. Hey, I'm actually
starting to sound a little like Harry Knowles here, but I guess I could see
where his frustration comes from time to time. It's sad really. A movie
which actually had quite a few people in my audience laughing at its idiocy,
including the over-used "folks hiding in the bathroom while someone else
comes in to take a crap and fart" gag . And how about
that dumb blonde model who keeps running into things. Pure hilarity! Or
maybe I'm just too jaded, too much of a critic, not relaxed enough to enjoy
this fluff-piece...uuuhhmmm...naaaaah!! This movie sucks the big one.
It's chockfull of stupid characters delivering inane dialogue fitting
snuggly into a preposterous plot. This is the kind of movie that has one
character inserting another character into a car headfirst to the floor only
because...well, it's supposed to be funny, see? You see, that person then
has their legs swinging in the other person's face as they drive and that
distracts the driver, see, and well, that's kinda funny, no? Harumph...yeah,
well...you get the picture! Anyhoo, Freddie Prinze Jr....nuff said. Monica
Potter, a bad career move, but we might forgive you if you keep up the Julia
Roberts bit. The rest of the model girls...well, thanks for being there so I
had something to look at, but please apologize to the entire modeling
community as a whole, for making them all out to be complete imbeciles!! So
why the three points out of ten, you may ask? Well, it's simple really. One
point goes to the Russian model girl and that cool accent (don't ask me why,
but it actually turned me on). One point goes out to all of the model girls
for being in the movie (nice window decoration...natch!). And one last point
goes out to the makers of this film, who spared us any long sorted story,
and made sure to give us the opportunity of leaving the theatre after only
90 minutes of manufactured garbage, so that we could run out as fast as we
can, grab the next person that we see walking down the street and warn them
of the devil that is...Freddie Prinze Jr...I mean, HEAD OVER HEELS. You've
been warned, good people.
PS: Didja notice how I didn't even mention REAR WINDOW once in my entire
review? I didn't want to taint the memory of the classic flick by having it
uttered alongside this thing, but then again, I just did mention it, but I
guess it doesn't count in the PS section...or does it? Ooooh, whatever...I
have a headache! (I think my brain is coming back to life)
Where's JoBlo coming from?
10 Things I Hate about You (7/10) - Coyote Ugly (6.5/10) - Down to You
(6.5/10) - Save the Last Dance (7/10) - She's All That (6.5/10) - The
Wedding Planner (4/10) - You've Got Mail (5.5/10)

Title
Review for Mexican, The (2001)
For more reviews and movie wallpapers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
PLOT:
A bumbling criminal has to do "one more job" before he can kiss his life in
the Bad Guys Corp. goodbye. When he tells his girlfriend about his
unenviable position (do or die), she tells him to take a hike, and he must
then complete his mission in Mexico alone. Unfortunately, he goofs up a lot
so the bad guys kidnap his now ex-girlfriend, to put more pressure on our
boy to perform. Got all that?
CRITIQUE:
A so-so movie that could've been a lot better if they hadn't taken such a
good thing and beaten it to death. First of all, how bad can any movie
starring Brad Pitt and Julia Roberts be, right? I mean, c'mon...seriously! I
could watch these two planting seeds for two hours and still come out with a
pretty decent-sized smile on my face. But I suppose that has more to do with
their inherent good looks and zesty personalities than anything else, so
obsessions aside, let me get back to the story. To be honest, I was actually
quite surprised by this movie, since the trailers have been making it look
like a very light, fluffy romantic comedy starring the two sweethearts of
Hollywood, but the reality of the film is actually quite grimmer. In fact,
the movie's stocked with profanities, contains scenes of violence and offers
plenty of frank conversations about that little thing called "love", from
both the hetero and homo perspectives. Basically...my kind of movie!!
Hehehe. Unfortunately for the audience, the film just doesn't know when to
let up and just goes on and on and on. I honestly thought that it was over
two and a half hours long, but it was really only two bucks or so, I
believe. What that tells me is that the film sorta "lost me" at some point
around the midway mark, and even though the movie still managed to get some
laughs from me here and there, it ultimately just ran out of gas (no pun
intended).
In fact, the first half of the film comes out a-blazin' with a very nifty
soundtrack, an infectious score, plenty of laughs via Pitt's adventures in
the land of Me-hico, and some decent tete-a-tetes between Roberts and
Pittski. And yeah, the directing was also top-notch. But once they split,
the two stories seemed to take different emotional routes and kept me
somewhat off-guard. In fact, I wasn't all that interested in the Roberts end
of the story as much as Pitt's end for the most part, and didn't
particularly see reason to get so much into Gandolfini's background either
(we find out more about him than the two leads together!). It was as if they
didn't want him to simply play this "thug" again, and they tried to develop
his character somewhat, but it was all too much, for this type of movie. I
would've preferred that the film stuck to its original fast-pace, hardy
chuckles and fun-time chemistry. But the length of the movie and the second
half's more "serious" tone, ultimately left me entertained, but not as much
as I anticipated early on (one specific somber event felt particularly out
of place). In fact, note to all filmmakers who decide to slap two very hot,
pretty stars together for another movie in the future...uhmm, give them more
scenes together, dammit!! That's what I'm paying my umpteen pesos for,
buddy, I want to see Julia and Brad interact!! Granted, the story also has
to be very good, but if you've got the stars to sign on the line that is
dotted, why not use them in more scenes together? Just a thought.
In fact, since the film only superficially touches upon their relationship
early on, you don't really feel all that much for the couple as they try to
get back together throughout the movie. But all in all, the film did still
manage to entertain me with its general fun vibe, its charismatic stars, its
somewhat diverting story and upbeat soundtrack. Not a mucho nachos
recommendation but a recommendation nonetheless.
Where's JoBlo coming from?
3,000 Miles to Graceland (7/10) - A Life Less Ordinary (5/10) - Fools Rush
In (5/10) - Forces of Nature (7/10) - Payback (8/10) - True Romance
(10/10) - Very Bad Things (8/10) - Way of the Gun (6/10) - The Wedding
Planner (3/10) - You've Got Mail (4/10)

Title
Review for Runaway Train (1985)
For more reviews and trivia, go to http://surf.to/joblo
This movie garnered Oscar nominations for both stars Jon Voight (Best
Actor) and Eric Roberts (Best Supporting Actor) at the 1986 Acadamy
Award celebrations. Director Konchalovsky creates an intense thriller
that takes two escaped convicts, slaps them on an unmanned train
barreling down some tracks at lightning speeds, and surrounds them with
the wonderful white world of winter.    
PLOT:
Con of steel Manny (Voight) gets let out of the "hole" after three
years of solitude in a maximum-security Alaskan prison. Soon enough, he
escapes the terror of the jail and its psychotic warden, alongside a
prize-fighting, dimwitted prisoner named Buck (Roberts), and hops onto
the nearest train. Unfortunately for either escapee, the train suddenly
loses its engineer, picks up excessive speeds, and hurdles down the
wintery tracks without brakes or a final destination.
CRITIQUE:
Gritty, suspenseful, stylish, overlong thriller that combines chompin'
good dialogue with solid acting performances by its main leads. Despite
the fact that I found both performances by Voight and Roberts a little
"overdone" at first, I eventually saddled into their tough guy
characters, and forgot to pay attention to the actors themselves
(always indicative of great performances). The story lends itself to
deep interpretations, none of which I will expand upon in this review,
but needless to say that the gist of the plot bleeds around freedom,
and the harsh price that many people are willing to pay for it.
The directing of this picture was highly stylized and wonderfully
achieved, while its cinematography was as sweet as the winter
wonderland that it chillingly portrayed. The dialogue was fresh (see
Little Known Facts below for possible reasons behind its authenticity),
and the acting was strong by both main men. On the down side, I do
think that the picture could have been cut by about fifteen to twenty
minutes, with some of the later scenes dragging on a little, and the
soundtrack was a little too synthesized for my predilection, but hey,
it was the eighties...what do you expect?! 
The final scene of the movie is also a classic shot that should stick
in your mind for years to come, with the accompanying music (Very
TITANIC-like (7/10), if you ask me. Hmmm...I wonder if James Horner
ever watched this cool flick?) icing the somber cake over which it
played. This film is definitely nacho material, and lends itself
greatly to newer condiments such as sour cream and/or ketchup (for
tomato fans). Overall, I would say that this movie is a little
overlong, authentically acted, wonderfully shot, and quite suspenseful.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Co-writer of this script, Edward Bunker is also known as Eddie Bunker,
who is also known as the actor who played Mr. Blue in RESERVOIR DOGS
(9/10). Eddie Bunker is a convicted bank robber, who was the youngest
convict ever to be sent to the San Quentin penitentiary at the time of
this conviction. At one time, he was on the FBI's Ten Most Wanted List.
He also makes an appearance in this film as Jonah. The script was based
on a story written by famed director Akira Kurosawa.
Eddie Bunker also acted in director Andrei Konchalovsky's 1989's film
TANGO & CASH.
Eric Roberts' famous sister is the PRETTY WOMAN (7.5/10) herself Julia
Roberts. In February, 1995, Eric was arrested and charged with spousal
abuse.
Jon Voight is the father of actress Angelina Jolie, who in 1995 married
"Sick Boy" from TRAINSPOTTING (8.5/10) Johnny Lee Miller in a black
rubber dress (she wore the dress, not him :))

Title
Review for Ringmaster (1998)
For more movie reviews and trivia quizzes, visit http://www.joblo.com/
PLOT:
Based on the wildly popular "Jerry Springer" TV show, this movie follows the
lives of two groups of people before they make their bizarre appearances on
the infamous program. One posse comes from the trailer parks and are to be
featured in the "I slept with my stepfather" segment, and the other is based
on some fly-girl whose girlfriends keep sleeping with her undevoted "dog"
boyfriend.
CRITIQUE:
The truth is that if I didn't have a day job, I would probably watch the
real "Jerry Springer" show every day. I find it quite entertaining, despite
its complete lack of redeeming value. Having said that, the show itself is
outrageous, funny, and always filled with goofy surprises, as opposed to
this film which features no laughs (is this a comedy or a drama?),
uninteresting and completely unbelievable one-dimensional stereotypes, and a
contrived plot which bores us stupid all the way. I never thought I would
utter the word boring in the same sentence as Jerry Springer, but this film
is an absolute yawn-fest, despite offering various scenes featuring
simulated blowjobs, lesbians, T&A and TV violence (who would've guessed
that?).
I wish they would have either A) made this movie much, much funnier, or B)
turned it into a complete drama and given us a real perspective as to why
people like this actually put themselves through these public forums of
embarrassment. Unfortunately, it doesn't seem as though screenwriter Jon
Bernstein spent more than a drunken weekend watching real "Jerry Springer"
reruns to complete his script, leaving us with a boring film, featuring no
laughs, one-dimensional characters, and no fun whatsoever.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Jerry Springer used to be the Mayor of Cincinnati, Ohio. For this film, he
won the 1999 Razzie Award for Worst New Star, tied with Joe Esterhas from AN
ALAN SMITHEE FILM: BURN HOLLYWOOD BURN.

Title
Review for Frequency (2000)
For more reviews and movie scripts, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Dennis Quaid with a decent role in a good movie? Say it ain't so. But it is
so for Mr. Meg Ryan, a man who is still trying to live down his horribly
over-the-top impression of Jerry Lee Lewis in GREAT BALLS OF FIRE, and whose
film choices (UNDERCOVER BLUES, GANG RELATED, SWITCHBACK, etc...) haven't
exactly been prime career moves. Well, it looks like he's finally got the
right frequency... ;)
PLOT:
Now pay very close attention. A thirty-something year old man living in
1999, is able to contact his own father in 1966 via a ham radio and some
freaky astrological event which allows for this unbelievable circumstance to
take place. But that's only half the story. As the two men come to terms
with this reality and get to know one another better, they quickly realize
that anything they say or alter due to their conversations, will ultimately
change the future and their own fates therein.
CRITIQUE:
Pretty gosh darn original! This film delivers on all fronts: solid acting, a
well-told and surprisingly believable story despite its fantastic premise,
some cool special effects, an emotional tug and plenty of thrills. Hollywood
should be proud of this release, a film which actually expects audiences to
use their brains and invest much of their attention, in order to fully
appreciate the film's intriguing story line. This movie makes you think,
think some more, and ultimately entertains while engaging the viewer with
non-stop brain-candy. Dennis Quaid succeeds in his part despite the goofy
accent, Jim Caviezel is rock-solid and definitely slated for bigger and
better things, and even the secondary characters, such as Andre Braugher and
Elizabeth Mitchell, deliver appropriately believable performances. Will some
people get confused with this movie? Sure. This film does flip-flop somewhat
between the different time lines, but unlike BACK TO THE FUTURE 2, which
also had a vaguely similar theme, this one presents you with all the needed
clues and explanations in order for you to keep up to date...that is, if
you're paying attention.
Having said that, the film actually begins on quite the slow note, with many
of the characters and situations gradually being presented to us with a
basic amount of "suspension of disbelief" needed to enjoy the rest of the
film. But once the initial premise is solidified and made to be very
credible, the movie turns into a very funky mystery murder thriller. Events
from the past alter those in the future, father and son work together to
solve a crime, despite living in different periods of time, and the movie
ultimately takes off in the second half, when all the ideal elements of a
thriller are successfully played out. The film's final 15 minutes are
probably its finest, with plenty of tension, creative license and surprising
turns to certify this film an original. Of course, if you're looking for
your everyday run-of-the-mill thriller, than you might just be disappointed
with this film's prerequisite for intellectual participation. But for anyone
else who likes thinking at the movies, enjoys watching good actors handle
great material, and has been looking forward to seeing an original film
break out of the early 2000 pack, wait no further cause this movie is the
one for you!
One of the things that I liked the most about this film was how its aura
seemed to remind me a lot of THE SIXTH SENSE. Despite not having much in
common thematically, it's obvious that both filmmakers expect their
audiences to pay attention during their presentations, and furnish them with
a sorted premise ripe enough for repeat viewings. Of course, some might want
to dig real deep in order to decipher the holes in plot, as did certain
detractors of the former film, but from my own experience, the film had me
...hook, line and sinker. No need to nit-pit here, folks...this film is a
fun, intelligent thriller with a heart. Enjoy.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Noah Emmerich, one of the co-stars in this movie, is the brother of Toby
Emmerich, the screenwriter of this movie.

Title
Review for In Crowd, The (2000)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
After toiling around on the beach all day, this film seemed perfectly fit to
cap off my nite. Packed with a bevy of beauties, impeccably shaped men,
beach parties and rich phoniness, the film appeared genuinely set to deliver
thrills, chills, T&A shots, steamy sex scenes and a tiny bit of cheesy fun.
PLOT:
A girl with head issues is released from a psychiatric hospital and given
another chance to re-enter society as the "summer help" at a rich, snooty
country club. Soon enough, she is taken into the fold of the inner rich,
snooty kids who seem to enjoy her company. It isn't long before the truth of
the matter unfolds, and things begin to get real nasty.
CRITIQUE:
Lots of hard bodies, not enough T&A, a semi-interesting setup, not enough
unpredictability, a few decent actors, but not enough good ones make this
film watchable and somewhat of a guilty pleasure, but certainly not good
enough to recommend on any sort of enthusiastic level. Sure I enjoyed
watching the boys and girls frolicking around on the beach. Sure I liked the
whole "which girl is the bigger psycho bitch" angle which kept popping in
and out of my head during the whole movie. And sure I did enjoy the whole
over-the-top Denise Richards/Carmen Electra look-a-like performance by Susan
Ward, but all in all, the film just didn't click enough points of interest
to be considered anything more than a teen soap-opera filmed for the big
screen. In fact, as much as I did get into some of the story's original
setup, I couldn't help but predict every coming moment as the film stepped
forward.
And where was all the action? For a thriller, this film sure did spend a lot
of time on the getting-to-know everyone scenario, and not enough on the
actual moments of tension or suspense, all of which were conspicuously
absent. Sure, I was never really bored during the flick, enjoyed the
grandiose phoniness of the queen bitch and her make-up clad sprinkle
girlfriends, and the performance put forth by Bobby aka Nathan Bexton. But
other than the main trio, the rest of the cast was basically just a bunch of
stale, one-dimensional characters, which under these circumstances didn't
bother me. With the focus on the primary two girls, the cardboard cutout
designation of the secondary players just didn't seem to matter that much to
me. The film definitely does not need to be seen on the big screen, but
might be enjoyed on a smaller level, if you're bored at home one night,
looking for a little cheesy fake fun, and like the ol' crazy bitch on the
loose type flicks, rent it and get a bonus shot of Susan Ward's breasts to
boot (although more sex and definitely more skin would have appreciated by
this film's teen target audience...what were they thinking?). But I guess
that's why the lesbian under-and-overtones were tossed into the mix, eh?

Title
Review for Wild Things (1998)
>From the man who presented us with HENRY: THE PORTRAIT OF A SERIAL
KILLER (6.5/10) comes a wild tale set within the elite and white trash
of Florida's South Coast.
PLOT:
Guidance Counselor (Dillon) is accused of raping one of his students.
She happens to be the daughter of one of the wealthiest women in
Florida. The counselor is brought to court on the charges, as another
white trash girl (Campbell), also joins the rape finger-pointing club.
As the story unfolds, we find that many things aren't exactly as they
seem (that's as much as I could say without ruining anything).
CRITIQUE:
Good little flick that slows down at certain points, and runs a tad
long, but generates enough twists and turns to keep most people
interested throughout. Mind you, I could see many people not liking it
because it takes "one too many" twists and turns, but hey, I happen to
like that kind of thing. And besides, the twists and turns in this
movie managed to remain within the realm of believability (or
scathingly close to), and even "explained" many of its turns with a
showcase of missed scenes during the credit crawl at the end of the
film (DO NOT leave the theatre before you see the credits...it really
does clear up some stuff !!).
Other than that, the acting was good, with Campbell transforming her
"good girl stereotypical" role into a pot-smoking, goth-looking white
trash chick out for a good time. Denise Richards (from STARSHIP
TROOPERS (7/10) fame) solidifies herself as Hollywood's jelly-donut
pinup girl of the moment, and proves that all breast implants needn't
lead to lawsuits. Bacon is solid, and so is Dillon (while continuing to
prove his inability to age to the whole wide wondering world !!).
Sprinkle the story with a bunch o' shots of alligators peeking through
the swamp waters, Bacon showing the world the size of his ding-dong (do
we really need to see this??), a couple of lesbian kissing scenes, and
a menage-a-trois, and you've got yourself a decent time at the movie
theatre.
On the down side, the soundtrack was not as prominent (or slick) as I
thought it would be, and Theresa Russell (real name: Theresa Paup)
seems to have lost her way in every which way possible....ooooh, I
almost forgot Bill Murray's exquisite role as the down-trodden lawyer
who agrees to defend Dillon in court. Murray actually added that extra
little spice of humour that allowed this film to affirm its position as
a quirky little noirish tale of sex, greed and mystery. 
Little Known Facts: 
Neve Campbell specified a non-nudity clause in her contract (she's also
born in Guelph, Ontario...go hoser!)
Director John McNaughton says he deleted a scene that would have shown
Matt Dillon and Kevin Bacon showering together, as it was gratuitous.
Kevin Bacon plays in a band with his brother, called The Bacon
Brothers, is married to actress Kyra Sedgwick, and has a game based on
him called "Six Degrees of Kevin Bacon".

Title
Review for Titanic (1997)
As of March 22, 1998, the movie "Titanic" was unanimously declared the
number one biggest money grossing movie of all time! Its domestic
ticket sales sailed through the $492 million mark, leading the old
box-office champ, Star Wars, to a darker side finish in second place.
It just gathered eleven Academy Awards to add to its incredible
success, and appears to be headed towards a worldwide box-office gross
of close to $1.5 billion worth of ticket sales. So why has this movie
turned into the biggest money-making film of all time? Hmmm...let's
investigate.
A mere six months ago, Titanic was being nastily compared to another
great water-based film that was over-budgeted, ran long and over-rated,
Waterworld. That film cost Sony Pictures close to $175 million to
produce, with dire financial results across the world. With Titanic's
enormous budget cradling the $200 million mark, many studio executives
had also begun to shake in their soggy boots, and hope for a miracle
from above. And as the movie's shooting schedule continued to go past
its original set date, the studio begrudgingly had to settle the film
into its late fall release schedule. This was not a decision it wanted
to make, as the summer season was without a doubt the greatest
money-making season for all Hollywood studios. But the director of this
ambitious film, James Cameron, would not succumb to the studio's
pressures, and even surrendered his own salary for the project, in
return for more time to film the movie that he had intended. 
And the rest, as they say...is Hollywood history.
Released on December 18, 1997, Titanic immediately gained the top spot
in the box-office ranks of that weekend, and has stayed in that
position ever since. It's currently in its 14th week of release, and
its prime spot at the head of the charts has yet to be rivaled
(Leonardo DiCaprio's other film release, The Man in the Iron Mask, was
the closest rival to Titanic last weekend, as it grossed only $300,000
less than Titanic). The Titanic album is also at number one on the
music charts, and the Titanic book has consistently remained in the top
ten since it embarked on its literary sendoff back in December.
Worldwide movie grosses are forecasted to balloon past the $1.5 billion
mark by the time the movie ends its run in theaters, and only then,
will the home video market begin to cut into its share of the Titanic
money pie. Titanic is no longer just a movie, it's a phenomenon.
But as I gathered my facts and figures about this triumphant film, I
started to ask myself about the reasons behind this movie's phenomenal
success. I personally saw the picture as nothing more than a decent
movie with some great special effects and a good love story. But that
was all. Why were others going ga-ga over this "big boat movie"? Why
had many gone to see all of its 197 minutes over and over and over
again? I had to know. The answer ran deeper than I had anticipated.
The nineteen-nineties began with the average budget of a film being
shot around the meager $20 million mark, and ended with Titanic's
gigantic cost of over $200 million. This rise in budgets led Hollywood
into a new genre of film-making that relied more on its special
effects, explosions, big name stars, and superb action sequences,
rather than the actual plot line of the film. When you look at the
highest grossing pictures over the past few years, Men in Black,
Independence Day and Jurassic Park, you will notice a singular thread
that passes through each of these films. 
That thread is firmly tied to the fact that each of those stories
lacked any kind of real emotional plot line. The special effects were
always good. The sound effects were monstrous. Even the creation of
these new and wonderful fantasy worlds left many of us in awe. But the
obvious lack of humanistic feelings and values had become openly
acceptable, common and regrettably absent.
With Titanic, director James Cameron was able to successfully mesh the
two worlds of special effects and human emotion, as to make this
picture unique within the sea of heartless big-budget movies that had
been propagating themselves over the past few years. People have liked
this movie because they liked the special effects, they liked the
story, but most of all, they liked the characters of Jack (Leonardo
DiCaprio) and Rose (Kate Winslet). They liked the love story.
Within the great, big, so-called technological advancement of the 20th
century, the Titanic, two socially incompatible people were able to
fight all odds, overcome all obstacles, and find one another. And as
the end of this century nears, and the dawn of the next millenium
creeps up and into our mental horizon, it is obvious that many people
have begun wondering about their own places in this highly
technological world of ours. 
The fast-paced lifestyles of so many North Americans has reached such a
mechanical stage at this point, that many have blindly adopted the
anti-social tools of this technological age. They've readily accepted
the notion of communicating via electronic mail with their friends and
family, researching their hobbies and interests in front of a 17-inch
computer screen, and even shopping by a click of a button. These events
used to exemplify the pinnacle of human and social interaction when our
times were simpler, but nowadays...they're just more tasks to add to
our Personal Digital Assistants. 
Are people happy travelling through this web of technological
advancements from year to year? Not according to the APA (American
Psychiatrists Association), which has claimed a steady rise in the
number of depression cases in the 1990's, and predicts an even higher
number as the new millenium approaches.
And when you superimpose the "Titanic" experience with many of the
anxieties that people from this decade are currently experiencing, the
answer to my original question, becomes a whole lot easier to solve. 
People see hope. They see love. They see the need to appreciate every
day to its fullest. They see Titanic, and they recognize these factors
as the most important things in their daily lives. Forget the daily
planners. Forget the emails still sitting in your inbox. Forget the TV
show that you felt you "had to" tape. See your family. See your
friends. See the love and hope and dreams that inhabit your mind from
day to day, and from month to month. Subside your disillusionment of
this crazy world we're living...just for a moment.
I believe that director James Cameron's timing was impeccable with this
project in regards to the times in which we are now living. People see
the future and they are scared. They aren't sure if they are going to
sink or stay afloat. The optimistic destiny that falls upon the two
main characters in this film, is a fate to which every audience member
would love to subscribe. And as the world's day to day operations
continue to retract us from the more important aspects of our lives as
human beings, this film allows us to breathe a certain air of optimism
into the future of our society. The hope and love that's resolved by
the characters in this film, allows everybody in the audience to
believe in their own chances of survival in this unpredictably,
evolving world of ours, and restore some of their own lost faith in
humanity.
These lessons are the ones that the next few copycat producers should
mimic as they attempt to cash in on similar movies over the next few
years. They shouldn't zone in on the Leonardo DiCaprio factor, the
gigantic budget, or even the great special effects. The real human
emotions is what they should be studying. The lost emotions of an
audience that has long been ignored by Hollywood movies. Movies that
exemplify hope, love and humanity. Movies that have a meaning to their
audience. Movies with a heart... 

Title
Review for Whipped (1999)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
At some point during the late 90s, every guy and his credit card slapped
together a film about how he and his friends scored (or tried to score) with
girls. SWINGERS was the ultimate "guy" movie for me, a film that gave you a
true insight as to how guys feel when asking girls out and what rejection is
like. It was also very, very funny and contained great dialogue! Many other
films failed to deliver the quality writing and acting that SWINGERS did,
and today, another film has tried to once again, to give us an even wider
glimpse into the world of "picking up"- guy style! Of course, the angle with
this movie is that the guys will ultimately be challenged by a woman, who
for all they know, is also playing their "game". So who's gonna end up on
top? Read on...
PLOT:
Three single college buddies and their married friend get together at a
diner every Sunday to discuss their weekly conquests with women. They
generally give their best "scamming" stories and pat one another on the
back. That is until they all happen to really fall for the same girl named
Mia. Now in competition with one another, the trio of bachelors suddenly
find themselves at the other end of the "playa" game.
CRITIQUE:
Lots of laughs, interesting characters and plenty of dirty detailed insight
into the world of "dating" raise this flick above all the other "talking
heads" movies and require that anyone who is riding the "single" scene check
it out. And despite a certain feeling of deja-vu, this film does move along
nicely, delivers a cool soundtrack and for once, gives us a little more
insight into the women's point of view. I personally enjoyed much of this
film because I was in that "single" scene for years on end, and related to
many of the humorous anecdotes presented here. We've all got that one friend
who liked to "play" it, another intellectual type who always thought that he
was God's gift to women and the other guy who just masturbated a whole lot.
I'll say this much...I definitely wasn't the "playa" in my own scenario!
Anyway, I really liked the dialogue in this film as well, most of which rang
funny and true, especially in tandem with the succinct delivery put forth by
most of the actors in the film.
And that's another thing that I really liked. All of the personalities in
the film weren't part of this generic ball of "guy". Each dude actually had
his own personality traits and the actors played off each other really well.
Mind you, the thespianism was a tad off during a couple of confrontational
scenes between the fellas and I suppose some would fault the film for going
for the easy toilet humor at times, but I was personally entertained by much
of it. It certainly isn't a grand film making a major statement, but a small
film with just a little insight into the crappy ass world of dating in this
day and age. Credit Amanda Peet for delivering yet another charming
performance and Judah Domke for having some of the funniest lines in the
movie, as the one guy in the crew who is "happily" married. Don't go into
this movie expecting to see a lot of sex because it's not there. What is
there is a pretty funny little tale about guys and girls and the "games"
that they like to play with one another. It's not romantic and it's not
sexy, but it's definitely got some yucks and should be a definite tool of
the trade for those still in the dating world. Oh yeah and
incidentally...the reason that I am no longer in the dating world myself is
because...I'm whipped!!! :)
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
The Brad character from this film, played by Brian Van Holt, and the Mia
character from this film, played by Amanda Peet, are currently dating and
living together in real life. Amanda graduated from Columbia University in
1994.
This is the directorial debut of Peter M. Cohen and the feature film acting
debut for two of the four guys: Zorie Barber and Jonathan Abrahams. Zorie
Barber is also co-producer of this movie. Jonathan Abrahams is also a
published author who writes books about golf.
Director Peter M. Cohen makes a cameo in this movie as the pizza delivery
guy in one of the film's funnier scenes.
This film was shot in 15 days, with 3 additional days of 2nd unit
photography.

Title
Review for Tailor of Panama, The (2001)
For more reviews and movie trailers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
PLOT:
A disgraced British spy is sent to Panama to dig up some dirt on the latest
governmental regime. He quickly strikes a deal with a debt-ridden tailor, by
which money would be exchanged for information that the tailor overhears
from his distinguished clientele. But how much of what the tailor is saying
is actually true and how far will this information ultimately go? See the
movie for more of those details...
CRITIQUE:
Pierce Brosnan playing a British spy? Say it ain't so! Poor guy, I hope that
he does eventually work his way out of this typecast-from-hell role, but 007
aside, let's break this puppy down. I didn't know anything about this movie
going in, and seeing it under the naked eye was quite refreshing indeed. I'm
generally interested in most films which offer insight into different
countries, different religions, cultures, and this one puts you right in the
thick of things down in Panama. The story is intriguing, the performances,
nicely done on the whole, and the conclusion, most fascinating and hilarious
to see wind down. On the negative tip, the film did feel a little redundant
at about the halfway point (although it picked up near the end), has a
couple of underdeveloped characters, notably Jamie Lee Curtis, who felt more
like window dressing (Can someone please light Ms. Curtis' left boob? Okay,
action!), and didn't do much for Brosnan's attempt to stretch his acting
muscles away from his staple character, but all in all, the negatives
weren't all that bad.
In fact, on the whole, the film was actually quite amusing. And despite it
being set more as a "drama" per se, the film ultimately turns into a major
 type of flick, as the lies pack onto the facades, the bribes
onto the blackmailings, until almost no one really knows what end is up
anymore. There's also a re-occurring conscience character who pops in and
out from time to time, and keeps things light-hearted. But you have to go in
knowing that this film does not have any action, elongated car chases or
fistfights. It's a political drama, with some tense moments, lots of
intrigue, lots of maneuvering about, some ironic humor and generally
entertaining results. I'd also have to give a major nod to its star,
Geoffrey Rush, who plays the sap trapped in the middle of all of this
international manipulation (but does he know it?) very well. It was funny to
see him squirm from scene to scene, and he reminded me a lot of William H.
Macy's Oscar nominated character from FARGO. Another great showing by Rush!
In fact, the whole relationship between the disgraced spy and the shaky
tailor was the cornerstone of the film, as each man so obviously tried to
overcome the failures of their respective pasts.
So if politics and the spy-game interest you in the least, this film should
definitely delight you to some extent. But even if you're just looking for a
pretty original story, told via certain familiar routes, and an ultimately
fascinating denouement, you should also check this trickster out. The
"humor" might not be appreciated by everyone, since it really isn't an "in
your face" type of funny, but as a whole, I think that the film develops
enough successful elements to satisfy most film fans.
Where's JoBlo coming from?
13 Days (8/10) - Before Night Falls (4/10) - The Contender (8/10) - The
Jackal (4/10) - Mission Impossible 2 (7/10) - No Way Out (8/10) - Proof of
Life (7/10) - Ronin (8/10) - The Siege (6/10) - The Talented Mr. Ripley
(6/10) - The World is Not Enough (7/10)
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Rush's son in this movie is played by Daniel Radcliffe, a name which we will
be all too familiar to us in a few months, as he's to play the lead
character in the highly anticipated HARRY POTTER movie. Rush's daughter in
the film is played by one Lola Boorman. The director's name is John Boorman.
Hello!?
This movie is based on the 1996 novel by John le Carre, who also co-wrote
and executive produced this project.
Pay close attention and you will note several in-jokes in this movie,
including one in which Rush says to a client, "That was Mr. Connery's
choice", an obvious nod to Sean Connery, the actor who played James Bond
years before Pierce took over the lead. Brosnan also makes two references to
other movies, including CASABLANCA and THE FULL MONTY.
This film was shot entirely on location in Panama.

Title
Review for Under Suspicion (2000)
For more reviews, screensavers, trailers & more, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Can Morgan Freeman ever give a bad acting performance? Or what about Gene
Hackman for that matter? Two solid thespians starring in a film that's been
mulling around in Hackman's mind since he saw the original French version
back in 1981, this movie was finally produced when Freeman's own production
company took a shot at it. I was one of the many members of a packed opening
night house at the Montreal Film Festival as this movie presented itself to
one of its first preview audiences.
PLOT:
A rich lawyer with a very pretty young wife is called in to answer some
questions about two local teenage girl murders by a detective with a slight
suspicion about the man. It isn't long before the brash attorney tumbles
over a few lies and consequently leads his inquisitors to further suspect
his guilt. The cat and mouse game between the cop and suspect, with
flashbacks, is what fills our time with the dueling duo.
CRITIQUE:
A slow-moving yet engaging mystery starring two great actors at the top of
their form, keeps you guessing throughout, but ultimately may lose many fans
with its unorthodox ending. I personally do not mind movies that ask the
viewer to "think" a little after the roll of the credits, but this one
actually threw me for a little bit of a loop. In fact, I'm still sort of
vague on the exact outcome of the characters in this film, but despite that,
still enjoyed the ride and would actually be willing to see it again, just
to certify my theories about its conclusion. Unfortunately, I saw the movie
by myself so I wasn't able to discuss it with anyone either. So that is one
thing about the movie that you should know right off the bat. If you only
like films that close things up nice and tidy, then you might as well skip
this ambiguous puppy. But if you enjoy films like 12 ANGRY MEN, in which the
viewer is asked to discover things as it moves along, changing their mind
throughout and ultimately passing their own judgment before the final
decision comes down, then this is just your kind of mystery. The film
could've been cut by about 15 minutes or so, with some scenes dragging on
somewhat, but ultimately the superior performances by the two leads is what
kept me interested throughout.
I also credit director Hopkins with some beautiful shots of the city during
its opening credits, and an extremely unique perspective on the flashback
sequences, in which the person being told the flashback actually joins the
speaker in their own retelling. Very well done and certainly an original
idea which lent an interesting new perspective to the goings-on of the past.
Extremely stylized flashbacks as well. Hopkins goes nuts with the camera
work. Oh yeah, and let me not forget to mention the stunning beauty of
newcomer Monica Bellucci, an Italian actress, who radiates on the screen,
and actually holds her own alongside the big boys. The film is really a
difficult one to rate because it's one of those movies that didn't leave me
feeling "complete" when I walked out. But looking back, I was quite "into
it" while I was there, and the reasoning behind the ending is just now
beginning to sink into my psyche, so let's just say that it may take a
little while to fully appreciate.
Will you like it? Not sure. Does any of this sound interesting to you? If
so, then I suggest you go see it and decide for yourself. There are some
definite things that I could tell you though: the mystery in the film is a
good one, the movie is slow and long but tends to hold your interest, and as
I mentioned earlier, the performances are strong, but the ending...initially
unsatisfying. In the end, I think that if you like a good murder mystery,
you may enjoy unraveling this one, despite the lack of real action or
thrills.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Lead stars Gene Hackman and Morgan Freeman are also the executive producers
on this project. Hackman has wanted to remake this film since he saw the
original French film in 1981, and finally got the opportunity when Freeman's
own production company, Revelations Entertainment, backed the project.
Morgan Freeman has been nominated for an Oscar on three occasions, but never
won.
Gene Hackman has been nominated for an Oscar on five occasions and won
twice. Once for Best Actor in 1972 for THE FRENCH CONNECTION and another one
as Best Supporting Actor in 1992's UNFORGIVEN.
This film is a remake of the 1981 French film called GARDE A VUE, which
itself was based on the novel "Brainwash" by John Wainwright. This film was
initially entitled THIRD DEGREE.
This movie was filmed entirely on location in Puerto Rico.

Title
Review for Lucky Numbers (2000)
For more reviews and movie trailers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Not a great twelve months for either of the principals from this movie.
Earlier this year, Nora Ephron wrote and produced one of the year's least
likeable "comedies" called HANGING UP, featuring a bunch of annoying women
(ironically, Lisa Kudrow played one in that film as well) who barely have
time to care about anyone but themselves. Ick...real sweet stuff.
But her little unsuccessful project was nothing compared to what John
Travolta went through earlier this summer, with a film entitled BATTLEFIELD
EARTH. I seemed to be the only person on this planet who somehow appreciated
the film, even if it was on a "cheese" factor, as everybody, and I mean
everybody else, pretty much classified the movie as one of the worst
disasters of all time. Yipes...another beauty. So what happens when you put
these two people in the same room and come out with a movie co-starring the
ever-versatile Lisa Kudrow? Uhhhm, you guessed it...not much.
PLOT:
In order to escape major financial difficulties, a local weatherman hooks up
with his ball-picking lotto girlfriend and rigs the state lottery. But as
more and more people find out about their scheme, more and more people
demand a part of their winnings, and more and more problems arise.
CRITIQUE:
Simply stated, I didn't laugh once during this entire picture. For a comedy,
it offered me a few smiles, a bunch of nincompoops as characters, a miscast
John Travolta hamming it up and Lisa Kudrow, in what can only described as a
"sluttier" version of her character of Phoebe on TV's "Friends". This film
was not as disastrous as I thought it would be, but it was pretty close.
Thankfully, the clips of Travolta dressed up in goofy outfits, dancing as
the weatherman were left in the film's trailer, and not in this final cut.
And not unlike the worst movie of the year so far, BEAUTIFUL, this film also
managed to feature many unsympathetic, idiotic and just plain irritating
characters in its cast. Foremost was Travolta's character, who declined to
give us any reason to care for him once in the entire movie. And for me, the
casting choice of John Travolta for this role was just plain wrong. He
didn't fit the part. I just saw him in GET SHORTY the other day and thought
about how perfect he was for that role. A cool, calculating roughneck with a
certain hip, suave "je ne sais quoi". In this film, he looks like he's
trying to be funny, trying to be bad, trying to be good. We're not supposed
to be able to notice that, and when we do, at least in my case, I consider
it a wrong choice in casting.
Add that to Lisa Kudrow, boring us with yet another one of her patented
"dumb blonde" routines, but this time, dressed in sexier outfits. Michael
Rapaport, stretching one small acting muscle to play the guy who isn't quite
up at the same speed level as everyone else. And a truckload of empty
comedic bullet shells, and you've got yourself an extremely quiet audience
anticipating punch lines that never quite materialize. The only real good
thing that I could say about this film is that its story was actually
half-interesting and never really bored me. I also liked Michael Moore's
perverted cousin character, and I loved, and I say it again, loved the
character that Bill Pullman played. Give this dude his own movie! He played
a lazy cop, a man who tries everything not to do any real work. He fakes
injuries to get off duty, tries to avoid arrest situations so that he won't
have to fill out any forms...now there's a base of humor. Sadly, the
filmmakers decided to bring him into play with only about half an hour left
in the film. And there's not much else I can say about this movie, folks. On
the whole, it was lame, included a slew of unlikable characters fiddling
around in a pool of unfunny lines, and very little of interest for any
target audience. But get somebody to write up a movie featuring that lazy
cop played by Pullman and I'm there!

Title
Review for Cruel Intentions (1999)
For more reviews and movie trivia, visit http://www.joblo.com/
The plot of this film was apparently "suggested by" the French novel, Les
Liaisons Dangereuses, but unlike its three previous cinematic predecessors,
this one decides to stick some beautiful young men and women into its
presentation, with plenty of degrading and reprehensible behavior to go
around. Sexual innuendoes and actual teen promiscuity abound in this film
that takes all of the best elements from the latest teen flick craze, and
mixes in some good ol' fashioned back-stabbing, incest and of course, love.
PLOT:
Rich spoiled stepsister bets rich spoiled stepbrother that he will not be
able to seduce an angelic, self-proclaimed "virgin till she falls in love"
peach from Kansas. With manipulation methods in full-gear, our boy takes on
the task, knowing full well that a victory will prize him a shot at his
stepsister's own honey. A miss however, will mean the relinquishing of his
favorite car to said sibling.
CRITIQUE:
I hate to say it but I actually had a fun time at this movie. It was never
boring, always nice to look at, didn't take itself too seriously, and
actually managed to convey an interesting, if not over-the-top yet amusing,
story line. If you're between the ages of 15 and 21, I am willing to bet my
monkey that you will truly enjoy this movie to the max! Most of the audience
with whom I saw it this picture were of that age, and seemed quite
rambunctious and favorable about their appreciation of this film.
More than anything, I thought that the movie was a beauty to behold, with
its beautiful people leading the way to beautiful clothes, leading to
beautiful homes, leading to beautiful cars, and well, you get the picture.
The actors were catty and enjoyable to watch, if only for their grandiose
manners, and their capacity to remind me of an ill-fated, but a guilty
pleasure nonetheless, dramatic TV series from the 1980s called "Dynasty".
Think of this movie as a better-looking version of that show called Dynasty
Jr., with a whole lot more emphasis on raw sexuality. Meanwhile, actor Ryan
Phillippe continues to score points as the young, innocent looking boy with
the big, puffy lips. His real-life sweetum, Reese Witherspoon is also very
effective in her role as the cuddly-as-can-be virgin, but more than anyone,
it is Sarah Michelle Gellar that takes the proverbial cake as the baddest
bitch from hell! She must've had a blast making this movie, cause her role
goes all out!! All in all, I recognize the fact that this film is not gonna
change the world or anything, but it was nice to look during its quick
runtime, had a decent soundtrack, and offered quite a few laughs with a cool
ending. Tight-asses beware, this one's not for you! This film is not to be
taken seriously. Laugh along, and you might just enjoy it :)
Note: The film is strung with sexual situations, with attempts at
feather-ruffling coming the way of a clear shot of Phillippe's hard apple
behind, some under-the-cover male homosexual activity, and an extreme
close-up of Sarah Michelle and co-star Selma Blair french-kissing.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Ironically, Swoosie Kurtz actually repeats her role as Madame De Volanges
(Cecil's mother) in this current version.
Reese Witherspoon was truly discovered when her parents took her in for an
extra role in a film that was passing through town. Once seen by the
producers, she was moved into a role with actual lines, and eventually
garnered the lead role in that film. The movie was called THE MAN IN THE
MOON.

Title
Review for Scary Movie (2000)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
I generally rate "spoof films" by the number of jokes that work in the film
versus those that didn't. Classics like AIRPLANE, TOP SECRET and NAKED GUN
get high marks for achieving an exceptionally high ratio of jokes that hit
their mark, while others like MAFIA, HOT SHOTS and HIGH SCHOOL HIGH barely
rattle off an average of 50%. This film is Keenen Ivory Wayans' third shot
at the "spoof movie" gold, and after a decent effort with I'M GONNA GIT YOU
SUCKA and lackluster results with DON'T BE A MENACE..., it looks like he's
finally found the right formula. SCARY MOVIE is a funny movie.
PLOT:
Hmmm...how could I put this? Do you remember the story line from the
original SCREAM? Well, it's basically the same story but played out as a
parody. A bunch of teens pursued by an unknown mask-wearing killer. That's
about it. Mix in a few other lampoons of other films, and there you have it.
CRITIQUE:
The funniest movie that I've seen so far this year, I couldn't help but
crack up during every other second of this film's first 30 minutes, with
jokes a-plenty, an excellent re-creation of the spoofed films and spot-on
potshots at the teen horror genre. Parody films work when most of the jokes
in the film click, and this one had no problem delivering plenty of gross,
over-the-top and clever moments in supposed tribute to those films which
passed before it. Admittedly, the second half of the movie doesn't really
keep up the joke-a-minute pace that the first half hour establishes early
on, but plenty of funny moments still reside, lots of big laughs and a
pretty neat ending keep it enjoyable all the way through. Mind you, I was a
little hesitant about the film initially. I love the whole "spoof" genre and
worried about the six (count 'em, six!) people credited as screenwriters for
this movie. Fortunately for me, my worries were very short-lived as the
jokes began rattling of my funny bone within the first few seconds of this
flick.
Of course, the actors are always a very big part of movies such as this.
They have to able to play their roles very seriously, and I give the most
credit to Anna Faris in this regard, as she nailed the lead role down to a
tee. Shannon Elizabeth was also good as the big-boobed bimbo, as was Marlon
Wayans as the heterosexual jock with a few issues locked away in his closet.
I think Cheri Oteri's character was a little underused, and despite finding
most of the pot jokes pretty hilarious, I didn't really appreciate Shawn
Wayans' over-the-top goofy pothead character. But hey, maybe that's just me!
I also could have done without the whole MATRIX parody, which was already
covered in DEUCE BIGALOW, earlier this year. Overall, the movie delivers
laughs, clever moments a plenty, references galore, a cameo here and there,
and even some pretty gruesome moments of murder (although they do still
manage to lace those moments with humor just the same). In the end, I really
liked the movie because it basically made fun of all of the stuff we always
find unbelievable in horror films, and they did it while maintaining the
authenticity from the original films.
Incidentally, this film also makes fun of retarded people, is loaded with
fart jokes, gay humor, dick shots, sexual innuendo and provides enough
disgusting behavior to disgust anyone who...well, is disgusted by stuff like
that! For the rest of ya'll, if THERE'S SOMETHING ABOUT MARY and SOUTH PARK
were enjoyable to you, this one should be just another walk in the park.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
SCARY MOVIE was the original title of Kevin Williamson's SCREAM screenplay.
Some of the films that are spoofed in this one include the SCREAM flicks,
the I KNOW WHAT YOU DID... flicks, THE SIXTH SENSE, THE BLAIR WITCH PROJECT,
PULP FICTION, AMISTAD, TITANIC, THE USUAL SUSPECTS, THE MATRIX and a couple
of others, which I am sure to have missed. There is also an entire sequence
which essentially parodies a complete "whazzup!" commercial.
Carmen Electra's character spoofs the role Drew Barrymore played in the
original SCREAM movie. Which is why her character's name is Drew in this
one. Get it?
Shannon Elizabeth's name is Buffy in this film, an obvious reference to
"Buffy, The Vampire Slayer", the popular TV series starring Sarah Michelle
Gellar. Note that Shannon's dad in this film is referred to as "Mr. Gellar".
Just as in the original SCREAM movie, in which Henry Winkler played the
principal (he's best known for having played The Fonz on TV's "Happy Days"),
this one slapped another goofy leather-jacket wearing TV-star from the 70s
as the principal. Principal Squiggy is played by David Lander (best known
for his role as Squiggy on TV's "Laverne & Shirley").
This film was spliced together from two spoof scripts respectively named:
"Last Summer I Screamed Because Halloween Fell On Friday the 13th" and
"Scream If You Know What I Did Last Halloween".

Title
Review for Crimson Tide (1995)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
PLOT:
An American submarine is set out to sea after instability in Russia leads to
the possible threat of a nuclear attack. Nuclear devices aboard, the crew is
suddenly poised to launch the missiles after an emergency message advises of
an imminent Russian strike. Unfortunately, the last message received is cut
off halfway, so the crew is suddenly unsure of their mission. The Captain of
the ship believes that they should launch the missiles, while the XO thinks
they should wait for confirmation. Tensions rise and mutiny abounds.
CRITIQUE:
Thrilling, entertaining, claustrophobic, interesting, tense, are only a few
of the words that I can use to describe this successful submarine thriller
solidly anchored by the superior performances from two of today's top actors
in the prime of their form, Denzel Washington and Gene Hackman. Despite an
overload of technical terms, this film still managed to capture my attention
and interest with a plausible situation, credible actors (Mortensen rocks!),
an environment about which I knew very little and spitlets of comic relief.
The buildup of the film was also managed quite dramatically with a
burgeoning tension as it moved along at a rapid pace. Who would have thought
that a film set almost entirely in a submarine could capture my attention to
the point that it did? Credit goes to director Tony Scott for this
accomplishment and the effectiveness of the story.  This film is not about
action either, it's basically about being in a situation where two people
may be right, but a decision has to be made, and the fate of a billion
people may lie in its wake. Pretty tense, no?
All in all, this film is an excellent nacho-plate movie, waiting to be
enjoyed by groups of people who enjoy high-energy, macho thrillers brimming
in mood, excellent actors and a unique environment.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Gene Hackman's role was originally offered to Al Pacino.
Blink or you'll miss 'em roles: Pay close to attention to this film and you
will see actor Ryan Phillippe in his first motion picture role as Seaman
Grattam, Steve Zahn in one of his first roles as William Barnes and Rick
Schroder (?), that's right l'il Ricky Schroder, in one of his few screen
roles, as Lt. Paul Hellerman. Schroder's character has to follow one of the
grimmest orders in the entire film. Pay close attention. There is also an
uncredited cameo by Jason Robards at the end of this film.
Quentin Tarantino was an uncredited "polish" writer for this film, managing
to include such pop-fare as the whole "Silver Surfer" debate, and surely the
"Star Trek" references as well. Another Tarantino-ism can be found in the
character name "Russell Vossler" which is a reference to Rand Vossler, a
friend of Quentin's from his days working at the Video Archives video store.
Vossler was also used in PULP FICTION. It was one of the names on the
marquee of Bruce Willis' boxing match. Director Tony Scott once directed an
entire film out of Quentin's own script called TRUE ROMANCE (10/10). One of
my favorite films of all-time.
Other well-known screenwriters were also used to punch up the script
including Robert Towne and Steve Zaillian who also contributed key scenes,
including the "Von Clausewicz" scene having to do with the essential nature
of war, which Towne apparently added.
The name of the submarine in this film is the "Alabama". The University of
Alabama's football team is called "The Crimson Tide", and their coach's
nickname is "Bear", which is the name of the Alabama's captain's dog in this
film. Coincidence or major conspiracy?? :)
Among the many factual errors in this film, the Lippizane horses do have
some Spanish descent, but are essentially bred at the Austrian Imperial Stud
at Lippiza.

Title
Review for Sugar & Spice (2001)
For more reviews and movie wallpapers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
PLOT:
A cute and cuddly cheerleading squad consider robbing a bank, when their
captain gets preggers and must deal with the harsh reality of paying bills,
etc... The girls watch movies and talk to some real-life con-women to get
prepared for their roles.
CRITIQUE:
Despite my rating of "so-so", I was actually disappointed with this movie
because its fresh and punchy premise started off strong, only to disappear
in the film's less than impressive second half. What the heck happened
there? Here's a movie that bangs out on all cylinders, give you a few
smiles, a few laughs, some dark comedy and a very cool idea, and suddenly
about halfway through, the screenwriter seems to have given up on the whole
thing and just wrapped it all up with some filler. I'd love to know what
happened. If anyone associated with this production can explain this to me,
please email me...seriously! My theory is that the "premise" of the movie
alone sold it to the production company. "Five wholesome cheerleading
teenage girls out to rob banks"-- where do we sign? But once production
started, they probably realized that they actually had to make a complete
story out of this very cool premise and despite the second half playing
"okay", most people will likely be let down. Seemed kinda anticlimactic to
me. But all is not lost, since the film does still ring original, which is
why I would still recommend it to most.
Just take some HEATHERS, grab a stick o' RESERVOIR DOGS and dash it all up
with some BRING IT ON (natch, the film grossed all kinds of dough last year)
and that's pretty much what you've got here, albeit...on a very light tip.
The girls are all very good in their roles, over-the-top, goofy and pretty
sexy for the most part. Teenage boys can't really go wrong with this movie,
as the girls love to walk around in their cutesy-patootsy cheerleading
outfits no matter where they go, and we even get a couple of Victoria's
Secret moments. Woo-hoo! And teenage girls will likely connect to the whole
concept of wanting to rob banks in Betty masks...uuuhmmm, well, you get the
idea. Female empowerment, rah-rah and all that jazz! And howsabout that
James Marsden? Yowsa! And kudos to the makers of this film for tipping the
proper cap of homage out to their influences such as POINT BREAK, HEAT and
many more. So what can you take away from this review? Well, I liked the
whole "idea" of the movie, enjoyed most of its execution, till about the
half-way point, and was pretty disappointed in the film's second half (which
slowed and seemed to forget about one character in particular...what the
hell?) and its very weak ending. I don't know what to tell you, kids. I'm
pretty much in the middle on this one. Great marketing, cool premise, creepy
masks, but in the end, too much unrealized potential. Check out my ratings
of similar films below and see if you jive with me at all.
PS: And by the way, Heather Graham does not star in this movie! I know, I
know...the lead girl looks EXACTLY like her, but trust me when I tell you
that it's not her. It took The Arrow and I some time to figure this out, but
geez, do they ever look alike or what? The actress' name in question in
Marley Shelton.
Where's JoBlo coming from?
Charlie's Angels (8/10) - Election (7/10) - Heathers (8/10) - Heat (8/10) -
Point Break (7/10) - Reservoir Dogs (9/10)

Title
Review for Get Carter (2000)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Revenge seems to be a popular motif in films nowadays. Last year, Ashley
Judd pulled in over $100 million for her woman out for revenge flick
entitled DOUBLE JEOPARDY. 1999 also showcased Steven Soderbergh's nod to
revenge in THE LIMEY starring Terrence Stamp, which was about a man lookin'
to kick ass in the name of vengeance. And Quentin Tarantino is also rumored
to be scripting his next picture about a woman out for revenge. So what's
everybody so pissed off about? Not sure but after seeing this movie, I
wouldn't want to be caught on the wrong side of Sly Stallone's cranky
mood...brrrrr...
PLOT:
A professional "financial adjuster" (aka mob enforcer) comes home after
hearing of his younger brother's death and questions the drinking and
driving story which apparently killed him. The man suspects foul play and
goes looking for payback. He kicks a lot of ass, asks a lot of questions and
then kicks a little more ass. He also gets to know his late brother's
daughter a little better.
CRITIQUE:
Although not an action movie as portrayed in the hip trailer, this highly
stylized crime film worked for me despite its slow pace and somewhat
predictable story line, because of the sharp turn given by Sly Stallone, its
groovy tunes and its generally dark and gritty nature. I think that most
people who go in expecting a typical Stallone movie, or what the trailer
makes the film appear to be (an all-out brawl), will be disappointed. So try
to go in with an open mind and think about the film more in the realm of
last year's THE LIMEY, about a guy just looking out for his family...and
pissed! He goes from place to place, questions people, kicks a little ass
when he needs to, and moves on to the next clue. I enjoyed the movie on the
basis of style, soundtrack, the cool fight scenes and the 70s style car
chases. I also really liked the character that Stallone was playing, a bad
guy who despite his badness, wins our hearts because of the supposed good
that he's looking to do in honor of his brother's untimely death. Okay, so
he won my heart...he might not win yours! One definite problem that the film
does have, besides a mystery which to be honest, wasn't all that mysterious
in my eyes, is the supporting characters, who ultimately don't add up to
much. Miranda Richardson is given second billing but I have no idea why. She
is barely in the film. The same could be said for any of the other bit
characters, Mickey Rourke, Alan Cumming and John C. McGinley. Small roles
which don't really give you much insight.
Rachael Leigh Cook does get in the mix with Stallone a bit, and the
chemistry between the two was good, but the bottom line with this movie is
Stallone, Stallone, Stallone! If you dig the big lug, you will more than
likely enjoy this easy-paced dramatic turn for the puppy-eyed bastard!
(Bastard meant in a "good" way here, folks. No letters, please!). I was
personally very happy to see Sly up on the big screen again with some solid
acting on his part, palpable screen presence and plenty of cool one-liners
(And yes, despite most of the one-liners being good, some did fall flat).
This film is not for everyone, not sure if Jimmy Jack Corn will appreciate
the extreme darkness of the lead character, but if you're looking for a
tough, intense, gritty character...don't look any further than this dude,
Carter. He simply doesn't f**k around. Stay tuned for a particularly
effective scene of him and another guy in the woods...nuff said! So overall,
despite the film's predictability and underdeveloped side-characters, the
movie's got a lot of style, a great soundtrack, an awesome performance from
Stallone as the ultimate man on a mission and boy, does he look great in
those suits or what? Anyhoo...not a keeper but definitely one to check out
for all Stallone fans. Adriaaaaaaaaannnn!!!
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Sylvester Stallone's middle name is Enzio. And yes, he has been MIA since
1997's COPLAND, a film which ironically landed him many an acting praise and
only $60,000 in salary. One of Stallone's earliest roles was as the "Subway
Tough Guy" in the 1971 Woody Allen comedy BANANAS. He did not have a line in
the movie. You may have also heard about his up and coming Formula One movie
which is scheduled to come out in 2001 entitled DRIVEN, but did you know
that other than starring in the film, Stallone also wrote the screenplay? Of
course, Stallone received an Oscar-nomination for writing 1976's ROCKY.
Stallone has an autistic son named Seargeo.
The man who wrote this film, David McKenna, also wrote one of the best
movies of 1998 entitled AMERICAN HISTORY X.
This is director Stephen T. Kay's second feature film, his first was 1997's
THE LAST TIME I COMMITTED SUICIDE starring Keanu Reeves. Sadly, he also had
something to do with the screenplay for last year's THE MOD SQUAD debacle.
He's known primarily as an actor with his many stints on TV shows such as
"General Hospital", "Party of Five", "Murder, She Wrote" and
"Thirtysomething".
This film is "based on" the 1971 film GET CARTER starring Michael Caine, and
not an exact remake. Caine played Jack Carter in the original and plays the
bar owner in this one. Both films are actually based on Ted Lewis' novel
entitled "Jack's Return Home".

Title
Review for Fallen (1998)
For more reviews and movie trivia, visit http://www.joblo.com/
PLOT:
Prize cop is haunted by the soul of a murderer whom he helped capture. Even
after the execution of said killer, the spirit of the man returns in others,
and is passed around different bodies by the slightest touch.
CRITIQUE:
A fascinating and creepy premise, as well as an authentic performance by
Washington, and an inventive stylish look, wrestle this film from its "just
another serial killer" roots, and qualify it as an interesting, occasionally
suspenseful supernatural thriller. Some aspects of the film didn't work for
me, like Washington's home life, the way the killer kept leaving cryptic
clues which Washington always ended up finding and solving (how original!),
and the final, final scene, which seemed tacked on for obvious reasons. That
aside, the film kept me interested with its original tale of the Azazel
spirit switch, a little action, and some suspense. But I will admit that I
felt like they could've done so much more with the subject matter at hand.
Other than Washington, the cast were throwaways like Gandolfini in a
funny-looking fu-manchu mustache, Donald Sutherland playing yet another
authoritative gruffy ol' coot, and John Goodman stapling himself into his
mainstay role of the main cop's buddy partner. I also enjoyed the resolution
that Washington deduced by the film's slick conclusion. All in all, a decent
serial killer thriller that doesn't come close to the ultimate in the genre,
SEVEN (9.5/10), but does come up with an intriguing premise, a solid
performance from Washington, and just enough suspense to keep you on your
toes for its two hour runtime. Just remember..."Time is on your side". :)
Little known facts about the movie and its stars:
Screenwriter Nicholas Kazan is the son of infamous director Elia Kazan.


Title
Review for Gladiator (2000)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Rave reviews about this movie have been trickling onto the Net for months
now. Russell Crowe is an extremely hot commodity after his Oscar nomination
for THE INSIDER, and Ridley Scott has been due for a big movie for some time
now. With all of these expectations brewing in my little head, I was just
asking to be disappointed in this hyped film, but once I got into my seat,
absorbed battle scene after crazy battle scene, I couldn't help but be drawn
into this motion picture event myself. See it for yourself. It's solid.
PLOT:
A highly respected general of the Roman Empire is stripped of his livelihood
and family, when the son of the recently deceased Emperor decides that he is
a threat to his leadership. Enslaved and forced to join the gladiator
circuit and fight for survival, it isn't long before the fallen man
discovers a way to return to Rome and face the man who ruined his life.
CRITIQUE:
A sprawling epic set ablaze by massive sets, genuine authenticity, awesome
battle sequences and yes, even a good ol' fashioned story dipped in love,
power and revenge. And to top it off, this film officially christens Russell
Crowe as an all-out "movie star", a man laced with superior acting talent,
an impressive body of work and a rugged handsomeness to boot! Having seen
him in several interviews, Crowe comes across as the ultimate unpretentious
actor, whose down-to-earth manner and subtle charm endears him to most
anyone who follows his work. A man's man starring in a film created for men,
but ultimately accessible to all. The film's strong points are
unquestionably highlighted in its various battle scenes, but don't let it be
said that these fights are set adrift in a plot-less movie. In fact, many
internal struggles take place in this picture with love, redemption,
revenge, honor, tradition, allegiance and blackmail all making personal
appearances. For perverts, incest also plays a part in the festivities,
albeit a small one, but it is the film's sheer scale which demonstrates its
grandest achievement. All we kept thinking about as we walked out of the
theatre was how Hollywood has been rebooting crappy TV shows into movies for
the past decade now, and no one, and I mean no one, ever thought to bring
back the Roman action flicks.
Kudos to Ridley Scott for having the balls to go ahead with it, and further
kudos to him for managing to pull it off so magnificently. God knows copycat
producers are already developing various incarnations of this film for next
summer, but this will surely be the one to remember. You always remember
your first. A couple of minor complaints of mine include the so-so showing
by Phoenix, who seemed to be "acting" a little too much for my taste, some
scenes which dragged on for a few minutes too long, and the general
predictability of the story. Of course, none of these minor details made
much of a dent in my overall enjoyment of the movie, which was all but
certified with a great ending, accentuated by some effective emotional
drama. Yes...I even got a little choked up. Of course, you don't have to
take my word for it, you can read just about every other review of this film
on the Net, the majority of which praise the movie through and through. In
the end, you will more than likely get your money's worth on this picture if
the story and trailer appeals to you. Now put your hands together and
welcome back...the epic motion picture!!
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Russell Crowe had no problem packing on 40 pounds for his Oscar-nominated
role in THE INSIDER, but took much longer to lose the weight for this film.
With his cholesterol level being at such a high rate, the Australian actor
only managed to lose 5 pounds after his first five weeks of working out
alone. Russell also accepted the role on a giant leap of faith. When
presented to him, they basically said "We don't have a script which is good
now, but we've got a concept. Ridley Scott...185 A.D...you start the movie
as a Roman General. Want to talk to Ridley?" Russell immediately agreed.
He's been acting since the age of six and smoking since the age of ten.
Joaquin Phoenix was born with a cleft lip, and is the younger brother of
late actor River Phoenix. Joaquin was the one who made the 911 phone call on
the night his brother overdosed at the Viper Room.
The character of Maximus is purely fictional, but the rest are all drawn out
of the history books.
Actor Oliver Reed, who portrayed the role of Proximo in this film, died of
apparent heart failure toward the end of filming.

Title
Review for Psycho (1998)
For more reviews and trivia, go to http://surf.to/joblo
Thirty-eight years after the original release of Alfred Hitchcock's
classic thriller PSYCHO, director Gus Van Sant, best known for his
Oscar nominated film GOOD WILL HUNTING (7.5/10), takes on the task of
recreating an exact "replica" of the film, with up-to-date actors,
color film stock instead of black & white, and a few minor changes. 
PLOT:
Marion Crane decides to rob $400,000 from her employer in order to help
her lover get out of debt. She leaves town, but unexpectedly gets
caught in a rainstorm, and must stop off at the Bates Motel for a
night. This is where she meets Norman Bates, the owner of said
establishment. Norman operates the motel and takes care of his ill
mother. They talk and eat, after which she goes off to take a shower.
Thrilling moments ensue, as a private detective, Marion's lover and
sister all get involved in a mystery.
CRITIQUE:
Slow, well-manufactured film with solid performances by its leads,
doesn't have enough tension to be qualified a real thriller, and
basically makes you question its remake in the first place. This film
has some good moments, many long-winded scenes, an excellent eye for
style and great performances by actors who basically had to recreate
characters that were considered historical in the eyes of many
movie-goers. The one actor who stood out from the pack was definitely
the rising star of the year, Vince Vaughn, who took Anthony Perkins'
superb original performance, and added his own macabre touch of
surrealism.
The directing of this film was basically a "shot-for-shot" remake of
the original, and therein, remained extremely stylish and original, in
classic Hitchcock style. Van Sant did take some initiative in regards
to little changes here and there, but on the whole, the film still
played like it could have been set in the 50's or 60's. Having said
that, the film's main peg of disinterest for me was its slow pace and
even slower build-up. I guess I have just gotten used to the greater
quantity of thrills in the thrillers of nowaday, and just didn't
appreciate the snails pace build-up of this story in respect to its end
result.
Having said that, this film might be better appreciated by those who
never saw the original, since they would not be privy to the film's
basic story line and twist, allowing for a greater interest in the
mystery of the whole thing. All in all, the film does offer some great
performances by its actors, with Vaughn offering another standout
performance, some stylish cinematography, but ultimately runs at too
slow a pace, without offering enough real thrills, to keep me
interested. I think my good friend The Arrow said it best when he
turned to me at the end of this film and said "Unnecessary. Why not
re-release the original instead of this?" No real improvement, no real
surprises, just a recreation of a film that played very well in its
original state in the 60's, but suffers somewhat in its imitation form
of the 90's.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
This new PSYCHO was shot at the same studio as the original and used
the same compressed six-week schedule. The film cost $20 million
compared to the $800,000 that Hitchcock spent on the original in 1960.
Director Gus Van Sant also makes a cameo in the film during the same
scene that Hitchcock himself made an appearance over 30 years ago. He
also thanks fellow director John Woo for the use of his "kitchen knife"
in the end credits of this film, and was one of the executive producers
on the 1995 film KIDS (8/10).
Nicole Kidman turned down the role that eventually went to Anne Heche
in this picture.
The bassist of the Red Hot Chili Peppers, Flea, makes an appearance in
this film as Viggo Mortensen's co-worker. He also played a part in Gus
Van Sant's classic pic MY OWN PRIVATE IDAHO (7.5/10), which starred
Keanu Reeves and River Phoenix, and rode in the ambulance alongside
River, on the night that he died from a drug overdose. His real name is
Michael Balzary, and he was born in Australia.
Vince Vaughn stands 6"5. When asked about the last time that he cried,
Vince offered this little anecdote: "When I was a small, small child,
Elvis was passing through Evanston, getting a hamburger. And he bought
me and my mama one. And he said, "Son, you've got a twinkle in your
eye, don't let anybody tell you that you can't do this. And that was
the last time I cried." Vaughn's big break came when he appeared in a
nationally televised Chevrolet commercial in 1989. Steven Spielberg was
impressed with Vaughn's performance in SWINGERS (8.5/10), after he saw
a tape of the film when the film's producers approached him about the
possibility of using the theme music from JAWS (7.5/10) for a scene in
which Vaughn's Trent cozies up to an unsuspecting young woman at a
party. Spielberg liked him enough to cast him in the monster hit THE
LOST WORLD (7/10).
Julianne Moore's real name is Julie Anne Smith.
Actress Rita Wilson, who plays the other secretary in this film, is Tom
Hanks' wife in real life.

Title
Review for Rage: Carrie 2, The (1999)
For more reviews and movie trivia, visit http://www.joblo.com/
In 1976, director Brian DePalma created a legendary thriller based on a
best-selling novel by the horror-meister himself, Stephen King. Sissy Spacek
played the lead and garnered an Oscar nomination for her role. Even John
Travolta showed up for the fun. Twenty-two years later, in the midst of
teen-flick mania, some wise folks over in Hollywood decided to update the
film for the kids of today. Bad idea.
PLOT:
Girl#1 meets boy#1. Boy#1 sleeps with girl#1. Girl#1 tells her best friend,
girl#2, she really digs the guy. Guy#1 tells his friends that he doesn't
give a crap about girl#1. Girl#1 finds out. Girl#1 does something real nasty
to herself. One of the guy's friends now starts liking girl#2. Is he using
her as well? Does he really like her? Not sure, but either way, girl#2
possesses telekinetic powers by which she can move things with her mind when
she is upset, and hurt people real bad. Enjoy the movie.
CRITIQUE:
Lame, predictable, slow and not scary...and those are its good points! I
wish I could say that this film had something going for it, but it doesn't
even have any cheap T&A shots, pop-culture humor, or one decent, hip teen TV
star to gaze at (Okay, I know the kid from "Home Improvement" is in it, but
he ain't really all that hip.) If you've seen the trailers for this movie,
you've pretty much seen the only exciting parts of this entire film. It
starts off slow, it continues to go slow, and then eventually downshifts
into the most anti-climactic and foreseeable ending this side of the PSYCHO
remake! The best part about this movie is when they splice in shots of the
original CARRIE, and that's not saying much. Amy Irving, we forgive, because
this is the best that you could muster at this point of your career. The
rest of the cast is lame and forgettable, non-withstanding Jason London
(Twin brother of the kid who starred in Kevin Smith's MALLRATS, Jeremy), and
Emily Bergl in her feature film debut.
If you're looking for a bad horror movie, this is it!!! I saw this film at a
sneak preview, where most of the audience got in for free, and even then,
people we're walking out! By the end of this cinematic gig, most people were
rolling in the aisles with laughter, but not because of the humor in the
film, but for the cruel joke that we had all just been a party to. Even the
soundtrack sucked. All in all, I would recommend this film only to those who
love to see bad horror movies, or cheezy remakes that blow chunks.
Otherwise, skip this dull follow-up and rent the original TEXAS CHAINSAW
MASSACRE, if you really want to get the schmekkies scared out of ya!
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Amy Irving actually made her feature film debut in the original CARRIE. She
was the only survivor of the infamous prom night inferno (It's scary to
think that she actually got original director DePalma's okay on this project
as she notes in the press clippings, "I talked to Brian DePalma about it, to
get his blessing, and he thought it was a great idea and I should go for
it."
Emily Bergl, who plays the lead in this incarnation, is also making her
feature film debut. She was originally born in England, but mainly grew up
around the Chicago area. In 1993, she was a national champion in Poetry
Reading (National Forensic League).
Elijah Craig also makes his big-screen debut in this movie. His mom is
actress Sally Field.
Dylan Bruno, who plays the character of Mark in this film, graduated from
MIT with an engineering degree in 1993. His latest role was in Steven
Spielberg's SAVING PRIVATE RYAN.
Jason London is real-life twins with actor Jeremy London of TV's "Party of
Five". He is married, and has a daughter named Cooper.
Zachery Ty Bryan has played the role of Bradley Michael Taylor on TV's "Home
Improvement" since 1991.
Director Katt Shea plays the role of the Deputy DA in this film.
Actor John Doe, who plays Rachel foster dad in this pic, got his name during
his years in the punk rock band "X".
Producer Paul Monash also produced the original CARRIE back in 1976. He
hadn't produced anything since.

Title
Review for Playing by Heart (1998)
For more reviews and movie trivia, visit http://www.joblo.com
Originally entitled DANCING ABOUT ARCHITECTURE (i.e. "Talking about love is
like dancing about architecture"), but changed because it sounded too much
like the recent box-office dud DANCING AT LUGHNASA, this film slaps together
a stunning cast of Hollywood names, playing interesting and well-written
characters, within a vignettes-styled plot arrangement a la Robert Altman.
PLOT:
Follow the lives of several couples falling in and out of love, finding
themselves, regaining a clearer understanding of the people that they are,
and who they want, and appreciating the fine emotional art of love.
CRITIQUE:
Charmingly effective romantic drama, this film offers insight into various
types of relationships, presents us with interesting characters and
excellent performances from the cast, and scratches beneath the surface of
love and its many complex subtleties. How do people fall in love? Why do
people fall out of love? How do people fall back into love, once they've
been hurt and left to join the Lonely Hearts Club? All of these questions
and more, are touched upon in this film, within several types of variant
relationships.
Meet a hip, young couple going through their first date. A divorcee
attempting to date again after her many failed relationships. A married
woman "finding herself" while cheating on her husband. A husband letting go
of his inhibitions. An older couple dealing with a past "love" of the man, a
secret recently uncovered. A son dying from AIDS, joined by his mother at
the hospital. There are many nuances to this picture, and many ideas and
quotes to which we could all relate, but more importantly, there is
diversity. Diversity of relationships helped me and my gang of friends enjoy
this film on many levels. Some related to the younger couples' issues.
Others with the married. There's a little bit of everything for everyone in
here. And I would bet dollars to donuts that if I were to watch this film
again in a year, I would relate myself to yet another predicament. Just like
love itself, this movie is distinct and appreciated by all on many different
levels.
The actors in this film are all also very, very good. Sean Connery is solid
as the older man with some issues to resolve, as is Gena Rowlands, as the
aging wife with trepidations. Jolie comes out of this film a star with a
great performance, while Philippe is as pretty-boy as ever. Anderson leaves
Scully far behind with her wonderful portrayal of a damaged woman trying to
re-ignite her love life, opposite a surprisingly admirable performance by
former talk-show host, Jon Stewart. Even Dennis Quaid manages to step
outside of his overacting shoes in this film, and offers a convincing show
of a man lost within his own imagination. The only piece of this puzzle
which left me somewhat detached, was the part surrounding Jay Mohr, the man
dying from AIDS, and his mother, Ellen Burstyn. The actors were fine, but
somehow, the piece seemed out of place within the realm of everything else.
The ending of this film was also a little too saccharine for me, but I guess
that's just Hollywood. This film is actually a lot like YOUR FRIENDS AND
NEIGBORS (5.5/10) and HAPPINESS (4.5/10) in concept and style, but its
complete anthesis in regards to character relatibility and likeness. The
characters in those films were too unique and inhuman for anyone to care, as
opposed to this film, which offers rich and believable characters, living
real lives and talking about real issues in today's relationships.
All in all, this movie offers many interesting characters, talking and
living genuine and engaging love lives, wonderful performances by its solid
cast, too sweet of an ending, but an enjoyable and rewatchable movie
nonetheless.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
According to a story in the London Sunday Mirror, Sean Connery asked for
only $60,000 for his role in this movie, as compared to his usual fee of $14
million, because he liked the script so much. On top of that, he convinced
his co-stars (including Gena Rowlands, Gillian Anderson, Ellen Burstyn, et
al.) to do the same.
This is director/writer Willard Carroll second real foray into the world of
"adult films". Before this, he had written and produced many children's
movies.
Gillian Anderson stands 5'2.
Angelina Jolie's full name is Angelina Jolie Voight. She is actor Jon
Voight's daughter. She has trained and performed at the Lee Strasberg
Theatre Institute. She divorced actor Jonny Lee Miller of TRAINSPOTTING
(8.5/10) fame in 1997. They were married in 1995.
Actor Ryan Phillippe's full name is Matthew Ryan Phillippe. He stands 5'9,
and spent his childhood in New Castle, Delaware. His acting career started
on TV's "One Life to Live". He portrayed daytime television's first gay
teenager.
Jon Stewart's full name is Jonathan Stewart Leibowitz.
This film was originally entitled IF THEY ONLY KNEW and DANCING ABOUT
ARCHITECTURE.
Watch for movie posters from SWINGERS (8.5/10), CHASING AMY (7/10) and THE
TEXAS CHAINSAW MASSACRE (8/10) at the movie theatre where the characters of
Joan and Keenan go on their first date.

Title
Review for Any Given Sunday (1999)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
In any given year, director Oliver Stone will attempt to focus his manic
tendencies into a version of reality seen through the eyes of a man who's
been through wars, Wall Street, the White House, Jim Morrison's dirty
laundry and a long, summer heat with Sean Penn and Jennifer Lopez. Now
whether you dig the man's style, personality, odor or not (I do), there is
one thing that we can all agree on: there is no one like Olly Stone! Cheers
daddy-o and smoke 'em if you got 'em!
PLOT:
An old-school football coach is faced with the possibility of ending the
season without his number one veteran quarterback. Luckily for him, a
younger, cockier QB is ready to take his spot in the limelight, but as per
his ego, the strappin' lad cares little about the sport, his teammates or
anyone else for that matter. And as the playoffs approach and the team's
headstrong owner looms overhead, the coach must figure out how his team is
going to overcome the odds to win the big game, win each others respect and
ultimately win as men.
CRITIQUE:
Football fans rejoice, this film is tailor-made for you. Everyone else,
uhhmm....well, close your ears and get ready for an overlong, over-stylized
humpty-dumpty ride of loud banging music, loud crashing football players and
a loud, but surprisingly predictable, script. Stars galore, many wasted,
this film offers more names than any recent Woody Allen flick. Check Pacino,
as the old school coach, tough, rugged, chips on his shoulder but still
ballsy enough to get shit done. Good job. Check Diaz, going against type as
a strong-willed woman fighting to make her voice heard in a sport run wildly
by men with giant egos and wallets. Solid effort. You can even check Jamie
Foxx, last minute replacement for Puff Daddy, as the cocky, new kid on the
block, looking fine, feeling fine and acting, well, pretty damn fine. The
rest, uuuhhm, James Woods, pretty one-dimensional, Lauren Holly, even more
one-dimensional, Elizabeth Berkley, looking the mess, LL Cool J, underused,
and Matthew Modine, wow, what an insignificant career move, my friend.
The story, you ask? Well, the story is so-so interesting with much of it
predictable to anyone who has seen any other Hollywood sports movie done in
the past 50 years or so. Does Stone bring an extra stick of hot-peppered
pinnace to the proceedings? Sure, but unfortunately it materializes itself
mostly in many ridiculously overdone "symbolic" camera shots inter-spliced
between characters speaking to one another (Can anyone please explain the
whole Ben-Hur thing to me? Deeeeeep?), and some really cool scenes featuring
bang-up football at its best, but very little "insight" into the game
itself. I mean, by now anyone with a remote control knows that YES, some
sports doctors do allow their players to go on playing injured, YES, most
modern sports athletes think a lot more about the money than they do the
game itself, and YES, owners are generally cold-hearted pricks with very
little more on their mind than the bottom line. Nothing new here, folks.
Unless of course these accepted stereotypes were new to you, than oops, I
guess you might find something a little fresh in this story.
So why do I still rate this film as a "good movie"? It's simple really. It's
one great big kickass rock n' roll rappin' ride through the wonderful world
of professional football, including its rough and tumble menageries on the
green, its extra-curricular partying with the booze and the drugs and the
whores, and its ultimate high of winning the big game, teammates strapped by
your side. Basically, it's your ultimate testosterone rush, and unless you
spend your Sunday afternoons meditating over the "golf" channels, or you get
bored seeing football scene after football scene being followed by a party
scene and a "time to move the plot forward dialogue scene", this film should
blow your eardrums and eye-sockets right out of your ass! Wham-bam, thank
you man! (Bring your own condoms)
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
On March 8, 1999, The New York Daily News reported that actor Jamie Foxx had
filed assault charges against rapper-actor LL Cool J after the two had a
dust-up on the set of this movie. Foxx apparently claimed that LL socked him
in the face while they were filming a scene for the movie.
Plenty of real football folks pepper this film's cast, most notably an
impressive turn by LT (Lawrence Taylor) as Shark, Jim Brown as defensive
coordinator of the Sharks, Warren Moon, Ricky Watters, as well as Dick
Butkus and Johnny Unitas featured as opposing coaches. Ex-Dallas Cowboys
coach Barry Switzer also takes a turn as a sports announcer, alongside the
writer/director of this film himself, Oliver Stone (who can be seen taking a
sip o' booze from his post high atop the proceedings early on in the film).
Sean "Puffy" Combs' official statement regarding his dropping out of this
movie from the role of Willie Beaman was that "Following numerous scheduling
changes that created conflicts with my other professional commitments, it is
clear that this is not a film in which I will be involved."
Veterans to Oliver Stone films include the always-funny John C. McGinley,
who makes his sixth appearance in a Stone pic with this one, and James
Woods, who shows up for number five.
This film is based partly on the novel written by Rob Huizenga entitled
"You're okay, it's just a bruise: A doctor's sideline secrets about pro
football's most outrageous team".
Male frontal nudity is also featured in this film, but none of the stars,
including Al Pacino, Dennis Quaid, Jamie Foxx or LL Cool J take part. Of
course, we all know that LL Cool J. stands for "Ladies Love Cool James".
Pretty corny, but hey, the man made it stick, so leave him alone! James
Smith is his real name.
Why no mention of the NFL you may ask? Considering the unyielding, honest,
and free depiction of professional football that Stone wanted to portray in
this film, he also wanted to splash an element of fiction in its physical
backdrops. Ultimately, the filmmakers and the National Football League
agreed to disagree, without interference from one party to the other, and
thus, the AFFA (Association of Football Franchises of America) was born, the
professional football league to which the Miami Sharks and all other teams
depicted in ANY GIVEN SUNDAY belong. In fact, the Shark Stadium, where the
fictitious Miami Sharks play football in this film, is actually the Orange
Bowl Stadium, in Miami, Florida.

Title
Review for Way of the Gun, The (2000)
For more reviews, screensavers, trailers & more, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Writer/director Christopher McQuarrie seems to have taken quite a bit of
time off after his 1995 Oscar triumph for Best Screenplay for THE USUAL
SUSPECTS. McQuarrie was apparently being asked to do another crime film
wherever he went, and decided to make one himself so that "no one would ever
ask him to make another crime film again". Hmmm...strange wish, but okay!
Now let's see how Chris handles the directing end of things.
PLOT:
Two out-of-luck schnooks looking for a fortune to save them from their dead
end lives, kidnap a surrogate mother with hopes of demanding big-time moolah
from the rich parents of the baby upcoming. Of course, things never go off
without a hitch, and the two boys quickly have to deal with problems
arising. This includes the two bodyguards who were hired to protect her, the
bagman, who wants to make a deal with them, and the surrogate mother
herself, who turns out to be more than a handful.
CRITIQUE:
This film's got plenty of style and blood to spare, even a couple of decent
rat-tat-tat scenes tossed here and there, but the plot is just too elaborate
for its own good. Coming from the writer of THE USUAL SUSPECTS, I certainly
expected some confusion, although not to this extent, but I damn sure didn't
expect this film to be so boring at times. Yeah, that's right, there is a
whole stretch at the center of this movie that is just plain tedious. The
film features about three very cool shoot-out scenes, a very funny opening
scene and fills the rest of its time going back and forth between way too
many characters all bitching about who's gonna do what to do whom
next...over and over and over again. "And here's my
motivation"...bla-bla-bla-bla-bla...can we get on with it already!? Of
course, the biggest problem is that you just don't care about any of these
characters, so while they're all going on and on about what they want to do
and what they think should be done next, you're just left wondering why the
film isn't keeping you all that interested. Add to that, the fact that many
of the characters eventually start revealing connecting relationships to one
another, and it all starts feeling a little too much like a giant soap opera
with bullets.
Overall, I would say that I was disappointed with the film. I suppose that
my expectations were a bit too high and few of them were met. Sure, Benicio
Del Toro was good as usual, the score appropriately dour, reminiscent of the
Leone flicks with that extra Tex-Mex feel, and the shoot out scenes really
loud (and I mean LOUD!) and bloody (Peckinpah anyone?). But with so much
downtime and overwrought dialogue, a lot of which just felt "written", I
just didn't like enough things in the movie. It's also the kind of film that
seems to want you to see it a couple of more times in order to fully absorb
its convoluted plotline. What a shame. A great trailer, some really cool
actors, including Diggs and Caan who both come off very well, but ultimately
way too many stupid side characters, like the dweeby doctor and the
completely one-dimensional bitchy wife, and the film erodes under its own
over-ambition. And even though blood never really bothers me, though it
might bother some people after this movie, I was particularly taken aback by
one bloody "operation" scene near the end of the film that just grossed me
out completely. A little "overdone", I thought.
All in all, I suppose I was not "taken" by as much of this film as I had
hoped but certainly wouldn't qualify it as a bad picture. Others may enjoy
it for their own reasons, and I will admit that it does contain many
positive elements, including a memorable score, solid directing and some
great shoot-out scenes. Check it out and let me know what you think.

Title
Review for Nutty Professor II: The Klumps (2000)
For more reviews and movie wallpapers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Eddie Murphy used to be a great comedian. Then, he became a funny actor.
Then, he took a shot at singing and quickly realized that his talents
weren't as widespread as he believed, so he continued his pace at original
comedy. Nowadays, Murphy seems to have become a cash cow, delivering many
generic roles in retreads of formerly popular films from Christmas past. His
humor seems to be attached to the latex that his characters inhabit and his
jokes no longer have that Murphy "punch". BOWFINGER was a step in the right
direction. This film is a step in the wrong direction.
PLOT:
Professor Sherman Klump's alter-ego Buddy Love does not want him to get
married to the love of his life, Denise, so he breaks free of Sherman's body
and attempts to take credit for his fat chum's invention, a revolutionary
youth serum. All kinds of craziness ensues.
CRITIQUE:
A few big laughs and Granny Klump don't excuse this film's lame plot,
over-sentimentality and many gross, unfunny and regurgitated jokes. And why
slap in a "heartfelt" scene every few minutes? I know that we're supposed to
feel sorry for Sherman Klump because he's fat and lonely at times, but we
got that the first time that you struck us over the head with it...now make
us laugh, dammit! Over-the-top sexual innuendoes, potty humor and fart jokes
just didn't do much for me in this film. I think that it's the kind of movie
that you're either gonna like or not like. Many people walked out of the
audience that I saw it with, but many others were laughing out loud. I
chuckled every now and again, mostly when Mother Klump and Granny Klump were
in the forefront, but found much of the story to be very, very boring, and
Eddie Murphy's primary characters of Sherman and Buddy Love to be the least
interesting.
And you'd figure that with a title like THE KLUMPS, the studio would have
focused more on the secondary Murphy characters, but other than a tired
running sketch between Mother and Father Klump (something about him not
being able to hold an erection...haha), none of them were really developed
further. Make a film starring Granny Klump going on vacation or something,
and I'm there! But watching Murphy overact as Buddy Love and overplay his
sad puppy look as Sherman just annoyed the hell out of my after a while. And
what's with some of the embarrassingly generic comedy bits like Sherman
accidentally slipping the table cloth into his zipper and then getting
up...haha, guess what happens to everything on the table? Is this supposed
to be fresh comedy? Don't think so! Felt a lot like Archie comic book jokes
to me. Janet, Ms. Jackson (cause I'm nasty), does an okay job as the
one-dimensional girlfriend who loves Sherman despite him acting like an ass
every minute, but no one really cares much about her. On the other hand, a
shout-out does definitely go out to Eddie Murphy who once again amazes as
all of these different characters (all flawlessly executed), but I
personally think that he has overextended his "latex" card with this one.
How's about you get back to some real original Eddie Murphy comedy, dude?
Enough of the retreads!
Overall, this movie will either amuse you with its few big funny moments and
Granny Klump disgusting eroticism, or bore you with its genericism,
indescribably inane plot and mumbling dialogue. In fact, much of the
dialogue between the family members is lost because of overlapping and
hard-to-decipher mumbling.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
One dream sequence in this film pays homage to three science-fiction films
including STAR WARS, ARMAGEDDON and 2001: A SPACE ODYSSEY. Why you may ask?
I have no idea!
Eddie Murphy plays no less than six characters in this film: Sherman Klump,
Buddy Love, Mama, Papa, Ernie and Granny. The transformation in girth that
each character required demanded that Murphy endure between 3 to 5 hours of
extensive make-up every day.
Actor/comedian Chris Elliot has a three-second "cameo" in this film (or is
that a part?). Yikes, who's your agent, dude?
Janet Jackson, a singer who has sold over 45 million albums worldwide, also
used to play Willis' (Todd Bridges) girlfriend in the popular TV sitcom
"Different Strokes".
This is Murphy's third collaboration with producer Brian Grazer. They also
worked on LIFE and BOWFINGER together.
Director Peter Segal's directorial debut was on NAKED GUN 33 1/3. He
followed that up with MY FELLOW AMERICANS and TOMMY BOY.
Co-screenwriters Paul and Chris Weitz made their own feature film debuts as
directors of 1999's teen comedy romp AMERICAN PIE.

Title
Review for Bulworth (1998)
For more reviews and movie quizzes, visit http://www.joblo.com/
It's ironic that I watched this Warren Beatty political comedy just when the
rumors of the actor actually running for the Democratic nomination for
President in the year 2000 are beating about.
PLOT:
A suicidal political candidate decides to hire someone to assassinate him a
few days before his election race ends, and takes his knowledge of this
fact, to tell people exactly what's on his mind, no matter how crude or out
of line it may be. He also seems to take on an African-American spirit, and
surprising to everyone, including himself, people actually begin to respect
his newfound honesty.
CRITIQUE:
An okay movie with plenty of insightful commentary on the state of American
politics today, the plight of the poor and African-Americans in today's
society, and all the unwritten political rules that we should all be aware
of by now. Having said that, I thought that only some of the scenes in this
film were genuinely funny, I did NOT appreciate the "rap character" that
Bulworth's persona would take on from time to time (It just didn't feel
right to me), and thought there was just too much focus on only one aspect
of American political injustice (i.e. Is Compton the biggest issue out
there?). Beatty and surprisingly, Berry, pulled in some neat performances,
and the soundtrack was pretty cool, but I thought that the film just
oscillated between too many genres, comedy, drama, romance, political, to
satisfy any one completely. On a high note, Oliver Platt delivered one of
his best performances ever, with a great rendition of the ultimate sleazy,
hypocritical sidekick who changes his opinion on anything in a second, as
long as it pleases the populace. All in all, a thoroughly original script,
performed with some good actors, but Beatty's unbelievable "rap character"
and the somewhat unfocused direction of the script, left me somewhat
detached.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Plenty of cameos in this film: George Hamilton, who is mentioned in the
script as someone that Bulworth resembles, Jan Carl from Entertainment
Tonight, talk show host Larry King, playing himself as usual, out-of-work
actor, William Baldwin, as Bulworth's opponent in the race, and director
Paul Mazursky.
Look for the movie marquee in one of the black neighborhoods that shows a
double-bill of SUPERFLY and BLACULA.
Actress Halle Berry was the first runner-up in the 1986 Miss USA pageant.
She was also named Miss Ohio in 1986, and Miss Teen All American in 1985.
She was married to baseball player David Justice for about three years.
Oliver Platt's dad, Nicholas Platt, is an ex-ambassador to Pakistan, Zambia,
& the Phillipines. He graduated with a Bachelor of Arts degree with a major
in Drama in 1983 from Tufts University.

Title
Review for Where the Money Is (2000)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
If Paul Newman acted in a so-so movie and nobody went to see it, would he
still be considered a great actor? You bet! Newman recently announced that
he would be making one more picture, his "swan song", and calling it a
career. Of course, everyone and their uncle wants Newman to get together one
more time with that guy who runs the Sundance Film Festival...what's his
name...something-or-another Redford. Anyway, only time will tell what will
happen to the king of popcorn and salad dressing, but for now, let's focus
on yet another movie which was filmed entirely on location in my hometown of
Montreal, Canada.
PLOT:
A lifelong bank-robber fakes his own stroke in jail so that he could be sent
to a temporary nursing home, from where he intends to find an easier route
to the outside world. Unfortunately for him, his nurse is on to his game and
ultimately ends up trying to convince him to work with her on one more bank
job.
CRITIQUE:
As I left the theater, I was still a little confused as to what kind of film
they were going for with this one. If it was meant as a crime caper, it
failed because there really wasn't much tension, suspense or action. If it
was meant as a romance or drama, it failed to a certain extent, because
there was actually very little chemistry between husband and wife, even
though Newman did manage to shine all on his own. His back-and-forths with
Fiorentino were definitely the highlight of the film. And lastly, if this
film was meant as a comedy, it didn't fully achieve its full potential
either, with only a handful of guffaws sprinkled lightly across its quick
90-minute canvas. Of course, it really shouldn't matter whether or not one
could qualify this film in any specific category, as long as the film can be
entertaining as a whole. Unfortunately for this movie, it rarely peaked any
level of interest on my part, especially after its extremely slow start and
eventual predictable story line.
Of course, I still recommend seeing it (although I would suggest waiting for
video), only because of the understated performance by Newman, who doesn't
achieve the emotional vibe that he was able to contribute to NOBODY'S FOOL,
but definitely tweaked enough of my interest, to sit through the film's
unoriginal plotline. Points also go out to Fiorentino, who had up until
recently been relegated to roles featuring her gruffy voice and fine legs
(this film also focuses on her booty), scoring with a solid performance of a
down-and-out small town nurse looking for a way out of her hum-drum life.
Her sexual appeal also decided to make a palpable appearance in this film,
with a touch of THE LAST SEDUCTION still shining through. As a whole, the
film doesn't suck by any means, nor does it bring anything exciting to the
table. It's a very generic tale of an old-time crook looking for a new
score, and a new crook looking for some old-time help. Some charm, some
laughs, zero tension, solid performances by Newman and Fiorentino, wrapped
in a so-so story. Sound interesting to you? Well, maybe you should just see
it to pay tribute to one of America's favorite actors. And no...I'm not
talking about Dermot Mulroney! :)

Title
Review for Hurricane, The (1999)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Denzel Washington has never been afraid to play the part of a man who
triumphs in the face of adversity, and this true life tale of Rubin Carter,
a man who was wrongly imprisoned for over 19 years, sure fits that bill to
the tee. Washington shines in another great role which actually has you
feeling some of the pain and anguish of a man, whose unimaginable ordeal
could only make one wonder about the absurdity of our own everyday
insignificant complaints.
PLOT:
Rubin "Hurricane" Carter, a champion boxer, is wrongly convicted of a murder
and spends close to twenty years in prison. Appeal after appeal, march after
march and outcry after outcry does not set this man free, until the day that
a young black man picks up his book at a fair, and along with his three
Canadian friends, attempt to free the man who has been unjustly placed
behind bars for the better half of his life.
CRITIQUE:
A powerful, moving and emotional drama ready to replenish you with spirit
and determination in the face of adversity, while demonstrating once again,
the superior acting talents of a man who goes by the name of Denzel
Washington. In fact, his cohort in this film, Vicellous Reon Shannon, also
swings the bat for a homer in his first major role, as the duo combine to
draw some believable faces onto a story which is just too unbelievable to
imagine. Don't get me wrong, despite it being a true-to-life story, it is
all too sad to have to admit that I had heard plenty of similar tales
beforehand, but thankfully for us all, the magical touch of Denzel
Washington just made this film invigorating and inspiring to behold. And
yes, I hope to God the Academy tips their hat to this wonderful actor once
again this time around. He plays him cocky, he plays him blissful, he plays
him violent, he plays him soft-spoken, in fact, he plays the man through
many of the colors that he explored throughout his lifetime. The story, a
classic, is one of triumph over adversity, persistence over resignation,
love over hate, and ultimately, one of justice over injustice, but truly it
speaks of the power of the human spirit.
Would any one of us have been able to survive the terrible ordeal that this
man had to endure for all those years? Everything taken away from him. His
life, his job, his kids, his wife, his dignity, his everything! And what do
you say about those four people who decided to dedicate their entire lives
to getting this man out of prison? A man who they barely knew! Yes, even the
"Hurricane" himself said that he would not have been able to do that for
another. Actually, that was the one part of the story which I wished they
had explored further. Those Canadians. What was their story? Who were they
really? The film barely speaks of them in detailed terms and skates around
the issue of their actual professions, and even their ultimate intentions to
do the things that they did. Don't get me wrong, they are admirable without
a doubt, but I would have liked to have known more about them (The Little
Known Facts below might shed a little light on that, JoBlo :). The film was
also a little slow at parts, but I think the pacing was done purposely in
order for us to better appreciate the snail-like grind of this man's
solitary experience. All in all, the secondary actors all could have been
snapped up a notch or two, but none of that really mattered much with the
knockout performance from Denzel as Rubin.
Rarely does a film transcend the level of a good film and become one with
greater connotations simply because of its lead performance, but THE
HURRICANE is just that. Now give that man an Oscar, dammit!
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
A recent interview with the real Rubin Carter and Lesra Martin on the Oprah
Winfrey show confirmed a couple of greater coincidences in their life
stories which were not accurately depicted in the film.
1. For one, the first letter which Lesra wrote to Rubin in jail, was
actually just one letter amongst the hundreds of messages that Hurricane
would receive in jail. In fact, he never wrote back to any of them, but for
some strange and inexplicable reason, he found himself spiritually attracted
to that one letter in the pack. He opened it, read it and was deeply touched
by it. As per the film, Rubin finally sat down at his typewriter and wrote
Lesra back a thank-you letter. The rest...is history.
2. A similar experience overcame Lesra when he first spotted Rubin's book at
the Toronto book fair. In fact, he felt as though the cover of the book
itself "spoke to him", and actually spent around two hours following the man
who was holding the book at the fair, until he finally dropped it and Lesra
made it his own purchase.
To clear up the "Canadians question", it turns out that in the actual story,
there were nine Canadians who lived and worked together on the Carter case.
However, for the sake of developing well-rounded and believable characters
with whom the audience could relate, the nine became three. Those folks were
basically the three who actually went to New Jersey and did most of the
legwork on the case.
This film is based on two books. The first was written by the man on whom
the entire film is based, Rubin "Hurricane" Carter, and his book called "The
16th Round", and the other was written by two men, Sam Chaiton and Terry
Swinton, whose novel is entitled "Lazarus and the Hurricane". In fact, the
film's original title was LAZARUS AND THE HURRICANE.
To prepare for his role as boxer Rubin "Hurricane" Carter, Denzel Washington
apparently worked out for a year with trainer Terry Claybon and lost a total
of 44 pounds.

Title
Review for 6th Day, The (2000)
For more reviews and movie news, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Es tu, Arny? What the heck happened to these guys after the late 80s, early
90s? Remember when Sly, Arny and Bruce ruled the box-office? Well, Bruce is
actually still kickin' some mighty tail, but Arny has gone "soft" and
doesn't want to be seen blowing away a zillion guys with one machine gun
anymore. Of course, his newfound morality is commendable, but it doesn't
appear as though he has completely made up his mind just yet. Both END OF
DAYS and this film seem to be hinting at this so-called "new" Arnold, but in
the end, they just give us the same "old" Arnold, but with much less
fire-power and oomph. The result? Well, in the case of both of these
films...pretty lackluster.
PLOT:
Set sometime in the near future, this film features a world in which cloning
your dead pets minutes after they pass on is considered normal. Human
cloning, on the other hand, is forbidden, but do you think that will stop
the rich evil guy and the unethical doctor from having some fun of their
own? Not a chance! Unfortunately for them, one of the dudes on whom they
decide to test their brand of fun is named Arnold Schwarzenegger (in real
life, that is). And yup, you guessed it...Arny is not happy about having
another "man" take over his life.
CRITIQUE:
A really great premise, some cool futuristic doodads in the first half hour
and a surprisingly strong humor element don't make up for this film's cheesy
production value, stereotypical bad guys, weak score and lack of energy in
the second half. Not exactly sure what went wrong here but I was really
enjoying this movie during its first thirty minutes or so. There were plenty
of cool technological gadgeteries presented, a nice setup for the whole
cloning scenario and one of the creepiest "dolls" to ever see the day of
light (her name is Sim-Pal Suzie and trust me...you won't ever forget her).
Even Arnold seemed to be back to his old self. Delivering goofy lines, being
that burly nice guy husband we all love so much and setting us up for some
good ol' fashioned cloning fun. But the bottom seemed to drop out of this
film at around the halfway point. It's as if they didn't have enough budget
and decided to place everyone in one building and have them run around
playing laser tag. And how annoying were those laser guns and repetitive
scene transitions? Plenty, but not as bad at the obvious blue screen used in
some of the later helicopter stunts. I mean, c'mon people, is this a
Hollywood movie or a phony baloney TV production set to the big screen? Not
enough gloss, not enough punch, not enough of much.
And I'm really kinda pissed about it all because the film did actually seem
to have quite a bit of potential. It's a great subject for a movie, one that
actually manages to spark several cool moments throughout, but too much
talking and not enough interesting developments in the story ultimately
stunt the film's growth. Arny was pretty good as his character(s) but the
film never really seemed to emit any sense of impending doom. Maybe it was
because the characters weren't that well developed. Maybe it was because the
bad guys were so cheesy (red and blue hair, people...c'mon...get with the
program!), or maybe it was because the film didn't look that believable
after its gratifying start. Whatever it was, it certainly didn't prevent me
from enjoying enough of the film to recommend it just slightly, especially
to Arny fans. But there is no revolutionary sci-fi flick in here, folks.
Just another dud to add to the long list of sub-mediocre sci-fi movies
plaguing the industry this year. But I did enjoy this film's many funny
lines (and yes, Arny even says "I might be back" at some point), its cool
techno fun stuff early on and its intriguing proposition. Sadly, it is in
its execution that this film ultimately fails. Video fodder for sure, but
nothing more than that. I do however look forward to a real good cloning
movie in the future. In the meantime, I'm gonna go out and rent TOTAL RECALL
again. Now there's a great sci-fi flick!
Oh yeah, and if you're looking for an "action" movie, this one doesn't fit
that bill either. Unless of course, you consider laser tag gun games
"action". And where was this clone fight between Arnold and himself that I
had heard so much about? Hmmmm...wasn't in our copy.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Director Roger Spottiswoode is probably best known for directing James Bond
in TOMORROW NEVER DIES. Which made people forget about him directing STOP OR
MY MOM WILL SHOOT! and TURNER AND HOOCH. He used to be married to actor Jack
Palance's daughter, but they divorced in 1997.
Screenwriters Cormac Wibberley and Marianne Wibberley are man and wife.
This film was originally titled ON THE SIXTH DAY.

Title
Review for Breakfast of Champions (1999)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
For your own protection, keep your arms and legs inside this movie review at
all times. No smoking will be allowed, although you really shouldn't enter
the premises without the proper mind-sponging substance floating through
your great white yonder, and prepare to meet the man some refer to as Dwayne
Hoover, or his master of creation, Kilgore Trout. This is the story about a
man and his dog. Well...actually...it isn't!
PLOT:
Used car salesman extraordinaire Dwayne Hoover loses his identity in the
midst of a massive mid-life crisis which leads him to cheat on his wife,
whose hooked on pills, attempt to kill himself every other day, and seek out
the answer to the questions in his mind. Very few answers follow.
CRITIQUE:
Bubble, pill, bubble, pill, bubble. Exit 11, take a left please. This film
is based on the apparent "unfilmable" novel written by one Kurt Vonnegut Jr.
Much like last year's unfilmable film FEAR AND LOATHING IN LAS VEGAS (7/10),
it offers much style and esoteric gobbledygook in a narrative which cannot
be described as anything more (or less) than incomprehensible. The
ladieswear department is down by the last aisle, sir. I personally enjoyed
the film on the level in which it was obviously meant to be taken...a
spiritually enlightening chemically-induced psychedelic soul searching
vehicle, in which many people seem to float through the floors, see images
of paradise reflecting from the mirrors, death looming, and bubble with
overly fake enthusiasm/depression. You can call me Bunny, dad. Strobe,
strobe. Don't call me Dwayne, it's Wayne, Wayne Hoobler...like Dwayne
Hoover, you know! Crying won't help, but an apparent big dick and sex with
the secretary f**k machine will? Good soundtrack. The answer for Hoover
obviously lies within life itself. Spiraling lights and a nice, olived marti
ni. Take two!
The actors were all very good in this film, with Bruce Willis standing out
in another very different role for him. He plays this cartoon character very
well and never draws his colors outside of the idiosyncratic line born to be
this person. Dwayne Hoover~?! Is that you~?!! Why don't you just come out
and say it, "I wear women's clothing and I like it!". Nick Nolte is awesome!
His role in this film rivals any in his career! Expect Mr. Nolte to walk
away with many more high award recognitions this year. Best worst part. And
no more goodbye to Blue Mondays after this movie, that's for sure.
Hardy-har-har, Mr. Trout! If that's your "real name" . I also
enjoyed the style of the film which was basically its only actual film
component, seeing that the substance was only to be discovered through two
highly enriched characters named Mary Jane and Lucy in the Sky with
Diamonds. Thirty-six bucks for a car?! You got it!
I personally will be adding this film to my collection of "high" level
quality productions which one could only truly appreciate when-is that
BIRDSH*T on my car?!! All in all, I would say that I had quite a few laughs,
no serious moments whatsoever, passed the two hour runtime like it was a
five-minute trip through the dentist's waiting room (Top floor, of course),
and appreciated the cooky-wooky soundtrack. Last stop in Brownsville. I love
you and life should be lived while attending life! Please remove your
seatbelts on your way out and make sure to move your hands away from the
aisles. This review has now ended. Thank you for flying in our friendly high
skies. Please check the rating on your way out.
(7/10) --> If you actually understood and appreciated aspects of this review
and enjoy puzzles.
(5/10) --> If you didn't understand and DO NOT WANT TO understand any aspect
of this review, and do not like puzzles.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
This might explain a few things about this movie: Novelist Kurt Vonnegut Jr.
once attended College with fellow author Dr. Seuss (Theodore Geisel). Think
about it? Remember all that Who-hash from THE GRINCH WHO STOLE CHRISTMAS?
Vonnegut Jr., on whose novel this film is based, also makes an appearance in
this movie as the "TV commercial director". He was born in 1922.
This is Nick Nolte's second time in a film based on a Vonnegut Jr. novel.
His first was 1996's MOTHER NIGHT.
Director Alan Rudolph and Bruce Willis had previously worked together in the
1991 film MORTAL THOUGHTS co-starring Bruce's then-wife Demi Moore.
Co-producer David Willis is, you guessed it, Bruce Willis' real-life
brother. He has been involved as a producer on 9 movies since 1990, 7 of
which starred his big-shot brother in one way or another. You go, girl!
This film was nominated for a Golden Berlin Bear award at the 1999 Berlin
International Film Festival.

Title
Review for Nightmare on Elm Street 3: Dream Warriors, A (1987)
Third installment of the infamous NIGHTMARE ON ELM STREET horror series
which features a young Patricia Arquette excelling in her role as the
screaming ingenue of the day.
PLOT:
Freddy Krueger is haunting the dreams of the remaining children from
the famous Elm Street. The kids are afraid to fall asleep, and are
placed in a medical facility for evaluation. Unfortunately for them,
the nightmares continue, as Krueger continues to exact his revenge on
the kin of the people who torched him alive many years ago. 
CRITIQUE:
Enjoyable enough for a horror/fantasy film. This movie never bored me
at any point, and has many cool scenes featuring violent and gross
deaths. This is the film that made Freddy cool, and distanced the film
from the real horror flic genre, while simultaneously approaching the
kitchy fantasy realm. Patricia Arquette is perfect as the shrieking
victim, and the rest of the cast is adequate as the stereotypical
misfits wrestling with their unexplained bad dreams. 
This movie explains more of the reason why Freddy became what he has
become, and adds some pretty neat special effects (the first death at
the hands of the "Freddy puppet" is by far the coolest). Having said
that, some of the effects near the end of the film are horrible (when
Freddy's bones "come alive"), and the movie never really terrifies you,
more than anything, it grosses you out! Fun stuff if you're sitting
around the house on a dark Saturday night, looking for a flic to give
you the heebie-jeebies.
Little Known Facts: 
Writer Frank Darabont went on to pen, and direct, the Oscar-nominated
adapted screenplay for SHAWSHANK REDEMPTION (8/10).
"The" Elm Street is located in Potsdam, NY (a small town just south of
the Canadian border, in northern New York). Wes Craven was a student
there at SUNY (State University of New York), Potsdam. 
When Laurence Fishburne was 14, he worked on APOCALYPSE NOW (7/10),
after lying about his age. He also landed a part of Cowboy Curtis on
"Pee-wee's Playhouse".
Patricia Arquette is married to actor Nicolas Cage, and is sister to
fellow actors Richmond Arquette, Alexis Arquette, David Arquette and
Rosanna Arquette 

Title
Review for Highlander: Endgame (2000)
For more movie reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
And just when you thought JoBlo was getting a little soft around the
corners, not rating anything lower than your standard "this movie sucks",
along comes this cinematic atrocity and he's forced to take out his secret
weapon and spray it with a stench so thick, even the bravest movie-goer
would think twice about seeing this waste of time. Yes, despite being a
third sequel to a successful original movie, the latest HIGHLANDER doesn't
seem to have anything going for it. Oh stinky movie, let me count thee
ways...
PLOT:
(From what I understood) A really bad highlander dude comes to the present
looking to whack out the nice highlander dudes in order to gain their power
and become the mightiest immortal...or something along those lines.
CRITIQUE:
A complete and utter mess. Disjointed, incoherent, boring, corny, filled
with bad dialogue...and that's just the first thirty minutes! This film
doesn't seem to know what to do with itself. It's confusing to anyone who
doesn't know the series (I include myself in that group) and apparently
idiotic to those who do know the series (I include die-hard HIGHLANDER fan
The Arrow in that group). The film doesn't explain anything about
itself...it just goes from one inexplicable situation to another. One moment
they're in the present time, the next moment, they're in Italy in the 1600s.
Why? Who knows. What are they talking about? No idea. Flashbacks mixed in
with the present, mixed in with a few spontaneously cheesy fight sequences
every now and again, and I even remember seeing one flashback scene which
went even further into its own flashback scene!! Hullo...?!? Confused yet? I
was and I basically stopped giving a crap about anyone in the film when I
realized that neither the writer or director was interested in presenting me
with any kind of semblance of a story.
Random swordplay, Mad Max-like dudes showing up in motorcycles in the 1800s?
Or were they in the present at that time? Who knows...and to be honest...who
seriously cares! This series should have been shot in the head and put out
of its own misery a long time ago, but sadly, someone at the studio decided
that it still had a little life left in it. Please, please...for the love of
God and all that is holy in the world of movie-making, and mostly out of
respect for those who loved the original film, put this series to bed and
end it! Even Christopher Lambert knew enough to play second fiddle to Adrian
Paul in this one. The director also tries to do the best he can with the
muddled material, but all he could come up with is plenty of slo-mo action,
some fast-motion fight scenes and lots of smoke everywhere. And is there
anything spectacular about the sword-play or fight scenes? Nope. And I think
we all could have done without all those zooming Lambert face
close-ups...yipes, the man is not aging gracefully, is he? Oh boy, and I
haven't even gotten around to the greatest piece of over-acting that I've
seen in years. The man who plays Kell in this movie, Bruce Payne, should get
a ham trophy for literally chewing up every piece of scenery that he gets
near. Overacting is not a hobby for this guy...it's a living! He's also very
funny, not purposely though. All in all, the movie stinks. Nuff said.

Title
Review for Forces of Nature (1999)
For more reviews and movie trivia, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Take a few elements from the successful Meg Ryan flicks like SLEEPLESS IN
SEATTLE (6.5/10) and WHEN HARRY MET SALLY... (9/10), merge them into a
"can't seem to get home" type travelling disaster idea like PLANES, TRAINS &
AUTOMOBILES (8/10), and you've pretty much got the gist of this film
starring the good-looking faces of Ben Affleck and Sandra Bullock.
PLOT:
Man is about to get married to woman. Man meets "other woman" on a plane
accident. Man and other woman attempt to make it down to Georgia, where his
wedding is to take place and where she owns a business, but bad travel luck,
keeps slowing them down. Their time together brings them closer, and drips
small specks of doubt into the man's original idea of marrying the original
woman.
CRITIQUE:
Entertaining, magical, romantic comedy that doesn't pretend to break new
ground with its concepts, but does offer an always interesting story, two
charming leads, and a non-stop festive soundtrack. Its biggest strength lies
in its two main actors, without whom, the movie might've whimpered into
video-bottom shelf-hell. Sandra Bullock is cute, different and always fun to
watch in this movie, and Ben Affleck shows us that he can actually play
co-banana in a film (without Matt Damon) and come off as an amusing and
effective performer. This movie was also very well directed and offered
quite a few original shots and picturesque sequences. I'm not gonna pretend
that its story line revolutionizes the romantic comedy genre, but certainly,
it is one of the better ones to come along in a while.
It talks about fate, love, marriage and the endless amount of subjective
questions that we all have to ask ourselves at one point in our lives. Is
this the person with whom I want to spend the rest of my living days on this
planet? This question is pondered over by many a love critic in this film,
and offered very little in actual resolution. There is no real answer
anyway, the answer lies within all of us. I personally would've preferred an
alternate ending to the one that is tacked onto this one, but I suppose that
I might be able to appreciate it more over time. All in all, this movie is
fun to watch, fun to listen to and fun to discuss. If you're in love,
falling in love, hoping to fall in love, or still wishing over that falling
star, watch this fantastical movie and enjoy its easy blend of humor, tender
moments and general entertainment.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Actor David Strickland, who plays the ex-boyfriend of Ben Affleck's fianc
in this movie, hung himself in a Las Vegas motel room, only three days after
this movie opened in the United States. He was 29 years of age at the time
of his death.
Ben Affleck has one directing gig to his credit. It was a short film he made
while studying at Occidental College in 1993. It was called I KILLED MY
LESBIAN WIFE, HUNG HER FROM A MEAT HOOK, AND I HAVE A THREE-PICTURE DEAL AT
DISNEY. He was one of the many future stars to act in Richard Linklater's
1993 film DAZED AND CONFUSED (7/10). Others included Matthew McConaughey,
Parker Posey, Renee Zelwegger, Adam Goldberg, Milla Jovovich and Joey Lauren
Adams. He reportedly pocketed about $7,000 for his starring role in CHASING
AMY (7/10), and $600,000 for his role in ARMAGEDDON (8/10). He stands 6'4".
Sandra Bullock's middle name is Annette. She is the daughter of a German
opera singer and an American voice coach, and is a huge fan of Dr. Seuss.
She made $500,000 her role in the original SPEED (7.5/10), and $12,500,000
for SPEED 2 (5/10). She stands 5'7".
Director Bronwen Hughes' directorial debut was 1996's HARRIET THE SPY. This
is her second feature.
Screenwriter Marc Lawrence also wrote the screenplay for the upcoming Goldie
Hawn/Steve Martin flick, THE OUT-OF-TOWNERS.

Title
Review for Nine 1/2 Weeks (1986)
For more reviews and trivia, go to http://surf.to/joblo
Adrian Lyne follows his tremendous hit FLASHDANCE with a movie that
garnered the most sexual attention for a film since LAST TANGO IN PARIS
(6.5/10). Lyne went on to direct many other perverted films such as
FATAL ATTRACTION (8/10), INDECENT PROPOSAL (7/10) and 1998's LOLITA.
PLOT:
Man sees woman. Woman sees man. Instant sexual attraction. Man likes to
play head games and control the woman. Woman likes it to a point. Woman
loves man? Man loves woman? Find out.
CRITIQUE:
Dated, redundant, yet still somewhat interesting sexual drama that pits
the young, good looking Mickey Rourke against the young and even
prettier Kim Basinger. The film rolls by without much emotion, tension
or resolution, but does feature a solid performance by Mickey and some
of the most graphic sex scenes between two stars in a Hollywood
picture. The shock and outrage that people expressed when this movie
was first released was now replaced with a "been there, seen that" kind
of feeling for me. 
The soundtrack sucks (except for Brian Ferry's "Slave to Love" and the
sex with food song), the direction is standard, and the story line
blows chunks, but still, the nostalgia factor and Mickey Rourke acting,
well, like Mickey Rourke, still managed to keep this film afloat the
recommendable area. Also, if you're into Kim Basinger in any which way,
shape or form, check this piece of tape out, 'cause God knows there are
plenty of "provocative" shots in there to keep you busy during those
long and lonely winter nights.
Overall, the film's plot is jammed with sex, some small talk about sex,
kinky sex, some sadomasochistic undertones with a touch of control and
misogyny, and even kinkier sex. If you're into any of that stuff,
cheezy '80's soundtracks, Mickey Rourke's younger days, or even Kim
Basinger's rack, I suggest you walk into your local video store and
lease this Johnson for an evening. If not, your life will not change,
and you could still catch an even greater acting coup by Mickey Rourke
in the under-appreciated BARFLY (8/10) co-starring the lovely Faye
Dunaway. Either way, Adrian Lyne's still a perv.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Note that Kim Basinger's character Elizabeth wears white or colorful
clothing except when she is with John (Mickey Rourke), when she wears
black or grey. 
A few years after this film, Mickey Rourke tossed in his acting gloves
and replaced them with some real boxing mitts as per his new career as
a professional boxer. After an unsuccessful foray into that field, and
several face-altering operations, Rourke is now attempting to re-ignite
his Hollywood movie career. 
Mickey Rourke wrote the screenplay for the film HOMEBOY under the
pseudonym Eddie Cook.
Mickey is in an on-again, off-again marriage to model/actress Carr
Otis, with whom he co-starred in WILD ORCHID. He's also been arrested
on several occasions, for busting up hotel rooms, smoking up in a
plane, and charges of spousal battery. 
Writer Zalman King also co-wrote and directed the Mickey Rourke vehicle
WILD ORCHID.
Kim Basinger is married to hairy actor Alec Baldwin, with whom she has
mothered a child named Ireland. Alec once cracked a photographer in the
head for attempting to take a picture of his baby daughter. He was let
go with a simple slap on the wrist, with the jury ordering him to cough
up a mere $4,500 in damages for being negligent.

Title
Review for Best Man, The (1999/I)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Pretty weird. Here I was thinking about how much this film reminded me of
BEAUTIFUL GIRLS (8.5/10) as I walked happily out of the movie theatre, and
how great it was that director Malcolm Lee got his first big break via his
more famous cousin's help (Spike Lee ya'll), that I realized that the former
film was also directed by a novice at the game of directing, Ted Demme, who
also happened to have a much more famous uncle in the biz (Jonathan Demme
anyone?). Oh well. Just thinking out loud.
PLOT:
A best man at a wedding comes together with his old college buddies a couple
of days before the exchange of the vows, and is suddenly placed under a
magnifying glass when his first novel (To be launched on Oprah, thank you
very much!) gets premiered by all of his friends. It isn't long before each
friend begins to recognize themselves in the book and learn secrets about
one another which they never knew.
CRITIQUE:
Great film, great script, great premise and great characters. This film was
funny, it was poignant, it was timely (Okay, maybe that's just me, but it's
definitely geared to all twenty-somethings), it was always interesting and
an overall joy to absorb. The film talks about coming of age, career and
love-life sacrifices, accepting adulthood, and even more so, appreciating
commitment. I hope people don't avoid this film because they think it's just
another "black movie" because this film has absolutely nothing to do with
the color of one's skin. It's about love, friendship, trust, honesty, and
forgiveness. But even more than that, it's about a bunch of guys, each of
which I could relate to one or a few friends in my own life, who meet,
drink, play poker, enjoy a certain night of bachelor fun, and who discuss
women, their lives, their hopes, their dreams and once again, their
relationships and impressions of the women in their lives. In fact, a lot of
frank discussion travels along this film, as well as plenty of well-timed
humor and romance.
Girls might enjoy this film a little more for that aspect (Yes, Mrs. JoBlo
loved it!), but guys will remain in the ballgame with plenty of connection
to the lively male characters, all living down something or another in their
lives. Congratulations to director Malcolm Lee for putting together such a
solid effort his first time around the bend, with excellent performances all
around. I especially enjoyed Morris Chestnut's performance as the
over-sexed, but ready-to-settle-down-now football player who wants to get
married so that he could quench his promiscuity. The audience that I saw it
with tonite loved this movie and demonstrated their enjoyment with plenty of
spontaneous rounds of laughter and applause filling the house. They, as well
as me, I must admit, also hooted and hollered at the presence of actor Taye
Diggs without his shirt every so often (Mark Wahlberg: Part Deux?) with
another Oscar-worthy performance by his rock-solid pectorals. Supporting
nomination for his ass? :) Actually, I thought Diggs was okay in this film,
but not as good as his smaller role in GO (8.5/10). Having said that, the
film itself was a complete success, with plenty of fun, interesting twists
and turns, moments of cringing, moments of crying and moments of flashbacks.
A little too clean of an ending for my taste, but hey...I guess some happy
endings do also happen in real life, right? See it with your friends or your
better half, but not both together. It might just get ugly! :)
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Director Malcolm D. Lee is director Spike Lee's cousin. Spike was also
producer on this film. Malcolm's only other screen credit before writing and
directing this film was "assistant to Mr. Lee" in 1995's CLOCKERS. Spike
Lee's birth name was Shelton Jackson Lee. He's been married since 1993,
stands 5'5" and was actually born in Atlanta, Georgia (Being such a huge
Knicks fan, folks generally tend to think that he was born there as well).
I know Taye Diggs best from his slick role in one of the best movies of
1999, GO, but many others may remember him from his role of Benny, the evil
landlord in the Tony Award winning stage production of "Rent", or his
re-occurring role as Adrian "Sugar" Hill on TV "The Guiding Light" from 1997
to 1998. Of course, his big break came when he landed the lead role opposite
Angela Bassett in 1998 HOW STELLA GOT HER GROOVE BACK. He was born in
Rochester, New York and received a BFA degree in musical theater from
Syracuse University.
Actress Nia Long also spent some time on the cast of TV's "The Guiding
Light" as the character of Katherine "Kat" Speakes from 1991 to 1993. Of
course, most of you TV freaks might remember her from her re-occurring role
of Lisa Smith, Will Smith's girlfriend, on "The Fresh Prince of Bel-Air".

Title
Review for Animal, The (2001)
For more reviews and movie wallpapers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
PLOT:
A loser of a man who can't make it as a cop, dies in a horrible car 
accident, only to be brought back to life by a nutty doctor who replaces 
many of his organs with animal parts. The result is a man who is 
seemingly controlled by his animal urges. Hilarity ensues?
CRITIQUE:
Before you read my review, you really gotta know that I loved DEUCE 
BIGALOW, it honestly cracked me up throughout. But when I saw the 
trailer for Rob Schneider's latest cinematic odyssey, it didn't 
particularly strike my fancy (i.e. I didn't think that it was funny). 
And now that I've seen the entire picture, I still don't think that it's 
all that funny. Sure, the concept itself does sound like something that 
might generate a gaggle of laughs, but the sight of Schneider licking 
his sack, swimming like a seal and jumping around from branch to branch 
like a monkey...just didn't make me laugh. It's that simple. The whole 
thing just felt like another dumb "Saturday Night Live" movie based on 
one joke, a joke in which unfortunately, I didn't find much hilarity. 
Now I don't know exactly why I didn't think any of it was funny, but I 
guess that has to do with your own personal sense of humor. My buddy 
next to me was cracking up at plenty of the same scenes which I didn't 
think were amusing, so who knows, maybe you'll like it too, but then 
again, he also thought that the trailer was pretty funny, so I guess 
that has something to do with it. One thing is for sure though, if 
you've seen this movie's trailer and didn't think that it was all that 
comical, skip this movie all the way because pretty much all of the 
"big" jokes are in there, and if you didn't roll with it then, I doubt 
that you're gonna dig it now that it's up on the big screen.
So why am I giving it a 4/10? Well, I generally do find at least "some" 
things in all movies that give it a little bit of worth. This time 
around, the positives in this film were actually pretty obvious to 
figure out. First of all, John C. McGinley's character is hilarious. 
He's the tough as nails cop with veins popping out of every muscle in 
his body and he doesn't like Schneider. McGinley plays the character to 
a tee and he steals every scene that he is in. I also drooled over one 
particular scene of a lovely lady sauntering down a sidewalk in a mini 
white dress or skirt or whatever. Not exactly sure what happened after 
that, because as soon as she bent over...so did I! I'd also like to 
throw some props out to the one ongoing joke that "worked" for me in 
this movie and that was the "black guy" joke. I won't ruin it here but 
the theory itself was quite funny. And last but certainly not 
least...Colleen Haskell. Aaaaaaaah, Colleen Haskell. Aaaaaaaah, I say 
again...Colleen Haskell. Just adorable! Put that girl on the screen for 
85 more minutes and I'm there! Aaaaaaah...Colleen Haskell. Harumph, but 
enough about her. Okay, so there were a couple of things that I did 
appreciate about this movie, but don't misinterpret that as a positive 
review. Overall, I didn't think that anything that Schneider did in this 
film was funny, and I guess that really is the bottom line. If you think 
that seeing Schneider acting like different animals is entertaining, 
well, then I guess you might enjoy some of this. If not, forget this 
movie every happened and rent DEUCE BIGALOW again...now that's a funny 
movie! "You can do it!"
PS: Oh yeah, I also dug the fact that they kept the "You can do it!" gag 
going in this movie as well (for Sandler fans, you know what I'm talking 
about). It's also interesting to see who says it in this film (but I 
won't ruin that for you here either).
Where's JoBlo coming from?
Big Daddy (7/10) - Billy Madison (7/10) - Deuce Bigalow (8/10) - Freddy 
Got Fingered (5/10) - Happy Gilmore (9/10) - Joe Dirt (5/10) - The 
Ladies Man (6/10) - Little Nicky (6/10) - Lost and Found (4/10) -The 
Waterboy (4/10)

Title
Review for Object of My Affection, The (1998)
For more reviews and trivia, go to http://surf.to/joblo
Another "Jennifer-Aniston-cast-as-the-beautiful-girl-with-no-luck-
in-relationships" movie attempts to add a little variety onto the
proverbial menu, by slapping a gay lead as her man of choice, while
serving the consequences of their relationship as the main course.
PLOT:
Lovely, independent woman does not want her boyfriend to move in with
her, but does request a gay friend of hers to do the same. Her
relationship with the gay man blossoms into a true friendship, as her
actual relationship with her boyfriend begins to crumble. When faced
with a life-altering decision, she must decide who she really loves,
who really loves her back, and how these decisions will affect their
future.
CRITIQUE:
Would-be comedy actually delivers very little in the chuckle
department, runs way too long, musters up a weak ending, and offers
nothing substantially original or thought-provoking to the audience.
This film was actually quite dramatic at points, and within that
context, delivered very little substance to back itself up. The funnier
moments were lacking, the characters seemed pieced together, and the
ending just seemed to politically-agree with anyone who might care
(except for an audience looking to be entertained, that is.) 
CHASING AMY (7.5/10) is the Kevin Smith film that bookmarked the idea
of a heterosexual falling head over heels for a homosexual, but that
film made sure that we understood where each character was coming from,
mixed the whole fling within various real circumstances, and delivered
many funny moments and hip dialogue. Having said that, I also didn't
care for AMY's ending, but that's because I didn't find Banky's
decision realistic. This movie, on the other hand, seemed very clich,
unoriginal, and quite boring.
Many of Nina's (Aniston) decisions in the film seem self-centered and
unexplained, and left us wondering why she was acting the way that she
was. Also, I never really bought into her "love" for her gay roommate,
and didn't appreciate the zillions of shots of them dancing together,
to make this point (Oh, I get it. If they're dancing together, that
MUST be love!!). All in all, this film is so-so in its narrative, so-so
in the acting department, but boring over its entire close to two-hour
running course. Nigel Hawthorne was the only standout in the cast as
the older, wiser, and more sensitive soul. 
Unless you are in this exact type of situation in your own life, do not
see this film. And even if you are in the same type of scenario, you
will still not be entertained by this film, but may take away some
questions of your own. Either way, do yourself a favor and see Kevin
Smith's CHASING AMY instead. A way superior movie, with better
characters, better dialogue, and a much more entertaining story-line.
You might even want to see MY BEST FRIEND'S WEDDING (7.5/10) for a more
mainstream solution.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Nigel Hawthorne is presently one of the few openly gay men actors
working in Hollywood.
Jennifer Aniston's real name is Jennifer Anistonopoulos. She was
brought up in Greece and New York City. Her father, John Aniston, has
been playing "Victor Kiriakis" on the soap opera "Days of our Lives"
since 1985. The late Telly Savalas, famous as TV's "Kojak" (Who loves
ya, baby?), is her godfather. Jennifer received $2,000,000 to star in
1997's PICTURE PERFECT. She also played Ferris Bueller's sister in the
ill-fated TV version of the classic pic, and co-starred with director
Quentin Tarantino in "Steven Spielberg's Director's Chair" CD-ROM game.
Timothy Daly is the brother of Tyne Daly, famous for playing Lacey in
TV's "Cagney & Lacey". His film debut was in Barry Levinson's DINER
(7.5/10) opposite fellow movie-virgins Paul Reiser and Ellen Barkin.

Title
Review for Happiness (1998)
For more reviews and movie trivia, visit http://www.joblo.com
Writer-director Todd Solondz' third full-length feature made plenty of "Best
of 1998" lists, but made only one list of mine this year, and that's the one
at the unfortunate end of the cinematic totem pole. His second film was the
critically acclaimed Sundance sensation WELCOME TO THE DOLLHOUSE, but I
believe that it is the title to his first movie, that essentially describes
this year's film, FEAR, ANXIETY AND DEPRESSION.
PLOT:
Vignettes of several dysfunctional people all linked together through the
lives of three diametric sisters. One sister is a very successful novelist.
The other is a housewife, whose husband hides an extremely dark secret about
himself, and the third is a 30-something loser, who still has no clue as to
what she wants to do with her life. Their parents are also part of the
package, as the film serpentines its way through the troubles, perversions
and sexual dichotomy of many of its happily-challenged subjects.
CRITIQUE:
This is a bad movie. Crap served surreptitiously on an independent tray of
arty pretension and highbrow entertainment. Some of its problems: It's too
long and runs at a snails pace. It's uninteresting and unentertaining. It's
not funny and contains very little human drama. But even worse than that, it
pretends to be something terribly insightful and revealing, when really it's
just boring and obviously shocking. It's pretentious and might actually by
enjoyed by those who like figuring out the "true meaning" of a film or its
characters' intentions, but for all the rest of us, who like to go to a
movie theatre, order some nachos, and enjoy ourselves, this one is a lost
cause. I'm trying to think of one redeemable quality in this film, but I
just can't figure one out. There's a regular husband-guy ("Mr. Rogers on
acid" as per the Arrow's comments) who lives a double as a pedophile.
Hmmmm....yes, yes, how utterly insightful and shocking. *Yawn* Ironic as it
all may be, I didn't care for the characters, their lives, or this film.
So is this film a satire or a true reflection of the lives of many of our
contemporaries living amongst us today? The truth is that I just don't know.
The film was very uneven in that sense, and had plenty of scenes featuring
real-life dramatic situations, while others, clearly indicated its "tongue
and cheekness". The point is that I couldn't figure it out, cared even less,
and I just didn't appreciate any of the tragic characters or anything that
the film had to say. Am I too much of a simpleton, and am I missing the
"bigger picture" of what Mr. Solondz is attempting to tell us in his oh-so
subtle and annoying depression-fest? Perhaps.
The bottom line is that as a great movie lover, I generally tend to find
something nice to say about most films. In that sense, this movie did offer
some true and realistic performances by its cast, especially Dylan Baker,
who was excellent as the husband with the secret, and Jane Adams as the
pathetic loser sister. But other than that, please don't see this movie
unless you also enjoyed other self-indulgent indie pieces such as THE DOOM
GENERATION (3/10) and FRIENDS AND NEIGHBORS (5.5/10). And another thing, a
few scenes of masturbation in a film, mixed with plenty of shots of cum
flying around do not an insightful, real and good indie movie make. We must
always remember that a film must be interesting or insightful, or at the
very least, entertaining. This movie struck out on all three counts. Where
are the Tarantinos and Kevin Smiths when you need 'em?
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Director Todd Solondz had a small cameo in AS GOOD AS IT GETS (7.5/10) as a
passenger on a bus. Solondz was born in Newark, NJ, and grew up in the
suburbs. At New York University Film School, he made three award-winning
short films.
This film was dumped by Universal's October Films, and picked up by the
production company Good Machine.
Camryn Manheim (the overweight woman in this film) received a master's
degree in drama in 1987 from New York University.
The mother in this film, actress Louise Lasser, was married to
writer/director Woody Allen from 1966-69, and starred in four of his films,
including the amazing BANANAS (8/10).
Actor Philip Seymour Hoffman has been in 20 films since 1991. He graduated
from NYU's Tisch School of the Arts.
You might remember actress Cynthia Stevenson as the relentless character of
Doris, Norm's secretary, on the popular TV sitcom "Cheers".
Two members from TV's "Saturday Night Live" cast list make cameos in this
picture. Jon Lovitz from SNL past, and Molly Shannon from SNL present.

Title
Review for Last Action Hero (1993)
This film was received very poorly at the time of its release, but
doesn't have much for which to be ashamed, in my humble opinion.
McTiernan, of DIE HARD (8/10) and PREDATOR (8/10) fame, and
Schwarzenegger from the TOTAL RECALL (8/10) and TERMINATOR (8/10)
films, have teamed up to create a fun and enjoyable movie for young and
old.
PLOT:
Young movie geek (O'Brien) receives a magical movie ticket that
mysteriously transports him into the cinematic world of action-star
Jack Slater (Schwarzenegger). Fun ensues as he tries to convince Slater
that he's really "in a movie", dodge all kinds of bad guys, and return
back to his native New York. 
CRITIQUE:
Fun, enjoyable, action-packed, humorous ride through the world of
movies, action heroes and the fine line that rests between fantasy and
reality. This movie is a joy to watch, always keeping you entertained
with exaggerated action sequences, inside jokes, dozens of cameos by
other movie stars (don't bat an eye or you might miss Robert Patrick in
his full police uniform from TERMINATOR 2 (8/10) or Sharon Stone as
Catherine Tramell from BASIC INSTINCT (8/10)), and a semi-coherent plot
that keeps spilling slick action scenes all over this trigger-happy
movie. 
Schwarzenegger plays his role as it is supposed to be played (a movie
character that can't believe that he's in a movie), and even shows up
as a cameo himself, as Arnold Schwarzenegger (one of the funniest
scenes is when the real Maria Schriver (wife of Arnold) scolds the real
Arnold about over-promoting his Planet Hollywood restaurant at movie
premieres, at the movie premiere of Jack Slater 4). The little kid is
decent, and the bad guys are your obvious hyperbolized nemeses, but
that's okay, because this movie is a complete send-up of all action
films, and if you don't "get the joke", than you'll probably not enjoy
the film very much (also, if you don't like action...skip this film!).
The soundtrack is constantly pumping you up, the action sequences are
extremely well shot, and there are no boring parts in the entire film. 
On the down side, the movie does run a little too long, there are one
too many explosions, and some people may not follow the entire plot
line that has some of the characters moving from one dimension to
another (I had no problem with this), but hey, no movie's perfect
right? Overall, this movie is a great nacho-munching extravaganza,
filled with superb action scenes, a bunch of cool cameos, and a
super-tough-guy action star that does the job to the best of his
ability. Fun stuff !! 
Little Known Facts: 
Young O'Brien's Christian parents objected to all the foul language
used in the script, and asked that they be removed from the script. 
This film contains intentional continuity errors.
The schoolteacher who praises Laurence Olivier's performance was played
by Joan Plowright, who is Olivier's widow.
The video CHRISTMAS IN CONNECTICUT (directed by Schwarzenegger) is
visible in the video store. 
Visit JoBlo's Movie Reviews @ http://www.microtec.net/~drsuess/

Title
Review for Autumn in New York (2000)
For more reviews and movie wallpapers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Richard Gere was mad at the studio for not pre-screening this movie for
critics because that's usually a sure-fire sign that a film sucks. Gere came
out and said that he was "very proud of the film", while the studio claimed
that they didn't pre-screen it because they didn't want critics ruining any
plot points for the audience. Yeah...whatever! In the end, I was going to
decide this one for myself. And to be honest, the studio's action and the
lame trailer for this movie had me expecting the worst. In the end, the
film's wasn't so bad, but it wasn't much good either. It was just sort
of...there.
PLOT:
Old, rich, womanizing man falls for a young, perky girl with a secret. You
know the story...boy gets girl, boy loses girl, boy gets girl again, etc...
Obstacles are thrown in the way of their relationship and the couple must
struggle to make the best of their difficult situation.
CRITIQUE:
A sad, love story featuring a distant performance from Richard Gere, a good
turn by Ryder but a lack of real emotion needed to fuel its supposedly
moving, and unoriginal, story line. Having said that, despite no new ground
being broken with this film, I did appreciate the lead couple's chemistry
(for the most part) and was never really bored during its runtime, in spite
of some overly sappy dialogue at times. In fact, having gone in with
expectations of the worst kind, I must say that the overall film surprised
me as a pretty "okay" time. But in the end, I just can't recommend it
because all real love stories inevitably live or die according to the
audience's connection to its lead characters, and if the characters in the
movie don't "work", the film as a whole suffers. Having said that, I thought
Winona was quite commendable in her role. She was perky when she needed to
be, cute at that, sad when the time called for it, and even angry, when
things got out of hand.
Richard Gere, on the other hand, well...who was the brave soul who actually
believed that he might be able to pull off more than a handful of emotions
in this film? I mean, I like Richard Gere, I think he's an interesting man,
a decent performer, but a good actor, well...not really. How can I empathize
with the film or its characters when I don't really feel any emotion when
emotion is what is supposed to be stirring up inside me at that time? I
mean, I had more tears in my eyes when I found out that Jar Jar Binks was
returning in the Star Wars sequel than Gere did in his major breakdown scene
here! But if you take away the "Gere" factor, the film itself does present
some decent style, via rookie director Joan Chen, a soothing soundtrack and
some nice shots of New York City (natch!). But in the end, it just failed to
"pull me into" its story as much as it should have. And yes, I definitely
could have done without some of the really corny lines and poetry, but then
again, others may think it romantic. I do understand the studio's difficulty
in marketing such a film though. Despite its romantic moments, the film also
deals with a very bleak subject matter and in a very big way. The studio
decided to show only the "good stuff" in the trailer, which may ultimately
bite them in the ass, when couples walk out of the film, disappointed and
surprised to find such gloominess within.
I didn't mind that so much, in fact, I thought another great title for the
film could've been THE AGING WOMANIZER, but the movie itself probably isn't
really worth checking out in the theatres. But if don't mind shlocky
"remakes" of other sappy stuff, like the two lead actors and just wanna get
out of the house...well, okay then! :)

Title
Review for Soldier (1998)
For more review and trivia, go to http://surf.to/joblo
RAMBO meets MAD MAX in this follow-up to director Paul Anderson's
derivative science-fiction exercise, EVENT HORIZON (6.5/10), with Kurt
Russell collecting one of his biggest paychecks yet, and the studios
passing it off as the first official "sci-fi Western". Anderson claims
that compared to Kurt's character in this film, "Clint Eastwood is
f-king Hamlet!"
PLOT:
A boy is born and bred to become a cold-hearted, man-killing machine
with only fear and discipline as his emotions. When a new breed of
man-killers are created, his kind are obsolete. He is eventually dumped
into a wasteland of garbage, and left for dead. Discovered by a host of
"homeless people in space", this soldier attempts to grasp newer
concepts such as love and affection. Eventually, the newer mankillers
arrive on said wasteland, and the battle between this once obsolete
soldier and his replacements begins.
CRITIQUE:
Short, easy to digest, science-fiction Western, that does very little
to innovate anything in either genre, and ends up fogging your mind
with memories of gunfire and explosions, and not much of anything else.
If you like to see a lot of people get shot up, then you should check
out this movie. If you like to see a lot of fire and explosions go off,
then go see this movie. If you want to see TV's "The Commish", Michael
Chiklis play eighth banana in a mediocre science-fiction pic, then go
see this movie! Otherwise, skip it, and rent it on video one night when
you have absolutely nothing better to do, and you want to shut your
brain off for a while.
On the positive tip, Kurt Russell does play his cold, feeling-less
character to a tee. He apparently only had a handful of words to
enunciate during the entire film, but he sure made up for it in
unemotional stares. Wow, what a man! All that and he was built like a
lighthouse on steroids. Pretty good for a forty-something, if I don't
say so myself. Scott Lee also had very little dialogue (probably even
less words than Russell), but did provide for some sense of rivalry, I
suppose. All in all, the film never bored me at any point, but it also
never blew me away at any time. It basically just punched in its time
card when it was supposed to, and called it a night.
Russell's character kept reminding me of that classic line from John
Carpenter's THEY LIVE (7.5/10), where Roddy Piper says, "I came here to
chew bubble gum, and kick some ass--- and I'm all outta bubblegum!".
That's basically what Russell was like for the entire movie! He was
just there to kick ass and not much else. I had more fun that I
anticipated because I was with my friend, and we had some fun with the
crappy lines and campy hommages (I noticed at least one to RAMBO and
one to APOCALYPSE NOW). See it if you like brainless guns and
explosions, and a good performance by Russell. Skip it, if you don't
like guns, explosions or Kurt Russell.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
The writer of this film, David Webb Peoples also co-wrote BLADE RUNNER
(7.5/10), and wrote 12 MONKEYS (8/10) and the Oscar-winning UNFORGIVEN.
Isn't that so very, very odd?!
Kurt Russell has 69 words of dialogue in this entire picture. He was
reportedly paid $20million to do this movie, which rounds that off to
about $290,000/ per word. Kurt...you're a great, great man!! With a
middle name like Vogel, how could you go wrong?
Kurt played professional baseball (2nd base, AA club- California
Angels) until a torn shoulder muscle forced him into retirement in
1973. He was hitting .563 at the time of his withdrawal. His friend,
Ron Shelton wrote the Crash Davis role in BULL DURHAM (7.5/10) for him,
but the studio insisted on Kevin Costner instead.
During one particularly realistic fight scene with Jason Scott Lee,
Kurt Russell broke his ankle.
Kurt apparently only landed his role in TANGO & CASH after Patrick
Swayze dropped out. Also, he apparently only landed his role in
BACKDRAFT (8/10), after Dennis Quaid nixed it.
Kurt Russell's real-life son with partner and fellow actress Goldie
Hawn, Wyatt (Note: Kurt played the character of Wyatt Earp in 1993's
TOMBSTONE), plays Russell's character as a 12-year old at the beginning
of this film.
Jason Scott Lee most famous part before this film was his portrayal of
Bruce Lee, in DRAGON: THE BRUCE LEE STORY (8/10)-(no relation).
Note: Kurt Russell has apparently announced this film to be his last
action movie. Stay tuned!

Title
Review for Timecode (2000)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Two major novelties with this film: 1) The movie presented on the screen is
divided into four equal smaller screens, each showing a different story at
the same time as the others 2) The entire movie was shot in one straight
take of ninety-three minutes, and features general improvisation by the
actors. Certainly the concept of this film is unique, but then again,
director James Toback tried another such cinematic experiment earlier this
year with BLACK AND WHITE, and it sucked the big one. Fortunately for us,
this film is actually able to combine its technological novelty, with solid
acting and quite the interesting, sorted tale of a day in the life
of...Hollywood.
PLOT:
Follow the lives of various Hollywood types during a hectic audition day
with a handful of behind-the-scene situations padded by various relationship
dramas.
CRITIQUE:
This is a film which begins on a visually confusing note, eventually settles
into its own and manages to seduce with its voyeuristic appeal, its talented
cast and its sheer creative spirit. Oh yeah, and if none of that appeals to
you, how about the fact that the film features two different sets of
actresses swapping spit during a couple of the film's groovier scenes (Hayek
and Tripplehorn go at it early, and later on, Burrows and Mann take a shot
at the gold). But lesbianism aside, the movie is cool on various different
levels, all of which transcend the initial shock of the visual, including
some surprising comedy by the way of Julian Sands' overly competent massage
therapist and Richard Edson, playing the neurotic director. Of course, the
basis of the film is soaked in various intertwining relationship dramas, but
it's nice to know that director Figgis doesn't take himself too seriously.
He even features a pitch scene in which a woman presents an idea for a movie
not unlike Figgis' own creation, only to be laughed off by a producer as
"the most pretentious crap I've ever heard".
And despite it taking me a while to get used to the idea of four stories on
the screen at the same time, it wasn't long before the volume controls began
to work wonders, and I gelled right into the movie. Finally, a cinematic
experiment that succeeds! Mind you, I wouldn't want to see movies like this
all the time, honestly you have to pay about four times more attention than
you usually do, but kudos to Figgis for pulling this one out of the hat. Of
course, the film wouldn't have been such a success were it not for the
extremely solid performances of its actors. Improvising most of their lines
from a pre-established structure, all of the actors involved in the
production seemed to take full advantage of their respective carte blanches,
smacking many a ball out of the park. By golly, even Salma Hayek was really
good in this (besides being a Goddess of beauty, of course). Give an award
to Stellan Skarsgard for his amazing portrayal of Alex, the alcoholic
producer, who slowly disintegrates before our very eyes, as well as Jeanne
Tripplehorn, who surprised me with her strong showing. A great cast, a
captivating story about pretentious Hollywood folk dishing their dirty
laundry, a novel idea that works and lesbian make-out scenes. How could you
go wrong? :)
Honestly though, if you think that an experiment as such is in your
interest, you should definitely see this film on the big screen, since it
will more than likely lose many of its subtleties on video. A few moments
drag on here and there, but overall the movie works on all cylinders, and
its running time of ninety-three minutes is ideal, considering its novel
concept. So if you're not one to allow your mind to stray during a movie
outing, this film is ideally created for you. Visually unique with an
interesting narrative and a solid cast, this film has turned into one of the
year's nicest surprises for me.

Title
Review for Blow (2001)
For more reviews and movie wallpapers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
PLOT:
George Jung is your typical middle-class kid from Massachusetts.
Unfortunately, he's got a bitchy mom but a nice dad. As a child, he
witnesses his father's struggles to make ends meet and grows up wanting more
out of his own life. As an adult, George generates so much cash at some
point, that his biggest problem becomes finding a place to store it all. How
does George go from being a lil' tike with a cool dad to one of the biggest
drug-runners in the United States during the late 70s, early 80s? True
story. Find out by watching the movie.
CRITIQUE:
Is this movie original? No, not really. Does this movie still give us a
great story, an intriguing lead character, an amazing soundtrack, plenty of
style, many a touching moment and an altogether fascinating cinematic
journey? Oh, definitely! "Ever since I can remember, I always wanted to be a
gangster!" is the quote that starts off one of my favorite movies of
all-time: GOODFELLAS. Now it goes without saying that this film will
unavoidably be compared to that film, SCARFACE, BOOGIE NIGHTS and many other
epic life-stories of little so-and-so's making it to the "big time". But
unlike most of those wise guys, here's a film in which the lead character
doesn't really want to be a gangster, but one circumstance leads to another
circumstance and the next thing you know, he's meeting with Pablo Escobar,
the biggest drug lord in the world. A very interesting journey, to say the
least. Here's a movie that gives you another intriguing story of a "regular
guy" who ends up in extra-ordinary circumstances, and with a little bit of
street-smarts, a little bit of charm and a lotta balls, makes something out
of himself. Mind you, I personally have always been fascinated with the
biographies of famous people, so maybe this story won't grab you as much as
it did me. But the actors are also all very good in this film, the high
style in perfect alignment with the previously mentioned flicks and plenty
of drama, bits of humor, betrayals and double-crossings (natch!).
Another thing that sets this flick apart from the previously mentioned
movies is its personal connections which are highlighted to us through its
lead character. A very deep father/son relationship is explored here and so
is the lead's love for his daughter, which keeps him going through some of
the tougher times (having recently had a baby girl himself, I could see how
Depp could relate more to this character). Ultimately, you will either be
interested in this man's story or not, and I for one, was quite absorbed and
entertained. The detailed progression of his beginnings, his rise and his
eventual downfall (I don't think I'm giving anything away here) are well
paced and convincingly strung together, with lotsa flair via the director's
eye, a groovy soundtrack, some entertaining side characters and a very
poignant ending. I don't think you should go into this movie expecting to
see something entirely different from the films mentioned above, because
they do ultimately resemble each other quite a bit in style, pace and
general undertone. But the personalities, the struggles and the personal
story behind this one is on a fresher tip, and it certainly grabbed me and
took me along for quite the ride. The word "epic" was made for this movie.
Kudos to Ted Demme for taking the material and turning into an entertaining
and touching vehicle, and to Johnny Depp for keeping me glued to the screen
with yet another solid performance. Although I do wish he hadn't worn his
sunglasses so much, since it didn't allow for the viewer to get into his
character's eyes. But alas...
PS: You also shouldn't expect to see much of Cruz or Reubens, who appear to
be billed much greater than their characters' respective appearances in the
film.
Little Known Facts about the movie and its stars:
This movie is based on the Bruce Porter book called "Blow: How a small-town
boy made $100 million with the Medellin cartel and lost it all".
When the film first started casting, actors John Leguizamo and James
Gandolfini were in talks to play Depp's good friend in the movie and his
dad, respectively. The roles eventually went to Jordi Molla and Ray Liotta.
>From where do you know the screenwriters of this movie? Well, David McKenna
is the man who wrote AMERICAN HISTORY X (9/10) and co-wrote GET CARTER,
while Nick Cassavetes is the son of the famous writer/director John
Cassavetes, who himself also had a role as one of the bad guys in John Woo's
FACE/OFF. He also co-starred with Johnny Depp in THE ASTRONAUT'S WIFE
(4/10).
One of Depp's earlier girlfriends in the movie is played by German actress
Franka Potente, who you will undoubtedly remember as the lead from RUN LOLA
RUN.
One of the producers on this project is none other than actor/comedian Denis
Leary. Director Ted Demme has directed a couple of Leary's TV specials,
"Lock N Load" and 1992's "No Cure for Cancer", and two films starring the
funnyman, MONUMENT AVENUE (aka SNITCH) and THE REF. Leary also hails from
the same state as the film's lead character George Jung: Massachusetts.
And yes, for anyone who's still asking, director Ted Demme is in fact the
real-life nephew of SILENCE OF THE LAMBS director Jonathan Demme.
Where's JoBlo coming from?
Boogie Nights (8/10) - Casino (7/10) - Donnie Brasco (8/10) - Fear &
Loathing in Las Vegas (7/10) - Goodfellas (10/10) - Scarface (9/10) -
Traffic (8/10)

Title
Review for Civil Action, A (1998)
For more reviews and movie trivia, visit http://www.joblo.com/
This film melds the respective talents of the man behind the words of
SCHINDLER'S LIST (7/10) and the man who once proudly uttered the phrase
"They call it Le BigMac" in a film, Steve Zaillian and John Travolta.
Captured from a book written by Jonathan Harr, this film is based on a true
story, stars plenty of big names and tosses in a couple of cameos, just for
the fun of it.
PLOT:
Typical shark-like lawyer with no conscience takes on a case featuring the
suspiciously similar deaths of eight children in a small town. The parents
believe that a local plant had contaminated the water supply, ultimately
killing their kids. The lawyer fights two multinationals in court, but runs
out of money nearing the end of the trial. Luckily for him, he's able to
replace it with a newly developed sense of morals.
CRITIQUE:
Interesting yet unexciting court-battle drama features Travolta in prime
form as John Travolta, Duvall in one of his better supporting roles, and an
unsatisfying ending which leaves you dispassionately shrugging your
shoulders at best. This movie is a highbrow affair for people who 1) enjoy
lawyer movies 2) don't require any action in their films and 3) don't mind a
"realistic" ending and appreciate good actors. I personally found it to be
quite humdrum, and even a little boring at times. Kinda had me wishing for a
fistfight or something, one which, unfortunately for me, never materialized.
The plot is well developed, as is the execution of the film, but the missing
link seemed to be the emotional attachment to the film or any of its
characters. This seemed to be non-existent for me. Travolta's cold
performance may have been the reason. Or maybe the lack of tension or real
suspense. Not sure. All's I know is that the film had a superb idiosyncratic
performance by Bobby Duvall, some interesting law factoids, and enough stars
to agreeably allow me to weather its two-hour runtime, all without wowing me
over.
All in all, a mediocre fabrication of law-cinema, offering some points of
interest, no real action, and a weak ending, which applauds the hard work
and genuine nature of some lawyers out there, while belaboring a few of the
justice system's systemic imperfections. No need to see it on the big
screen. Catch it on video, if interested.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
John Travolta received only $140,000 for his Oscar-nominated role in Quentin
Tarantino's PULP FICTION (7.5/10), and a whopping $15,000,000 for 1997's
FACE-OFF (8/10). He needn't make another movie for the rest of his life
because he has secured a percentage of the profits from the Saturday Night
Fever and Grease soundtracks (which have sold in excess of 19 million
copies).
Travolta was born the youngest of six children to tire salesman and former
semiprofessional football player Salvatore Travolta, and high school drama
teacher Helen Travolta. At the age of 16, Travolta dropped out of school
(with his parents' permission, mind you) to pursue acting full-time.
Travolta's white "disco outfit" from 1977's SATURDAY NIGHT FEVER (7.5/10)
recently fetched a record-setting $145,500 at a Christie's auction.
Travolta's present wife, actress Kelly Preston, was once engaged to
Hollywood bad-boy Charlie Sheen, and lived with George Clooney at another
point in her life.
Since 1964, Robert Duvall has been married three times, most recently to
dance instructor Sharon Brophy. Their tumultuous divorce, which was set into
motion by Duvall's allegations that Brophy had carried on an adulterous
affair with a pool installer, dragged on for nearly three years.
William H. Macy got his infamous role in the Coens' brothers FARGO (7/10) as
such: From the moment he read the script, Macy knew he was the man best
suited for the role of luckless car salesman Jerry "Hey! I'm cooperating
here!" Lundegaard. Though asked to read for the part twice, Macy was
eventually left hanging by those darn Coen brothers, who promised to get bac
k to him. Shortly thereafter, the actor learned that the brothers were
continuing to audition his prize part and promptly flew from L.A. to New
York, where he cornered the still-deliberating duo and frankly informed
them, "I'm very, very worried that you are going to screw up this movie by
giving this role to somebody else. It's my role, and I'll shoot your dogs if
you don't give it to me." The Coens conceded, and Macy's brilliant
performance was rewarded with a Best Supporting Actor Oscar nomination in
that very same year.
Actor James Galdolfini's sister Johanna is a prominent official with the New
Jersey Family Court system.

Title
Review for Outside Providence (1999)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Hard to market. That is what this movie is. Hard to market. I suppose that
is why Miramax was trying to sell it as a "Farrelly brothers comedy",
because it's a movie whose target audience is extremely hard to pinpoint. Is
it a teen comedy? Sort of. Is it a father-son drama? Sort of. Is it for kids
or for adults, funny or dramatic? Sort of. And I guess that's why Peter
Farrelly has come out and said that it's basically just a coming of age
story. And that's basically it. Not much more, and not much less.
PLOT:
A young boy from the wrong side of the tracks gets busted for drugs and is
sent to a prep school by his uneducated, vulgar, drunk of a father. While
away, he discovers new friends, a girlfriend and more pot. Oh yeah...and he
learns a few lessons too!
CRITIQUE:
I originally wondered why they had translated this movie into "Cannabis 101"
for the French posters around town here in Montreal, but I wonder no more.
Lots of pot smoking going on in here, people. That aside, this is a passable
teen comedy with little original inspiration, save for the over-the-top,
gruffy performance from Mr. Chesthair himself, Alec Baldwin. It basically
treads no new ground in respect to the genre that it inhibits
(coming-of-age), and made me curious as to how it ever got made in the first
place (Can anyone say "Farrelly brothers!"). Having said that, the movie
does contain some humorous sequences, one or two touching moments, and a lot
of scenes showing kids smoking drugs and drinking booze. I guess you should
see the movie if the general premise appeals to you, but overall, I would
say that it's a rental for sure.
Unfortunately, despite some of the comedic sequences actually coming through
in this film, the same cannot be said for its dramatic element. In fact,
there seemed to be no palpable tension or any real obstacles to overcome for
anyone in this movie. It just sort of floated along in front of my eyes, and
then suddenly disappeared, just as the credits popped up. The tete-a-tete
stuff vs the school supervisor was the least effective, since the man was
once more, composed of little less than one dimension, while the romance
with the girl was easy and unexciting at best. I guess that could actually
be said about the whole movie as well. Easy and unexciting. Nice enough for
a date movie, a few laughs, or a video rental, but little else. Hatosy
reminds me of a young Peter Berg. One thing is for sure: DO NOT go into this
movie expecting a "Farrelly Brothers comedy". It's a reincarnated
coming-of-age dramedy, and that's about it. Baldwin rocks!
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Actor Shawn Hatosy hails from the state of Maryland, where he was born in
1975, in a place called Fredrick. He made his motion picture debut in the
Jodie Foster-directed 1995 film HOME FOR THE HOLIDAYS. He played the
"counter boy". You may also remember him as the student who ultimately had
the courage to stand up for his recently outed teacher Kevin Kline, in
1997's IN & OUT.
Director Michael Corrente was born in the town of Pawtucket, Rhode Island,
the same city in which this film takes place. In fact, most of the film was
shot in and around Rhode Island. Michael has also done some acting in his
career, and played "Scranton Wino" in the Farrelly Brothers hilarious 1996
movie KINGPIN (8.5/10). He did almost everything on his first picture called
FEDERAL HILL in 1995. He wrote, directed and starred in it.
The Farrelly brothers were also born in Rhode Island. Cumberland, RI, to be
exact. Peter Farrelly actually graduated from Providence College in
Providence, RI, and based this film on his semi-autobiographical novel of
the same name.
This film was released and translated into the title "CANNABIS 101" in the
province of Quebec, Canada.

Title
Review for SubUrbia (1997)
For more movie reviews and trivia, visit http://www.joblo.com/
PLOT:
A bunch of GenX kids hang around a convenience shop for the night, while
they await the return of their friend from the past, who is now a big-time
drummer for a popular band on MTV. They talk, talk some more, and then talk
some more.
CRITIQUE:
Originally a play by Eric Bogosian, I could see how this idea might've
worked in the theatre, but on the big screen, it does little more than
perpetuate the ill-founded theory that most kids of our generation are
without direction, plagued with problems, and most importantly, boring and
self-important. The dialogue in this movie was pretty good and believable,
and Giovanni Ribisi sure comes out of it smelling like a solid acting rose,
but the rest of the cast was so-so and unsympathetic, the set seemed too
clean and contrived for the circumstances, and the plot, far from
compelling. I also hate films that don't "close themselves up" real well,
and this one decided to take that ol' "you figure out what might've happened
to these characters" approach. Listen pal, I just invested two hours of my
time into these cheesy characters, so the least that you could do it give me
a decent payoff! Didn't happen. Anyway, I hope to God people don't see this
movie and imagine our generation to be this lame and annoying (Could the
"fly-girl" Sooze with the earrings all over herself have been any more
irritating?!!?). All in all, a generic dialogue-intensive film with no plot,
uninteresting characters (save for Ribisi) and an open ending.
One saving grace: Giovanni Ribisi shows the whole world what his ding-dong
looks like. Congratulations Giova, you've officially been knighted
Keitel-Jr.  :)

Title
Review for Perfect Murder, A (1998)
For more reviews and trivia, go to http://surf.to/joblo
Remake of Alfred Hitchcock's 1954 thriller originally titled DIAL M FOR
MURDER, pits Michael Douglas alongside Gwyneth Paltrow and Viggo
Mortensen, under the direction of Andrew Davis, the man behind the
1993's FUGITIVE (8/10) starring Harrison Ford.
PLOT:
Caught in a loveless marriage, Paltrow hooks up in an affair with
artist Mortensen. Paltrow's ultra-rich husband Douglas soon finds out
about the tryst, and develops a foolproof plan to murder his wife. The
plan does not quite go as planned, and all three characters are left
dangling in a plot filled with double-crosses, blackmail and intrigue.
CRITIQUE:
Effective, well-paced murder mystery set within the elite of New York's
high society, melds elements of intrigue and suspense, with some plot
holes and plenty of guesses as to what's gonna happen next. This film
kept me (and Mrs. JoBlo) guessing all the way through, and added to the
overall enjoyment of this imperfect mystery. I'd heard predictability
complaints from others that had already seen this picture, but let me
tell you that most of the stuff that went down in this movie was quite
the surprise to this guy! The performances, on the other hand, were
not.
All three characters were your basic Hollywood movie cardboard cutouts,
but still, the actors all managed to pull off some decent performances.
Michael Douglas has all but certified his position as the ultimate
rich-guy with rocks of steel, as this performance and his earlier
tours-of-force in THE GAME (8/10) and Gordon Gekko (my hero!) in WALL
STREET (8.5/10) have undoubtedly proven. Paltrow didn't really do much
with this role, but then again, it wasn't written with much in mind.
Her character seemed quite ignorant and aloof for most of the film. But
Viggo Mortensen, well heck, now there's an actor with some bite!! If
you have yet to hear much about this man, open your ears, and listen
wide. This guy can act...and act well goddammit! I have loved almost
all of his performances, with his role in THE INDIAN RUNNER (6/10) and
last year's G.I. JANE (6.5/10) standing out in my mind, and certainly a
force to reckon for all great future character roles. Watch for
him...he's hot!
On the whole, this film never bored me, always kept me guessing, and
offered some ripe performances from some decent actors, while never
overplaying itself. It will definitely not go down in the history of
film as one of the greatest mysteries to ever be shown on the big
screen, but then again, it ain't a stinker either. Curl up with your
loved one, shut the lights, inhale those nachos, and try to figure out
who's going to be doing what to whom next. You'll have a fun time,
despite the film's lack of major breakthroughs.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Viggo Mortensen actually painted the large murals in his artist's
studio in this film. He also lived in South America from age 2 to age
11.
Gwyneth Paltrow admitted that her romantic scenes with Michael Douglas
felt weird in this film, because he had practically seen her grow up
before his very eyes, since Michael and her father, Bruce Paltrow, are
good friends. On August 15, 1998, Gwyneth gave a $21,000 watch to
boyfriend Ben Affleck as a birthday present. She stands 5'9.
Michael Douglas won an Oscar for Best Actor for his role as Gordon
Gekko in 1987's Oliver Stone film WALL STREET (8.5/10). He also
produced the Oscar-winning film for Best Picture in 1975, ONE FLEW OVER
THE CUCKOO'S NEST (7.5/10), whose movie rights were owned by Mike's
father, Kirk Douglas, for a long time before his son finally started
the project.

Title
Review for Beach, The (2000)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
I think it was director Quentin Tarantino who once related the experience of
watching a movie with an umbilical chord attachment to the screen. You see,
the chord apparently remains attached until "something" in the movie just
cuts it off, after which point, it is all but impossible to re-attach, and
your "relationship" with the film ends. This film had my chord attached till
about 3/4 of the way through but then...snip-snip!
PLOT:
A young American looking for adventure in Bangkok gets a hold of a secret
map to a paradise island and takes a couple of French friends along for the
ride. Once at the island, all is well among the community of folks lucky
enough to have found this utopian garden, that is...until things don't go so
well!
CRITIQUE:
The excellent showing by DiCaprio and the slick soundtrack don't take away
from the fact that this film starts off strong, slows down considerably
during its median and just goes kinda cooky in the end. For DiCaprio, one
can't really blame the kid for choosing this project over all others after
his gigantic TITANIC success. It doesn't pander to his teeny-bopper
followers or exploit his good-looks, it delivers a decent premise and many a
dark undertone, and it even sets him up with the hip director of
TRAINSPOTTING...so what's the problem? Well, it looked to me like the film
just didn't know what it wanted to be. Was it an action-adventure? Hmmmm,
not really. Was it a romance? Well, a little bit, but then not! Was it a
thriller? Not really, but there were a couple of thrilling scenes. It's hard
to say. Of course, none of this would really matter if the film's many
facets worked together to form a cohesive and entertaining whole, but
unfortunately, this film just slips up right under the wire. In fact, the
sudden "twist" near the end of the flick just kinda "lost me", on top of the
lingering pace once they had settled in at the island. Some people might dig
all that, but for me, it just felt a little ackward. Although I did enjoy
the "video game" sequence (you'll understand if you see the film).
Don't get me wrong, I'm into surrealism as much as the next guy, but after
waddling through what seemed like over an hour of "look how happy we all are
to be in paradise!" exposition, I was just expecting a little more out of
this film. But on the positive tip, this movie was packed with gorgeous
shots of places that we all wish we were at right now, moves along a little
smoother under the electro-sounds of the film's groovy soundtrack and
presents us with an actor by the name of Leonardo DiCaprio in top form! It's
good to know that he's still the great actor that he was before that damn
boat sunk his career into a professional abyss. Welcome back, dude. Having
said that, it's actually pretty hard to define the type of moviegoer that
would thoroughly enjoy this film, since it does meche many different styles
into one. Adventure fans might like some of it, romance seekers might enjoy
parts as well, a little drama, a little comedy. Hard to pinpoint. Of course,
most Leo fans should dig it just for his solid presence, but then again,
would those same people appreciate the HEART OF DARKNESS undertones?
Probably not.
All in all, this movie succeeds in style, music and Leo, but ultimately
fails to string along a story good enough to warrant a hearty
recommendation. Entertaining for a while, but faulty overall.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Leonardo DiCaprio's middle name is Wilhelm. That name comes from his German
mother's side, who apparently experienced a sudden kick from her unborn
child while enjoying a DaVinci painting at the Uffizi. Hence his first
name...Leonardo. His father was of Italian heritage, a comic book dealer,
but his parents got divorced only a year after his birth. At the age of
five, Leo was on his favorite kid's TV show, Romper Room, where we was
nearly tossed off for misbehaving. A great professional move on his part
came when he turned down the opportunity to play Robin in the Batman flicks.
Leo received $2.5 Million for his role in TITANIC, and about $20 Million for
his role in this movie.
French actress Virginie Ledoyen has been acting since the age of 11. She was
recently signed on as a L'Oreal celebrity model and nominated as "most
promising young actress" at the 1996 Cesar Awards. This was the first
"english" film in which both she and her French co-star Guillaume Canet had
ever been a part.
Reports of problems with the filming of this movie in Thailand were running
rampant over the past year. Another film which also ran into a multitude of
problems while filming was Coppola's APOCALYPSE NOW, a movie that is
actually featured in a scene in THE BEACH. A respectful homage, I am sure.
This film is based on the novel written by first-time author Alex Garland,
who is only thirty years old.

Title
Review for Sleepy Hollow (1999)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
I've always been oddly attracted to the dark and the beautiful, the strange
and the black, the surreal and the imagined. I've also loved the leaves of
autumn, the nights of breeze and cold when I could just curl myself up into
bed and wrap my daily reality into dreamy visions of wonder and fantasy,
while knowing full well that not one person on this planet, including
myself, truly knows why we exist. The only thing that we do know is that we
are all lucky enough to have a director like Tim Burton who also seems to
affiliate himself to the surreal and beautiful, and likes to slap his tales
of the absurd with some darkly mined humor.
PLOT:
Constable Ichabod Crane is sent to the small town of Sleepy Hollow in order
to investigate a recent rash of murders by decapitation. Basing his findings
solely on scientific factors and evidence, the detective respectfully
brushes off the townfolks' allegations of a "headless horseman", but soon
discovers much personal evidence to confirm the people's outlandish claims.
Headrollings ensue.
CRITIQUE:
Beautiful. A film which draws you into its grungy world with its impeccable
style and attention to dreary detail, woos you in further with a charmingly
pure performance from an actor who is firmly solidifying his place amongst
his peer group of esteemed thespians, namely Johnny Depp, and topping the
whole gothic show up with an interesting tale of the legendary unknown,
mixed in with some timely humor and bloody carnage courtesy of the coolest
scary son-of-a-bitch of the year, put your hands together for...the headless
horseman. You know I really dug a movie when I run off and into 100-word
sentences, so grammatically wrong, but so emotionally right! This is the
ultimate Tim Burton movie. The entire presentation is a flawless visual
feast which makes you feel like you are really in this dingy town in upper
New York, when in reality, the whole film was shot on sets in London,
England.
I always knew Johnny Depp was a different kind of actor, but also suspected
that he might be taking his goofy roles to hide his lack of true acting
chop, but boy, did this film ever prove me wrong. Johnny chomps up his
scenes during this entire film and had me utterly convinced of his presence
in the year of 1799, engulfed in his character's arrogance on one side and
cowardice on the other. Excellent job! He made this film so much more
enjoyable for me along with the haunting score from Danny Elfman, the wildly
effective sets, the dreamlike cinematography and let's not forget, the
ultimately cool clompety-clomps of the headless horseman riding his way into
town. Brrrr...cover that neck, this bastard's pissed and he's got no head!!
I love this movie! It looks awesome, it feels awesome, it sounds awesome,
it's got Johnny Depp in top form, Ricci letting it all hang out, humor,
thrills, romance, drama, a little murder mystery tossed in, and oh yeah,
let's not forget all the bloody decapitations that you could shake a stick
at!
You'll be happy to know that I've also invited this film back for an annual
visit inside my DVD player every season of the pumpkin, joining its
Halloween staple brother in law, THE NIGHTMARE BEFORE CHRISTMAS.
And someone tells me that the actual town of Sleepy Hollow is only about
two hours from where I'm stationed. Hmmmm....interesting.
Clompety-clompety-clomp.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
COMING SOON to JoBlo's Movie Emporium

Title
Review for Wag the Dog (1997)
For more reviews and trivia, go to http://surf.to/joblo
Step aside Stanley Kubrick, Barry Levinson has just released two films
within six months of each another, while you're still out filming your
first movie in over ten years! Then again, Levinson's two films don't
exactly mount a challenge to any of your classic tales (DR.
STRANGLELOVE (7/10) being the first to spring to mind here), but hey,
at least he's working hard, right? SPHERE (6.5/10) was Levinson's other
film released in early 1998, while WAG THE DOG came out in late 1997.
PLOT:
The President of the United States is alleged to have had a sexual
encounter with a firefly girl while in office. To divert the country's
attention from this politically fatal bit of information, the
President's spin staff go all out on creating true-to-life scenarios of
more important and relevant news to the country. A Hollywood producer
is brought in to orchestrate the diverting hoaxes, and maintain the
President's approval ratings until the re-election vote in eleven days
time.
CRITIQUE:
One-joke political talking heads film does not generate enough humour
or excitement for me to appreciate the overall strong efforts put forth
by all of its actors and director. This movie is basically based on one
idea of pulling the wool over the country's eyes and not much else. And
as much as this concept intrigued me during its first ten to fifteen
minutes, the repetitive nature of the film's progression, just dragged
any enthusiasm and interest completely out of my system. There are only
so many scenes of people gathered in a small boardroom, and folks
chatting things up through their cellulars that I could take before
hungering out for something with a little more entertainment value.
Also, despite the film being classified as a political satire (I'll be
the first to admit that political films are not my favourite types of
film), I found very little humour in this script, despite a few moments
of cheeky cleverness. I'm sure that many people in the Hollywood and
Washington inner-circles would appreciate many of the witty lines from
this movie, but for me, it all seemed like a lot of talking by the same
group of people about the interrelated ideas over and over and over
again. Having said all that, the film did run a quick 90 minutes or so,
did have a decent score, and did offer some unique directing ticks by
Levinson, and solid performances by all involved.
Dustin Hoffman, Robert DeNiro and Anne Heche all pull off dead-on
portrayals of sneaks in the business world of show and politics. But
despite their valiant efforts and high credibility factors, I did find
myself rolling my eyes during many of the films scenarios of deception,
and questioning their relatively ease of unfolding. And while the film
does moniker itself a satire, I felt that too many of its media-fueled
fantasies just made the entire American population and media appear to
be a bunch of complete ignoramuses with not much more on their mind
than TV and sensationalism. Not sure how factual that statement may be
to true life, but I guess I would've preferred a stronger offensive
from the plethora of cynics roaming today's societal potpourri. All in
all, I could picture this film endearing itself to all those fans of
political fare, but gaining very little excitement from the rest of the
American Joes of whom this film pokes fun. I personally liked its
conclusion and acting performances, but found much of the rest of the
film to be dry, repetitive and unfunny.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Keep your eyes peeled for Robert DeNiro's real-life daughter playing
the gate stewardess at the airport in this film. Her name is Drena
DeNiro. Mr. DeNiro was also a producer on this film.
After this film started production and before its release, US President
Bill Clinton became involved in a sex scandal with former White House
intern Monica Lewinsky, and threatened military action against Iraq.
Barry Levinson apparently took only 30 days of filming to complete this
film.
This film constitutes Robert DeNiro's fourth partnership with a David
Mamet-based screenplay. The three others were the ill-fated WE'RE NO
ANGELS, THE UNTOUCHABLES (7.5/10) and most recently, RONIN (7.5/10).
William H. Macy once studied under writer David Mamet at Goddard
College in Vermont. The "H" in his name stands for Hall.
Anne Heche dated fellow actor Steve Martin for two years, before
switching sexual gears and becoming Ellen DeGeneres' partner in 1997.
Plenty of cameos pepper this small-budgeted production ($15million)
including Woody Harrelson, Jim Belushi, Jay Leno, William H. Macy
(Delivering one of the films best lines, "When the fit hits the shan,
someone's going to have to stay after school,"), Craig T. Nelson,
Willie Nelson and Kirsten Dunst.
Woody Harrelson graduated from Hanover College in 1983. He also played
the character "Woody" from Hanover on the super-popular TV sitcom
"Cheers".
Kirsten Dunst beat out Christina Ricci for roles in INTERVIEW WITH THE
VAMPIRE (8/10) and LITTLE WOMEN.
The original music for this film was scored by Mark Knoffler, member of
the famed "Dire Straits" musical group.

Title
Review for Edtv (1999)
For more reviews and movie trivia, visit http://www.joblo.com/
It's just a matter of time before this movie concept actually materializes
itself into the fabric of our real life cable network channels, but until
that time, I guess we have to settle for the always reliable direction of
Ron Howard, a script by the kings of harmless comedies, Babaloo Mandel and
Lowell Ganz (based on the French film, LOUIS 19), and the acting chops of a
wide range of Hollywood thespians.
PLOT:
Regular Johnny Lunchpail dude gets paid by a cable network channel to
televise his entire life on TV as it happens live. He agrees and ultimately
turns into a media sensation and major celebrity in the eyes of the millions
of people that watch him daily. These changes affect every relationship in
his life, including the most significant one with a woman who touches his
heart, but not those of his fickle TV viewing audience.
CRITIQUE:
Light, safe, enjoyable romantic comedy with a good premise, charming leads,
offers just enough cute, cuddly and funny moments to satisfy the general
population. Now despite clocking in at a heftier time than anticipated (2
hours+), I think this movie works particularly well because of the potent
acting talents of its two main stars, Matthew McConaughey and Jenna Elfman.
Admittedly, I was never a fan of Elfman before this film, but she gives a
great, loveable performance that most everyone should enjoy. And yes, I even
thought she looked adorable in that UPS outfit! McConaughey also punches up
the film with his authentic performance of Joe America, with the ideal
balance of charisma, humor and drama. The rest of the cast is also pretty
solid in their roles, but I felt that the amplitude of characters left some
to be underdeveloped. For example, the Woody Harrelson role started off
strong, but ended pretty flat, while Rob Reiner's character seemed like a
one-dimensional cookie-board cutout role generally used to satisfy the
screenwriters' need for an audience-satisfying retribution finish, which
didn't leave much to the imagination.
Having said that, this film had me chuckling and even laughing along for
most of its run, with the title of Woody Harrelson's book in the film,
generating my hardiest guffaw. There are also plenty of cameos sprinkled
throughout this party which seemed to resonate an overall sense of easy and
clean humor (The lack of uninhibited sex, violence and open vulgarity
obviously well calculated.) The soundtrack seemed like a constant, with
every other scene containing a new song, and the style, pretty
straightforward. And even though I don't particularly recall one superior
scene or even one hoppin' song from the movie, I can say that it was
entertaining, and that it should pull in some decent numbers at the
box-office. Go see it with your loved one. It's safe, it's fun, and nobody
gets hurt. Hi Mom!
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
COMING SOON to JoBlo's Movie Emporium

Title
Review for Buffalo '66 (1998)
For more reviews and movie trivia, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Actor, part-time Calvin Klein model and all-around greazy-looking guy
Vincent Gallo takes his first shot at directing, in this
semi-autobiographical movie, which he also wrote and provided the original
music. Christina Ricci, best remembered as the character of Tuesday from the
ADAMS FAMILY films, grows up, sloshes on some make-up and a frilly
cleavage-friendly tap-dancing dress, and comes into her own in this hybrid
comedy/drama. Let's all hope that Gallo doesn't call me up and tell me off
because of that "greazy-looking guy" comment now....hehehe.
PLOT:
Frenetic con man gets out of jail and returns home to see his parents.
Having invented an existence without prison and a new wife to his folks, the
man kidnaps a girl to play his wife for his one visit home.
CRITIQUE:
One of the few real independent movies to come out in 1998, this film
combines an excellent troupe of actors, a quirky, humorous and sometimes
serious script, with an amazing new set of visual techniques purposely
orchestrated by the man behind all of the magic, Vincent Gallo. This film's
style blends elements from many an independent director's early works, like
Tom DeCillo's JOHNNY SUEDE (8/10), Martin Scorsese's MEAN STREETS (7/10),
David Lynch's BLUE VELVET (8.5/10) and Gus Van Sant's MY OWN PRIVATE IDAHO
(7.5/10). Gallo also wrote a pretty funny screenplay filled with interesting
characters, idiosyncrasies galore, and a decent romance between two very odd
lead characters.
Christina Ricci plays an excellent victim in this movie, and rises to every
occasion to shine whenever her character takes center or back stage. She
comes across as a very sexy, mature and interesting actress, primed to take
off in her career. I haven't seen much of Gallo on film, but he most
certainly does exude a hunk o' charisma despite his character's utter
despicability, and convinces as the double, and triple-talking, prick. One
particularly peculiar scene in the photo booth will have the words "spanning
time" resonating in your head for years to come. Trust me, this guy's nuts
and hilarious. The parents as played by Ben Gazzara and an unrecognizable
Anjelica Huston also come through in spades, and the conclusion in the strip
joint is an eye-full to beware. An overall unique style, with a unique
story, a unique actor and a great supporting cast, and the great Christina
Ricci.
Mind you, if you don't like movies that are different from the norm, don't
see this film. If you enjoy a little paprika in your dinner every now and
again, taste this original spice and watch the low-class dirt from the movie
ooze right down into your gut. Note: Alongside Tony Kaye's AMERICAN HISTORY
X (8/10), this film is one of the most visually stunning movies of the year.
Ironically, both directors are extremely vocal in their displeasure of
anyone who opposes their views.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Actors Vincent Gallo and Kevin Corrigan both had parts in the 1990 classic
Martin Scorsese mob film, GOODFELLAS (9/10). Gallo played a member of Harry
70s crew, while Kevin played Ray Liotta's younger brother, Michael Hill.
Vincent Gallo was actually born in Buffalo, NY. His real father's voice,
Vincent Gallo Sr., is the actual voice that you hear during Ben Gazzara's
"serenade" of Christina Ricci.
Gallo has been known to shoot off his mouth in real-life, and even had
conflicts with Anjelica Huston and Christina Ricci on the set of this movie.
Susan Sarandon no longer speaks to him because he called her "an old hag."
He called Leonardo DiCaprio "a good-looking girl" and director James Cameron
"a pig." He turned down roles in both RESERVOIR DOGS (9/10) and BOOGIE
NIGHTS (7.5/10). He claims not to drink, smoke or do drugs, and portrays
himself as a rather right-wing Republican. He also has a personal collection
of over 5,700 videotapes. "Very ordinary, corny movies are ones that I seem
to like the most."
Gallo first wrote the screenplay for the film in 1989, and was satisfied
with a final draft completed with Alison Bagnall in 1996. He apparently
cannot spell or use a typewriter. The film cost $1.5-million to make, and
was shot entirely in Buffalo, NY. He's had 15 one-man shows of his artwork,
and an early Super 8 film of his appears briefly in the movie BASQUAIT (as
does Vincent himself). He has also played in several bands including The
Plastics, Gray (with the real-life Basquiat), Bohack and Bunny.
Christina Ricci was turned down for the role of Claudia in INTERVIEW WITH
THE VAMPIRE (8/10), as well as roles in JURASSIC PARK (7.5/10) and LITTLE
WOMEN.
Review Date:  February 13, 1999
Director: Vincent Gallo
Writers:   Vincent Gallo and Allison Bagnall
Producer:  Chris Hanley
Actors:   Vincent Gallo as Billy Brown, Christina Ricci as Layla, Ben
Gazzara as Jimmy Brown, Anjelica Huston as Janet Brown
Genre:   Comedy
Year of Release:  1998

Title
Review for Girl, Interrupted (1999)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
It was writer/director James Mangold who apparently resurrected Sylvester
Stallone's career a couple of years ago when he cast the ol' lad in a
"character role" in COPLAND. Recently, Stallone admitted that his phone had
ceased to ring shortly thereafter and that he basically felt a lot like a
piece of "driftwood". Hmmmm. Well, I've had that same feeling about Winona
Ryder for the past few years, so eager was I to see what she would come up
with in her executive producing debut.
PLOT:
Set in the sixties, this film takes place in a ward reserved for girls with
mental problems. The main character in the story is a depressed girl who is
not sure about whether or not she is really crazy, but knows enough to sign
herself into the recuperation center. Over time, she finds out more about
herself, life and the other so-called "insane" girls around her.
CRITIQUE:
Dry rehashed depressing material coiffed in a couple of solid performances
from Winona Ryder and Angelina Jolie, does not impress much in story,
original characters or insight, but did manage to haul itself in less than 3
hours, so I guess that it ain't all bad! Surprised was I that this film
wasn't as boring as I had initially anticipated, but definitely far from
being a visual page-turner as well. Jolie's performance alone kept me
interested for most of the runtime, with plenty of energy, attitude and
sheer presence to make up for the basically depressive story similar in vein
to Jack Nicholson and ONE FLEW OVER THE CUCKOO'S NEST. This film might
certainly be useful or even insightful to many people who could relate
stronger to its characters, but in my own case, I found very little new or
rich material here. In fact, the final "confrontation scene" which was built
up to be one filled with emotions, left me with little more than a roll of
the eyes.
Is it truly depressing and will you want to go out, find the nearest bar and
drown yourself in liquor over the pitiful state of your measly existence
after having seen the movie? Certainly not. It does provide for some levity
in parts and even teases you with an epilogue which definitely might be
mistaken as an optimistic one by some. Unfortunately, I just didn't find
anything fresh or engaging in much of the film's narrative, save for the
bang-a-gong performance by John Voight's daughter, Angelina. Actually,
Winona Ryder was also pretty solid as the girl falling apart at the seams,
as were most of the rest of the girls (Ixnay on Whoopie Goldberg, who
basically felt like Whoopie Goldberg in some big-ass hair!), but on the
whole, the film just didn't leave me with much more to think about once it
was over. The only thing on my mind after the movie was all that damn snow
that I was gonna have to clean off my car, but alas, that is my life in the
Great White North.
See it if you haven't seen ONE FLEW, enjoy depressing material, feel as
though you may relate to the unstable characters or really dig Jolie and
Ryder. Otherwise skip this downer and live to smile another day.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Winona Ryder's birth name is Winona Laura Horowitz, named after the town in
which she was born-Winona, Minnesota. She came up with her last name after
having shot her first feature LUCAS in 1986, when she received a phone call
from the producers who asked her how she wanted to have her name appear on
the credits of the film. She suggested Ryder as her father's Mitch Ryder
album was playing the background. And that was that!
Winona was also able to personally identify with the character that she
portrayed in this film because she once checked herself into a hospital when
she was 20 years old as well (Not sure if her break-up with Johnny Depp had
anything to do with this). Her condition was based around anxiety attacks
which she could not understand or explain. Most recently, Winona had a small
but memorable part in SOUTH PARK: BIGGER, LONGER & UNCUT (8/10).
Many are now familiar with Angelina Jolie's film work, but did you know that
she has also been in various music videos? "Has anybody seen my baby?" by
the Rolling Stones, "Rock 'n Roll dreams come through" by Meatloaf and
"Stand by my woman" by Lenny Kravitz.
The actress who plays Daisy in this film, Brittany Murphy, might be
memorable to some from her role as the
"loser-girl-to-be-turned-into-winner-girl" by Alicia Silverstone in
CLUELESS.
Of course, you all recognized the lovely Joanne Kerns playing Winona's mom
7in this movie. She played little Kirk Cameron's chipper mom, Maggie Seaver,
in the sitcom GROWING PAINS.
James Mangold, the director of this movie, and Cathy Konrad, one of the
producers of this movie, are married. He is also the son of two celebrated
painters and earned his undergraduate degree from the California Institute
of the Arts (in both the acting and the film schools) and a master's degree
from Columbia University. He is currently 35 years old.
This film is based on the true story of writer Susanna Kaysen and her
best-selling memoir, Girl Interrupted.

Title
Review for Godzilla (1998)
>From the makers of INDEPENDENCE DAY (6.5/10) comes the umpteenth remake
of the original monster movie classic Godzilla. I believe that there
have been over sixty variations of this picture filmed through its
various mutations, but this one claims to be the one that cost the most
clams: $140 million worth.
PLOT:
Nuclear radiation turns an ordinary lizard into a gigantic 500-foot+
beast. The giant monster roams into New York City, and consequently
terrifies and squashes many of its "innocent" inhabitants. The US
military, along with a nuclear radiation specialist (Broderick) are out
to stop this freakish abnormality from taking over. Mayhem and crazy
special effects ensue.
CRITIQUE:
"Been there, seen that" was my main reaction after the conclusion of
this film. This kind of picture may have been incredibly inventive and
original a few years back (think JURASSIC PARK (7.5/10)), but now it's
nothing more than a rehashed carnival of special effects. Okay,
admittedly the special effects are still quite spectacular, taped
alongside their partnered action sequences, but the crust of any film
still lies in its overall story line, and this pie just doesn't have
much cream to it, boys and girls. Standard characters conveying
contrived movie feelings through icky standard dialogue. The story is
basically this: Monster bad. Kill monster. And that's about it.
Other than that, the writers attempt to squeeze in another cheezy
romance between two bad actors (Broderick's career peaked and ended at
FERRIS BUELLER'S DAY OFF (8/10), give up the day job, dude, you're
done!), and a bunch of characters who have to disagree with the
theories of the "always-right" scientist. Smack that all together, and
you've got yourself another special effects airball of a movie! By the
way, is there any reason why the President of the United States of
America didn't get involved in this giant beast's destructive path
through New York City, while the French secret service made this
mission their top priority in life?? (Okay, so they kind of explain the
French involvement, but where the heck was the Prez through this
unthinkable disaster??).
For movie fanatics, watch for the fun-poking of Siskel & Ebert
throughout the entire picture by the way of Mayor Ebert and his
assistant Gene. In the end, the film does lengthen itself out by means
of another standard monster flic scenario ("Someone" re-emerges. Guess
who? Yawn.), and does end with the perpetual open door to an obvious
sequel, but that's about it. If you're in the mood to see a crazy
monster running loose in New York City and nothing more, then check
into this movie. If you're looking for something more interesting and
original to watch, I suggest you skip this over-hyped puppy, and warm
your nachos for several other interesting salsas to come on this
summer's fiesta line-up of films.
Little Known Facts: 
Jean Reno's real name is Juan Moreno. He was born in Casablanca,
Morocco.
Harry Shearer does the TV Simpsons' voices of Charles Montgomery Burns,
Waylon Smithers, Ned Flanders, Seymour Skinner, Otto Mann and many
others. Hank Azaria does the Simpsons' voices of Apu
Nahasapeemapetilon, Moe Szyslak, Police Chief Clancy Wiggum, Comic Book
Guy, Dr. Nick Riviera, and many others.  
Matthew Broderick is married to fellow thespian Sarah Jessica Parker,
and is known for being the original choice to play Alex P. Keaton
(later played delectably by Michael J. Fox) in the long-running NBC
sitcom Family Ties. Broderick declined the proffered role, however,
because his father was dying of cancer in New York City at the time and
the job would have necessitated a move to Los Angeles.

Title
Review for Ladies Man, The (2000)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
The "artistic integrity vs commercialism" debate has always been one to draw
fire from both ends of the forum when it comes to movies. On the one hand,
you have people who truly believe in their craft, their art, their ability
to affect and touch people's lives with their contributions to the world of
cinema, and on the other hand, you have Lorne Michaels. A man who likes to
take funny sketches from his SNL variety show and turn them into
inexpensive, uninspired feature films which make him money. Sadly, this film
falls into the latter category and much like many of the other unsuccessful
SNL pictures, its opening weekend gross, low budget and high video rentals
will surely continue to ensure that more of the same kind of movies will be
produced in the future. Lorne, please...buddy, pal...help us out here...is
it ONLY about the money now? Sad, really.
PLOT:
An oversexed talk show host who still believes that he's living in the 70s
gets fired from his radio show because of his crude dialogue on the air.
While trying to find another job with his pretty producer friend, he
receives a letter from an old girlfriend, who wants to hook back up with him
and take him around the world. With that in mind, he begins the search to
find his mystery woman among the hundreds of ladies that he's bedded over
the years.
CRITIQUE:
Another typical SNL sketch turned into a movie featuring a very hip
character sadly placed inside a paper thin plot, with many weak moments, a
couple of inspiring touches and a handful of funny jokes. This movie is not
necessarily a good movie and not necessarily a bad movie, it's sort of
just...there. And I guess that's what frustrates me even more about this
film. I really liked Leon Phelps. I really dug his style, his lack of social
etiquette with women and his funky duds, but why-oh-why couldn't these guys
come up with something a little funnier, or at least, more interesting. The
story is lame. Leon loses his job and has to find another one. An
ex-girlfriend of his wants to get it on with him but he doesn't know who she
in. All sketch stuff, but not enough for a movie. Why can't these SNL movies
be a little more ambitious? Especially with a character such as Leon, a guy
who despite his complete lack of tact with the ladies, still seems to come
off as a "nice guy". But the bottom line with any comedy is the laughs, the
laughs and the laughs. And unfortunately, there weren't many in this film.
Sure there were one or two very funny scenes, including the one exceptional
scenario featuring a posse of Leon-hating men suddenly breaking out into
song, and many clever moments, but overall, I was just sitting there,
waiting for something really funny to happen. Something really funny that
never came.
Meadows was great as Phelps, Billy Dee ideal as the smooth talking bar owner
and Will Ferrell memorable once again as the ambiguously gay rich guy. Kudos
also go out to Ms. Tiffany Amber-Thiessen's luscious breasts, who in
themselves delivered great performances, but sadly, the film as a whole just
fell short in most every other category. One interesting thing to note is
that despite the film featuring some nudity, although none from the lead
actresses (or from Julianne Moore in a surprising cameo), the film on the
whole was very tame. I mean, here's a guy who thinks only about sex and the
nastiest thing that he seemed to ever say was "want to take it in the butt?"
You'd think that with an "R" rating, they would have tried to take some more
chances, but na-ha, no SOUTH PARK here, folks. Anyway, I know it may sound
like I'm mostly knocking the film but overall, I had an okay time. Enough to
recommend it for fans of the sketch and maybe even some people out there who
are looking for a different kind of easy laugh. A definite video movie,
that's fer sure.

Title
Review for Hercules (1997)
Disney's 35th feature-film foray into the world of cartoon animation
is set within the mythological world of the ancient Gods, in the
historical setting of Greece. 
PLOT:
Greek God Zeus's son Hercules is kidnapped by a couple of incompetent
underlings of the evil Hades, accidentally placed down to Earth, and
brought up by some human beings. To recapture his God-hood, Hercules
must prove to his real father Zeus, that he can be a true hero. While
all of this goes on, the menacing Hades prepares to take over as the
ruler of the after-life.
CRITIQUE:
Uninspired, semi-interesting, and sometimes funny cinematic attempt
by Disney to cash in on another marketable historical myth. This film
seemed destined for success, but didn't seem to fully hit all of the
right notes on its way to the concert. I thought that it basically
lacked the heart of THE LION KING (7.5/10), the humor of ALADDIN
(7.5/10), and the romance of BEAUTY AND THE BEAST (8/10). I was most
disappointed by the lack of realism in the "love" that ultimately
materialized between Hercules and the New York-accented Meg. I found
it to be quite weak.
The hero story line was nice, and cool to keep track of, but
ultimately the romance, the songs or the bad guy have to stick out for
a children's animated tale to fully succeed, and unfortunately for
Disney, this one contained no such stickout. Having said that, James
Woods did make an excellent bad guy voice for Hades, but the
character itself never seemed to be such a real threat to anyone but
himself (Word on the street is that Hades was originally scripted as a
slow, menacing character until James Woods auditioned for the role and
impressed the casting directors with his rapid-fire style. The script
was rewritten, but Woods ad-libbed many lines.)
The songs in the film were passable, but could someone please explain
the connection between the re-occurring Motown quintet in a film set
in ancient Greece? Another aspect of the film that didn't seem too
kosher in my opinion was Hercules' trainer in the film, Phil (DeVito),
who is generally supposed to be cute and adorable in films as such, but
stood as half-man, half-goat in this movie. Not your cutest character
ever invented by the Mickey-crew, that's for sure! 
All in all, I would recommend this film to all kids (mind you, I
don't see this becoming a classic by any stretch of the imagination),
and some adults who are interested in viewing a quick (88 minutes),
harmless animated story about the Greek Gods, and some hip, quirky
one-liners from James Woods. If not, warm up those nachos, and go out
to rent any of the three Disney films that I suggested earlier.
You've got heart, humor and romance on the tab. Make your choice.
Little Known Facts: 
Danny DeVito stands 5"0, hails from New Jersey (hence the name of his
production company: Jersey Films), and has been married to the
infamous barmaid from the super-successful TV sitcom "Cheers", Rhea
Perlman since 1982.
Ron Clements and John Musker have also co-written and co-directed
ALADDIN (8/10), THE LITTLE MERMAID, and THE GREAT MOUSE DETECTIVE.
During one scene in HERCULES, when Phil (DeVito) is hit by a
discarded painter's palette he cleans himself up using a lion's fur
that bears a striking resemblance to Scar from THE LION KING (7.5/10).

Title
Review for Biloxi Blues (1988)
For more reviews and trivia, visit http://surf.to/joblo
This film was the second installment of Neil Simon's trilogy of plays
based on his own youth. In 1986, BRIGHTON BEACH MEMOIRS debuted as part
one, with Jonathan Silverman embracing the lead role of Eugene Morris
Jerome. BILOXI BLUES came out in 1988, with Matthew Broderick as the
lead, and three years later, the TV movie BROADWAY BOUND closed off the
triad, with Corey Parker as the protagonist. 
PLOT:
Story follows one Eugene Morris Jerome, an insecure, highly-observant
wannabee writer, and virgin, from New York, over his ten-week World War
II boot camp trial in Biloxi, Mississippi . Several divergent young
recruits highlight his group of trainees, as well as an abusive drill
sergeant who will stop at nothing to discipline this nave set of
youths. Many rites of passages and lessons of life are entertained
during this unsure time of their lives. 
CRITIQUE:
Interesting, playful comedy covers most bases of youthful exuberance
and insecurity, offers a terrific performance by Christopher Walken as
the highly unstable drill sergeant, but ultimately does nothing to
reinvent the boot camp Army flic genre. This movie's strongest points
of consideration are its witty and well-skewered lines delivered via
the pen of writer extraordinaire, Neil Simon, and the fascinating
exhibition delivered by Christopher Walken, in one of his best roles of
his career.
Most of the characters in this film play caricatures of this period,
but as a whole, the gang worked on the platform on which they were
asked to perform, and many of their presentations were top-notch. Corey
Parker was particularly outstanding as the arrogant, outspoken, Jewish
recruit who delivered one of the most poignant and relevant lines for
me as a writer, "Once you start compromising your thoughts, you're a
candidate for mediocrity." Great line! 
The style of the film does not offer us much more than any other film
of its genre, and the soundtrack could also have used a giant boost,
but overall, the film does deliver many laughs, some decent
performances, and a pretty intense scene between Walken and Broderick
nearing its finish. Also, I have always been a fan of epilogues, so I
did enjoy this one as well, but will admit that it did turn out to be a
little too schmaltzy if you really think about it. But most of all, it
is the idiosyncratic and genuine performance by Christopher Walken that
solidified this movie for me. He delivered all of his lines with
extreme coolness and pinache, and drew out a perfect scene as the drunk
sergeant on the brink of sanity. If you liked him in TRUE ROMANCE
(9/10) and AT CLOSE RANGE (7.5/10), you'll love him in this wonderfully
unhinged achievement.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
The stage version of this film also saw Matthew Broderick playing
Eugene Morris Jerome (He also replayed the character in the stage
version of BRIGHTON BEACH MEMOIRS), Penelope Ann Miller as Eugene's
first love, Matt Mulhern as Eugene's sometime-nemesis Wykowski, and
Park Overall as the earthy, whiskey-voiced prostitute who teaches
Eugene a thing or two about a thing or two.
Corey Parker, the actor who portrays the part of Epstein in this film,
played the lead character in Neil Simon's third installment of the
series, BROADWAY BOUND, Eugene Morris Jerome (part played by Matthew
Broderick in this film.)
Jonathan Silverman, the actor who portrayed Eugene in the first
installment of the series, BRIGHTON BEACH MEMOIRS, also showed up in
the TV movie BROADWAY BOUND, as Stanley Jerome.
Christopher Walken's real name is Ronald Walken. He has been married to
Georgianne Walken since 1969.
During the same year as this film, Penelope Ann Miller also played
Winnie, PeeWee Herman's girlfriend, in BIG TOP PEE-WEE.
Neil Simon's full name is Marvin Neil Simon.

Title
Review for Iron Giant, The (1999)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
PLOT:
A giant metal man falls from the sky and befriends a small town kid whose
imagination and enthusiasm rank highly in his repertoire of qualities.
Unfortunately for the friendly duo, the United States government of the
1950s does not take too well to "alien" beings, and attempts to violently
get rid of the giant monster.
CRITIQUE:
Hmmm...a serious animated movie with a message? Well, I'm sure it could work
but this one sure didn't do much for me. The ending of this movie was nice
with the deeper meaning and emotional touches, but for most of its run time
I found myself bored, searching for something-anything, nice music, some
humor or even a touch of romance or action, to make the film interesting to
watch. It wasn't to be. This E.T.-type flick moved along at such a neutral
pace that I kept wondering if anything interesting was ever going to happen!
Well, nothing really did and since I don't consider myself much of a 50s
connaisseur, or a sci-fi comic book enthusiast, there wasn't very much in
this films' ho-hum story that engaged me in any way. Of course, matters
weren't helped by the fact that the only so-called "bad guy" in the film was
completely one-dimensional and that the animation was obviously not intended
to impress. Think of it as an after school television cartoon program
elongated to match the length of a full feature and that's pretty much all
you have here. Much like the BLAIR WITCH PROJECT, I am not exactly sure what
all the hype about this movie is about either.

Title
Review for Dirty Work (1998)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
PLOT:
Two life-long losers, who need $50,000 in a jiffy to save the life of their
whore-loving Pops, start a business in the only service in which they
consider themselves to be experts: Revenge-for-hire!
CRITIQUE:
This film stars a man whose humor I've always found to be funny, Norm
McDonald. It's also peppered with plenty of other comedian cameos, an
interesting premise, but unfortunately, doesn't deliver as many laughs as
you might expect. Is it because "America's Funniest Videos" host Bob Saget
is at the helm? I doubt it. He's actually much funnier in real life than any
of his corny lines from the show might indicate.
And in that respect, this film is actually mined with a lot of dry,
sarcastic humor and plenty of Normisms (He likes to mention crack, anal sex
and whores a lot!). But overall, it just seemed to lack any real interest in
their phony plight, and didn't provide enough good jokes to sustain anything
more than a half hour TV program. Of all the cameos, I thought the Don
Rickles one was the best, while Chris Farley deserved much more than his
two-bit stint. So if you don't go into this film expecting a laugh-out riot,
you might just be slightly entertained by a self-conscious Norm McDonald
basically playing himself. On the other hand, it goes without saying that if
you never enjoyed the man's humor in the first place, you will not
appreciate this movie either. Real fans only. Overall, an inferior
hit-and-miss SNL sketch gone long.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Norm McDonald is born in my hometown of Montreal, Canada. Most of this film
was shot in Toronto, Canada.
Chris Farley's bother Kevin plays one of the theatre workers in this film.
Co-screenwriter Fred Wolf also plays one of the homeless guys. He wrote
Chris Farley's 1996 film BLACK SHEEP and was an uncredited writer on his
1995 film TOMMY BOY.
Cameos in this film include Adam Sandler, Gary Coleman, John Goodman,
Rebecca Romjin-Stamos, Dini Petty and Chevy Chase.
This film is only 81 minutes long, and contains outtakes during the final
credits.

Title
Review for Beautiful (2000)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
It had been a while since I had seen a movie this bad. I honestly thought
that they just didn't exist anymore. Sure, this year was filled with a lot
of so-so movies, even a few films that just plain sucked, but none had
actually managed to make me physically ill as this film did. By the first 45
minutes, I wanted to all-out kill the lead character, who could not have
been a worse human being. Were we supposed to care about this woman for some
reason?! I don't know. Was it all supposed to be funny?! Not sure. All I
know is that this was one of the sappiest, stupidest, most embarrassing
films put to the screen over the past few years. And now, I will go puke and
hopefully feel a little better afterwards. PS: Skip this movie!
PLOT:
An ugly duckling girl turns into a moderately attractive woman and somehow
manages to become Miss Illinois and get a shot at the Miss America Miss
contest. Despite paying her own daughter no mind and treating everyone else
around her like they didn't exist or matter, the woman somehow manages to
make it into the finals, where she must inevitably decide what she wants out
of her own life. Yugh! (and believe you me, I've actually left out the
stupidest parts!)
CRITIQUE:
This movie is hilarious...hilariously bad! The lead character in this film,
played by Minnie Driver, is one of the most reprehensible human beings that
I have ever had the displeasure of watching at the movies. She is shallow,
self-centered, rude, vain, egotistical, a bad sport, a bad friend, a bad
mother, a bad person, bad with kids, horrible with her own kid...and just a
big ol' despicable human being. Not many qualities, I assure you. Why oh
why, the folks behind this wretched film thought that anyone in the audience
would give a rat's ass about a lady who treats everyone around her like
garbage, most especially her own kid (!), with only her idiotic dream of
winning the Miss America Miss contest as her goal in life, is beyond me! But
sadly, she is not the film's only problem. The biggest issue that this movie
has is its terribly formulated screenplay. I am honestly still not sure
whether or not this was supposed to be a drama or a comedy, but either way,
the film is just howlingly bad. The dramatic moments were humorous (one of
Minnie's friends is in jail on a murder rap and all she wants to discuss is
her upcoming beauty pageant...and yes, that was supposed to be a dramatic
moment!), and the funny moments, just plain stupid (Minnie puts crazy glue
on her competitor's baton so that she could sabotage her
performance...hahaha, look at her, she can't let go of the
baton...hahaha...ugh!).
Add that to the embarrassing plot device used to get the mother and daughter
together (I won't ruin it here, but it is one of the most nonsensical plot
twists that I have ever witnessed in a movie), the pathetic acting
performance given by Joey Lauren Adams (the thought of her prison
"confrontation" scene still makes me cringe), the extreme disservice that
this film does to all beauty pageants and the pseudo-lesbian undertones, and
God-oh-mighty, how the heck did this one get past the guards at the gate?!?
The smartest person in this whole film is a 7-year old kid, who manages to
say all the right things, while the only man in the script is a
child-molesting drunk? Yeesh! C'mon ladies, are we really that bad? Director
Sally Field also paces the film all wrong. Too much time is spent on the
childhood, the film goes on for too long, and without a proper line between
humor and drama, the film just dies all around. And what's with Minnie
looking like a transvestite in the final "talent" contest? Yikes! And that
dress! Ugh. Bad decisions all around! But when the lead character can be
described in three simple words, bee-a-tch, you know the movie isn't gonna
touch many hearts. Men, stay away, and I mean FAR AWAY from this one. And
women...stay away also. But if you do decide to go, please just do me one
favor: DO NOT BRING YOUR KIDS TO THIS FILM! The lead is an egotistical,
selfish, lying phony who will give your loved ones nothing but bad advice
and offensive moral values. Actually, you might want to take them in order
to show them what NOT to become in their lives! I gave this movie one point
because of the lovely Bridgette Wilson, who looked real pretty in the film.
Other than that, a complete and utter waste of time. I'm gonna go brush my
teeth now.
Having done a little bit of research into the screenwriter of this film, Jon
Bernstein, I found that he had only written one other movie project before
this one. Do you want to guess what it was? It's actually a perfect
companion piece to this film...Jerry Springer's RINGMASTER! Oh
my...Jon...please...for the love of God and all that is good and sacred in
this world and in screenwriting...put down the pen and concentrate your life
on something else. You're "hurting" the world by writing movies.

Title
Review for Everyone Says I Love You (1996)
Woody Allen's first foray into the cinematic world of musicals, once
again boasts a cast full of brand names from Hollywood, and Woody's
ever-present comedic genius.
PLOT:
Musical that presents us with the ups and downs of a rich family from
New York. They travel to Paris and Venice, and introduce us to their
love lives through the international language of gab and music. 
CRITIQUE:
Upbeat musical that works on some entertainment-value levels, but fails
to delve into anything of great motivation for the audience to fully
enjoy. This film is your basic Allen comedy (Standardized with the
continually funny one-liners..."I should go to Paris and jump off of
the Eiffel Tower. If I took the Concorde, I could be dead three hours
earlier."), but with much less character development, and much more
songs sung by the cast. I personally am not a fan of musicals, so I
must admit that I was somewhat surprised that I semi-enjoyed this
movie. I mean, it wasn't like EVITA, where the actors sung their lines
throughout the entire movie. These songs were nice and lively, and
introduced only when needed (Although I must admit that I could've done
without the Woodster's awful crooning, and Julia Roberts' brave attempt
at carrying a tune.)
Overall, the actors were very good, like every other Allen movie, with
Alda, Hawn and Tim Roth sticking out in my mind as the standouts (Mind
you, as per usual, I didn't care for the Barrymore performance.) The
scenery shots were beautiful, especially the fall and winter snapshots
of New York, and the Venician and Parisian vignettes. The ending was a
bit weak, but then again, the entire story line wasn't really much to
get excited about. Just a bunch of little adventures laced through some
nice music and gorgeous scenery. 
Definitely far from my Allen favourites like ANNIE HALL (8.5/10),
BANANAS (8/10) and CRIMES AND MISDEMEANORS (8/10), but a continuing
sign of a genius whose only barometer of success lies deep within his
own consciousness and spirit. Keep it up, Woody!! You're the man.
Little Known Facts: 
Goldie Hawn's real name is Goldie Studlendgehawn.
Tracey Ullman filmed several scenes for this film, but all were cut by
Woody to reduce the film's running time.
Woody Allen's real name is Allan Stewart Konigsberg. Word on the street
is that the man speaks fluent French, and that he refuses that watch
any of his own movies once they've been released. One of his funniest
one-liners was ""I'm not afraid of dying...I just don't want to be
there when it happens." He apparently plays a mean clarinet with his
band, every Monday night in a local jazz caf in New York City. 
Drew Barrymore made her screen debut as William Hurt's daughter in the
Ken Russell film ALTERED STATES (6.5/10) in 1980. At the age of 7, she
starred in a little movie by Steven Spielberg (her godfather) called
E.T. (8/10), and then spent the next few years going through drug-abuse
and alcoholism. She is half Hungarian from her mother's side, Ildiko
Jade.
Despite his reputation as an actor being firmly established, Tim Roth
still likes to tend bar from time to time. He stands 5"7.
Edward Norton has a degree from Yale in history.

Title
Review for Love's Labour's Lost (2000)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
What do I love most about going to the movies? The surprises! Here I was, a
hater of all films musical, not a fan of the old-school movies, not a fan of
a man they call Shakespeare and definitely not a fan of this movie's lame
ass title, and I walked out of this picture with a shit-eating grin so wide
across my face, you'd think I just hit the motherload. Instead, I was
treated to a fun, joyous, wonderfully orchestrated picture resurrected for
the audiences of today. Will it bring back the genre as GLADIATOR did
earlier this summer? Only time will tell...
PLOT:
The four boys of Navarre have sworn off girls and limited their food and
sleep intakes for a period of three years, in order to concentrate
exclusively on their studies. Unfortunately for the gents, circumstances
soon change when four very lovely ladies come to visit, and cupid, the boys,
the girls, the songs and the dances all take a shot at their hearts.
CRITIQUE:
Wow. A magical recreation of the classic 1930s style musicals, filled with
infectious dances, delightful songs and an overall sense of joy and
merriment all around. What a wonder to see such an original film still being
produced in our day and time. Is there a market for this type of movie? I'm
not sure, but the film put together here by Kenneth Branagh is certainly an
excellent candidate to begin the trend. The movie is able to capture the
pure essence of the classic films from the day, and present it to us within
a bouquet of colorful costumes, authentically decorated settings,
captivating performances from the cast and every fine detail that you would
expect to receive from a master craftsman. In fact, the opening credits
impressed me right off the top, with their classic-style of character
presentation, pictures - actor names - character names, along with the
proper background music and letter font, all of which just seemed to
kickstart the whole show on a sensibly nostalgic tone. Stranger more is the
fact that rarely had I ever sat through any of those "old time" movies
before, since not a one had interested me in the least.
And yet the "feel" of this movie, the "look" of the entire piece, the songs,
the black and white updated news footage from the time, the many groovy
choreographed dance sequences, all seemed to resonate a flawless homage to
the classics, and just won me over, dammit! It's funny because I honestly do
not prefer the word of the Bard to the words of Tarantino, since for one, I
do not understand most of what Shakespeare is saying (mark me an ignoramus,
but at least I'm honest), and two, I'm a child of the 80s...sniff, sniff.
Pity me. Seriously though, my only reservations with this film actually lay
within those areas. Granted, I did love the dances, the songs, the costumes,
the settings, but you know the thin story line actually had to be driven
along by at least some dialogue, and when the dialogue came, well...I just
tuned out. Half of what was being said struck a foreign chord with me, so
getting the gist of their conversations was the best that I could do. I also
couldn't help but notice the Alicia Silverstone factor, which just seemed
out of place, to be sure. Not that she was necessarily bad in her role, but
somehow, she just didn't seem to belong there. But no biggie.
In the end, we accept the fact that these types of films aren't exactly
character studies or created solely on the merit of their story lines. They
are generally based on the spirit of their convictions, the zip of their
songs and the zap of their dances, and by golly, this movie struck gold on
all those counts. Color me impressed, cause God knows I would be the first
to tell you to keep me far and away from any musicals this side of the SOUTH
PARK movie, but listen to I, when I tell thee this...romance, show tunes,
dance, enchantment, moonlight and even a little humor never hurt anybody.
Drop your cynicism off at the door and enjoy.

Title
Review for Mercury Rising (1998)
For more reviews and movie trivia, visit http://www.joblo.com
Bruce Willis teams up with bad-guy Alex Baldwin in a film that essentially
introduces elements of WITNESS to the underlying theme of RAINMAN (8/10).
The film also offers us one of the crappiest titles to grace a movie screen
in a while, and has the privilege of being the recipient of "my shortest
review award", due to the generic nature of its existence and the "been
there, done that" feel of its development.
PLOT:
FBI agent Art Jeffries is a rebel within his own clan, and is demoted to a
rookie officer's job until he bucks up. While on an open-and-shut case,
Jeffries runs into an autistic child, who was able to decipher an elaborate
governmental code in a magazine, and suddenly finds himself attached to this
kid's safety. Covert agents from the government are after the boy, and want
him, and anyone else who knows about the discovery, dead.
CRITIQUE:
Sub-par movie, this film doesn't truly live up to anything, because it
doesn't offer enough action to be considered an "action movie", nor enough
thrills to be considered a "thriller". Its dramatic touches are far from
effective, so skip the drama category, and its semi-witty repartees don't
amount to a hill of beans in regards to a legitimate comedy. So what is it?
Who knows! It certainly isn't a great picture, but it does offer an
interesting premise, a good actor in the kid who play the autistic child,
and a few moments of quasi-action scenes. It also offers a one-dimensional,
overacting bad guy in Alec Baldwin (Sure Alec, it's all about
patriotism.....yawn.), many, and I do mean many plot holes (Which may, or
may not bother you, depending on the type of movie-watcher you are), and a
weak conclusion. All in all, a film in which the title character resembles
and acts like the John McClane character from the DIE HARD series, but put
them head to head in an ultimate cage-match, and McClane would chomp this
pup's cheezy one-liners, and fake concern for breakfast. Bruce, it's time to
listen for the bell, my friend, cause it seems to be tolling for thee.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Alec Baldwin, at some point in his life, respectively dated Michelle
Pfeiffer, Janine Turner and Ally Sheedy. He is currently married to actress
Kim Basinger. What a man!
Bruce Willis' full name is Walter Bruce Willison. His nickname is Bruno.
This film's title went through some changes before the geniuses at the
studio settled on MERCURY RISING (Great idea, guys! Way to sell those
tickets!). Some of the earlier titles were SIMPLE SIMON, MERCURY FALLING
(how innovative), and SIMON.
Director Harold Becker has directed some solid films before this one. He's
the man behind 1981's TAPS (7.5/10) with a young Tom Cruise, SEA OF LOVE
(8/10) with the come-back of Al Pacino, and the 1996 drama CITY HALL (7/10).
The one inside joke in the film comes in the way of Alec Baldwin telling
Bruce Willis that "you've been watching too many of those 4-wheel-drive
commercials" (Baldwin himself being the television voice of Chevy trucks). -
Thanks to Scott Renshaw for that one.
The autistic kid in this film, actor Miko Hughes, is not autistic in real
life. His name means Chief in Chickasaw. He is a Native American. He also
played Tom Hanks' son in 1995's APOLLO 13 (6.5/10).
Bohdi Elfman, who plays the character of Leo Pedranski in this film, is the
nephew of composer Danny Elfman, and married to TV star Jenna Elfman.

Title
Review for Your Friends & Neighbors (1998)
For more reviews, check out http://surf.to/joblo
Neil LaBute follows his critically acclaimed indie sensation from 1997,
IN THE COMPANY OF MEN, with a broader look at relationships and the
innappropriate behaviour of adults in contemporary society.
PLOT:
This film follows the lives of three couples: one married, one living
together, and two singles. We waltz through their everyday lives, and
listen in on their private dinners, sauna sessions and the multitude of
discussions about sex, life and the ups and downs of relationships.
CRITIQUE:
Annoying character study starts off with some thought-provoking ideas,
but eventually turns into a dialogue driven film that doesn't provide
the audience with any one character to give half a crap about. I liked
this movie at first because it seemed to bring up some interesting
queries likely to be discussed with my better half later on that night.
But soon enough, it downshifted into another boring tale about the
immoral actions of many of the "bad" people in today's society, and the
self-centered nature of life in these awful modern times. Unfortunately
for me, I could not stand to watch a film that spend the entire hour
and a half studying people who apparently don't feel much, have little
conscience, and whine incessantly. If it were only one or two of them
who didn't know what they wanted out of sex and/or their relationships,
then I might've been able to let it slide, but when all six characters
spend the entire runtime kvetching about their uselessness as human
beings. Well, let me tell you...it just got irritating.
Having said that, the acting was rock-solid on all sides, with special
kudos to Eckhart and Keener. But the real standout was Jason Patric
(who also produced this film) whose performance is one of the best of
his wobbly career. He played this prick to perfection, and really
pulled out all of the stops during one confrontation scene with Keener
in the bookstore (chilling). His cool performance is definitely one of
the reasons that I would barely recommend this film despite its
repetitive nature, lack of redeeming quality and unresolved ending.
Another reason to see this film is the hilarious opening credit score
that features a warped acoustic version of Metallica's "Sandman" song.
And, oh yes, none of the characters in this film call each other by
their names because director Labute apparently wants us to be able to
recognize these people within ourselves and others. Well, guess what?
Despite seeing little aspects of people I know in some of the folks in
this movie, the general lack of morals, compassion, feeling and
humanity (Kubrick anyone?) gave me very little reason to care or even
appreciate any of the lives of these people. It made the film
unbelievable, boring and most importantly, unentertaining.  
PS: Mrs. JoBlo cared even less about any of the characters in this
film, and gave it an even 5/10.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Director Neil LaBute is a mormon.
Aaron Eckhart was also the star of LaBute's first big-screen picture,
IN THE COMPANY OF MEN.
Amy Brenneman's mother is a superior court judge.
Catherine Keener has starred in all four of indie-director Tom
DiCillo's films.
Nastassja Kinski's real name is Nastassja Naksyznyski.
Nastassja Kinski spent some days in a German prison when a sin of youth
caught up with her. She had used public transportation several times
without paying, hadn't paid the fines, and hadn't worked in a hospital
as she was sentenced to do by a juvenile court. In 1978 she was finally
arrested. She spent 5 days in prison despite being a celebrity at that
time. After five days she was released early because of good conduct.
Jason Patric's real name is Jason Miller Jr., son of actor Jason Miller
(who played the priest in the original EXORCIST (7.5/10) movie). Jason
is also the grandson of legendary actor Jackie Gleason, and was married
to actress Robin Wright for two years from 1988 to 1990.

Title
Review for Woman on Top (1999)
For more reviews, screensavers, trailers & more, visit http://www.joblo.com/
I've been hearing about this "up and coming" actress named Penelope Cruz for
what seems like years now. She's the next Salma Hayek...she's the next big
thing...she's this...she's that! Alright, now here was my first opportunity
to actually see her on the big screen. To be honest, I was pretty sick of
hearing about her and just wanted to get this over with already. To my
surprise, she was actually quite charming. In fact, I can freely admit that
she owns this film! If you don't like her or her personality, the film will
not win you over. If you are taken by her (which I was), you will be swept
away like many others. Now get ready to be taken on a Cruz...
PLOT:
A story about love, motion sickness and the art of cooking. A strange
description but certainly an accurate one. This film is about a beautiful
woman who loves to cook but cannot allow others to "control" her, due to her
motion sickness. She must always be "on top" of things. After finding her
husband cheating on her, she flies off to San Francisco to start anew. An
instant cooking star in America, she is eventually tracked down by her
wayward husband and asked to love again. Will she? Can she? Should she? Find
out...
CRITIQUE:
A cute comedic fantasy romance whipped out of a recipe with a pleasant bossa
nova groove, a LIKE WATER FOR CHOCOLATE-type story, and dessert featuring
the adorable Penelope Cruz. This film is very light on its feet. It doesn't
take itself too seriously and doesn't ask that any audience member does
either. It's filled with fun Brazilian tunes, bright colors, tasty settings,
magical moments, easy humor and dashes of romance. It seems to be wrapped up
in a neat little bow asking for you to love it, and with Penelope Cruz's
enchanting charisma, it succeeded in tangling me in its web of fluffy
amusement. Do the characters attain any deep states of consciousness? Not
really. Is the ending telegraphed from scene one? Pretty much. But this
isn't that kind of film. It's the type of movie that you see in order to
"watch the pretty colors", or in this case, the pretty people, settings and
cuisine. I enjoyed it all the way through. It was an easy watch, moved along
at a rapid pace and presented just enough mystical mumbo-jumbo for me to buy
into its fantastical elements.
Not sure if "regular" audiences are ready to accept the
fantasy/comedy/romance combo, but I'm confident that this will find at least
a certain niche of red-hot lovers out there. The one thing that is sure
about this movie is that it's all about Penelope! She's glued to the camera
for the entire picture, with close-ups, tight shots and body parts swaying
across the screen throughout (no nudity though!). She makes this film with
her wonderful smile, her cuter-than-Hayek accent and her oh-so seductive
appeal. Is she a good actress? Sure. For what the role demands, she was
perfect but certainly could've benefited from a few more third-dimensional
characters around her. Everyone from her comic-relief-based best friend to
her Antonio Banderas Jr. boyfriend was decent, but mostly underwritten.
Ultimately, the film touches everything with a "light" brush. Light drama,
light humor, light fantasy, light performances, a light soundtrack and a
light ending. Personally, the film won me over with its top performance by
Cruz and its groovy tunes. For those who have seen LIKE WATER FOR CHOCOLATE,
consider this its light American cousin. Perfect for dates and those cozy
late nites together in front of the VCR. A delicious fairy tale that goes
down easy.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
This is actress Penelope Cruz's first English-speaking lead role, despite
having over a dozen films to her credit, and already being a superstar in
her native Spain. She is probably best known in the States for her role in
the Oscar-winning film ALL ABOUT MY MOTHER, by Pedro Almodovar. Her upcoming
American projects set her up with Matt Damon (ALL THE PRETTY HORSES), Johnny
Depp (BLOW) and Nicolas Cage (CAPTAIN CORELLI'S MANDOLIN). Ironically,
Penelope became a vegetarian after filming ALL THE PRETTY HORSES.
Screenwriter Vera Blasi suffers from motion sickness herself and also spent
much of her own childhood and teen years going back and forth between Brazil
and San Francisco (as does the main character in this film). This is her
first produced screenplay.
All of the characters in this film speak English but when they sing, they
sing in Portuguese.

Title
Review for Sphere (1998)
For more reviews, go to http://surf.to/joblo
Three big name actors, Hoffman, Jackson and Stone, one big name author,
Michael Crichton, and one big name director, Barry Levinson, get
together and create an underwater science-fiction movie called SPHERE.
Just imagine THE THING (8/10) meeting ALIEN (7.5/10) in THE ABYSS.
PLOT:
Underwater spacecraft in uncovered by the U.S. government, and four
relevant experts in their respective fields are sent down to
investigate the unknown entity. Once beneath the ocean, the group makes
contact with a source from within the vessel, and attempt to piece
together the mystery that is the sphere inside the unexplained
discovery. 
CRITIQUE:
Cool premise and eerie buildup from the first hour, ultimately
downshifts into an unsatisfying film that drags long past its bedtime,
and turns into a gobbledygook of psychological head games and
illusions. Add to that the loss of coherency about halfway, and a major
anticlimactic ending, and I can't really say that I thoroughly enjoyed
this two-hour plus piece of celluloid. Which is all too bad, because I
really liked the first hour, especially the whole claustrophobic feel
of the group underwater with the unknown swimming all about them. 
The actors all play their cards real well, with Schreiber pulling off a
good performance as the egghead astrophysicist, and Sam Jackson coming
through as the hairless mathematician with the uneven glimmer in his
eye. Stone was also pretty good, but nothing special could be said
about Hoffman's by the numbers "nervous dude" character, whose
umpteenth performance he seemed to be calling in from his home. And
despite Levinson creating some real suspense early on, the overall feel
of the picture was quite uneven, along with the absence of a gentleman
by the name of style.
Overall, this movie did offer some suspenseful and potentially potent
scenes early on, but by the end of this overly long picture, I just
felt like a kid who'd been staring at a nacho plate all evening, only
to have it taken away at the last minute by a grumpy old man with a
crutch. The ending is lame and confusing, the payoff from the early
decent premise never really comes through, and the clock ticks at least
thirty minutes past its due time. Having said that, the performances
are decent, and the early tension and suspense of the film is enough
for me to recommend it for at least one night of dark, moody
strangeness and confusion. 
Note to nacho-platers: Don't waste your salsa on this one. Slap some
sour cream on the side, and you should be okay.
Little Known Facts: 
In the 1970's, Barry Levinson wrote for "The Carol Burnett Show", and
won two Emmies in three years. Levinson also co-wrote the script for
Norman Jewison's Al Pacino vehicle ...AND JUSTICE FOR ALL with his
then-wife Valerie Curtin. Interesting to note that in all of his films,
Levinson has featured character actor Ralph Tabakin in a small role.
Did you know that Sharon Stone's IQ is 154, and that she is a member of
MENSA? In 1986, Sharon was in a TV commercial for Seagrams 7 Golden
Wine Cooler with fellow struggling actor at the time, Bruce Willis.
Sharon also appeared on TV's "Star Search" as a contestant in the
spokesmodel category in the mid-80's. Her payday for her breakthrough
hit BASIC INSTINCT (7.5/10) was $750,000. 
Dustin Hoffman stands 5"5, and made $17,000 for his breakthrough
performance in THE GRADUATE (6/10).
Peter Coyote's real name is Peter Cohon.

Title
Review for Mod Squad, The (1999)
For more reviews and movie trivia, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Gather closely around the table, kids, and let's try to figure out what goes
through the minds of Hollywood studio execs, when green-lighting a movie
such as this. "We'll get the baby-boomers in the theatres with the TV show's
nostalgia factor. We'll get every single kind of kid in the theatre with the
three divergent stars of the movie. We'll slap it all in an eclectic, hip,
young soundtrack and spend our weekends counting all of the money that we
will make. But what about a story, sir? Forget the story, son. This is
marketing!!!"
PLOT:
Three young hoodlums are taken in by a cop who is willing to give them a
second chance. He tells them that they could either work undercover for him
or go to jail. They choose the former route and begin their investigation of
the stolen drug evidence. Soon enough, they find themselves in over their
heads, and without any legal authority to do much about it.
CRITIQUE:
This film has no character development. We are given no reason to give a
rat's ass about any of its leads. This film has a plot line no more
intricate than any weekly mediocre episode of "Miami Vice". With Aaron
Spelling executive producing, this is no big surprise. This film has bad
dialogue, pretty bad acting, and a  horrible haircut by way of Claire Danes.
When you consider that this is a remake of a popular TV series, this might
be caused by the lack of clarity on whether or not this movie was trying to
be serious on its own, or a parody of said show. But most importantly, this
movie is not entertaining in the least, hasn't a single memorable moment in
its entire short runtime of 94 minutes, and only saves itself from being a
complete loss, by the way of Giovanni Ribisi's funny lines.
Oh yeah, and another thing. The number of irrational scenes in this movie is
staggering. Why would anyone give these "kids" any information on the
streets, you might ask? Who knows. One guy gave up all his information
without ever being shown a badge, a gun, or even a viable threat. Also,
early on in the movie, the kids have an opportunity to bail on their given
ultimatum without any repercussions, but without much explanation, they
remain on the case, for in my humble opinion, the sake of this most
uninspirational screenplay. No hip clothes, no hip songs, no slick style,
this film has very little mod about it. In fact, my dictionary definition of
mod reads: "boldly modern and unconventional". This movie is anything but
this! It's a boring, standard, TV show-remake gone wrong, starring Claire
Danes in a role not meant for her, Omar Epps brooding and walking funny, and
Ribisi as the film's only saving grace. And did I mention that there's
barely any action in this movie? You have better chances of being amused in
a dentist's office.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Born and raised in New York, Claire Danes always wanted to be an actress.
She enrolled at the Lee Strassberg Theatre Institute when she was only ten
years old.
Omar Epps is also a rapper and a music video director for such artists as
Heather B, Special Ed and his own rap duo, Wolf Pack. He and his cousin
G-Sharp, recently recorded an as-yet untitled album, producing two of its
tracks. A Brooklyn native, he received his professional training at High
School of Performing Arts in New York City.
Giovanni Ribisi has been in such diverse fare as Steven Spielberg's SAVING
PRIVATE RYAN, David Lynch's LOST HIGHWAY (9/10) and TV's "Friends", as
Phoebe's (Lisa Kudrow) brother, and "The X-Files".
Actors Richard Jenkins and Josh Brolin, who both star in this film, also
co-starred as gay police officers in the hilarious FLIRTING WITH DISASTER
(8.5/10).
"The Mod Squad" TV series also spawned from the brainchild of producer Aaron
Spelling. The series ran from 1968 to 1972, encompassing 100 episodes.  He
is also known to be the father of TV actress Tori Spelling.

Title
Review for Assignment, The (1997)
The second Jackal-based film to come out in 1997 (the other starring
Bruce Willis was simply entitled THE JACKAL), this one stars Aidan
Quinn and Donald Sutherland, and is directed by a man who hailed from
JoBlo's own alma matter, Concordia University in Montreal, Canada. The
story is based on the exploits of the real terrorist known as the
Jackal, but does not pretend to be 100% factual.
PLOT:
Naval Officer Ramirez (Quinn) gets called upon by the CIA to
impersonate the international terrorist known as the Jackal, in order
to put an end to the actual militant's radical activities. He is chosen
for this role because he physically resembles the real terrorist to a
tee. Ramirez reluctantly agrees to take part in this "assignment", and
soon finds himself wrapped up in a true web of international terrorism,
intrigue and double-personality syndrome (which does not sit well with
his uninformed wife and kids back in the States.)
CRITIQUE:
Great premise is executed with enough style and thrills to keep the
piece interesting throughout its close to two-hour runtime. Admittedly,
I wasn't a huge fan of any of the main actors in this film, and didn't
expect much from this movie beforehand, but surprisingly it did have
its thrilling moments, as well as a mostly plausible and absorbing
story line. The first hour is mostly just a build-up of things to come,
and does offer a great characterization of the Jackal, but the second
hour is the one that really cranks in the cool scenes and a sweet
ending.
Quinn was adequate in both roles as Naval Officer Ramirez and the real
Jackal, but didn't offer anything extraordinary, in my opinion.
Sutherland and Kingsley seem to be playing the same role that they've
played in both of their respective careers of late, but nonetheless,
appeared to relish the cold-heartedness of their chosen characters. I
didn't like performance put forth from Quinn's wife in this flick, but
then again, she doesn't show up in most of the film, so that wasn't so
bad.
I did however enjoy director Duguay's interesting style and cinematic
vision. This thriller could easily have been boring during many
sequences, but Duguay always seemed to find something interesting to
show the viewer. I thought that was neat. Having said that, I didn't
think the first hour needed to be as long as it was, and the film did
have me tinkering on the bridge of believability when the "fake" Jackal
met with the "real" Jackal's girlfriend without much retrospection on
her part, but all in all, not too many complaints in a movie that could
easily be enjoyed by all those who take pleasure in the spy and
terrorist thriller genre.   
Little Known Facts: 
Ben Kingsley's real name is Krishna Banji, he stands 5"8, was born in
Scarborough, England, and won the Best Actor honor in 1982's Academy
Awards presentation for the title role he portrayed in GHANDI.
Many scenes from this film were actually shot in Montreal, Canada
(JoBlo's haven of restfulness).
Donald Sutherland has fathered actor Kiefer Sutherland, is Canadian,
and apparently still owns a place in the North of Montreal.

Title
Review for Dr. T & the Women (2000)
For more reviews and movie wallpapers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
"Women are incapable of being bad luck by themselves. It's men who make them
that way. Women, by nature, are saints. They're sacred and should be treated
that way." This is the philosophy of Dr. T, the man whose name graces this
film's title. After having read that first passage, I bet that most women
believe that to be a positive philosophy, right? Well, sometimes "too much
love" is just...well, too much!
PLOT:
Gynecologist Sully Travis, better known to most as Dr. T, is surrounded by
women at work, women at home and women in his relationships. This film
follows the good doctor as his wife loses her senses, his daughter is
preparing to marry and a new woman enters his life. Can the doctor handle
all of these things happening at the same time? Can he handle all of these
women? Let's see.
CRITIQUE:
A fluffy, meandering, overlong tale which barely manages to stay afloat
thanks to its many kooky characters, interesting premise about a controlling
man who finally loses all control and a pretty neat ending. Not a great
movie by any stretch of the imagination, this film had me wondering about
its purpose during several scenes, but ultimately won most of me over with
some really fun performances. Shelley Long was surprisingly good as the
doctor's right-hand woman at the office. Funny, quirky and always
understanding of the doctor's issues, Long actually had me forgetting her
Diane character from TV's "Cheers". Another major kudo goes out to Laura
Dern in an excellent comedic turn as the ultimate rich, clumsy, alcoholic
sister-in-law from out of town, stealing every scene that she was in.
Unfortunately, as in usual Altman style, the film is filled with many stars,
actors and characters, without any real time dedicated to any of them.
Dern's character sadly falls into this latter group. But much of the rest of
the cast is good also. Gere and Hunt worked well off one another, although
someone should really tell Dick to stay away from characters sporting
accents, or at least to try and maintain the same accent through the entire
picture.
Plug all that on to Farrah Fawcett, in what can only be described as a
"perfect casting choice", Kate Hudson looking great, Tara Reid putting teen
flicks behind her and Janine Turner in an almost unrecognizable role as the
ultimate pain in the butt, and most anyone seeing this film should have at
least one favorite character. But with so many characters and so little
"real plot", the film ultimately gets bogged down in many moments where you
are left wondering why you're watching any of it in the first place. I
wasn't sure about what any of it meant until the near end of the film when
the doctor finally came to grips with the journey that he had taken. I
especially liked the final scene which was quite MAGNOLIA-esque. A fine line
between fantasy and reality. This ambiguous last scene also contains one of
the memorable shots ever shown in a commercial movie. The film is also laced
with many symbolic touches, with water literally co-starring in most every
outdoor scene, and quite a few beautiful scenery shots, all of which sort of
made up for the lack of "real" story. I would recommend this film to people
who like any of its principals, enjoy watching a large cast of characters
interact on film and don't mind a lack of solid narrative. Also, please note
that despite this film being labeled as a "comedy", it's really much more of
a drama than anything else. One thing that it did manage to do convincingly
was to skewer the women of the Dallas elite social scene. Yipes...and you
thought Minnesotans were pissed after FARGO?
PS: The nudity factor in this film includes Helen Hunt sans top and Farrah
Fawcett hopping around a water fountain in her birthday suit. Richard Gere,
on the other hand, shows no ass.

Title
Review for Blow Dry (2001)
For more reviews and movie news, visit http://www.joblo.com/
PLOT:
A renowned British hairdressing competition is coming to a small town and
the local barber is iffy about hopping aboard. That is, until his son and
ex-wife get together and convince the man to join. And for kicks, his old
hairdressing nemesis is also entered into the tournament. Sounds kooky,
right? Well, his ex-wife is dying of cancer and she left him for another
woman a few years back. Have a blast!
CRITIQUE:
It seems as though every other year, the Brits slap a cute, quirky, small
town comedy into our theatres and into our hearts and as that same time of
year rolls around again this year, well...this movie is definitely not it!
Predictable, highly uneven, filled with too much drama and not enough humor,
this unfortunate attempt at capturing a small town's "obsession" with a
quirky British hair-styling competition, doesn't deliver much on any front.
The film lacks any real emotional narrative drive, falls flat on way too
many supposed jokes (although I couldn't really tell if they were supposed
to be funny sometimes, but I think colored sheep are supposed to be,
right?), has a very boring soundtrack featuring tunes decades old and just
seemed about 15 years past its prime. The only semi-redeeming quality of the
film is its actors, but even this eccentric bunch couldn't save this oddly
fashioned movie screenplay. Here's a film which tries to mix a woman dying
of cancer, a quirky hair contest, a lesbian couple dealing with past
infidelities and a teen romance all in one big pot, but none of it seems
sincere, interesting or fresh. In fact, there really isn't one thing in this
movie that isn't easily forecast about three scenes before it happens.
And to top that off, most of the characters are just plain boring. It isn't
bad enough that the film hasn't properly characterized the folks in the
movie for us to care about, but couldn't they at least have made them more
interesting? There's no panache here...zero! They should've taken some
lessons from all of the fun characters designed for a similar type of film
named BEST OF SHOW from last year. I mean c'mon, sure I was impressed by
Josh Hartnett's accent (although I have no idea if it was locally accurate
or not-"Mum!"), but couldn't the kid also been given an actual personality
to boot? (mind you, his "bedhair" remained intact) Or how about giving Alan
Rickman more to do than just stare at the screen and feel sorry for himself?
And is Rachael Leigh Cook ever going to develop into anything more than an
adorable little face on the big screen? I sure hope so. In the end, the film
falters the most in its inability to effectively balance its humor and
drama, and ends up being too emotional when it shouldn't be, and not funny
enough, when it should be. The best thing for this film would have been for
it to be released as a straight-out comedy or a straight-out drama, but this
shot in the dark was definitely not the way to go. Even a shot of Heidi
Klum's bush couldn't save this puppy (and I ain't kidding about that!).
Where's JoBlo coming from?
Best in Show (8/10) - Chocolat (6/10) - The Gift (7/10) - Mystery, Alaska
(8/10) - Sliding Doors (7/10) - State and Main (7/10) - You Can Count on Me
(8/10)
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Yipes! This film was written by none other than the screenwriter of the
highly successful British comedy, THE FULL MONTY, Simon Beaufoy. I guess the
second time around is not always a charm, eh? Actually, he has apparently
been trying to distance himself away from this project (I could see why!),
which is why the credits of this film actually read "Based on a screenplay
by..."
Actress Natasha Richardson is married to actor Liam Neeson.
This film was originally titled NEVER BETTER.

Title
Review for Ready to Rumble (2000)
For more reviews and movie trailers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Okay, so here's kinda how the pitch must've gone down: "We get the guy who
directed VARSITY BLUES to make this movie about wrestling (cause it is just
like totally hot now!), slap in a couple of dumb teenage characters, like
that ultimate weirdo, David Arquette from those SCREAM movies and Scotty
Caan, cause he's got a great ass. Toss in a bit of sexual exploitation, via
the overly-curvaceous Rose McGowan, a soundtrack filled with bitchin' tunes
and all the shit and groin jokes that you could fit into ninety minutes, and
by golly, I think "the kids" will go for it!" Well, I ain't no kid, and I
ain't much into "rassling", but gosh darnit, this film was pretty funny.
PLOT:
Two goofy kids who worship their wrestling hero as a god believe themselves
to be his savior when their great champion falls from his reign.
CRITIQUE:
Stupid, crass, loud, juvenile, exploitative and most importantly...pretty
darn funny! No offense to any morons out there, but if you actually go into
this movie expecting anything but cool wrestling scenes, rockin' songs,
girls with big boobs, and another awesome shot of Scott Caan's ass, then
you're a bigger moron that anyone in this film. If on the other hand, you
liked Beavis & Butthead, you liked Bill & Ted's, and you liked, well,
Rocky...you will most likely enjoy this passable update of their respective
themes. That being established, let's see what was good and bad about the
movie. Good: The story is cute and actually convinces with a little heart in
the end. Good: The soundtrack is kickass, although whoever decided that it
was a better idea to play the remake version of Twisted Sister's classic
anthem "We're Not Gonna Take It", as opposed to the original, should
literally be slapped silly. Good: Arquette, Caan and even the wrestlers all
come out smelling like shit, which in this movie...is a good thing! You'll
get what I mean by the 12th caca joke in this film. Honestly though, they
were all pretty good in their respective roles.
Good: The wrestling scenes were really cool, only I wish they had included
more of them...pretty exciting stuff! Ultimately, the last twenty minutes of
the film packed the most punch. Good: Martin Landau's cameo as an old time
wrestler. Damn funny! Bad: Not enough Rose McGowan! It's one thing to
include her and the Nitro girls as blatant exploitative fodder, but at least
if you're gonna go that far...let's see more of them, dammit! Bad: Some
jokes work, but others fall flat. It's up and down on that count, with no
major laugh out scenes either. Bad: I did enjoy Oliver Platt's drunken Elvis
performance, but I generally love his humor, so felt a little disappointed
in that he didn't get many better lines. Having said all that, this film is
not to be taken seriously. It does provide a small emotional touch in the
end, which I thought was nice, but I seriously doubt any movie critic (or
adult for that matter) over the age of 40 will enjoy any of this shite!
Unless of course, you don't mind seeing an umpteen set of people getting
kicked in the groin over and over, enjoy loud rock music, don't mind
watching two morons prance around the big screen, and...yes, of
course...love that rassling!!
Incidentally, I've always felt like wrestling fans and soap opera fans had a
lot in common. They both enjoy watching over-the-top spectacles, most never
admit to being an actual fan and they all seem to get really involved in the
most absurd plot twists, no matter how ridiculous! The only difference that
I've noticed between the two is that wrestling's got more sweaty men...but
even that, is pretty similar.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Rose McGowan was born in Florence, Italy and raised in a commune for the
Children of God cult (the same folks who had River Phoenix's parents in the
early years). She later moved to Oregon, and ran away from home when she was
14, after her parents checked her into a drug rehab program, even though she
wasn't - she insists to this day - doing drugs. She lived on the streets for
a while, and eventually moved to California, where writer/director Gregg
Araki met her outside of a gym and cast her in THE DOOM GENERATION. She is
now married to weirdo rocker Marilyn Manson.
David Arquette's dad Lewis also makes an appearance in this movie. He also
played Chief Louis Hartley in SCREAM 2 (7/10).
Scott Caan stand 5'5, is the son of actor James Caan and apparently likes to
stand around naked in his cowboy boots, since he does so in both this movie
and VARSITY BLUES.
Ahmet Zappa, son of the late weird rocker Frank Zappa, plays the convenience
store owner in this movie.
Some of the wrestlers with appearances in this film include Goldberg,
Diamond Dallas Page, Sting, Sid Vicious, Juventud Guerrera, Kidman, Konnan,
Rey Mysterio Junior, Disco Inferno and Bam Bam Bigelow.
Screenwriter Steven Brill is quite the renaissance man. He's a writer, he
wrote the three MIGHTY DUCK movies, an actor, he had parts in all three
MIGHTY DUCK films as well as BIG DADDY (7/10) and THE WEDDING SINGER, and
heck why the hell not...he will also be directing Adam Sandler in his next
comedy flick entitled LITTLE NICKY.
Brian Robbins, the man who directed this film and last year's teen success
VARSITY BLUES (7/10), was once an actor himself. He is probably best
remembered for his role as Eric on TV's "Head of the Class". That's
right...he was the "cool" nerd.
Stay tuned at the end of this movie for some pretty funny outtakes.

Title
Review for Muse, The (1999)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Actor/writer/director Albert Brooks teams up with several other well-known
directors, Scorsese, Cameron, Reiner, as actors, to create a magical film
about gorgeous actress Sharon Stone, and cute-as-a-patootie actress Andie
MacDowell, spending a night together naked in bed! Well...okay...not
exactly, but the point is, it almost happens! Anyway, on to my review...
PLOT:
A veteran Hollywood screenwriter gets his writing contract terminated when
everyone in the industry deems him to have "lost his edge". After querying
his successful producer friend for help, he suddenly finds himself hooked up
with a modern-day "muse", who is ready to stir up his creativity...but at a
price! You see, the "muse" likes to inspire at her own pace, loves
extravagance and has a "thing" for expensive gifts.
CRITIQUE:
A very original fantasy tale strung along with plenty of funny lines, a nice
pace, a couple of twists and turns, a surprising ending, cameos galore,
Hollywood in-jokes, and a spectacular performance from Sharon Stone as "the
muse". I've given Sharon a hard time over the past few years, with her
trying to get all serious and shit, but she is perfect in this role, funny
as heck, cute as ever, and man-o-man...what a great ass! :) Albert Brooks is
someone whose humor is either appreciated by one or not, much like Woody
Allen, and if you haven't liked any of his previous films, you probably
won't like this one either. Fortunately for myself, I love Woody Allen, and
respect Brooks' unique brand of humor, despite his tepid acting range
leaving much to be desired. This film had me laughing out loud for the first
thirty minutes or so, but did take a little dip in the second half, with
little spurts of humor buoying me afloat.
Having said that, the plot itself always kept me interested, while Sharon
Stone and her engaging performance, locked me in for good! Don't get me
wrong, I also liked Albert Brooks' character, and he certainly hogged all
the best one-liners to himself, but Stone stole the show for me. MacDowell,
on the other hand, does little but float around in this one, adding very
little to the mix, and Jeff Bridges, well, he acts with his tan, and does a
mighty fine job at it, if I say so myself! Scorsese's walk-on and a couple
of other big scenes have giant laughs, but on the whole, the film is cute,
and fluffy, and fun, and well, entertaining. Surely my own bias as a
screenwriter might be shining through a little here (Just so you know where
I'm coming from :), but Mrs. JoBlo has no interest in the Woods of Holly,
and she was also spurting out laughter throughout. Take it as you will, but
do appreciate the fact that there are plenty of Hollywood jabs in here,
humor which treks heavily through the sardonic, and Sharon Stone is goddamn
delicious! Any questions...? And no...I haven't sold any of my scripts
either. Anyone know of any cheap muses running around?? Anyone? Bueller?
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Albert Brooks was born and raised in Los Angeles, Brooks is the son of radio
comedian Harry Einstein, known as "Parkyakarkus". Brooks' real name is
Albert Einstein. His brother is the infamous daredevil "Super Dave"
Osbourne, whose real name is Bob Einstein. Albert turned down the lead in
WHEN HARRY MET SALLY... (10/10) because he thought it was too much like a
Woody Allen script. Albert himself has been described as a West Coast Woody
Allen.
Sharon Stone's first (albeit fleeting) film appearance was as the blond
goddess glimpsed by Woody Allen on a passing train in Allen's STARDUST
MEMORIES. Stone's first major film role was as the conniving young actress
girlfriend of Ryan O'Neal in the comedy IRRECONCILABLE DIFFERENCES. She is a
member of MENSA, with an IQ of 154. She once auditioned for the Cathy
Moriarty role in Martin Scorsese's classic 1980 film RAGING BULL, the Glenn
Close role in FATAL ATTRACTION (8/10), the Kim Basinger role in BATMAN
(8/10), and the Madonna role in DICK TRACY. She also speaks Italian.
Andie MacDowell's full name is Rosalie Anderson MacDowell. In 1988, she
became a member of the New York City Church of Christ, a local affiliate
with a cult known as the International Churches of Christ. She left the
group shortly thereafter, when she was forbidden to take part in the film
SEX, LIES & VIDEOTAPE by the leadership.
Jeff Bridges met his wife, Susan in 1975 while filming RANCHO DELUXE. She
was working as a maid on a dude ranch, and as of 1999, they're still
married.
Cameos in this film include directors James Cameron, Martin Scorsese and Rob
Reiner, actors Lorenzo Lamas, Cybill Shepherd and Jennifer Tilly, and famous
restauranteur Wolfgang Puck.
THE MUSE marks the sixth collaboration between screenwriter Monica Johnson
and Albert Brooks. Their previous films together were MOTHER, LOST IN
AMERICA, MODERN ROMANCE, and REAL LIFE (all of which starred and were
directed by Brooks) and THE SCOUT (which only starred Brooks).

Title
Review for Stepmom (1998)
For more reviews and movie trivia, go to http://www.joblo.com/
Chris Columbus takes another poke at a film that includes happy upper-middle
class families coping with their troubles by singing a few catchy 50's
tunes, visiting beautiful settings with wonderful memories, and tossing a
cute kid in for effect. Sound familiar? It might. He previously directed the
huge hits of HOME ALONE (8/10) and MRS. DOUBTFIRE. This film is actually
more of a drama, but the director's trademark devices are all present and
accounted for.
PLOT:
Two kids must deal with the fact that their parents are divorced and that
daddy is ready to bring another younger woman into their lives permanently.
The mother of said kids seems to have a bigger chip on her shoulder in
regards to the new "stepmom" moving in with her kids, as the whole lot of
them deal with their emotions, reservations and fears in respect to this new
family dynamic.
CRITIQUE:
A cardboard cutout of a perfectly sad drama done in happy smiley faces, this
film gives us a few laughs, most of which I had already seen in the TV
commercial, many moments of emotional confrontations, a couple of which
managed to give me the "ol' wet-eye", and an uninspired script acted out to
perfection by some very talented actors. I have to say that nothing in this
movie surprised me one bit, and that most of what I did see was played out
by the numbers. Stepmom bad, kids and mom good. Daddy confused. Stepmom mess
up, kids and mom still good. Daddy confused. Stepmom try harder, kids start
liking her, mom catch deadly disease. Daddy still confused. Can you fill out
the rest? Well I did, and I'm guessing that most others will as well.
Having said that, this film still managed to make me chuckle every now and
again, mostly because of the cute kid (Damn you, Columbus!!), and did
feature some terrific performances by all involved, with a special hand
going out to Susan Sarandon's eyes, which absolutely took a beating during
this film. Her eyes were filled with tears for what seemed like the whole
movie, but she still managed to deliver her lines perfectly. To the redness
in her eyeballs, and to the onions in her diet, I tip my baseball cap, and
wish her the best of luck at the Oscars. Julia also managed to cramp up a
couple of tears here and there, and even Harris got in on the act. All in
all, a by-the-numbers sappy dramatic comedy, that offers a lot of
inspiration to all those in this same situation (I am not, so I admit that I
could not truly relate to any one of these characters), but very little to
all others, who may be looking for a night of entertainment. My usual female
companion for the evening, Mrs. JoBlo also didn't care much for the film,
despite washing a wave or two from her puffy eyes during the Sarandon
red-eye scenes. See it if the premise interests you, or if you want your
loved one to cry, so that you could cuddle up with them, otherwise, skip it,
and see TITANIC (7/10) again. At least that schmaltz-fest had some slick
special effects!
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Julia Roberts' full name is actually Julie Fiona Roberts. She was once
engaged to actor Kiefer Sutherland, and dated TV's "Friends" favourite
sarcastic friend, Chandler Bing, Matthew Perry. Her wedding with Kiefer
Sutherland fell through just days before the couple was scheduled to take
their June 14, 1991 vows. The groom-to-be's indiscretions with a stripper
reportedly were the last straw in what had been a turbulent relationship
from the outset, and Roberts fled to Ireland with Sutherland's buddy, actor
Jason Patric.
She is to receive US$17 million salary for her upcoming role opposite her
PRETTY WOMAN (7.5/10) co-star, Richard Gere, in the film called THE RUNAWAY
BRIDE. Her bra size is 34B. Her real parents divorced when she was only
four, and her father passed away from cancer when she was only nine.
Susan Sarandon's full name is Susan Abigail Tomaling. She has three children
with actor Tim Robbins, to whom she is not married. She also had a large
family growing up, and was the oldest of eight younger brothers and sisters.
She once dated director Louis Malle and actor Sean Penn. If you're into this
kind of thing, you might enjoy her lesbian love scene with Catherine Deneuve
in 1983's THE HUNGER, starring David Bowie.
Ed Harris has been married to actress Amy Madigan since 1982. She is best
known as Kevin Costner's wife in FIELD OF DREAMS (7.5/10).
Two previous titles for this picture were CLASS DIVIDED and GOOD NIGHT MOON
(and you thought STEPMOM was bad).
The proposal scene in this movie was apparently thought up by Julia Roberts
and Ed Harris (And yet they needed five writers to accomplish this squeeshy
script?).
Director Chris Columbus' production company is called 1492 productions. Get
it? Christopher Columbus...1492? :)
Screenwriter Gigi Levangie, who just happens to be the wife of big-time
producer Brian Grazer of Imagine Entertainment, had originally presented her
original screenplay to all involved, who found her version to be
"unrealistic". Four other writers later, it apparently turned "realistic".
Go figure.

Title
Review for Sixth Sense, The (1999)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Bruce Willis takes on a role strategically opposite to his usual macho,
wise-crackin', gun-tottin' beefcake, to star alongside a cute kid, in a part
that finds him leveled out as an insightful, caring, children's
psychologist. Could he go an entire picture and not make one wise-ass
remark? You bet!
PLOT:
A children's psychologist becomes strongly attached to one child's problem,
when the boy begins displaying strong signs of similarity with another young
kid whom the doctor once treated, and failed to cure. The boy claims to see
"dead people" walking all around him. In the meanwhile, the doctor's own
marriage begins to fall apart, as he focuses too heavily on the child in
question.
CRITIQUE:
Wow. What an ending. I don't think I've been this moved by a film's
conclusion since the frighteningly shocking end of David Fincher's SEVEN
(9/10). Don't worry because I will obviously not ruin this film for anyone,
but suffice it to say that the end of this film allows you to see the entire
picture from an entirely different point of view, and that is simply a
unique achievement. In fact, I am more than willing to see this film once
again, just so that I could see it unravel within that other realm. Another
thing that stood out for me with this picture was the fact that unlike its
trailer, which sells this film as a chilling thriller, this movie is
actually a supernatural drama with plenty of tear-jerking scenes to boot.
And yes, even your faithful author crumbled under the emotional drainage of
the film's players, filling his eyes with a little bit of the ol' wetness. I
would rather compare it to elements of THE OMEN and GHOST, rather than any
thrill-seekers ride.
In fact, the film is deliberately paced very slowly, with plenty of time
given to the performers to grapple with the potent material at hand. Haley
Joel Osment does an excellent job as the confused young child who is going
through things that no child should ever go through, and even Bruce Willis
pulls off an impressive steady performance, without a single "yipee-kaya" in
the whole script. But once again, allow me re-iterate how much the twist
ending of this film allowed it to catapult onto another level. Even after
the film's credits had long been done rolling, my friends and I could not
help but discuss the various intricacies of the plot which were altered
through this amazing ending, and could not help but further our appreciation
for this film. Great acting, great style, great score, an instant classic
ending, and certainly worthy of being called one of my favorite films of the
year. And despite it not being an all-out thriller, believe me when I say
that you will be startled in a few scenes, and certainly touched in others.
Giant kudos go out to the writer/director of this film, M. Night Shyamalan,
for pulling off a very impressive film presentation.
Oh, and by the way, if this film interests you in the least, make sure that
you see it as soon as possible, before someone ruins the ending for you. It
truly is one to digest firsthand.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Ex-New Kid on the Block, Donnie Wahlberg, makes a powerful performance in
this picture, looking absolutely NOTHING like he used to in the days of
"hanging tough" with his now-defunct band. Such an immense physical
transformation, I have not seen in a long while. Donnie apparently dropped
30 pounds for his minimal role. Robert DeNiro would be proud. Donnie has
eight brothers and sisters, including his one other famous sibling, Mark
Wahlberg, another once-a-singer-now-a-want-to-be-serious-actor in his own
right. Donnie also has a son named Xavier by a member of his brother's band
Marky Mark and the Funky Bunch.
Willis' wife in this movie is played by Olivia Williams, the apple of Max
Fischer's eye in last year's comedy hit, RUSHMORE (8/10).
You may remember child actor Haley Joel Osment from his roles as Avery
Brown, son of TV's "Murphy Brown", Matt Foxworthy son on TV's "The Jeff
Foxworthy Show", and Forrest Junior from, you guessed it, FORREST GUMP.
Actress Toni Collette is Australian. In 1994, she won the Australian
equivalent of the Academy Award for MURIEL'S WEDDING, a role for which she
gained 40 pounds in seven weeks, with the help of a dietician.
Pay close attention, and you will notice writer/director M. Night Shyamalan
in his role in this film as Dr. Hill. Mr. Shyamalan is born in Madras,
India, and wrote/directed his first autobiographical film, PRAYING WITH
ANGER, when he was only 22 years old. This is his third picture.

Title
Review for Meet Joe Black (1998)
For more reviews and trivia, go to http://surf.to/joblo
>From MALLRATS (6/10) to this!?! Claire Forlani breaks into the "show"
with her first big romantic lead opposite one of the "sexiest men in
the world", Brad Pitt. Director Martin Brest follows up his greatest
critical success from 1992, SCENT OF A WOMAN (7.5/10), with a
semi-remake of the 1934 film, DEATH TAKES A HOLIDAY, a 3-hour long
fantastical romance starring Death. 
PLOT:
Death comes to Earth and injects itself into the form of a human body
(Pitt) in order to learn more about human beings and life in general.
He chooses an extremely successful and rich man, William Parrish
(Hopkins) to be his guide through this journey, up until the time he
chooses to end it, at which point, he will take the 65-year old Parrish
with him. What's the quirk in his plans? Mr. Parrish also has a
gorgeous daughter, to which Death gradually takes a liking. 
CRITIQUE:
Despite it being too long, too slow, and not all together believable,
this film still manages to whip up a kernel of cinematic magic with the
wonderful performances by its leads, the beautiful scenery and a
touching father-daughter subplot. Folks, before you read any more of
this review, please appreciate the fact that this film truly feeeeels
like three hours! Most of the scenes seem to go on for too long, the
dialogue between the actors is constantly interrupted by long spurts of
silence and ambiguous gazes, and the overall feel of the film is slow,
slow and slow. Having said that, I might recommend this film for
video-watchers, who have the prerogative to watch the film at their own
leisure, and even forward the boring parts, or rewind the whispering
parts (Most of which were too low to comprehend.)
That aside, the film's actual story line is sort of original, but not
taken full advantage of. They basically just make Death feel like a
"fish out of water" character which we've already seen done to death
(no pun intended) in many a better film. As Death, Brad Pitt is good,
but his character is really quite annoying and slow. His counterpart,
the mousy Claire Forlani is also quite decent in her role, but their
romance never really grabbed me by the throat (They might have wanted
to pursue the "coffee shop" scene's ambience further in this
script...). Her boyfriend in the film is also played well by actor Jake
Weber, but for some reason, he downshifts into a completely
one-dimensional character about halfway through this voyage. Anthony
Hopkins is also great as the patriarch of this super-rich family, while
managing to authenticate true feelings of his power and humanity.
Jeffrey Tambor is also funny in the role of the comic-relief loser.
I must say that the conclusion of this film also left me dry in the
enthusiasm department, as Death's departure from Earth was somewhat
anticlimactic. And I don't care how high you jam your bombastic musical
score, Mr. Brest, you will not make me cry solely on the basis of blood
gushing out of my eardrums!! All in all, the film does not succeed on
most fronts. It's too long, waaaaay too slow, and kind of flaky as a
romance. On the other hand, if you don't mind long or slow movies, like
staring at beautiful people and images for 3 hours, and are interested
in the father-daughter relationship angle, which is quite well done in
this film, then by all means, check this movie out...on video! And oh
yeah, I never like to reveal plot points in my reviews, but just this
once I'll tell you a little something that might juice this film up for
you..........................are you
ready?...........................Death gets laid!!
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Brad Pitt's favorite snack is pizza. His favorite cereal is Frosted
Flakes. His favorite movie of all time is ONE FLEW OVER THE CUCKOO'S
NEST (7.5/10) (one of his favorites). His favorite TV show of all time
is "All in the Family". He likes the music of Neil Young, Bob Marley,
Soundgarden and Eric Clapton. (The Oprah Winfrey Show, November 13,
1998)
Brad Pitt received $17,500,000 for his role in this film. He dated
fellow actresses Juliette Lewis and Gwyneth Paltrow for three and two
years respectively, and dropped out of the University of Missouri
School of Journalism when he was only two credits short of (and two
weeks prior to) graduating to move to California. He was majoring in
journalism with a focus in advertising. He told his parents and friends
that he was off to attend the Art Center College of Design in Pasadena,
because he was afraid to tell them that, in fact, he planned to
relegate himself to the status of a table-waiting, limo-driving,
chicken-suit-wearing, LA type, all in the hope that someday he would be
famous.
Pitt was the third choice for the role of J.D. in THELMA & LOUISE
(8/10). William Baldwin, the first choice, left to star in BACKDRAFT
(7.5/10).
In 1992, director Martin Brest was nominated for an Oscar as Best
Director for SCENT OF A WOMAN. He also directed the original BEVERLY
HILLS COP (7.5/10) starring Eddie Murphy.
Claire Forlani is British, and played the long-lost daughter of Sean
Connery in THE ROCK (7/10).
This film was originally titled DEATH TAKES A VACATION.
Singer Melissa Etheridge once provided this Brad Pitt testimonial: "One
night a few of us, shall we say, lesbians, were in the hot tub watching
the guys play basketball in the pool. We were staring at Brad and we
all agreed he could change a woman's mind."

Title
Review for Nurse Betty (2000)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
PLOT:
A soap-opera addict goes delusional after witnessing a traumatic event take
place before her very eyes and scoots off to Hollywood in order to find her
ex-fiance, a character on her favorite TV show, whom she believes to be a
real person. On her tail are the two bad guys responsible for causing the
"traumatic event", now bent on finding the woman before she comes back to
reality and remembers the crime which they committed.
CRITIQUE:
An original modern-day black comedy based in fantasy that delivers a great
cast, fun undertones a la WIZARD OF OZ and a terrific performance from Renee
Zellweger. Admittedly, this movie took some time to ingratiate itself to me.
Frankly, I was a little letdown by its first half, and only began
appreciating its many diverse characters, its wacky story and its humor
after the midway point of the film. Now don't get me wrong, I was never
bored or unhappy with the movie, but it just wasn't doing much for me until
cute l'il nurse Betty got to L.A. and started living our her complete
"fantasy" world. At that point, all bets were off and I was hooked. I
especially enjoyed all of the scenes featuring Zellweger and Kinnear's
characters playing off one another. These scenes featured some of the better
double-entendres that I've heard in a while. And I just love those! One
person talking about one thing, while the other person believes them to be
talking about something entirely different. Pretty funny and extremely
well-written and acted in this case. The rest of the film wasn't necessarily
funny for me and definitely not laugh-out loud ha-ha! It was clever and
certainly interesting enough as a modern-day fable, but the laughs didn't
start a-coming 'till a little after the halfway mark. Mind you, others have
deduced deeper issues beneath this film's surface.
Zellweger and Freeman's characters are apparent mirrors to one another in
the sense that each of their respective personalities has imagined a
delusional fantasy love for themselves, based on an ideal which they cannot
attain in real life. A love, which in either case is oblivious to their
respective existence. Now that may all be good and true, but I must admit to
not catching any of that the first time around. Thinking about it now, it
does all seem to have a deeper meaning, and I certainly wouldn't be opposed
to watching this film again in order to fulfill that level of "depth" which
I seemed to have missed. But let's stick to the stuff above the surface for
now. The film is definitely one to catch just to see some of the better
performances of the year. Aaron Eckhart is asshole-perfect as the husband,
as is Kinnear as the arrogant actor. Morgan Freeman and Chris Rock work
beautifully off one another, while Renee Zellweger delivers a new kind of
performance for herself. I've generally seen her as the cute, romantic type
in most films, but in this one she manages to play an excellent unhinged
individual with an adorable smile and a sensitive nature. She has to ride a
fine line with this part, never going over the top kooky and having us
believe that she really _believes_ that what she's doing is "real", and she
does so in perfect form. See it for her, see it for the original fantasy
tale, see it for all of the other cool characters, see it for its deeper
connections, or see it for the re-emergence of Crispin Glover as an actor
(where has he been?). Either way, it's safe to say that this film definitely
"ain't in Kansas any more!" The year of film mediocrity seems to have hit a
little bump.

Title
Review for For Love of the Game (1999)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Range. What exactly is it when a director is said to have "range"? Well,
before you go to see this movie, please go rent EVIL DEAD 2 (8/10), a
classic horror movie from director Sam Raimi. It contains camera tricks
galore, an over-the-top script, a hand which lives on its own, and plenty of
blood. Sam Raimi is also the director of this film, which features baseball,
Kevin Costner in chinos, and plenty of gooey love and romance stuff. Now
THAT'S range!
PLOT:
An aging baseball player gets dumped by his girlfriend and asked to consider
retirement by management right before what may be his last trip to the
mound. As he begins to pitch towards a perfect game, he also looks back at
his career, and more importantly, the special moments of his relationship
with his girlfriend.
CRITIQUE:
Reflective, syrupy and effective adult, romantic drama which deals
eloquently with a man torn between his affection towards the game of
baseball (i.e. his career) and his ability to open up to a woman for whom he
cares deeply (i.e. his love life). Do you have to like baseball to like this
movie? Not at all. Would it help you enjoy this movie more if you liked
baseball? Probably. This film is definitely not about baseball as much as
BULL DURHAM and FIELD OF DREAMS were, but it does manage to spend quite a
bit of time on the game in question. In fact, I could have done without some
of the baseball scenes, which made me feel like I was watching a
play-by-play game at times. The announcers were also welcome to some extent,
but their voice-overs sure became irritating after a while. But I digress,
since the meat of this film lies in the relationship built between the two
people in the movie, Costner and Preston, and it is handled with much care
and affection. Raimi also proves that he has an excellent ear for cinema
with some pointed scenes featuring the "power" of a pitcher's concentration.
Wonderfully crafted.
I also liked the way the film intercuts the progression of Costner's bid for
a perfect game, with the reflections upon his relationship with this woman
whom he appears to adore. The romance is constructed diligently with genuine
believability, with both actors extremely effective in their roles.
Admittedly, I never considered Kelly Preston anything more than Mrs.
Travolta, but goddamn if she didn't have me sniffling in this film. She and
Kevin light up the screen with their affair, and I found myself relating to
many of the issues which plagued their relationship as well. If you have
ever been in a relationship which competed with your career for the top spot
in your life, you will certainly appreciate many of the sentiments
realistically delivered in this romantic tale. It definitely could have been
cut by about twenty minutes, but all in all, the film made me cry like a
baby, further appreciate the talents of director Raimi, and extend kudos to
Costner who delivers one of the finest performances of his career (The
poignant scene in his hotel room after the game is an ironic and powerful
twist). This is definitely an adult drama featuring many moments of
heartfelt emotion, and despite not being for everyone, it may just be the
best romantic drama since 1997's AS GOOD AS IT GETS (8/10), and certainly
worthy of a comparison to the strength of JERRY MAGUIRE (7.5/10).
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Actor Kevin Costner graduated from the California State University at
Fullerton with a degree in marketing. Note that the scene in which Costner
sees a vision of his parents in the crowd, is in actuality, his own parents
from real-life. Costner was not afraid to voice his disapproval of
Universal's "trimming of the film" due to the length and PG-13 rating.
Kevin's middle name is Michael. His ex-wife's name is Cindy Silva. They were
married for 16 years and have three children together.
Kelly Preston was born and raised in Hawaii. Her real name is Kelly Palzis.
As a result of her father's position with an agricultural firm, the family
moved first to Iraq for one year and then to Australia for two years. It was
while she was a teenager in Hawaii that Preston appeared in television
commercials and began to develop an interest in an acting career. You could
see her topless in the teen comedy SECRET ADMIRER starring C. Thomas Howell,
and SPELLBINDER. Nice breasts. She also lived with actor Charlie Sheen from
1989-90. She was accidentally shot in their apartment in 1990 .
Soon thereafter, she settled down with actor John Travolta in 1991, with
whom she has a son named Jett.
Actress Jena Malone, who plays the daughter in this film, also played the
daughter in STEPMOM (6/10) with Susan Sarandon. She's pretty good.
Director Sam Raimi was originally approached to direct the Arnold
Schwarzenegger movie END OF  DAYS, but was more interested in this film
because he is a gigantic baseball fan, and wanted a chance to present his
own tribute to the game which he loves. Raimi's brother Ted Raimi plays one
of the doormen at the gallery in this film. Sam Raimi formed Renaissance
Pictures with his two College buddies, producer Rob Tapert and actor Bruce
Campbell. They are the group behind the TV shows "Hercules: The Legendary
Journeys" and "Xena: The Princess Warrior". Producer Tapert recently married
the Xena star, Lucy Lawless.
The baseball scenes which took place in Yankee Stadium used between 800 and
2000 extras for the crowd shots, while the rest of the audience was to be
filled in with computer graphics.
This film is based on the novel by author Michael Shaara. Shaara's son Jeff
found the manuscript of FOR THE LOVE OF THE GAME among his father's works
after his death, ensuring its publication after the man's untimely death in
1988.

Title
Review for Risky Business (1983)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
PLOT:
Rich kid preparing for College suddenly finds himself all alone in the house
as his parents leave for a trip. When one of his friends suggests that he
loosen up, he turns that piece of advice into a money-making scheme,
featuring escort call girls and his friends trading favors for one another,
in a wild night of drinks, sex and debauchery.
CRITIQUE:
Tom Cruise's breakthrough feature accentuates the rebellion of youth
intertwined with the trepidation of a future unknown. A darker, sexier
FERRIS BUELLER'S DAY OFF, if you will. And if you won't, you could see this
film as an interesting character study of a kid torn between his tendencies
to discover the wild side of life before adult responsibilities and his
desire to satisfy his parents. I liked it mostly on nostalgic grounds with
Cruise coming across as the perfect boy next door with that certain twinkle
in his eye, and sunglasses that were just waaaay too big for his face.
Having said that, Ray-Ban isn't complaining since this film's success
literally quadrupled their sales the next year. This film also features the
classic scene of Cruise dancing around in his white briefs and preppy shirt
to the tune of "Old Time Rock n' Roll".
Overall, it was unique enough to keep me interested throughout, despite the
tepid romance scenes between Cruise and DeMornay and the farfetched nature
of some of its scenarios. If you like Cruise, you should see this film at
least one, or if you're also in the midst of interrogating your life
decisions right before College. All in all, despite its dated feel, this
film has an interesting premise, great style and good acting.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
This film garnered actor Tom Cruise a 1984 Golden Globe nomination for Best
Performance by an Actor in a Motion Picture- Comedy/Musical. He lost it to
Michael Caine for EDUCATING RITA. The top of Tom's head is apparently 5'7"
from ground level.
This film grossed $63.5M upon its release in 1983.
This was writer/director Paul Brickman's first time behind the camera. He
only directed one other film after this one, and it was 1990's MEN DON'T
LEAVE. The only other film he wrote after this one was 1999's TRUE CRIME
(5.5/10).
The "bad guy" character of Guido in this film is played by actor Joe
Pantoliano. He recently starred as "Cypher" in the 1999 Sci-Fi classic THE
MATRIX (7.5/10).
Actress Rebecca DeMornay's birth name is Rebecca George. She changed her
last name so that she would not be connected to her father. She was raised
in France, went to high school and College in Europe and speaks fluent
German.

Title
Review for Rushmore (1998)
For more reviews and movie trivia, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Writer/director Wes Anderson and writer/actor Owen Wilson take another stab
at the movies after the critical success of their initial independent effort
titled BOTTLE ROCKET. Nicolas Cage's real-life cousin, Jason Schwartzman,
offers his big screen debut in this film, while Bill Murray finally finds an
excellent script in which to rest his solid straight-man acting abilities.
Think of this film as a quirkier FERRIS BUELLER of our day!
PLOT:
Max Fischer is a unique high school student who has all the talent in the
world, but cannot seem to focus on any one thing that he enjoys doing,
besides attending Rushmore high that is. One day, he falls for a 1st grade
teacher who appreciates his persistent adoration, but cannot reciprocate his
feelings. Max's friend and rich mentor, an alumni of Rushmore himself, also
falls for the 1st grade teacher, and unintentionally creates a childish
"love war" between the two.
CRITIQUE:
Quirky, unique, original in style, funny as heck, with some great
performances put forth by the entire cast, this movie offers an extremely
viable alternative to all of us who are sick and tired of watching the same
old Hollywood comedies done in the same old boring way. This film has wit up
its ying-yang, a tremendous soundtrack that goes perfectly with the black
humorous tone of the flick, and a script that always has you wanting to see
and know more. I did find that the last act of this piece was not as solid
as the first two, the confidence seemed to be lacking, but all in all, a
great show! This movie made me laugh out loud during several scenes, enjoy
and smile gratuitously at various clever shots and moments, and fully
appreciate the originality of a film that doesn't seem to come around often
enough.
Bill Murray is amazing as the rich, indifferent old fart, who chain-smokes
like it's going out of style, and carries a lit fuse right into all of his
mannerisms. It's beautiful to see him finally chew into some material that
accentuates his underrated acting abilities. Jason Schwartzman is also
fantastic as the know-it-all, smart-aleck kid who carries around enough
enthusiasm to sustain a thousand regular kids in any high school of our day.
He's been given some great lines to work with here, but he delivers them all
perfectly, and essentially, turns into Max Fischer. I don't mind saying that
he reminded me a bit of a role by another diminutive actor by the name of
Dustin Hoffman, in a little film called THE GRADUATE back in 1967. Let's
hope that his career goes further than his mom's ever did . All in all, this movie's loaded with plenty of fun eye and ear
candy, a totally creative script, some great performances by everyone
involved, and a thoroughly original time at the movie theatre.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Actor Jason Schwartzman is the son of actress Talia Shire (birthname Talia
Rose Coppola), who is best known for her role as "Adrian" in all of the
ROCKY movies. She is director Francis Ford Coppola's sister, which
essentially makes the legendary director, Jason's uncle. Seeing that actor
Nicolas Cage is also part of the Coppola's clan, his father is Francis
Ford's brother, Jason is technically cousins with Nic as well.
Screenwriter Owen Wilson is brother to actor Luke Wilson who appears in this
film as the pre-med student/companion to Ms. Cross, and Andrew Wilson who
plays the part of the baseball coach. Both brothers also had parts in Owen's
first written film, BOTTLE ROCKET, alongside Owen himself, who is also an
actor in his own right. He starred as "Oscar Choi" in 1998's big-ass hit
ARMAGEDDON (7.5/10), and "Gary Dixon" in 1997's ANACONDA, among various
other roles. He was also an associate producer on the big 1997 Oscar flick,
AS GOOD AS IT GETS (7.5/10). The director of that film, James L. Brooks, was
the guy who backed the dynamic duo's first film, BOTTLE ROCKET, as executive
producer. He is also "thanked" at the end of RUSHMORE.
Actor Bill Murray claims that he's only read three scripts in his lifetime,
which he did not alter in any way. RUSHMORE was one of them. GROUNDHOG'S DAY
(7.5/10) was the other. And MAD DOG & GLORY (6.5/10) the last.
At one point during filming, director Wes Anderson needed US$25,000 to shoot
an airplane scene. Not within the budget, he pleaded for the money from the
studio for a few days, but never got a "yes" for an answer. Bill Murray
heard all this and decided to write the man a personal check himself, so
that he needn't worry about money issues so much, and focus on his grand
vision instead. Wes accepted, they shot the scene, but it was never used in
the film. The studio never paid Murray back.
Director Wes Anderson shot most of this movie on location at the prep
academy that he once attended. He also used to mount fanciful plays there to
entertain his fellow students. He once did a stage version of STAR WARS.
Director Wes Anderson on his writing style, "I have a pretty rudimentary
method for formatting scripts. I use an old version of Microsoft Word and
just keep hitting tabs. Chop, chop, chop. At the end of the page, it might
say the character's name and then on the next page are the lines that he
says. Stuff that people say is wrong. So we have to retype it at the end.
Horribly unprofessional."
The kid who plays Max Fischer side-kick in this film, actor Mason Gamble, is
better known for his role as "Dennis" in 1993's DENNIS THE MENACE.

Title
Review for Trial and Error (1997)
Michael Richards leaves his spot as Kramer on the infamous Seinfeld TV
sitcom for a stint as a lanky, goofy best friend to Jeff Daniels'
lawyer character in this ill-fated, and unfunny, "comedy".
PLOT:
Richard the actor (Richards) has to take the place of Charles the
lawyer (Daniels) in a real court case, after Charles is left
unintelligible from a night of heavy drinking at his bachelor party.
The film follows the antics of the two men as they try to get away with
their tomfoolery.
CRITIQUE:
This movie did not make me laugh once. Perhaps it was because I was
tired when I watched it. Perhaps. Perhaps it was because I had seen
Richards perform most of the same schtick a thousand times on Seinfeld.
Perhaps. Perhaps it was because the movie just wasn't funny.
Absolutely.
The lack of humour wasn't the only issue that I had with this film
either. The movie attempts to weave a couple of love stories through
its vision, but unfortunately, they are also lacking in conviction,
believability and credibility. They are contrived and appear to be
placed into the story for convenience sake. The actors were all
adequate enough in their roles, but the problem didn't lie in the
acting. I wish I could find one good reason for you to see this waste
of time, but I can't. Unless of course, you need something playing on
your TV set while you waste some time around the house.
Overall, this movie stinks. On the good side, Charlize Theron is darn
cute, and the movie is no longer then 90 minutes. On the bad side, this
movie is not funny, interesting or enjoyable in any which way possible.
A person wouldn't even enjoy his nachos while watching this emptiness.
Please skip it.
Little Known Facts: 
Jonathan Lynn earned a degree in law from Cambridge before becoming an
actor/director.
Charlize Theron grew up on a farm outside Benoni, South Africa, as the
only child. At the age of 18 her mother made her go to Los Angeles to
try a career in the movie industry. She came to LA without knowing
anyone in the city but after two weeks when she was standing in line on
Hollywood Boulevard an agent gave her his card. After eight months in
LA she got her first part. Since then she has taken acting lessons and
her career has skyrocketed, specifically in DEVIL'S ADVOCATE (8/10).
Charlize was narrowly beat out by Elizabeth Berkley for the lead role
in the "movie", SHOWGIRLS. She was quoted as saying "it was like I had
some guardian angel."

Title
Review for Hidden, The (1987)
One of Kyle McLachlan's earlier cinematic features, this movie has had
an obvious influence on such films as THE TERMINATOR (8/10), SPECIES
(7/10) and the more recent, FALLEN with Denzel Washington.
PLOT:
A science-fiction picture set in modern times, this thriller follows
the exploits of an "entity" from outer space, who likes to inhabit
human bodies, use them up until they are completely worn out, and then
switch over to the next available receptacle. FBI agent (McLachlan) and
local top cop (Nouri) are charged with the capture of this "thing"
before it's too late.
CRITIQUE:
This fast-paced, urban equivalent of THE THING (8/10), checks in on all
cylinders for ultra-violence (God knows how many people died in this
movie), action and an overall rock 'n roll attitude. Then again, how
can you go wrong with an "alien" that likes the Ferraris, guns, heavy
metal music and sexy girls ?! Granted, the plot isn't the most
elaborate of tales (alien bad, find alien, kill alien), but I can
honestly say that I was never once bored during the viewing of this
entire picture.
I wouldn't recommend it to those who don't like car chases, murders,
and bland acting, but for all the rest of you out there, those who
enjoy putting away their brains every now and again, sitting back,
slamming back some salsa'd nachos, and relishing in the cheeze some
call film... have a blast !! 
Two scenes to watch for are both within the first ten minutes of this
gore-fest. The opening sequence is one of the most rockin' scenes to
open any action movie, and the subsequent extra-terrestrial
"transformation" is another eye-catcher. Even the late 80's special
effects were okay. Followed by THE HIDDEN II in 1994.
Little Known Facts:  
This film was Kyle MacLachlan's first non-David Lynch foray into the
world of feature films. His first two movie appearances were in Lynch's
wretched DUNE (4/10) and the sensational BLUE VELVET (8.5/10)

Title
Review for Teaching Mrs. Tingle (1999)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
This movie is written by the man who is deemed to be "one of the hottest
writers in Hollywood". He wrote the groundbreaking screenplay for SCREAM
(8/10), then added the successful I KNOW WHAT YOU DID LAST SUMMER (7.5/10)
script to his mix, and also created the popular TV series "Dawson's Creek".
So when he asked to direct his first movie, based on his first ever script
written, everyone and their grandma said "Sure, go for it!". Uhhm, my
question is...did anyone bother reading this stupid script???
PLOT:
Ace student Leigh Ann Watson is mistakenly caught with some cheating papers
by the bitchiest teacher in the West, Mrs. Tingle, and set to lose her
scholarship to College. When she and her friends visit the teacher at home
in order to explain their side of the story, they end up tying her up, and
slowly trying to talk some sense into the hardheaded woman.
CRITIQUE:
It's not so much that this is a bad movie, than the fact that it sucks. This
movie is chock-full of one-dimensional characters, contains no actual humor
that I was able to zone in on, zero tension or thrills, plot holes the size
of my big ass, lame pop tunes played to mask nothing going on in the movie,
and Molly Ringwald, Vivica A. Fox and Lesley Anne Warren tossed away in
throwaway roles. I was primed for this film as its interesting premise had
me thinking MISERY (8/10) and 9 TO 5, but unfortunately for Williamson, he
went nowhere with the bright foundation, making references to THE EXORCIST
and DR. ZHIVAGO, which I doubt many in his target market will appreciate. He
also forgot about suspense, with all of his characters based on
incomprehensible decisions, unbelievable motivations and simply boring us
with all of their trite dialogue.
Sure, Katie Holmes is cute, and her co-star, Marisa Coughlan, did a
reasonably amusing impression of THE EXORCIST (Worth two points out of my
three on ten), but how can we forgive the biggest one-dimensional character
in any film, Holmes' rival in the film, Mrs. Tingle's complete
unprofessionalism being let go by all others around her (Are teachers
allowed to behave that way nowadays?) and a transparent romance between
Holmes and some long-haired dude, hired to be the poor man's version of
Skeet Ulrich (Who himself is a poor man's version of Johnny Depp!). All in
all, this movie was laughable for me, provided me with no insight into
anything, demonstrated Williamson's genuine lack of directorial skills
alongside a juvenile script, and provided Helen Mirren with a great role to
chew into, unfortunately forgetting to give her character any believability,
humanity or capacity to comprehend. No hip lines, no cheap thrills, just a
dull time at the movie theater. If you want to see a funny teenage movie, go
see DETROIT ROCK CITY (8/10), and thank my drunken, sorry ass in the
morning.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Kevin Williamson's father was a fisherman. Kevin used his knowledge of
fishing hooks and winches when creating the killer in I KNOW WHAT YOU DID
LAST SUMMER (7.5/10). He is also a huge fan of Steven Spielberg and
coincidentally, so is Dawson Leery on TV's "Dawson's Creek", a show Kevin
created. He was once an aspiring actor. In fact, he even landed a bit part
on TV's "Another World". Also, Williamson has gone on record to say that an
unsupportive English teacher who once told him that he would never amount to
anything was the inspiration for Mrs. Tingle, which is also loosely based on
the book "Killing Mr. Griffin" by the writer of I KNOW WHAT YOU DID LAST
SUMMER (7.5/10), Lois Duncan. He has also come out and said that he is a gay
man.
Helen Mirren was born in London, England under the name Ilynea Lydia
Mironoff. She is married to director Taylor Hackford, whose works include
DEVIL'S ADVOCATE (8/10) and AN OFFICER AND A GENTLEMAN (8.5/10).
This film was originally titled KILLING MRS. TINGLE, but was changed after
the Columbine high school shooting incident.
Actress Marisa Coughlan will star in Kevin Williamson next TV project called
"Wasteland".
This is actor Barry Watson first full feature film. He has played the
character of "Seth" on TV's "Malibu Shores" several times.

Title
Review for Someone Like You... (2001)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
PLOT:
A very pretty, intelligent, single girl finds, who she thinks is, the man of
her dreams. Sometime later, he dumps her unexpectedly and she doesn't know
quite how to cope with it. Left without an apartment, she is forced to move
in with her womanizing co-worker Eddie, and slowly but surely devises a
theory explaining men's bad behavior in relationships.
CRITIQUE:
I kept wanting this film to get better, to throw me a curve, to gimme some
oomph, to make better use of its great-looking stars, but sadly, it was not
to be. This movie is yet another subpar romantic comedy...Hollywood-style!
And I use the term "comedy" lightly, as only a few giggles ever made their
way round my parts and the film's second half featured the lovely Ms. Judd
tearing up in practically every other scene. And the whole "new cow" theory
on which most of this film is based (and its humor, I suppose), the one
which Judd's character keeps referring to in voice-overs throughout the
film, and conversations with her friends, is not one bit as clever as the
filmmakers believe it to be. All the theory basically says is that all guys
are "dogs" and that they can't stay with the same woman all the time. Yawn!
Wake me when the film comes up with an interesting NEW theory and not a
recycled one which in this film, is aligned to the mating rituals of animals
in an obvious attempt to boost its "cute" factor. C'mon man, here you've got
a magnetic up-and-coming male lead in Hugh Jackman, a man who radiates
charisma whenever he's on the screen, and the script just flops with
annoying title cards a la "Frasier", an extremely boring and generic romance
angle played by puppy dog eyes Greg Kinnear (I like the dude, but did he
have to look that way during the entire movie?) and an ending which will
likely give you what you want, but left me feeling emotionally vapid.
Basically, the film just didn't "grab me". It felt like a bunch of sketch
sequences all tied together by the "cutesy" theory and many scenes of Ashley
Judd crying. I mean, I know this is a definite "chick flick", in that it is
totally geared towards women (men are bad!), with a nice nod to Oprah just
in case we didn't realize what we'd fell in on, but I don't even think most
women are going to be impressed with this film either, since it's mostly
just boring. Yeah sure, it's got a couple of cute moments here and there,
extremely good-looking leads in Ashley Judd (who might work in a romantic
comedy but this isn't the one) and Hugh Jackman (a younger, better looking
Clint Eastwood), but not much else. Little romantic tension, little
character development in anyone, especially Kinnear and Barkin, who looks as
though she spent a couple of extra days in the tanning salon, and very
little originality. And I guess Marisa Tomei has convinced herself that the
best way to get "back in to the biz" is by taking two-bit friend roles in
second-rate flicks. Oh well. Now I don't usually do this in my reviews but
I'll tell you what might've made this movie better. One, more laughs, two,
more scenes and situations involving Judd and Jackman together, and three,
more romance and believable tension. And how about tying up loose ends? The
film brings up Tomei's relationship and touches upon Jackman's past love,
but never mentions them again once the film gets rolling. Hello!? We're an
audience here...don't just leave us hanging...! (or were they just
"devices"...whatever!) Much like THE WEDDING PLANNER earlier this year, this
film just seems more like a "vehicle" for two of the hot stars of the day,
with very little attempt to create something original, funny or all that
interesting. Skip it!
But if you really want, or if your opinions don't jive with many of my
previous views below, I say rent the movie one day, and see how even great
looking people like Jackman and Judd could be total messes when it comes to
relationships! Aaaaaah...there...I feel better now!
Where's JoBlo coming from?
Fools Rush In (5/10) - Four Weddings and a Funeral (8/10) - Keeping the
Faith (7/10) - Runaway Bride (5/10) - The Wedding Planner (3/10) - What
Women Want (4/10) - When Harry Met Sally (10/10) -You've Got Mail (4/10)
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Ashley Judd's popular mom and country songstress, Naomi Judd, makes a cameo
appearance in this film as a make-up artist who quickly applies some to her
daughter's face as she makes her way onto a talk show.
This film was originally titled ANIMAL HUSBANDRY, based on the novel of the
same name penned by Laura Zigman.

Title
Review for Blue Streak (1999)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Only three weeks before the release of his film, actor Martin Lawrence
keeled over while taking a jog draped in a moose-fur sweater in no less than
100 degree weather. It was an extremely unfortunate and life-threatening
situation, which left him in a coma for about three days. He's currently
recovering. I'll admit that I had this incident on my mind when I went in to
see this movie, but five minutes in, Martin Lawrence, the talented comedian,
had me forget all of that, and let me to enjoy this predictable, yet funny,
movie.
PLOT:
A lifetime criminal gets caught during a diamond heist but leaves the $17
million stolen diamond hidden in a vent of a building under construction. As
soon as he gets out of jail, he returns to the scene of the crime, only to
find that the building has been turned into a police station. The only way
into the edifice is to "pretend" to be a police officer, which is exactly
what our con man sets out to do.
CRITIQUE:
If you like Martin Lawrence, the stand-up comedian, you will most likely
enjoy this movie packed with Lawrence-based humor, as long as you can
dismiss its generic screenplay which is predictable and spotted with
forgivable holes. I enjoy Lawrence when he's "on", and baby let me tell you,
this film lets him go all out! The premise of the movie allows you to be "in
on the joke" from the start, giving you more reason to laugh when Lawrence
goes off on his crazy shite. I laughed out loud during several scenes of
Martin's schtick, but also noticed a couple of lulls here and there, and a
horribly annoying rap-electro-dance soundtrack. Drag that damn cow out to
pasture already! Having said that, Mrs. JoBlo loved the soundtrack, so it
might just be me. :) Idiot white-boy sidekick Luke Wilson also did a decent
job of acting like a bumbling fool, as did the rest of the paper thin
characters spread around Martin's ball of contagious humor.
Don't get me wrong here, folks, I don't go into these films expecting
awesome screenplays and deep characters anyway, so I won't bother rating
this film on that unrelated scale. You go to see this kind of movie because
you want to laugh. Did I laugh? Yes, I laughed a-plenty and it eased away,
at least for that sweet moment, some of the pain that continually drips
through my useless existence from the minute I step out of my grungy bed in
the mornings, to the moment I drop the proverbial kleenex in the toilet bowl
at nights (Just kidding! Just wanted to make sure that people are actually
reading my reviews all the way through :). Gotcha! Anyway, back to my
critique. Martin Lawrence is a funny man, and if you don't think he's funny,
do not go see this movie, because besides him, there ain't much else going
on. Consider it a BEVERLY HILLS COP Junior, cloned within 48 HOURS, but
without the over-abundancy of swear words. I also enjoyed it from a child's
perspective, since Lawrence's character was essentially getting away with
everything that I wanted to be as a kid...and kickin' some mighty ass in the
meantime, I must say! All in all, a funny, safe Martin Lawrence vehicle
based on a cute premise.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Actor Martin Lawrence is born in...Frankfurt, Germany!? That's apparently
so. He won the 1987 "Star Search" stand up comic award, and married, and
subsequently divorced, Patricia Southall, a former Miss Virginia. They had
one daughter together. Martin's life has been plagued with many unorthodox
incidents over the past few years. In 1996, he was found waddling aimlessly
through Ventura Blvd., while spouting nothings in the air. He was taken to a
psychiatric hospital. In 1997, he was twice arrested. The first time was for
carrying a loaded gun in a suitcase at the Burbank Airport, and the second
incident occurred outside of a Hollywood nightclub, after police were called
in by a man who claimed that Lawrence had punched him.
Actor Luke Wilson once dated smile-a-lot actress Drew Barrymore for a few
years. Then, they broke up. He also played the character of Billy in the
fake horror movie within a movie, STAB, in SCREAM 2 (7/10). His brother is
Owen Wilson, the goofy dude from THE HAUNTING (4/10), who also happened to
co-write RUSHMORE (8/10) and BOTTLE ROCKET.
David Chappelle's role was originally scripted as a cameo, but the chemistry
between him and Lawrence was so dynamic, that his role was consequently
expanded.
Not that anyone should be too surprised to find this out, but apparently
Martin Lawrence improvised a few of his scenes in this film, despite three
screenwriters having written the script. You go, boyee!
Some of you may remember actor/bad guy in this film Peter Greene from his
role as Zed from PULP FICTION (7.5/10). The cop dude who was f**king the
Ving Rhames character in the derriere, when all hell broke loose. In real
life, Mr. Greene apparently had a bad heroin addiction over the past few
years, which presumably kept him off many major roles on the big screen.
Let's hope that he's cleaned up his act, and keeps up the good, bad guy
work. His birth name is Peter Green.
Screenwriter Steve Carpenter has written and directed a few films in his day
as well. He wrote and directed three horror flicks in the 80s called THE
POWER (1980), THE DORM THAT DRIPPED BLOOD (1981) and THE KINDRED (1986).
Director Les Mayfield is the man responsible for other comedies such as
FLUBBER and ENCINO MAN, his directorial debut.

Title
Review for Ronin (1998)
For more reviews and trivia, go to http://surf.to/joblo
Director John Frankenheimer makes us forget about his last disastrous
outing along the fat, old, powder-faced legend of the acting community,
Marlon Brando (THE ISLAND OF DR.MOREAU (5/10)) and hops right into an
old-fashioned espionage/car chase caper starring the always
interesting, Robert DeNiro.
PLOT:
A band of rogue mercenaries are hired by an unknown employer to recover
a mysterious briefcase in France. Unknown to one another, the group
attempt to reach their goal, while constantly keeping an eye on each
other. Lots of car chases through narrow streets, shoot-outs and
double-crossings pepper this lengthy thriller.
CRITIQUE:
Interesting, thrilling, well directed, yet overlong picture features a
couple of excellent car chases, fun shoot-outs, and solid acting. Think
HEAT (8/10) meets THE FRENCH CONNECTION (6/10) in Paris! This film
didn't pack the deepest story line of all time (chase the briefcase
everybody!), but it did manage to keep me entertained through most of
its lengthy sitting, and even sparked some new life into the standard
car chase scenes. I can't truly say that I understood the finale, but
for some reason, it didn't really bother me either. I was quite
entertained by the film, and didn't really mind the semi-puzzling
ending.
DeNiro was cool as a cat, as per his usual method style, and was graced
with some of the hipper lines in this movie (Did you ever kill a guy?
Deniro's response: "No, but I hurt somebody's feelings once.") The rest
of the cast was also pretty solid, with Skarsgrd standing out from the
pack. The score of the film also set the right atmosphere, as did the
wonderful cinematography, featuring the wonderful splendor of France.
The only negative points that I recognized in this film could be that
its final resolution was a little ambiguous, and that its run-time was
about twenty minutes too long.
Overall, this film will surely appeal to you if you enjoyed the
previously mentioned HEAT or FRENCH CONNECTION, and will definitely not
disappoint any DeNiro or car chase fans. This year has not been a great
year for thrillers, but RONIN makes sure that it is present when all
names are called. Strap yourself in, learn some French, and get ready
for a bumpy ride!!
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Screenwriter Richard Weisz is actually the one and f-kin' only, David
Mamet. Apparently, he is responsible for almost the entire screenplay,
but the Writer's Guild of America decided that he had to share credit
with J.D. Zeik, who originated the story, so Mamet elected to go with
the pseudonym instead.
None of the actors in this film were ever told what was really supposed
to be in the briefcase. The actual contents of the case were really
chocolate bars during the filming of this movie. 
The finished project also left 83 cars "injured" after shooting
wrapped.
Ironically, director Frankenheimer also directed the dismal sequel to
THE FRENCH CONNECTION, called THE FRENCH CONNECTION II. Born in New
York and raised in Queens, John always wanted to become a professional
tennis player.
Robert DeNiro is the son of Robert De Niro Snr, an abstract
expressionist, and Virginia Admiral, a painter. He studied acting at
the Actors Studio with Stella Adler and Lee Strasberg. In his 1980
Oscar acceptance speech, Bobby thanked Joey LaMotta, who was at the
time suing United Artists for RAGING BULL's (7.5/10), portrayal of him.
In 1995, he and his girlfriend Toukie Smith had twin sons, conceived by
in-vitro fecundation.
Jonathan Pryce was one of the stars of DARK BLOOD, along with Judy
Davis and River Phoenix but the movie was never released due to
Phoenix's death during filming in 1993.

Title
Review for For Richer or Poorer (1997)
For more reviews, go to http://surf.to/joblo
TV stars Tim Allen and Kirstie Alley jump into a cinematic comedy about
a rich couple having to deal with the sudden loss of all of their
assets.
PLOT:
Rich, self-absorbed husband and wife team fall into major IRS problems,
when their accountant steals from their funds, and flees the country.
Forced to hide from the government until their lawyer gets things
settled, the duo crash in on an Amish community, and pretend to be
long-lost cousins. Then, the "hilarity" begins.
CRITIQUE:
Uninspired, predictable, and mostly unfunny comedy that joins TRIAL AND
ERROR (4/10) in proving that for some reason, Hollywood executives like
to correlate bad comedies with longer run times (This one clocks in at
a little under two hours.) I never really understood why people in the
Woods of Holly liked to explore the Amish community to such an extent
in film, and this bad movie does little to resolve my unanswerable
query. KINGPIN (8/10) successfully stepped through such a community
last year, but this movie just doesn't gather any comedy or originality
out of this age-old community of people. 
In regards to the actors, Tim Allen doesn't add anything to this
horrible punch, and Alley barely musters any added value, after she
spends the first hour and a half of the film whining about her newfound
situation. Larry Miller is actually pretty funny as the overly
exuberant IRS agent on their tail (He carries a large gun with him at
all times.) But other than him, the film is basically retreading the
old "fish out of water" tale for the umpteenth time, without a whimper
of innovation or entertainment.
The worst part about this movie is that even the lame attempts at
humour are marred by adult content, which disavows any kids from seeing
this dud on video. And to top that off, they decide to pull another
pseudo-case of MY GIANT (6/10) and get semi-serious near the end of the
film (This is where we recognize these people as regular folks like you
and I with hearts.) Not one laugh out loud joke here. Nothing original
to add to anything based in Amish folklore. Actors are very generic in
their roles. Avoid this one at all costs, and please try to recommend
it to those all those people who you deeply despise. 
By the way, if you do happen to rent it by mistake, at least stay tuned
for the outtakes during the end credits. They are actually the only
snickerable things in the whole movie (Not a good sign.) 
Little Known Facts: 
In 1978, Tim Allen spent 28 months in jail after being arrested for
attempted drug dealing. His real name is Timothy Allen Dick. He has
nine brothers and sisters.
Kirstie Alley stands 5"7, and is a member of the Church of Scientology.
She was part of TV's "Cheers" ensemble cast from 1987 to 1993.
Larry Miller's most famous role was as the nice Rodeo Drive salesman to
Julia Roberts in 1990's PRETTY WOMAN (7.5/10).
Director Bryan Spicer's previous attempt at cinematic humour was the
ill-fated MCHALE'S NAVY.

Title
Review for Boiling Point (1993)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
PLOT:
A federal agent apparently reaches his "boiling point" after his partner
gets killed during an undercover job, and vows to find the man who fulfilled
the dirty deed. As it turns out, the man who killed him is just a dimwitted
flunky of a lifetime criminal who just got out of jail and owes the mob
$50,000. The bumbling duo only have one week to get their hands on the
money, while the cop has the same amount of time to nail them. Pretty
exciting, eh?
CRITIQUE:
This film includes some pretty bad acting, little to no action, a "Miami
Vice" leftover script, and Dennis Hopper acting with his red hair. Having
said that, it also features a slick Wesley Snipes acting like a bad-ass
while chomping on a cigar every chance he gets, one of Viggo Mortensen's
earlier and less subdued roles, and an overall decent noirish time if you
happen to catch it on video. It won't make or break your evening, but it
certainly is an easy appetizer to complement any main dish which you might
be contemplating for the rest of the night. Is it all pretty predictable?
Yes. Is it all together boring? Not at all. In fact, despite some sub-par
acting by some of the side-players, you can't help but enjoy Snipes acting
like a tough guy, Seymour Cassel as a money-laundering flake, Hooper letting
his goofy walk do the acting for him, and Viggo the man, giving us a little
of what his hair would do for him in the future. Toss in a throwaway role
for Lolita Davidovich as the happy hooker with the golden heart, so-so
tension and a true-life fate report at the end of the film which lets us
know exactly what happened to all of these semi-interesting characters, and
you've got yourself a mediocre night at the movies. See it if you don't mind
rehashed cop movies featuring some interesting actors, and one of the worst
taglines to a movie...ever! --> "He's a cop who reached the Boiling Point!".
Yech!
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Based on a true story by the novel called "Money Man" written by a man named
Gerald Petievich.

Title
Review for Chicken Run (2000)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
I can't imagine this film not being a major summer success with kids of all
ages. In fact, I can't imagine anyone not liking this movie a whole lot,
girls, guys, kids, teens and adults alike. For Dreamworks, this film could
easily be the start of a major franchise, with plenty of sequels and
merchandising opportunities yet to come. I will also be the first to admit
that the trailer for this film didn't really turn me on, but once this film
got going, I was hooked, line and sinker. The movie is simply cluckolicious
(sorry, but I couldn't go an entire review without using one stupid chicken
pun...it was just too easy).
PLOT:
A bunch of British hens laying eggs in a chicken farm for a living decide
that it's time to escape their inevitable fates. They organize several
attempts of flight from their coops, but none turn out successful. Just
then, an outside American rooster pops into their lives and raises their
hopes of escape.
CRITIQUE:
A cluckin' good time! A wonderful production featuring impeccable clay
animation effects, a witty and original script, an infectious and booming
score, and the cutest l'il chickens you'd ever want to meet. Chicken has
always been my favorite of the "white meats", but after seeing this movie, I
may have to reconsider ever eating chicken again. They're just so cute and
cuddly! Seriously though, the film is a delight on so many different levels.
It's fun to look at, it's loaded with many funny one-liners, it moves along
at a hardy pace, and overall, it just makes you smile and love movies so
much more. It's also short and sweet, which is always welcome in so-called
"children's movies". The audience I was with seemed to love the film even
more than I did, with many of the attendees laughing out loud on several
occasions. I personally enjoyed much of the film's smart humor, but mostly I
just chuckled and smiled a lot. The British hen accents were also a very
cool and pleasant addition, as well as the hip turn by Rocky the Rooster,
perfectly voiced over by none other than mega-star Mel Gibson.
Any major problems with the film? Not really. Perhaps the addition of a
couple of snappy songs might've added to the proceedings, but any film
featuring a boisterous chicken dance sequence as well as an all-out muddy
cockfight, certainly has enough filling on its plate as it is. I also loved
the movie's many prominent homage scenarios, including the film to which
this one derives its most obvious influence, THE GREAT ESCAPE (just replace
the humans in that movie with chickens). There are also a couple of really
cool action sequences, one reminiscent of INDIANA JONES, and the other
bringing to mind the last 20 minutes of TOY STORY 2 (8/10), two films which
certainly aren't chicken feed on their own right. And if you really pay
close attention, you will note a famous shot from THE SHAWSHANK REDEMPTION
done with a chicken standing in the rain here. Pretty funny. I don't like
making predictions either, but this film certainly could be one of the
biggest hits of the summer (a sleeper, some might say), simply because of
its ability to hit many of the tones that people look for in a quality
movie. It's got a great look, a rousing score, plenty of goofs, inside
pranks, emotional scenes, a touch of romance, action, adventure, memorable
characters and just an overall solid feeling of chicken-loving-fun. So drop
the chicken wings, grab the kids, tow the better half along, and prepare
yourself to be entertained for 85 minutes of cluckin' fun!
And who can't love those darn chicken teeth!
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
How meticulous is this kind of movie-making? Picture this: There are 24
frames per second of film time, so depending on the action in a sequence of
film time, it is possible to have 24 separate poses to shoot per character
for every second in a scene, each pose involving the tiniest increment of
movement for body, head, arms, legs, hands, fingers, eyes, mouth, clothing
and more. Multiply that by every character in every scene, adding in the
movement of any props that are also on camera, and you begin to get the
picture.
Directors Peter Lord and Nick Park are the Academy Award-winning team behind
the popular Wallace & Gromit shorts. This film needed a total of 40
animators, split into two teams and guided by the two directors. Peter also
had a hand in creating the innovative "Sledgehammer" music video by Peter
Gabriel.
Julia Sawalha, the voice of the lead hen Ginger in this film, is probably
best known for her starring role on the BBC comedy series "Absolutely
Fabulous".
This film was previously known as C:R-1 (a sign of a sequel perhaps?).

Title
Review for Heartbreakers (2001)
For more reviews and movie wallpapers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
PLOT:
A mom and daughter team work together to con men into loving them, cheating
on them and then paying them upon divorce. But what happens when they
actually fall in love with their potential conquests? Find out when you
watch the movie.
CRITIQUE:
Despite its faults and "video movie" feel, I'd still slightly recommend this
movie because of its enjoyable premise, the two fun performances from Ray
Liotta and Gene Hackman, and the two other fun performances from Jennifer
Love Hewitt's breasts! C'mon everybody, let's all stand up and give those
puppies their rightful due . Okay, now
that I've gotten that out of the way, let's see what else this film had to
offer. Well, to start off with, I liked the whole mother/daughter
relationship between Weaver and Hewitt. I bought it and I liked the back and
forth bickering. I also loved the performance by Gene Hackman, who literally
stole every scene that he was in, as the old guy with a peculiar affection
for anyone who smokes. Very funny! I only wish there were more of him to go
around. Which brings me to my next point. Even though the general premise of
this movie is a good one, the filmmakers here seemed to think that over two
hours of it was required, so the last thirty minutes of the film ends up
feeling a little stretched, as the basic idea gets regurgitated over and
over again. I mean, how many times can the same guy fall for the same con?
There's also the disappearance of a very likeable character, which kind of
took me out of the movie as well.
But for the most part, the flick has enough laughs and funny moments to get
you by. The soundtrack also helps, with an upbeat tempo, and plenty of
sorted cool tunes. And being a fan of Jason Lee personally, it was also nice
to see him paying the rent as the "love interest". In fact, I even bought
most of the romance stuff between him and Jennifer Love. But despite some
stuff working in this movie, some other stuff could've been improved. The
dark nature of the film's premise could've really been milked with some
nasty black comedy, but the filmmakers decided to play the "safe card" with
this one, which is unfortunate because I really think that the extra spice
would have made this film so much better. The length of the film also hurt
its overall potency, and the ordinary nature of the comedy, which was for
the most part, so-so. I did however crack up at a few key scenes, including
one with SNL alumnus Kevin Nealon and some pretty funny lines, like the one
in which Liotta's character is asked whether he can "get rid of a dead body"
and he replies "I'm from Jersey, ain't I?" The film also has a handful of
cameos, including some small parts from Jeffrey Jones, Carrie Fisher and
Anna Bancroft. On the whole, the film is probably good-natured and safe
enough for most people to enjoy, and let's face it, nobody is going for an
Oscar here.
The film has enough laughs, entertaining co-performances from the conned men
and an interesting premise to definitely recommend on video. And as for
those contemplating a nite out at the movies with this one, I'd say to rest
your decision on whether or not you would like to see Hewitt's tremendous
figure on the big screen for two hours+ and whether or not you're just
looking for some flighty downtime. If so, then by all means, grab a box of
kleenex, a box o' nachos, a long raincoat and have a blast! And oh yeah, for
the ladies, we do get an impressive scene with Ray Liotta in his skivvies,
and uhhhh, yeah...the man's a packin'! Broke my heart, I tell ya... : )
Where's JoBlo coming from?
Bedazzled (6/10) - The Crew (5/10) - Deceiver (7/10) - The Grifters (6/10) -
House of Games (7/10) - The Last Seduction (8/10) - The Spanish Prisoner
(9/10) - The War of the Roses (8/10) - Where the Money Is (5/10)
Little Known Facts and this movie and its stars:
Previous possible cast mates for this film included Anjelica Huston & Alicia
Silverstone as well as Cher & Jennifer Aniston. Kevin Kline was originally
wooed for the Ray Liotta's part.
Director David Mirkin has written some stuff himself, including stints on
the popular TV series "The Simpsons" and "Three's Company".
This film was originally titled THE BREAKERS.

Title
Review for Story of Us, The (1999)
For more reviews and screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
WHEN HARRY MET SALLY (10/10) is one of my favorite movies of all-time. This
film comes from the director of that film and features the trials and
tribulations of a married couple after a 15-year run. Some might say that
it's the continuation of WHEN HARRY..., others, like myself, would say that
it's a rough draft of an interesting story featuring some great acting, but
ultimately burdened by too many copycat (And less successful) moments from
the former film (See Little Known Facts).
PLOT:
A married couple, with 15 years and two kids under their belts, suddenly
find themselves caught in a state of indecision on whether or not to
continue their relationship. You see, they have recently come to realize
that their initial love for one another has faded over the years, and that
all they seem to be left with are many differences of opinion. Will they
break up or keep going?
CRITIQUE:
Decent film featuring great performances by Pfeiffer and Willis, an
interesting story about a couple going through some rough waters in the
later years of their marriage, but too many "written" flat jokes by the side
characters, an easy ending and an annoying soundtrack placed this film on an
overall plate of mediocrity for me. Okay, so I am also a little biased
because I thought there were way too many blatant photocopied moments from
the successful WHEN HARRY MET SALLY, but even with that aside, this film
just seemed to dissolve into too many bickering arguments at certain points,
with moments of phony conversations with their "witty" friends just slowing
the whole process down further. I think I would have enjoyed this film so
much more, if it had focused more on the relationship between Willis and
Pfeiffer.
Both actors were at the top of their game in this film with many touching
and funny moments between them and their kids. I thought the flashback
sequences used in the film were effective and useful in driving us closer
into the characters, and appreciated the numerous relationship up-and-down
moments to which many people surely were be able to relate. I did find that
there was a little too much emphasis on the screaming/shouting variety of
scenes, as opposed to more of the lighter moments, but I suppose that was
the whole point of the film, you know, to show the "darker" side of a
marriage. All in all, I think that most people who have been in
relationships should be able to relate to several disagreements from this
film, certainly the core reasons behind the conflicts, if not the actual
circumstances themselves. Ultimately the film didn't blow me away with any
of its rehashed situations, and led me astray with the contrived "witty"
banter of their friends. Dramatically, I would recommend it higher, but the
comedic low-points should keep you away if you're looking for that sort of
escape. Either way, rent WHEN HARRY MET SALLY and thank me in the morning.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Bruce Willis was also going through his own divorce with wife of ten years,
Demi Moore, during the filming of this movie.
Having seen WHEN HARRY MET SALLY over thirty times, it was all too easy for
me to notice the blatant similarities between these two films. Admittedly,
many of these moments may show up in other films as well, but appreciating
the fact that both of these movies were directed by the same man, makes me
wonder if they were coincidences at all. Some might just call it laziness.
Please DO NOT read any further if you do not want to ruin any plot points
for yourself. SPOILERS AHEAD!
Similar scenes between the superior WHEN HARRY MET SALLY and THE STORY OF
US:
1. A scene featuring one of the main stars making a spectacle of themselves
in a restaurant (Willis in this film/Ryan in WHMS).
2. A cute scene featuring a woman wearing a piff helmet (Pfeiffer in this
film/Ryan in WHMS).
3. A meeting of a man and a woman looking for books in a bookstore (Pfeiffer
in this film/Ryan in WHMS).
4. A scene featuring one of the main stars fast-walking with their friend
and discussing their love-life (Pfeiffer in this case/Crystal in WHMS).
5. Both films feature the main couple having best friends who also happen to
be married to one another (Reiner & Wilson in this case/Carrie Fisher &
Bruno Kirby in WHMS).
6. Breakthrough final scene features a reconciliation by the way of one of
the characters breaking down and admitting their love for the other, while
describing all of the little endearing idiosyncrasies in the other's
behavior (Pfeiffer in this one/Crystal in WHMS).
7. Final scene features couple talking directly to the camera about their
future (Pfeiffer & Willis in this film/Ryan and Crystal in WHMS).

Title
Review for Urban Legends: Final Cut (2000)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
The original URBAN LEGEND was not a good movie. It got hacked at the knees
by the critics and clomped over the head at the box-office, with a little
over $38 million in final grosses. So now that the whole "teen slasher"
genre seems to be dissipating, what do you think is the best thing to do for
a studio? Well, it's pretty obvious, no? Release a sequel to a film that
wasn't so good in the first place and hope that its hackneyed plotline could
resurrect the genre!! Yeesh, what are these people thinking...
PLOT:
A bunch of college film students are completing their own movie projects
with the hopes of winning the prestigious Hitchcock award, a prize which
apparently leads directly to the riches of Hollywood. Suddenly, many of them
start dropping like flies, as a mysterious killer begins his swatting. Will
they live to finish their films? Will they ever figure out who the killer
really is? Will Joey Lawrence ever make us forget all about "Blossom"? Find
out below...
CRITIQUE:
A fun opening scene leads to a great opening murder which eventually leads
to one of the stupidest movies of the year. That's right, people.
Stupid...just plain dumb! There were so many cool ways in which this film
could have gone, but for some reason or another, the filmmakers decided to
start off strong and then jump right into yet another pile of heaping teen
slasher absurdity. It's funny because if there was one thing that everyone
agreed on about the first film, it was the fact that the mystery of the
murderer was so ridiculous, so "out there", that it reinforced much of the
idiocy that came before it. Well, apparently nobody from this production
decided to take any lessons away from the first go-around, and seriously
mucked this one up even larger. I get the feeling that these screenwriters
sit around thinking, "Who do you think is the one person which people would
LEAST suspect? Okay, let's go with that then!" Uhhhm, okay that's fine
fellas, but you know that it also has to make a little bit of sense, don't
you? Just a little bit...c'mon...please!!
The sad part is that the first half hour of this movie is actually pretty
good. It has some tense moments, funny moments, an exciting murder sequence
that should gross anybody out, and a decent little premise set in a perfect
place to develop a great story (film sets). Unfortunately for the audience,
that's where the "good" part of the movie ends. About half an hour into the
film, a character just happens to "pop into" the picture and pretty much
designates the exact spot at which the film ricochets into a downward spiral
of implausibility, predictability and just plain stupidity.
It was as if another director suddenly took over from the guy who started.
This second director might've been a fan of soap operas in his day, but
that's another story. And that's when the "idiot moves" begin. Girl being
chased, runs into a forest. Good move. Girl being chased again, runs up a
million steps to get to the roof. Uhhhm, and that's gonna help you...how?
And since when is there nobody, and I mean NOBODY else on a huge campus such
as theirs!? I dare any of you to show me one other student who shows up
anywhere in this film! It's just so sad, so ridiculous and just so stupid.
But don't fault the actors. They all actually do decent jobs with what they
have to work with, especially Jennifer Morrison who gives a solid
performance, and even Joey, oops, Joseph Lawrence who comes out of this one,
unscathed. The problem is the script, the script and the script! Half an
hour in, the plot is shot up like Swiss cheese and even though I was hoping
for some kind of "twist ending" to save it all, all I got was a "twist
ending" so completely out of left field, that it just had me laughing out
loud. In fact, pretty much everyone in the audience was laughing at the last
30 minutes of this film. Not sure if that was the idea, but that's what
happened here and deservedly so. Oh yeah, and the soundtrack was also
non-existent (the teens will love that, Mr. Filmmaker, good move!). I can't
say much more, but there it is. Check out the first half hour, then walk out
and get your money back. Trust me, you'll have seen all that you need to
see.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Joey (Joseph) Lawrence's birth name is Joseph Mignogna Jr.
This is Jennifer Morrison's first lead role in a picture, but she did have a
crucial role in last year's under-appreciated thriller STIR OF ECHOES, in
which she played "Samantha Kozac", the missing girl.
This is director John Ottman's directorial debut, although he has been in
the business for a number of years as a composer and editor. He composed the
music and edited three Bryan Singer movies, THE USUAL SUSPECTS, APT PUPIL
and PUBLIC ACCESS, and was the composer on several other "horror" flicks
including LAKE PLACID, H20 and 1997's SNOW WHITE aka SNOW WHITE: A TALE OF
TERROR. He also edited and composed the music for this film.
There are two specific "inside" references to the original URBAN LEGEND
movie in this film. The first is a scene in which two students are wearing
the exact same parkas as the killer from the first movie. And the second is
a scene which I will not ruin, but it's the last scene of the movie and it
refers directly to the first one as well. That final one is actually pretty
funny, with the Hitchcock music playing in the background, but much like the
rest of the movie, it ultimately goes nowhere.
Hart Bochner, the man who plays professor Solomon in this movie, is also a
director himself. He directed the Zucker brothers' HIGH SCHOOL HIGH, and PCU
back in 1994. He's probably best remembered for his role in the original DIE
HARD movie. He's the bearded horny dude who gets killed early on and loves
his cocaine.

Title
Review for Billy Madison (1995)
For more movie reviews and trivia, visit http://www.joblo.com/
PLOT:
Billy Madison is the spoiled, rich, immature, slacker son of a
multi-millionaire who is about to retire. To prove that he is worthy of
taking over his father's company, Billy must go back to school and pass all
of his classes from 1st to 12th grade. If he doesn't make it, one of his
father's evil henchmen will take over the corporate reins.
CRITIQUE:
Adam Sandler's first starring role is pretty standard Sandler fare with a
touch of weirdness sprinkled throughout. This film is definitely not for
kids, geared more towards adults who love all of Sandler's stupid schticks,
his man-child character, rude behavior and over-the-top acting. I personally
like Sandler's tricks, despite the fact that not all of them work in this
movie. The plot in itself is a farce, and should not be taken seriously by
anyone, unless they are looking to hate this movie. It's a stupid comedy
movie that has been created to make you laugh at the exaggerated behavior by
Adam and his goofy buddies (Chris Farley and Steve Buscemi come through in
their nutty cameos). Unlike his other flicks, this movie takes some very
strange turns in its second half, with Sandler breaking into a musical
number, a person in a Penguin suit floating around, a wrestling character
saving the day and plenty of material to demonstrate the possibility of soft
drugs or heavy liquor being related to the writing of this screenplay :)
Throwaway plot but enough funny "Sandler moments" to satisfy anyone looking
for some strange, cheap laughs.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Sandler's love interest in this film, actress Bridgette Wilson, was Miss
Teen USA in 1990.
Adam Sandler brought some of his buddies from TV's "Saturday Night Live"
along for this one with Chris Farley playing the crazy bus-driver, Robert
Smigel portraying Mr. Oblaski, Tim Herlihy (head writer at SNL) co-writing
the screenplay with Adam and Norm McDonald playing his buddy Frank. Robert
Smigel is known for doing those goofy cartoon sketches on SNL and for being
the lips and voice of Bill Clinton on Conan O'Brien's TV "Late Show".

Title
Review for What's the Worst That Could Happen? (2001)
For more reviews and movie games, visit http://www.joblo.com/
PLOT:
A thief who gets caught breaking into the house of a billionaire =
consequently gets his own ring stolen by the same man whose house he =
broke into. The robber then decides to make it his mission in life to =
get the ring back. Hilarity is supposed to ensue...=20
CRITIQUE:
Here's a movie that's just not very funny, entertaining, interesting or =
original in any way, shape or form. It's definitely not the worst movie =
that I've ever seen, in fact, it's probably not even the worst movie =
that I've seen this year (that honor is still holding firm at HEADS OVER =
HEELS), but it's one of those movies which has you coming out of the =
theatre and wondering why it was ever made in the first place. I mean, =
if it wasn't for the talent associated to the film (and boy, are there =
ever a lot of characters in this flick!), I wouldn't be surprised if =
this movie had gone straight-to-video. There just isn't much going on in =
here. Oh sure, maybe I'm a little jaded because I've seen my share of =
great comedies, but then again, haven't we all? Sure, we have. This one =
just feels like a retread of a retread of an idea that worked in a few =
good movies years ago, crunched through the generic meat-grinder =
numbered "Screenplay 101", packed with clich=E9 after clich=E9, =
ultimately resulting in little more than a couple of chuckles, a =
mediocre story-line and a lot of dead silence. Of course, comedies have =
always been subjective in nature and to be honest, there were quite a =
few people laughing their heads off during my screening (unless they =
were high, of course...yeah, yeah, that's it!), but keep in mind that =
these folks hadn't exactly "paid" to see the movie either. I was =
particularly un-entertained by the obvious setups to many of the "jokes" =
in this movie, like the one that has Lawrence blinking when he told a =
lie (hardy-har-har!) and a sign language translator woman who continued =
to translate certain curse words that DeVito (and then later, Lawrence) =
spurt out. Hahaha. Me crackie uppie.
I don't know, maybe I just wasn't in the "right mood" for this simple =
rehash of a film. The sad part about it all is that it really could have =
been something. Anybody who's seen TIN MEN or WHAT ABOUT BOB? knows that =
comedies based on guys vowing revenge on one another could definitely =
add up to some pretty funny times, but this one just blew it. Lawrence =
doesn't really offer much of his usual hilarity and DeVito seems to =
telegraph his role in while cashing his paycheck at the bank. And =
everybody else, well, they all just came across as obvious "filler" with =
little more to do than to stand around and play along with the goofiness =
happening around them. Granted, Larry Miller is always funny and he's =
probably the only person who comes off "okay" from this movie, but how's =
about getting more than three lines in your next film, Larry...you've =
got talent, dammit! And William Fichtner, a man who completely stole the =
show in 1999's GO, sort of works as an obviously gay detective here, but =
despite his character being fun to look at, not much laughs came from =
him either. Yeah, sure I smirked every now and then, but put me in any =
movie and I'm bound to do that anyway. Sorry fellas, this whole movie =
just felt like it was written over a weekend and shot over a week. A dud =
across the board.
Where's JoBlo coming from?
Big Momma's House (3/10) - Blue Streak (7/10) - Dirty Work (5/10) - =
Ruthless People (7/10) - Tin Men (8/10) - The War of the Roses (8/10) - =
What about Bob? (7/10)

Title
Review for Crazy in Alabama (1999)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Antonio Banderas' directorial debut. Whoop-dee-doo! Melanie Griffith
starring in the role of a wannabee movie actress. Harumph...whatta stretch!
Rod Steiger?!! Yikes! These were all the things going through my head as I
approached the viewing of this film. Admittedly, I was not excited to see
this movie. One of the few films that I see for the sake of my movie
criticism. Having said all that, Banderas' directing was top-notch, Griffith
pulled out one of her better roles in years and Steiger, well Steiger,
you'll have to read on to find out.
PLOT:
Set in the 1960s, a mother of six children murders her husband in cold blood
after 13 years of mistreatment and heads out to Hollywood to take a shot at
the big-time. Meanwhile, her favorite nephew Peejoe is left back home with
some of her secrets and a dilemma, after he sees the local sheriff kill an
innocent black youth.
CRITIQUE:
This film combines various elements from a handful of other films, beginning
with a solo THELMA & LOUISE theme, and actually manages to meche all of the
different situations into a cohesive whole by the way of interesting
characters, a sharp eye and direction from Antonio Banderas and a
captivating performance by Melanie Griffith. Thank God, she actually plays
something other than an airhead bimbo in this one! I also enjoyed the way it
was shot with both stories intercrossing one another all the way through
with overall effectiveness. I think the most credit has to be given to the
director in this case, who was able to juggle the two plot lines with great
aplomb, and bring out solid performances from all of his players. I thought
that both the kid and Melanie stood out in the cast, despite my initial
mixed reaction to his strong accent. Add to that an excellent ensemble of
supporting actors, including the always effective David Morse, the
surprising Meatloaf and the scene-stealing antics of the 'contender's brothe
r, Rod Steiger.
Now when you consider that I wanted nothing to do with this film before
actually seeing it, my recommendation should carry even more weight (At
least to those who care : ). One thing which does worry me about this film,
is the fact that it might never find a real target audience and get lost in
the shuffle of this weekend's five opening films. If so, be sure to catch
this movie on video because it really does offer many telling lessons on
love, persistence and freedom. And even if you're not interested in these
messages, you should at least try to see it because of the extremely
well-handled directorial debut of Antonio Banderas, a strong performance
from his wife, Melanie, and a hilarious supporting role by Rod Steiger, who
takes the ball and runs with it! Not a major motion picture, but definitely
one that ought to be savored as a major surprise.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Antonio Banderas has been married to the star of this film, Melanie
Griffith, since 1996. His full name is Jos Antonio Domnguez Banderas.
Griffith has been married four times in her life, including two separate
occasions to the same man, Miami Vice's Don Johnson. Her first husband,
Steven Bauer, played Al Pacino's good buddy Manny, in 1987's SCARFACE. They
had a kid together named Alexander. The character which Griffith's mom Tippi
Hedren played in Alfred Hitchcock's classic thriller THE BIRDS, was named
Melanie. Her half-sister Tracy Girffith makes a cameo appearance in this
film as well.
Actor/singer Meatloaf's real name is Marvin Lee Aday. He has been married to
the same woman since 1975. Her name is Leslie. Her name is Leslie. Her name
is Leslie. According to director Banderas, three lines into Meat Loaf's
reading of the script, he knew that he was the actor whom he was looking
for.
You might remember the teenage kid in this film, Lucas Black, from his role
as Frank Wheatley, the "kid" from Billy Bob Thorton's SLING BLADE. He claims
to want to be a bass fisherman when he grows older.
Cathy Moriarty made her feature film debut at the age of 18 in Martin
Scorsese's RAGING BULL opposite Robert DeNiro. When not before the camera,
Moriarty can be found in Beverly Hills or Encino working at one of the three
locations of Mulberry Street Pizzeria, which she owns.
Actor David Morse stands 6'5".
This film is based on the novel written by Mark Childress, the same man who
adapted it to the screen for this film.

Title
Review for Play It to the Bone (1999)
For more reviews and movie trailers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Director Ron Shelton apparently likes the sports. He started off strong with
the baseball angle in BULL DURHAM (7.5/10). Followed that one up with an ode
to basketball and buddies in WHITE MEN CAN'T JUMP (7/10). And recently
re-teamed with the star of his first film, Kevin Costner, in the golf
romance TIN CUP (6.5/10). Do you see a ratings pattern here, folks? His most
recent effort, which has to do with boxing, might finally give Mr. Shelton
the blow to the head that he needs to try another genre of filmmaking.
8-9-10...Knockout!
PLOT:
Two washed-up boxing buddies get the chance of a lifetime when a crooked,
obnoxious fight promoter offers them $50,000 apiece to haul ass down to
Vegas in 24 hours and fight each another. The duo accept but only if their
contract stipulates that the winner of the fight will get a real title shot
afterwards.
CRITIQUE:
"Something was missing" was the first thing that crossed my mind as I
ushered my way out of the movie theatre after seeing this movie. Some
elements were there, like the decent buddy-to-buddy repartee, the manly
humor, the woman caught between two men who love her, the ever-present
soundtrack, and yes, even some boxing, but "something" was simply amiss. I
didn't care too much for the characters, I didn't laugh too much at their
jokes, I didn't even care so much as to who ended up with the girl or who
won the boxing match for that matter. In the end, all I was left with was
essentially a "road film" with a little bit of boxing tossed in at the end.
The actors were all good, with Harrelson and Banderas providing some decent
chemistry, Lucy Liu sexing it all up, and Dadidovich, well, okay, I guess
they could have cast someone a little better for her role. She just looked
their mom in some scenes! Oh well. All in all, the film swooped by at an
even pace with just enough interest for me to stay tuned for the big fight.
Unfortunately, the actual moment of truth fizzled in my eyes and the
conclusion of the film just left me feeling indifferent at best.
I don't remember director Shelton ever pulling a symbolic ending over on us
before, but this film, and especially the, what kind only be described as,
"strange" boxing match, left much to be desired. I was looking forward to a
fun, hard-fought, exciting scrap between the two friends, but instead I was
left tickling my brain petals trying to figure out what some of the weird
imagery meant. Also, the fight itself was too repetitive, and way over the
top in respect to one particular aspect (I don't like to ruin actual details
of a film in my reviews, but hopefully you'll get my drift if you see the
movie). Overall, I would most likely recommend this movie as a rental for
sure, but if you are planning to see it on the big screen, I would suggest
it only to those who are huge fans of any of its stars. All boxing fans
should immediately drop their smelling salts and remain seated cause this is
definitely not the big boxing movie that you've all been waiting for.
Seventy percent of the film actually takes place on the road, and the boxing
scenes are just bizarre and monotonous. In the end, the movie made me laugh
hard a couple of times, smile once here and there, and shrug my shoulders
when it was all said and done. And save for one particularly cool movie star
cameo during the final boxing match, even the other celebrity appearances
were simply ho-hum. Rod Stewart?!? C'mon!!
Love it or leave it, the one good thing that we do come away with from this
movie is the realization that one of these two men clearly stands above the
other in at least one respect. And yes, hands down, the shower scene finally
confirms the fact that Woody Harrelson's ass can beat Antonio's any day!!
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Tom Sizemore credits actor Robert DeNiro with turning his life around during
the filming of the 1998 TV program "Witness to the Mob", in which he
portrayed mobster John Gotti (DeNiro executive produced the project). DeNiro
apparently showed up on his doorstep with Tom's mother and told him to
either enter rehabilitation in an Arizona center or he was going to have him
arrested for heroin usage.
Antonia Banderas' full name is Jos Antonio Domnguez Banderas.
Woody Harrelson's full name is Woodrow Tracy Harrelson. Woody provides the
narration voice on the 1999 documentary entitled GRASS. He recently married
his longtime girlfriend, and former assistant, Laura Louie, with whom he has
two daughters. Woody also spends his spare time as the lead singer of the
band Manly Moondog and the Three Kool Hats. He was once married to
playwright Neil Simon's daughter Nancy for one year.
I guess director Ron Shelton must have a "thing" for Lolita Davidovich,
since other than this film and the previously mentioned "sports movies", Ron
has directed two other flicks, BLAZE and COBB, both of which also star
Davidovich. Lolita originally hails from Toronto, Canada.
This film is actually Ron Shelton's second attempt at the "boxing film", the
first that he directed. In 1996, he was co-writer on the film THE GREAT
WHITE HYPE starring Sam Jackson and Peter Berg.
This film was originally titled PLAY IT.

Title
Review for Book of Shadows: Blair Witch 2 (2000)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
I didn't much care for the original BLAIR WITCH PROJECT. On the whole, I
thought it was boring. To me, it felt like a bunch of kids running around in
their wooded backyard scaring one another with a video camera. I was
frightened by only one scene: the final shot. I did however truly admire
what the film did in respect to movie innovation. It was able to blur the
line between fact and fiction for a lot of people, it managed to
successfully wrangle the power of the Internet and use it to complement the
film and it showed Hollywood that you don't need to spend $25 million on a
star's salary alone...in order to make a successful film. With all that in
mind, I was looking forward to seeing what the second installment had to
offer.
Pre-hype wise, I was once again, extremely impressed with Artisan
Entertainment's ability to harness the up-to-date technologies of the
Internet and put together an extremely cool event called the Blair Witch Web
Fest. The webcast was made to take place over three days, with plenty of
relevant horror guests including the stars and director of the film,
musicians, witches, horror alumni and plenty of chats, goodies and games to
keep everyone entertained. Those who were not able to attend in person,
could simply logon and participate in the chats and "become" a greater part
of the cinematic process. Artisan Entertainment seems to be generations
ahead of the rest of the generic cookie-cutter studio official websites, and
should rightfully be applauded for their avant-garde efforts.
Oh yeah...harumph...now that we've gotten that out of the way...how was the
film, you say? Let's see...
PLOT:
Four fans of the original "Blair Witch Project" movie hop on a tour to visit
the actual locations where the first film apparently took place. Led by a
local psychologically disturbed individual, the fun-loving teens drink and
party all night, only to wake up and find themselves unable to remember a
big chunk of their evening past, and caught in the middle of a ritualistic
murder investigation. Are they all cold-blooded killers? Is one of them a
witch and spooking the others? Are they all innocent but nuts? Does Roger
Ebert actually make an appearance in this film? All very scary thoughts...
CRITIQUE:
If you're looking for thrills, chills and plenty of scares...this film is
not for you. This movie is a decent psychological mystery filled with
paranoia and delusions, which messes with your head and demands that you
keep thinking about it, even after you've left the theatre. Not necessarily
an audience-friendly film, but then again, neither was the original. My
initial reaction to this film was lukewarm. It wasn't until further
contemplation that the film struck a chord with me and eventually
ingratiated itself the tag of a "good" movie. But if the boogie-man a la
SCREAM is what you're looking for, you will not find it here. If you're
looking for something similar to the first film, you will not get that here
either. This film is original in its own right, with all of the characters
making reference and working off the events which "apparently" took place in
the first film. They speak about the characters, they follow in their
footsteps, and they too, eventually get caught up in something that's
apparently beyond their simple teen grasps. But is all of this entertaining,
thrilling or even interesting? To some, yes...to others, no.
I enjoyed parts of this film, and didn't care much for others. I liked the
way that the whole movie was shot. Nice style. Good directing. Perhaps too
many flashbacks for its own good, but enough spooky moments to make you
question the events taking place and get into the mystery of it all. But at
some point, a lot of the film's events felt redundant, like they were going
around in circles. Everyone confused, everyone pointing fingers, who did
what to whom? But it isn't until you figure out the truth in the end, that
all of that disorder begins to make a little sense. I won't say any more
because I wouldn't want to spoil it for anyone, but suffice it to say that
"seeing is not always believing". Unfortunately for the audience, the film
doesn't really offer up too many clues during the actual picture or graft
out any real solutions, but for those who enjoy the head trips, watch your
step on the way in and enjoy.
I think that the core Blair Witch audience might appreciate this movie, or
those who don't mind sitting through the same film over and over again, just
to uncover its secrets. For most, the film will provide no obvious scares
(cheap or otherwise) or miraculous strokes of terror. But this film is not
about that. It's all about undertones and your interpretation of the events
taking place. Perception, interpretation, reality...all play different roles
in this movie. It's up to you to figure out who is playing who. Not exactly
what John Q. Public generally looks for in a movie, eh? But even beyond all
that, this film managed to keep me interested for most of its way, provided
for a couple of spooky scenes, and did finally manage to re-insert T&A back
into horror films, so even your average moviegoer has to give it at least
that much! The actors were so-so, with decent performances here and there,
over-acting there and here, and the soundtrack, appropriately heavy, creepy
and hip (gotta sell those soundtracks!).
So if you like head-games, enjoy all that supernatural witch mumbo-jumbo and
appreciate films which blur the line between the reality of your mind and
the actual events (think OJ, people!), then you might just really enjoy this
one. A LOST HIGHWAY for the teens. Not a classic, not a bad movie, not a
great movie...but definitely something interesting. PS: Incidentally, don't
ask me what "Book of Shadows" means because that's another thing that the
film doesn't hand you on a platter. You gotta work for this one, people.
NOTE: My appreciation of this film was lifted after I read a bit more about
it after my viewing. Now if you are confused about the film, its characters
or what really happened, and want to achieve a deeper understanding of the
material, I suggest you read some of what the director of this film had to
say here ,">http://joblo.com/blairwitch2-extra.htm>, but please note that it
does contain possible ** SPOILERS **. I would suggest that you read it only
after having seen the film.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Original drafts for this movie included one which had news crews tracking
the original kids and another featuring Heather Donahue's relatives
searching for her remains. But when first-time fiction director Joe
Berlinger got the directing nod (his previous work included three critically
acclaimed documentaries), he scrapped all that aside in favor of a more
radical approach. "I wanted to make a sequel to the phenomenon, not to the
movie."
Berlinger admits that his original cut of the film left the studio asking
him to "deliver scares earlier". Re-shoots took place up to a month before
release, and the director admitted that he was "not entirely happy with how
it was integrated into the movie". Berlinger went on to say, "If we weren't
up against a release date I would have tried to figure out a [better] way.
But all those posters say "October 27", not "Coming this fall".
(Entertainment Weekly, #564, pgs 30-32)
Writer/director Joe Berlinger has also given himself a cameo in this film.
He plays the "Burkittsville Tourist #1" early on in the film.
The creators of the original BLAIR WITCH PROJECT, Daniel Myrick and Eduardo
Sanchez, did not write, direct or produce this film, but did receive credit
as "executive producers". They are however, slated to collaborate on the
third installment of the "Blair Witch" series (currently envisioned as a
prequel).
The original BLAIR WITCH movie cost $30,000 to produce, cost Artisan
Entertainment $1 million to purchase and grossed $141 million domestically
and more than $109 million overseas. This film cost $15 million.
Several famous TV personalities are shown early on in this film, mentioning
the original BLAIR WITCH PROJECT on their respective programs, including Jay
Leno, Conan O'Brien and film critic Roger Ebert.

Title
Review for Joe Dirt (2001)
For more reviews and movie wallpapers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
PLOT:
L'il Joey Dirt loses his parents at the Grand Canyon at the age of eight and
spends the next ten years of his life looking for them. During his grand
journey across the United States, Joe meets plenty of kooky characters, some
of whom just put him down and others who help him along the way.
CRITIQUE:
This movie is not what you'd expect. I went in looking for a short,
disposable film with lots of redneck and gross-out humor, but came out with
a long story, laced with a surprising amount of dramatic moments, little
laughs and a sweet side. And even though the film itself doesn't really come
through in the comedy department, I would still slightly recommend it on
video, since it does offer a cute FORREST GUMP-ish story, a truckload of
cameos and a couple of laugh-out loud scenes. But what the hell were they
thinking when they made this movie? I mean, it's got Adam Sandler and David
Spade's names all over it, the trailer features the four or five major
idiotic sequences from the film, but it's really just a slow-paced dramedy
about a kid who gets abandoned by his parents, with spurts of Farrelly
humor, which ultimately end up feeling out of place. Now I'm not suggesting
that they'd have tried to make an all-out drama out of this, but why not
sell it more as a cute comedy with some soft touches, rather than your
typical Sandleresque movie, since the latter will only leave people
disappointed in the end.
I actually stopped waiting for the laughs about halfway through this film
and tried to enjoy it as it was. With its wicked soundtrack packed with cool
tunes, fun cameos like Kid Rock showing off his acting chops and Christopher
Walken, once again, bringing the house down with yet another excellent
comedic performance. Now how's about giving this guy his own comedy
already?!? He's hilarious!! I will also admit to actually starting to care
for the Joe Dirt character, which is something I really didn't expect to do,
but with most of Spade's characteristic wise-cracks left behind him for a
change, it was nice to see him play someone with a heart. Of course, the
bevy of beauties gracing the screen throughout also didn't hurt the film
any, but someone please explain to me how these TOTAL babes always end up
going for Spade's goofy characters?? (see LOST & FOUND) Oh well, I guess
that's Hollywood! Anyway, the bottom line is that this flick doesn't come
through in the laughs department (save for a few rare moments), goes on for
way too long, but does offer some bitchin' tunes, a sweet story and a
character that is ultimately likeable, in that sorry-ass kind of way. See it
on video if you're looking for a few laughs and a cute story, but don't go
out of your way to get it, since it ain't really all that good.
Where's JoBlo coming from?
Billy Madison (7/10) - Deuce Bigalow (7/10) - The Ladies Man (6/10) - Lost &
Found (4/10) - The Ringmaster (2/10) - There's Something About Mary (7/10) -
The Waterboy (4/10)

Title
Review for Exit Wounds (2001)
For more reviews and movie wallpapers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
PLOT:
A "Dirty Harry" type cop, who kicks ass in his job, but apparently doesn't
play by the rules, gets demoted to a rough part of town. Soon enough, the
detective partners with a rookie cop and stumbles across a drug traffic
ring. The next thing you know, they're both neck up in police corruption,
car chases, explosions, rat-tat-tats and Steven Seagal's bigass chin!
CRITIQUE:
Not bad, not bad at all. Surprisingly competent despite its many
contrivances, this film is officially my first guilty pleasure of the year!
And what does that mean? That means that as long as you don't take this film
too seriously, and basically take it for what it is, which is a typical
action flick with comic relief spread throughout, you will more than likely
be quite entertained by it all. And to top it all off, this movie is not a
Steven Seagal movie at all! In fact, even though his tubby face is on the
poster and his name above the credits, this film has a multitude of
characters, all of which add a little spice to the film's very basic
ingredients. Yeah, sure the movie has its over-the-top moments, like the
typical unappreciative head of the police demoting Seagal because he's a cop
who doesn't play by the rules (even though he saved the vice-president's
life!). And its just "plain stupid" scenes, like when DMX walks into a car
dealership, tosses the guy a bag full of cash and drives out with a car in
less than three minutes (no paperwork...nothing!). But for me, a few of
these goofy scenarios didn't spoil the overall fun that I had watching this
movie. And trust me...I was as surprised as anyone!! I don't particularly
like Steven Seagal, the man or the actor, and never thought twice about any
of his movies, but this flick thankfully doesn't focus on him, and that's a
definite plus.
DMX is the real show-stopper here, giving us plenty of on-screen charisma,
some kick-ass moves and even a healthy dose of acting shop 101. You go,
boy!! The rest of the cast also helped take the emphasis off ol' chubface,
and added some much needed humor into the mix as well, as both Tom Arnold
and Anthony Anderson took the reigns and rode 'em whole in here. And
speaking of those two, do not leave your seat at the end of the movie if you
liked what they did in the flick, because there is another really humorous
session between the two of them during the closing credits, that just put
the icing on this fluffy cake. So what's good about the movie? Well, it's
got lotsa gunplay, some wicked shots from the director, an actual story with
surprises, despite its basic plot line of "crooked cops" which we've seen a
thousand times, adrenalized action sequences, car chases and explosions and
even some T&A (for the kids...hehe). The negatives include Seagal's acting
talent, the obvious dummies and stunt people used in some of the sequences
(geeeez, are we really supposed to believe that Seagal could even ride a
motorcycle, no less, do the things done in this movie?), the somewhat
preposterous denouement once everything is out in the open, and oh, did I
mention Seagal?
Anyway, I think the people who go into this movie expecting to see some
solid action, a few laughs and an overall forgettable story, will likely be
quite entertained by it all. If you're looking to nail Seagal on his "same
ol', same ol" character and the basic generic tone of the movie, then you
could do that, too. But for me, I decided to take it as it came and I
honestly can't say that the film wasn't an enjoyable one, despite its many
faults. So take off that mask of cynicism and enjoy this movie for what it
is...a fun, good ol' guilty pleasure of guns, explosions and Steven Seagal
doing things with his body that we all know he can't really do without his
faithful stuntmen by his side! No substance here, folks...just good ol'
fashioned "guy stuff"!
Where's JoBlo coming from?
The Corruptor (7/10) - Mission Impossible 2 (7/10) - Payback (8/10) - The
Replacement Killers (6/10) - Romeo Must Die (3/10) - Ronin (8/10) - Shaft
(7/10) - Traffic (8/10)

Title
Review for Girlfight (2000)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
The Sundance Film Festival is known for the showcasing of smaller,
independent, character-driven films. Earlier this year, two movies shared
the top honor at the festival: YOU CAN COUNT ON ME and GIRLFIGHT. And while
I liked the former film much better than this one, I can say that both films
certainly do exemplify the qualifications needed to succeed at that
festival. They are both small, they are both quite independent (obviously
so) and they are both very character driven, something rarely found in the
blockbusters coming out of the Woods of Holly nowadays. Don't expect
wham-bam, and you should be okay.
PLOT:
An aggressive young girl without much hope in her future enrolls herself
into a local boxing club without her father's knowledge. She steals some
money from him to take the courses and improves her techniques as time goes
by. Eventually, she meets a young boy interested in the sport and in her,
and gets the opportunity to participate in some amateur fights versus boys.
CRITIQUE:
An okay film weighed down in cliches but more than made up for by its very
real characters and the charismatic performance turned in by its star,
Michelle Rodriguez. In fact, it was Rodriguez's early scenes that drew me
into this film right away and kept me going for quite some time.
Unfortunately, the film itself eventually dragged a little for me, with a
longer than needed runtime and an emotional entanglement which wasn't as
interesting to me as the "fight" being put forth by the lead character. And
despite its independent and grungy look, which actually made the film more
believable and appealing, I was distracted by several over-directed scenes,
in which there seemed to be too much emphasis placed on the camera and its
telling of the story. What's the old saying? "If you notice the directing,
than the director is not doing a good job?" Well, in this case, the film,
and the directing for that matter, certainly weren't bad, but the film as a
whole just didn't pull me into its mission as I hoped it would early on. The
characters were all very real, as were the situations and people surrounding
them, and the whole premise of a girl going through the training and
striving towards that unreachable goal was cool, but not as intense as I
expected.
I guess my biggest problem with the film would have to be its lack of
tightness. If the film would have been snipped a little here and there,
tucked and mucked, I think it would have made more of an impact. As it
stands, the film certainly does have its qualities, with the top of that
list belonging to the powerful performance set forth by Michelle Rodriguez,
whose gaze alone scared the crap out of me. You go, girl! Hopefully,
somebody somewhere will give her an award for an exemplary performance and
undeniable screen presence. The rest of the cast was also good, especially
Jaime Tirelli as the trainer, believable throughout, and Paul Calderon as
the washed-up dad, whose interesting dynamic with his daughter didn't really
conclude with the end of the picture. In fact, if you don't like
"open-ended" finishes, you might want to pass on this one.
The film does not have a clean-cut ending, but under the circumstances, I
personally didn't mind. All in all, the film should definitely appeal to the
equal opportunist in all of us, and I for one can certainly do with more
movies with females in the lead, especially after this sad sack of a movie
year! There is also a lot of ROCKY appeal to this film, the down-and-out
loser going for the gold with everyone against her but the audience. So if
you're feeling down on yourself, not recognizing any optimism in your own
future...see this film and maybe Diana's strong will to succeed will rub off
on you! Either way, you will definitely see a film filled with real
characters living real life situations NOT topped off by rose petals :)
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
And if you're wondering what the star of this film, Michelle Rodriguez has
done before this film, well...nothing! She apparently answered an open call
for the lead role and was about the 300th girl to test for the part. It was
her first speaking role in a movie and she had never boxed before this film
either. But she does have two other projects coming out next year
respectively entitled REDLINE starring Vin Diesel and 3 A.M. starring Pam
Grier and Danny Glover.
Besides tying for the top honors at this year's Sundance Film Festival,
GIRLFIGHT also won top prize at France's Deauville Film Festival, which
highlights American independent films.
Writer-director John Sayles executive produced this film and also shows up
in a small cameo as Diana's science teacher.

Title
Review for Ever After (1998)
For more reviews and movie trivia, visit http://www.joblo.com/
PLOT:
A retelling of the classic Cinderella fable, has a sweet, innocent 8-year
girl who loves her father dearly, turn into a servant for her stepmother,
after her father passes away unexpectedly. After 10 years of waiting on her
demanding stepmom and her stepsisters, the girl is wooed by the bachelor
prince, who believes her to be a courtier, and falls for her ability to say
what is on her mind, and her lack of manipulative tactics.
CRITIQUE:
Interesting, well-told, beautifully photographed version of the classic
tale, features many new, fun twists, and solid performances by the entire
cast, especially Drew Barrymore in the lead role of Danielle. This movie is
sure to strike a chord with girls around the world, who might be able to
identify with the lead character's conviction, truth and love. They might
also appreciate the whole "white knight in shining armor" scenario, with the
higher-brow prince falling for the lower-brow servant. Anjelica Huston plays
another wicked character flawlessly, as this film actually allows her
character to show some humanity, as well as one of the stepsisters, who is
essentially, very understanding to Cinderella's plight. Having said that,
the movie didn't blow my mind, was quite predictable considering its source
material, and did have a weak link in the prince character, who didn't quite
bowl me over. All in all, this film will be appreciated much more by girls,
but entertaining enough for all, with great cinematography, a solid lead,
and an interesting and timely story line.


Title
Review for Deep End of the Ocean, The (1999)
For more reviews and movie trivia, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Based on the best-selling novel of the same name, this film recreates a
nightmarish situation to which all parents could identify: the sudden
disappearance of a child. Michelle Pfeiffer takes on the role of the
absent-minded mom who loses the boy, while Treat Williams portrays the
steadfast and patient husband.
PLOT:
Regular family of mom, dad and three kids. Mom takes trip with kids, and
leaves her two sons alone in a hotel lobby for a few minutes. When she
returns, the younger boy has disappeared. They try to find him but to no
avail. Nine years later, the boy unknowingly shows up at her front porch
soliciting a lawn-mowing gig. His fingerprints are a match. Now, they must
survive his return and their ongoing struggles to cope with their divergent
feelings.
CRITIQUE:
Take a TV movie of the week, add two dashes of a solid actress via Michelle
Pfeiffer, an interesting, if not mostly given away by its own trailer,
storyline, some hugs, some tears, and you've got yourself a film whose title
still doesn't fully make much sense to me. Now despite me knowing exactly
what was going to happen up until the halfway point of this movie, this film
conquered the impossible, and still managed not to bore me too much. It did
however lack the overall emotional authenticity for me to qualify it as a
solid all-out dramatic piece of filmmaking. The acting was also a
half-and-halfer with Pfeiffer pulling off an excellent mom going through all
the obvious stages of grief and guilt-syndrome, while others like Whoopie
Goldberg stuck out like a sore thumb (That's right, she plays Whoopie
again!).
I also found the missing kid to be lacking much of the conviction needed for
his complex role. His character always seemed indifferent and emotionless,
and whether or not that was the actor's fault or that of the screenwriter, I
didn't quite find his full-circle plight all that believable. Having said
that, Jonathan Jackson playing the older brother was super in his role, and
Treat Williams, well, Treat Williams continues his artistic trek to restore
some much-needed legitimacy to his acting career. Mrs. JoBlo enjoyed this
film much more than I did, but I suppose that was to be quite expected,
considering the subject matter of the picture. All in all, I didn't think it
was a bad movie, but did wonder about its need for giant screen
presentation. The TV tube and a Sunday night would have been fine. All in
all, it is Pfeiffer and Jackson that give this movie some worth, with the
story never running into major boring moments (or any exciting ones for that
matter), and qualifying this movie as a worthy candidate for a video rental.
You might even want to check it out in the theatres, if you've been feeling
sensitive of late, and want a good cry. That, or if you're really intrigued
by its premise.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
The novel on which this film is based was endorsed by Oprah Winfrey's
wonderful Book Club. In fact, it was the first book picked by the super-rich
talk-show queen back in September of 1996.
MORE COMING SOON...

Title
Review for Husbands and Wives (1992)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
PLOT:
Interlocking stories of two married couples as they go through some tough
times during their long-term marriages. This film combines a
faux-documentary to its narrative seamlessly, offering us a further glimpse
into the thoughts and feelings of the parties involved.
CRITIQUE:
Thinking of getting married? Think again, and watch this movie with your
loved one. It's sure to get you talking for days. This film isn't only for
those getting married either, the feelings, situations and conclusions
brought up in this film, can be appreciated by anyone who's ever been in a
relationship. They are the questions and thoughts that cross all of our
minds. And despite Woody Allen's blatant cynicism towards the subject (See
Little Known Facts below for all the dirty details), this film does offer
many varying opinions on the subjects of love, fidelity, trust,
companionship, lust, and ultimately, marriage.
The performances in this film are top-notch with Judy Davis and Sydney
Pollack tearing up the screen with reality, and Woody and Mia eerily
wandering through, what probably was, real conversations which they were
having in their own relationship together at that time. Liam Neeson was
another knockout performer, and the writing by Allen was simply inspired. I
could watch this film over and over again, and always laugh or notice
something new that I missed the times before. I also loved the documentary
style of this movie (Some people were really annoyed by the handheld camera,
but not me), but certainly could've done without Juliette Lewis' presence
(Her scenes seemed to go on a little too long, if you ask me, but hey,
Woody's a genius, so what the hell do I know? :)).
All in all, this film is geared towards anyone who's had a loving
relationship and thought about whether or not that person is the right
person with whom they would like to spend the rest of their lives. It's fun
to watch, interesting to hear, and revelatory to discuss.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Actress Mia Farrow and Woody Allen lived together for a lot of years, and
had three children, two of whom were adopted. In 1992, Mia found nude
pictures of her adopted daughter Soon-Yi, a College student at the time, in
Woody's things. It was revealed later that Woody and Soon-Yi had been having
an affair together. Mia broke up with the perv, and filed sexual abuse
charges against him and their other kids. The charges were never proven to
be true, and Woody eventually married his "stepdaughter", Soon-Yi Previn, in
1997. NOW watch the movie again, and see if you can pick out the umpteen
references that you could make in regards to "art imitating life, or life
imitating art". Scary, eh?
Emily Lloyd was originally cast as Rain, and had actually filmed some scenes
when she was replaced with Juliette Lewis.
Director/writer Nora Ephron shows up as a "dinner party guest" in this film.
She was also a "wedding guest" in Allen's 1989 pic, CRIMES AND MISDEMEANORS.
This film garnered two Oscar nominations in 1993. One for Supporting
Actress, in the way of Judy Davis, and another for Best Original Screenplay
presented to Woody Allen. Neither of them won.
Woody Allen's full name is Allan Stewart Konigsberg. Mia Farrow's full name
is Maria de Lourdes Villiers Farrow. By 1994, she had 13 children, 9 of whom
were adopted. Six came from her previous marriage to Andre Previn, 3 of whom
were adopted, and 3 from her time with Woody Allen, 2 of whom were adopted.
She was also married to ol' blue eyes himself, Frank Sinatra, for about two
years back in the late 1960's.

Title
Review for Deep Blue Sea (1999)
For more movie reviews and trivia, visit http://www.joblo.com/
There was a time when films like JAWS and THE SHINING (9/10) scared the
beejesus out of us. Nowadays, special effects have taken over the movie
industry and Hollyland expects us to be thrilled by computer-generated
houses and sharks. THE HAUNTING (4/10) failed miserably at this task, DEEP
BLUE SEA on the other hand, chewed right into it and bit off my thumb up!
PLOT:
A team of research scientists genetically toy with sharks in order to find a
cure for the human disorder of Alzheimer. When things go awry, the sharks
get smarter, angrier and stronger. They also want to chew up those damn
humans!
CRITIQUE:
In my mind, the definition of a "fun summer popcorn flick" has something to
do with turning off your brain at the door, enjoying the thrills and chills
of a preposterous yet interesting situation, laughing, biting your
fingernails, and having a blast, whilst digging into your preferred snack de
la jour (Nachos, cheese and salsa for me, thank you very much). If you go
into this movie expecting to find the answers to genetic testing on animals
and its ability to cure human diseases, you will be highly disappointed. If,
on the other hand, you are going into this film expecting to find some
cool-looking sharks chewing on human bodies, one-liners galore, over-the-top
situations which hold you in bated breath, and a motley cast of diverse
characters just waiting to be ripped to bits by these mutated sharks...then
this puppy is definitely the summer movie for you! Think...JAWS on speed.
Unlike THE HAUNTING (4/10), this summer film doesn't rely solely on its
special effects to do the trick. It adds interesting and entertaining
characters, a plausible plot, some nice style, a heart-pounding score and
even some genre-bending surprises here and there. I personally would have
liked to have seen more of those rapid-fire sharks crunching into folk, but
hey, I'm just a guy munching on nachos down here. The plot also doesn't take
long to get going, and once it does, you could expect all kinds of crazy
shark action. The story is obviously not rich in breadth, with a simple
"shark angry-let's get away from the shark" explanation covering the rest of
the film, but director Renny Harlin makes sure that we all have a blast in
the meantime. Actor-wise, it is LL Cool J who steals the show with his
one-liners, with the "Sam Jackson scene" being the most memorable, and the
shark wrangler dude, Thomas Jane, also pulling in a fine performance. If you
can't stomach scenes featuring humans being chewed up by large sharks, well
guess what, stay away from this movie! But if you're looking for mindless
entertainment, with a diverse cast, fun thrills and some super cool sharks,
sharpen your fins and get your ass on over to your nearest multiplex, and
prepare to dive right into this deep blue sea of blood (Okay, okay...no more
puns!).
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
The "L" in Samuel L. Jackson's name stands for Leroy. Sam was an admitted
drug user until he completed drug rehab two weeks before playing a drug
addict in Spike Lee's JUNGLE FEVER. Some may remember him as Stacks Edwards
from Martin Scorsese's 1990 mob flick GOODFELLAS (10/10). He also played the
character of "Black Guy" in the 1989 Al Pacino thriller SEA OF LOVE
(7.5/10). His city of birth is Washington, D.C.
Director Renny Harlin's birth name is Lauri Mauritz Harjola. He was born in
Finland. He stands 6'4" and was married to tall actress Geena Davis for
about four years.
Thomas Jane's (The Shark Wrangler) mom is an antiques dealer and his dad is
a biogenetic-engineer. He has five younger siblings.
In the "wink or you'll miss it category", note that director Renny Harlin
can be seen leaving the seaport facilities with the rest of some folks near
the beginning of the movie. Guess he didn't want to stick around for any of
the carnage, eh?
This film was originally titled TIME OUT.
The first scene of this film could easily be interpreted as an homage to the
JAWS films.

Title
Review for South Park: Bigger, Longer and Uncut (1999)
For more movie reviews and screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
WARNING: If you are easily offended by such things as poop jokes, fart
jokes, puke jokes, racism, sexism, anti-Semitism, homophobia, xenophobia,
kids swearing like drunken sailors at a whorehouse, real-looking dildos,
nudity, cartoon sex, violence, blood and gore, Saddam Hussein and Satan
doing the nasty, and most of all, musical numbers...then this film just
ain't your bag! Oh, and by the way, this is NOT for kids :)
PLOT:
The gang from South Park attempt to save two Canadian foul-mouthed comedians
who are set to be executed by the United States of America, after its
declaration of war on Canada. Unbeknownst to everyone except for the kids
(Their dead friend Kenny returned as a ghost to tell them this bit of news),
the successful execution will lead to the rise of Satan and Saddam Hussein
from hell, and to their domination of the world. Simple enough?
CRITIQUE:
This movie is rude, crude, racist, sexist, homophobic, cheesily animated,
and pretty much offensive in every which way that you could possibly
imagine...it's also fuckin' hilarious!!! Before I saw this film, I had never
really sat through an entire episode of the "South Park" TV show. Not
because I didn't want to or anything, I just don't watch a lot of
television. Now as much as this film is probably geared more towards the
true fans of the show, I was still able to enjoy all of its disgusting,
over-the-edge, offensive-to-everyone, humor. This movie is definitely made
for people who are NOT tied to any politically correct soapbox. In fact,
that was the one thing that I really dug about this comedy more than any of
the other THERE'S SOMETHING ABOUT MARY-type films that have been cropping up
of late. It didn't ease up near the end, or pretend to be emotional at any
point, or apologize for anything that it stood for. It was nasty, raunchy,
and just plain ol' American-Joe funny to me. No holds barred!
Being Canadian myself, I must say that I was probably a little biased by the
hilarious depiction of our country and its circumstances within the story.
"Canada...kill them before they kill us!", read one T-shirt in the movie.
Pretty funny. There were also a lot of "smaller jokes" which may slip you by
if you're not paying close attention (Listen closely near the end, when one
of the African-American soldiers sounds peculiarly like one Jar-Jar
character from THE PHANTOM MENACE...nice touch, guys!). The one thing that
might've been improved on in this film, is the matter of musical numbers
that scattered its length. Most of them were pretty funny, but they didn't
need to have every single character break out in song at some point of the
movie. Then again, it was a small price to pay for an overall enjoyable time
at the theatre of movies. Just make sure that you leave your "thinking cap"
home for this one, switch off all of your politically correct electrodes,
and get ready to be entertained by a bunch of immature kids with filthy
mouths, fucked-up thoughts and the balls to pull it all off. Of course I am
speaking of the two men behind this raunchy production: Trey Parker and Matt
Stone.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Director/producer/writer Trey Parker's real name is Randolph Parker III. He
and friend Matt Stone have been slated to write the prequel to the movie
DUMB AND DUMBER (7.5/10) (Current working title is DUMB AND DUMBER: THE
EARLY YEARS). They're also in a band called DVDA. Matt is the drummer. The
band's name comes from the term Double Vaginal, Double Anal, which is
supposed to be the highest paying performance given by an actress in a porn
flick. Up until now, DVDA has produced three original songs, "I Am
Chewbacca", "Fuck That Guy From Bush", and "Now You're A Man", which is
included on the ORGAZMO film soundtrack. A film written and directed by Trey
Parker.
Some celebrity cameo voices in this film include George Clooney as the
doctor, Minnie Driver as Brooke Shields, Eric Idle as the scientist, and
Mike Judge.
Word on the street is that despite the title of this film, Matt Stone and
Trey Parker were forced by the MPAA to cut about 2 minutes of footage from
this film to bring it out of the NC-17 range and into an R rating. I guess
they're "almost" as nasty as they wanted to be. We'll have to wait for DVD
for the other stuff.

Title
Review for American Beauty (1999)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
I've been accused of not appreciating the "deeper" and "romantic" films by
some in my circle (Okay, so I didn't love SHAKESPEARE IN LOVE...shoot me!),
but if this week is any indication, JoBlo is finally starting to go soft.
First of all, I actually enjoyed and choked back a few wet ones during Kevin
Costner's FOR LOVE OF THE GAME (7.5/10). And then, as if that wasn't enough,
I rate this commercial art-house adult dramedy as a very good movie?
Something must be wrong. Not really. In fact...everything is just beautiful!
:)
PLOT:
A husband bored with his life and family suddenly wakes up and smells the
coffee when he "falls for" one of his daughter's slutty teenage friends. A
wife, bent on succeeding in her career, drinks a lot and "falls for" the
town's biggest real-estate hotshot. A daughter, feeling awkward and freaky,
"falls for" a bizarre neighbor kid who likes to videotape almost everything
he sees (So that he could remember it!). In the end, will any of them really
"fall" or find exactly what they are looking for?
CRITIQUE:
If you are the type of person who appreciates every minute of your life,
then you may just enjoy this film to its fullest potential. If you are the
type of person who doesn't appreciate every minute of your life or the
people around you, then you may just need to see this film, and learn to
appreciate its full potential.
This film is original in story, interesting in premise, acted sharply by its
well-rounded cast, directed in a manner made all the more absorbing, and
edgy and humorous enough to keep me going, despite some pseudo-existential
stuff floating around from time to time. Before I go on any further, let it
be said that an actor by the name of Kevin Spacey rocks! Okay, now that I
got that off my chest, let's go on. Many are comparing this film to the
highly praised 1997 film ICE STORM (6/10), but despite some general
similarities, I found the latter film to have very little surface and too
much esoteric depth, while this one delivers a fresh, livelier outlook on
its subjects, despite their obvious miseries.
Don't get me wrong, there were some moments in this film when I did find
myself rolling a little of the eyes, especially when it concerned scenes
between the weird (A little too strange for my taste) neighbor kid, and the
daughter. But whenever Spacey took center stage, man stand back, cause that
bastard sucked me right back into the thick of things! Having said that,
this film is definitely an "adult" film to be savored by people who are in
touch with themselves and appreciate a frank, sometimes brutally honest,
look at their pathetic and drab existence. I personally enjoyed the strong
performances by the cast, especially Spacey and the friend of his daughter
(And yes, I wanted to nail her also!), the finale, which seemed like it was
going one way but then kept curving back every now and again, and the dark
humor, which filled many of the scenes. Certainly an overly valiant effort
from first time director Sam Mendes, who seems to have a solid grasp on the
pulse of characters going through varied difficulties in their lives.
Admittedly, I went into this film with mucho expectations, so don't take my
nitpicking too seriously. Check it out for yourself and see how you feel. It
may just help you appreciate certain aspects of your life much better. Just
look closer... (Sorry, but I had to!).
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Actor Kevin Spacey was rumored to be gay for many years, until he recently
came out and said that he wasn't (Take you time there, buddy!). His full
name is Kevin Spacey Fowler, and he was born in New Jersey. Spacey is his
mother's maiden name. Kevin's sole directorial gig to this point has been
1996's ALBINO ALLIGATOR.
This is the 14th film in which Annette Bening has participated. Nobody would
remember this, but she actually played a character named "Vicky" in a 1987
episode of "Miami Vice". She has been married to the man with the golden
dick, Warren Beatty, since 1992, and the are currently expecting their 4th
child together!
This won't be much of a "little known fact" after the release of this film,
but teen actress Thora Birch has got a great set of knockers! Wow. She also
played the character of Sally Ryan, daughter of Jack Ryan, in PATRIOT GAMES
and CLEAR AND PRESENT DANGER.
Many of you hot-blooded teens will remember lovely actress Mena Suvari from
this summer's big teen horn-fest, AMERICAN PIE (7/10). She played the nice,
innocent girl. What a stretch from her role in this one! Her first role in a
big-time movie was 1997's KISS THE GIRLS (7/10) with Ashley Judd.
The man who plays the father neighbor in this film is actor Chris Cooper. He
played Uncle Joe in 1998's GREAT EXPECTATIONS and has been in three John
Sayles films.
Director Sam Mendes is best known for his direction of the current Broadway
version of Cabaret, and the Nicole Kidman nudie-show The Blue Room. He hails
from jolly England. This film is his directorial debut.

Title
Review for What Planet Are You From? (2000)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Am I the only one who still has dozens of "Larry Sanders" shows stashed in
all my video drawers? I hope not, cause that was one of the funniest and
best-written shows to ever hit the airwaves. It starred Garry Shandling as
Larry, and featured much of his signature dry, sarcastic and biting humor.
Easily one of the best asshole characters ever put to the small screen. With
that in mind, I was looking mighty forward to Garry's first big screen
credit as a writer and leading role.
PLOT:
A male life form from another planet populated entirely of highly evolved
males is sent down to Earth in order to impregnate a woman and consequently
save his own planet.
CRITIQUE:
Despite its one-track mentality and overall tame nature, this fun-premised
film features a decent helping of chuckles, a couple of big laughs,
interesting characters interpreted by good actors and enough penis jokes to
satisfy...well, all penis joke lovers! Being a proud lifetime member of the
penis joke lovers club, I was  amused by most of what I saw in this film but
still managed to leave the theater with an uneasy sense of fulfillment. Sure
I smiled, laughed and giggled...uhm, well okay I don't giggle, but chuckled
my way through one humming penis joke after the next, and you bet I enjoyed
John Goodman's nutjob FAA dude performance, as well as Kinnear's king of
sleaze character, but ultimately it just felt like the film was missing a
certain je ne sais quoi...bite, perhaps! I guess I was expecting a darker,
grittier and much funnier interpretation of this creative premise, but in
the end, it felt more like a safe trolley ride through the sanitized lanes
of Hollywood studio-land. Shandling...with restraints on tight.
Don't get me wrong, the film isn't bad by any stretch of the imagination, in
fact, I sort of appreciated some of its smaller, more emotional moments
between Shandling and Bening, and its cute ending. But if you're like me,
expecting to see an edgy, darker point of view in this film, you will be
hard-pressed to find it among its grab-bag of penis humming jokes. In fact,
the penis humming gag is the film's main running feature (i.e. alien gets
horny, penis starts humming loudly...alien gets turned off, the humming
subsides), which I personally enjoyed (see previous lifetime membership
acknowledgment earlier on in this review), but which I certainly can see
getting "old" to others out there. Overall, I would say that the film does
provide for some light, enjoyable, quick and easy entertainment with an
original story, but I would recommend that you go into it with minimal
expectations and a certified predilection towards penis and male
chauvinistic humor. Guilty on both counts :)
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Garry Shandling is not an easy person to break up with, as proven by the end
of his 7-year relationship with actress Linda Doucett (who played the
blonde, bimbo secretary on "The Larry Sanders" show), which resulted in her
filing charges against him for sex discrimination and sexual harassment, as
well as his breakup with long-time agent and friend, Brad Grey, which
resulted in Shandling suing Grey for millions of dollars.
Annette Bening currently has three children with actor Warren Beatty, also
known as the "Man with the golden dick", with another one baking in the
oven.
John Goodman calls New Orleans, Louisiana home for him, his wife of eleven
years and their one daughter.
Interesting to note that actress Annette Bening once again portrays a
real-estate agent in this film, as she did in her Oscar-nominated role from
AMERICAN BEAUTY (7.5/10), as well as getting pinned in bed by her lover.
Director Mike Nichols was born in Berlin, Germany to a Russian father and a
German mother. His real name is Michael Igor Peschkowsky. His family
immigrated to the United States when he was only seven years old, and he was
brought up in New York City. He also co-founded the Chicago comedy group The
Compass, later renamed Second City. He has been calling TV anchor Diane
Sawyer his wife since 1988.

Title
Review for Josie and the Pussycats (2001)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
I've always felt that all film "critics" should at least be able to
appreciate the type of movie that they're watching before voicing their
opinion on it. I mean, is any 50-year old man's opinion of this film, which
is obviously geared towards teenage girls, really gonna matter to a 13-year
girl in the target audience? I highly doubt it. So what makes my opinion of
this film any better? (I'm a dude in my late 20s) Well, for starters, I was
sent a nasty little email by a "fan" a few weeks ago, who actually called me
a "teen girl" because I happened to rate GET OVER IT with a higher grade
than his apparent notions of "genius cinema" like HAPPINESS and BEFORE NIGHT
FALLS. Of course, I take every email seriously, so if I'm a "teen girl",
would I like this movie...if I was a teen girl, would I like this movie...if
I was a teen girl...? 
PLOT:
Based on the popular cartoon series from the Archie Comics, Josie and her
best friends Val and Melody have a musical group called "The Pussycats".
When an evil manager comes to Riverdale to find himself a new hot group, he
hooks up with the Pussycats and makes them one of the more popular bands in
the world within a few weeks. Of course, he's also slapping subliminal
messages into their songs so that the government could mold the minds of the
young, but what else is new, right? :)
CRITIQUE:
A cute, harmless little movie that will likely be enjoyed by both young boys
and girls, with catchy, bubblegum songs, many clever in-jokes, some lulls,
some misses but an overall sense of fun. This movie tries to do what
CHARLIE'S ANGELS did last year, with bright colors, energetic scenes, lotsa
style, lotsa winkie-wink moments...but for teens! Unfortunately, this movie
only semi-succeeds with too many jokes which try to be funny, but aren't, a
few corny "romance" moments and a way too obvious story line (I know, I
know...that's not why we see movies like this one, but still!). And a lot
like the latter film, this movie knows that it's there just for fun, milking
many a pop culture moment and even making the obvious "pussy" joke during
its opening credits (impressively daring!). There's also the whole TRL
sequence in which Tara Reid's character is going back and forth with Carson
Daly, which is quite hilarious (they are a real-life couple) and even more
fun is paid at the expense of the entire "boy band" phenomenon (go Seth!).
The movie is also quite self-referential, like the one spot in which one of
the characters is asked why she is tagging along with the band and she says,
"Because I was in the comic book".
But the funniest two characters in the whole movie are Melody (Tara Reid)
and the evil manager (Alan Cumming). They both stole every scene in which
they were present, and you couldn't help but enjoy Melody's complete
goofiness. Great performances from both actors! In fact, all three Pussycats
played their characters very well (although Rosario Dawson seemed quite
"big" compared to the others) and made you believe in them. I did however
think the character of Alan M. was completely miscast as a sensitive skinny
dude, as he's always been known as the jockey built guy in the comics (yup,
I still read Archie comics, boys and girls...it's pretty darn sad). But like
I said before, there were also way too many moments in which not much was
happening, or "funniness" was supposed to occur, but it just didn't gel
(like Parker Posey's character, who wasn't as humorous as you'd think). In
the end, the movie is basically just having a lot of fun with itself, so I
don't think anyone seeing it should take it too seriously either. Of course,
that doesn't mean that it's a "good" movie by any means, but if you're in
the mood for mindless, goofy, teen, bubbly fun, than you could do worse. I
guess what I'm saying is basically what Josie said near the end of the film
before her final song (allow me to paraphrase): "If you think it's cool,
great, and if you don't, that's fine, too. But decide on your own."
Did I just quote Josie in my review? Yipes...maybe they really did
subliminally slip some things into this movie 
Where's JoBlo coming from?
Almost Famous (8/10) - Austin Powers 2 (7/10) - Charlie's Angels (8/10) -
Coyote Ugly (6/10) - Detroit Rock City (8/10) - Disturbing Behavior (7/10) -
Fight Club (10/10) - Grease (8/10)

Title
Review for As Good As It Gets (1997)
"Mr. Oscar", James L. Brooks (Three of the four films that he's
directed have been nominated for Best Picture, including this
e-TERMS OF ENDEARMENT (7.5/10) is the only one that won) 
directs Jack Nicholson to an Oscar for Best Performance by a 
leading male actor, Helen Hunt to an Oscar for Best Performance 
by a leading female actor, and Greg Kinnear to his first ever Oscar 
nomination for Best Supporting Actor.
PLOT:
This movie follows three very different people whose lives cross
because of circumstances, and change, because of emotions. Melvin
(Nicholson) is the overly-obnoxious and obsessively-compulsive writer.
Carol (Hunt) is the waitress whose status as a single mother further
accentuates her incapacity to take optimal care of her only son who
suffers from a severe asthmatic condition. And Simon (Kinnear) is the
semi-successful gay artist whose life turns for the worst after an
unpredictable and bizarre incident. Their sadness, pains, joys and
loves are the basis of this plot.
CRITIQUE:
Extremely well made character film which plays just as good as a
comedy, as it does an effective drama. This movie had me laughing out
loud on several occasions, while fighting back the lump in my throat
a couple of other pivotal scenes. Once again, director Brooks has
managed to effectively balance the two elements in this great picture
about love, the trials and tribulations of everyday life, and the human
capacity to survive and overcome all adversities.
The acting was top-notch all around, with Nicholson pulling off
another great performance as the rudest man in New York City, 
and Kinnear finally getting a chance to successfully showcase 
his acting chops to the world. Hunt was also very good, but I did feel 
as though she over-cried her part in one focal scene (Although she did 
make up for it in the scene where she demands that Melvin "never 
mention her son again" in the restaurant....ouch !!). The supporting 
cast was also very solid, with Gooding Jr. continuing to show us 
why he is definitely worth "the money".
And despite the fact that the movie did run a little long at close to
two and a half hours, the effective manner in which the characters
portrayed their lives was enough to genuinely keep me interested and
caring throughout the picture's entire run-time. The soundtrack was
also very good, as was the appropriate mix of sadness and humour
throughout the entire picture. One thing to keep in mind for this
film is that its content is definitely skewed towards a more mature and
adult audience. Somehow, I don't see your local skateboarding
GenX-ers appreciating the well-woven subtleties prescribed in this
wonderfully
human script. 
Little Known Facts: 
This film was originally titled OLD FRIENDS.
Screenwriter Shane Black plays the Caf owner in this movie (He has
written LETHAL WEAPON (7.5/10), THE LAST BOYSCOUT (7.5/10), and THE
LONG KISS GOODNIGHT (7.5/10).
Director Harold Ramis (He directed the original VACATION (8/10)
movie, and GROUNDHOG'S DAY (7.5/10) plays Doctor Betts in this movie,
along with fellow director Laurence Kasdan (He directed BODY HEAT
(7.5/10) and THE BIG CHILL), who plays Nicholson's psychiatrist.
Some continuity errors in the film include: Melvin removing his
glasses twice while looking out of the window on a rainy evening, and
while in Baltimore, Simon ripping off his cast so that he can better 
draw Carol...but in later scenes, his cast being shown as intact.
Director James L. Brooks has also produced several successful TV
series including "The Simpsons", "Taxi", "Lou Grant", "Rhoda", and 
"The Mary Tyler Moore Show".

Title
Review for Bait (2000)
For more reviews and interviews with the stars of "Bait", visit
http://www.joblo.com/
I guess everybody and their uncle is going to compare this movie to BLUE
STREAK and ENEMY OF THE STATE, so let me get that out of the way up front.
Yes, this film definitely has elements from both flicks! From the former, we
have the "funny thief going to jail and being the only one with knowledge of
the stash's whereabouts" element, and from the latter we have the
"technological mumbo-jumbo tracking of an unsuspecting man" angle. So what's
different? Well, despite not being as funny as BLUE STREAK, it does have
more action. And despite not having as much action as ENEMY OF THE STATE, it
does have more humor. Actually, now that I think about it...it's pretty much
a mix of the two!
PLOT:
A two-bit thief gets thrown in jail for stealing shrimp. While in jail, he's
given some information by an associate of the villain as to the whereabouts
of about $42 million in gold. The associate dies soon thereafter but the
government needs to capture the villain, so what do they do? They release
the two-bit thief, implant a tracking device in his jaw and wait until the
villain catches up to him. Simple enough?
CRITIQUE:
A decent action/comedy ride but probably a little too familiar for most
seasoned moviegoers. Credit Jamie Foxx for boosting this film's quotient
with many funny lines, and director Fuqua for jazzing the film up with a
Tony Scott-ish brush, but don't expect the film to toss too many surprises
your way or offer anything very original. Of course, one could argue that
I've seen too many movies in my day and that my opinion regarding
originality is tainted therein (okay, Mrs. JoBlo loved it and might've
mentioned that I was being too critical...doh!), but that wasn't the only
thing about the movie that didn't blow my pipes. The humor was fast and
furious during the first half hour of the film, but unfortunately absent for
much of its second half. There were also too many shots of people sitting in
the "tracking" room, listening to action taking place. Howsabout showing us
more of that action, folks?!
Having said all that, the film is actually a perfect video movie! It's got a
fun comedic element, a couple of cool car sequences, gun play, a grandiose
plot line which is pretty ridiculous when you really think about it (way too
many people chasing this one guy!), a hip soundtrack and David Morse playing
the ultimate A-hole once again. And he's not even the bad guy! (I'm not
giving anything away here...we know who the bad guy is from the start).
Actually, that's one thing that did bother me quite some. Why do these
government agents always have to be such one-dimensional pricks? I mean,
c'mon fellas...lighten up a bit, there's more to life than just catching bad
guys. How about giving them just a little depth from time to time? Doug
Hutchison was decent as the villain, with a hint of John Malkovich's
Oscar-nominated villainous role from IN THE LINE OF FIRE mixed in for fun.
So there you have it...the film is okay, provides enough laughs, action and
drama to satisfy your average movie-goer looking for a good time out, but
for originality, unpredictability and a quenching aftertaste, this movie
doesn't really cut it. So there's the bait...are you gonna bite?
PS: As mentioned earlier, Mrs. JoBlo loved this movie and especially the
performance put forth by the villain, Doug Hutchison. As it turns out, we
saw this film at the Montreal Film Festival with director Fuqua, Foxx and
Hutchison present in the audience, so the Mrs. was nice enough to approach
Doug after the show and praise his performance. Hutchison was very gracious
and delivered two sweet kisses onto the Missus' cheeks. Hmmmm...now that I
think about it, what the heck was that all about?! Since when do these guys
kiss their fans...gotta go speak to the Missus... :)
INTERVIEW with director Antoine Fuqua:
http://www.joblo.com/fuqua.htm
INTERVIEW with Doug Hutchison:
http://www.joblo.com/hutchison.htm
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Jamie Foxx's birth name is Eric Bishop. He chose the androgynous "Jamie"
because he learned that women got preference for mike time on open stage
nights (Jamie began his career as a standup comic). Jamie was a quarterback
in high school, auditioned for Cuba Gooding Jr's football player role in
JERRY MAGUIRE and finally starred as a quarterback in Oliver Stone's 1999
football movie ANY GIVEN SUNDAY. He was chosen after Sean "Puff Daddy" Combs
left the project over "creative differences".
This is director Antoine Fuqua's second film. His first was 1998's THE
REPLACEMENT KILLERS. He has been married to beautiful actress Lela Rochon
since 1999. He's also the man behind Coolio's "Gangsta's Paradise" music
video, as well as Prince's "The Most Beautiful Girl in the World".
Actors David Morse and Doug Hutchison previously starred together as two
guards in the 1999 weeper THE GREEN MILE.
This film was shot in Fort Erie and Toronto, Ontario, Canada and New York
City.

Title
Review for Virus (1999)
For more reviews and movie trivia, visit http://www.joblo.com/
This film was supposed to be released in the summer of 1998. It was pushed
back. Then, it was supposed to be released in the fall of 1998. It was
pushed back again. Now, in January 1999, the film based on an original
series from Dark Horse Comics called "Virus", is finally being released to
the public.
PLOT:
A Russian carrier gets hits by an electronic life form, unknown to mankind,
which begins to study and meche elements of the humans onboard with all of
the robotics engineered on the ship. When a stray boat accidentally bumps
into the grand carrier, and the crew hop aboard the empty vessel for a
looksie, they find loads of dead bodies, and computer-infested robots
buzzing around in every shape and size. These new life forms see the human
race as a virus, and would like to extinguish it from the universe.
CRITIQUE:
This is not a great movie. It's not even a good movie. It's a standard, by
the numbers, science-fiction derivative of the healthy ALIENS and TERMINATOR
series, which offers a few simple shocks, some engineered tension, another
politically correct cast, and special effects that don't add up to much more
than a lot of machines mangled together in metals and lights. None of the
robots in this film impressed me much because I figure that if you've seen
one robot with lights, gadgets, buzzes and hoses flapping all around, you've
pretty much seen 'em all! And despite this film brandishing quite a few of
these android-puppies, some of which were hybrids of humans, I can't say
that they did much to impress, scare or excite me. Having said that, it is
to note that the plot was also as thin as Jack Nicholson's hair, and the
actors campy in some scenes, movie-stupid in others.
The good thing about this lame duck film was that it knew not to overplay
its obviously mediocre presentation, and did us all a favour by slapping the
whole affair within a time package of a buck and a half. I was never really
bored in this picture, and did enjoy Donald Sutherland's salty ol' dog of a
sea captain, but will admit to longing for the legendary shots of Jamie Lee
Curtis in all her form (For interested parties, please note that there are
no T or A shots of the lovely Ms. Curtis in this picture). The rest of the
supporting cast was negligible, and the shots of the vessel being attacked
by a typhoon looked more like a model boat in a bathtub, but I suppose the
film can be considered brainless fodder for those interested in this type of
thing. So remember, it's quick, it's redundant, it offers some action and
mediocre effects, no boobie shots, and some campy acting by Sutherland. If
you enjoyed either SOLDIER (6/10) or EVENT HORIZON (6/10), you will most
probably enjoy this one as well. It's the science-fiction crazy cousin that
no one likes to talk about, but with whom we've all shared a conversation at
one time or another.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Jamie Lee Curtis' big-screen film debut was in John Carpenter's original
HALLOWEEN (6/10). Her mom is PSYCHO's Janet Leigh, and her dad, Tony Curtis.
She has been married to former-"Saturday Night Live" star Christopher Guest
since 1984. In 1983, she dated English rocker Adam Ant for nine months. She
became Baroness, Lady Haden-Guest, when her husband inherited the Barony in
1996.
Screenwriter Dennis Feldman also wrote the original SPECIES (7/10), while
the other writer on this pic, Jonathan Hensleigh had a hand in ARMAGEDDON
(7.5/10), THE ROCK (6.5/10) and DIE HARD 3: WITH A VENGEANCE (6/10). He also
happens to be conveniently married to the producer of this film, Gale Anne
Hurd, who herself had a child with legendary director, Brian DePalma, named
Lolita. She was also once married to director James Cameron for a few years,
during which, she conveniently produced some of his films including
TERMINATOR (8/10)-which she co-wrote with him, ALIENS (8/10) and THE ABYSS
(7/10).
William Baldwin graduated from SUNY-Binghamton, where he studied political
science. He has been married to singer Chynna Phillips since 1995. He has
brothers named Alec, Daniel and Stephen, who are all actors in their own
right.
Donald Sutherland is a hoser at heart. He was born in Saint-John, New
Brunswick in Canada, and graduated from the University of Toronto. He also
fathered actor Kiefer Sutherland.
This is director John Bruno's first solo directorial film. He also
co-directed one movie before this one with James Cameron and Stan Winston
called T2 3D: BATTLE ACROSS TIME. He is an Academy Award winner (for THE
ABYSS) and six-time Oscar-nominee in the field of visual effects. He
actually quit his post as visual-effects supervisor on a little picture
called TITANIC (7/10) because what he really wanted to do was direct.
Actor Marshall Bell, who played Woods in this film, made history as the
first person to die in an episode of TV's "Tales From The Crypt". In 1989's
pilot episode "And All Through The House...", he got a fireplace poker right
through the head.
Actress Joanna Pacula, who plays the Russian woman in this movie, is
actually Polish in real life.

Title
Review for Beautiful Girls (1996)
For more reviews, go to http://surf.to/joblo
Director Ted Demme chops together an exhaustive cast of big name
actors, a quaint little snowy New England town, and the follow-up
script of screenwriter extraordinaire Scott Rosenberg, whose first
screenplay turned into THINGS TO DO IN DENVER WHEN YOU'RE DEAD (7/10).
Scott's pen was also the one behind CONAIR (6.5/10) and 1998's
DISTURBING BEHAVIOUR.
PLOT:
Willie (Hutton) returns to his childhood hometown when confronted with
a question mark as to the destination of his relationship with
lawyer-girlfriend Traci, and his piano-playing career. Once in town,
Willie mingles with all of his friends of old, who are also caught up
in various levels of commitment, and positions his glad-eye on one
particular thirteen-year old girl living next door. Twenty-somethings
confused about their place in life, their relationships, and the world,
is the basis of this human dramedy. 
CRITIQUE:
Richly penned script, strong acting performances, elegant
cinematography and a solid soundtrack, rate this film as one of the
best of its reflective kind. Solid character driven story in the spirit
of DINER (7/10) that simmers through the sorted lives of several
twenty-somethings caught up in a small town and various stages of
emotional and intellectual development. This movie lingers in
nostalgia, while simultaneously delivering several poignant points of
view from the grab-bag of interesting characters growing up amongst one
another this scanty little blue-collar town (Many of whom were
personally identifiable as well.)
Timothy Hutton shines as the pillar within the group of misguided
"adults" still caught up in their own adolescence, while Natalie
Portman delivers the most dead-on performance as the witty, charming,
and in my humble opinion, overly-literate 13-year old that you've ever
seen. I love the script in all other regards, but a couple of the
overly pretentious lines delivered by some of the characters (generally
Portman), prevented me from completely falling for this film which
touches most bases of relationships, and the fears of commitment. Why
do we always seem to think that there may be someone better for us out
there? Why can we not appreciate the people in our lives until it's too
late?
This movie does not have all the answers, but it does offer many
interesting observations, several classic scenes and funny moments, and
a solid cast of colorful characters interesting enough to keep you
engaged throughout its entire close to two-hour run. I also liked the
fact that the ending did not close or open all doors, and instead, left
you with a mixed sense of melancholic hope. Admittedly, not everyone
will be as interested in this film as I was. I am in my
twenty-somethings, and felt extremely in tune with most of the
characters' thoughts, feelings and trepidations. You might not. Then
again, if you've ever had a moment in your life when you felt like you
could "do better" than the person with whom you were presently engaged,
this movie is certainly one that'll further appetize your food for
ample thought. This film may have been a small movie set in a small
town, but its characters are earnest, its dialogue is smart and witty,
and most of all, its heart is anything but small.
Little Known Facts about the film and its stars: 
Goof in film: When Sharon (Sorvino) is visiting Tommy (Dillon) in the
hospital, her lips don't move when she asks him how he is.
Director Ted Demme is the nephew of better known director, Jonathan
Demme. 
Stars Uma Thurman and Timothy Hutton were apparently heavily dating
during the filming of this movie (Is there anyone left in Hollywood
that hasn't taken a crack at Uma?). 
Timothy Hutton has a son Noah with his ex-wife, actress Debra Winger.
He also directed the music video "Drive" for the 1980's group The Cars.
Natalie Portman was born on the 9th of June, 1981, in Jerusalem,
Israel. She is a vegetarian, and was turned down for the role of Juliet
in the 1996 version of ROMEO AND JULIET (7/10): a part that eventually
went to Claire Danes.
Actor Max Perlich made his feature film debut as the "economics
student" in 1986's FERRIS BUELLER'S DAY OFF (7.5/10).
Writer Scott Rosenberg graduated from Boston University's College of
Communication.

Title
Review for 28 Days (2000)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, http://www.joblo.com/
I'm not sure about you all, but I always seem to relate the words
cutie-patootie to the lovely actress known as Sandra Bullock. Whether it be
in her interviews or her movie roles, the woman just seems to radiate joy,
giddiness and a generally nice aura of someone who doesn't take herself too
seriously. Which is why she is perfect for this role of a woman who is full
of energy and apparent joy, until confronted with the decision to take her
life more seriously or destroy herself and her loving relationships in the
long-run.
PLOT:
A woman with a penchant for the bottle drives a limousine into the side of a
house while intoxicated, and must serve 28 days in a rehabilitation center
or go to jail. Her initial indifference to the place and her issue, land her
into even more trouble, at which point, she must ultimately decide what she
wants out of her own life.
CRITIQUE:
A surprisingly emotional and funny picture, which despite its
road-much-traveled feel, gives us enough interesting characters and a solid
performance from Bullock, to qualify as a solid feel-good dramedy. I don't
recommend you see this film if you're expecting to learn something new about
the process of rehabilitation, drug or alcohol addiction or the
relationships of an addict. But if you don't mind revisiting some of these
tendered themes once more in a film which moves at a quick pace, delivers
tit-for-tat moments of humor and drama, and ultimately gives you every
single 12-step quote needed for anyone to conquer any addiction of life,
then grab a couple of six-packs and check yourself into this moving picture.
Of course, I've never been shy to admit my own enjoyment of "the beverage"
every now and again, but thankfully my even bigger fixation on Internet
porn, hasn't allowed either habit to take over my life completely. But
enough about me. Harumph!
Sandra Bullock really surprised me in this film. Sure, her character is
still pretty cute, does and says cute things, and knows how to party (well,
early on in the movie that is... : ), but this movie allowed Sandra to
demonstrate a little more of her dramatic range, a talent which up until
this film, had personally gone completely unnoticed by moi. Well by golly,
she pulled it off something fierce with several decent scenes featuring a
serious Sandra wallowing in her troubles that be. Of course, much like any
other "institutionalized" movie, the rest of the characters in the film also
needed to create a certain amount of interest, if only enough to pad the
lead performances. The film delivers on that front as well. The stand-out in
the area of humour was definitely the "german gay guy" aka Alan Tyduk, who
had the crowd in stitches every time he uttered, or tried to utter, a word
in this film. Dramatically, Azura Sky took the honors with a touching
portrayal of a girl struggling to overcome her disabling disease, and the
best hair, as usual, went to the great Viggo Mortensen. I suspect that most
fans of Julia Roberts' ERIN BROCKOVICH (7/10) will enjoy this one as well,
seeing as both films feature top-dog actresses at the top of their
respective game, an interesting yet predictable story, and as per usual
Hollywood style, a generally upbeat ending. Of course, this film also has a
lot more humor going for it, but I suppose that's offset by the film's many
serious moments as well.
All in all, you don't have to be a drinker to appreciate this flick, but I
suppose an affection for Sandy Bullock, an understanding of the subject at
hand, and the capacity to embrace a familiar but entertaining theme, should
make this one enjoyable for most anyone fitting that bill. Bottom's up!

Title
Review for Ideal Husband, An (1999)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
I was dragged to go see this film by my better half. I do not enjoy
time-period pieces. I am not a particular fan of Minnie Driver or her acute
jawline. British films generally do not "light my fire". Having said all of
that, I quite enjoyed this film, its actors, its setting and Minnie Driver
and her goofy head.
PLOT:
The time is 1895, and society is run on extremely high morals. Men rule the
country and women, well, women want to marry the "perfect" men. One
particular "ideal husband" suddenly finds his career as a politician and
loving marriage in complete jeopardy, when an indiscretion from his past is
set to blackmail by a woman, in exchange for a political favor. His good
friend, who at 36 has yet to encounter a need to get married, attempts to
help him out.
CRITIQUE:
Charming, delightful, comical at times, interesting at others, this film is
drenched in beautiful settings and costumes, witty dialogue, and a great
cast of actors in their top form. The plot itself is not very thick, and
does seem to finish just a little before its time, but for some very strange
reason, kept me interested, kept me listening, and kept me watching. My best
guess is that the solid performances from Julianne Moore and Rupert Everett
were at the crux of my enjoyment, as well as the rest of the consistently
entertaining cast, the moral intricacies of their day, and the well-styled
direction coming from the man behind the film, Oliver Parker. Double-props
go out to him from me, most particularly since I am generally bored stupid
during these kinds of movies, so "good show, young man!". Now while I did
enjoy watching the characters in the film jostle at the slightest
impropriety or lie told by a person, I could not help but notice the lack of
appreciation that today's society had towards any of their "simple" moral
boners.
I guess we have all gotten so used to the immoralities running rampant today
(The President of the United States was getting headjobs under his desk from
an intern, for God's sakes!), that the outrage supplied by the characters in
the film feel quite exaggerated. Then again, perhaps it is time for us to
begin revising our own moral agendas of the day. Then again, perhaps it is
time for me to loosen up and get back to my review of this film, instead of
rambling on about stuff that is of no consequence to this critique, per se.
Arrrumphh.....now where was I? Ah yes, despite my original misconception,
there is no gay content in this film, despite its lead actor being an openly
gay man, and the story being based on an Oscar Wilde play, another gay man.
Now there's another remark that has absolutely nothing to do with my review,
just a fact that I thought might help another sap like me, who would go in
thinking the same. Overall, a harmless little ditty is this film, with some
great performances from all involved, most particularly Julianne Moore as
the Queen Beeyatch, and Rupert Everett as the ultimate slacker bachelor.
It's funny, it's serious, there's romance, there are twists and turns, and
all in all, it is quite pleasant to look at. Fun English times.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Minnie Driver's real name is Amelia Driver. She has dated everyone from John
Cusack to Matt Damon to Josh Brolin to the drummer from the "Foo Fighters".
Up to this point, she's only been humiliatingly dumped in public by Matt
Damon. She stands 5'10".
Rupert Everett turned down the Daniel Day-Lewis role in A ROOM WITH A VIEW.
Juliane Moore's real name is Julie Anne Smith. Her father was a judge in the
Army's Judge Advocate General Corps and her mother was a psychiatric social
worker. She stands 5'5", and was born in Fayetteville, North Carolina.
Actor Jeremy Northam's first American film was the forgettable NET (5/10)
with Sandra Bullock. He was born in Cambridge, England.
Oscar Wilde's full name was Oscar Fingal O'Flahertie Wills Wilde. This play,
AN IDEAL HUSBAND, was also produced as a TV movie in 1969 starring Jeremy
Brett (Not sure if he was gay or not :).
Director Oliver Parker's first and only other film was 1995's OTHELLO with
Larry Fishburne.

Title
Review for Raising Arizona (1987)
For more reviews, screensavers, trailers & more, visit http://www.joblo.com/
The Coen brothers have been known to do many different types of movies.
BLOOD SIMPLE was their ode to the noir murder mysteries. MILLER'S CROSSING
tipped a cap at the stylized gangster flicks. BARTON FINK left much to
interpretation and played on the old Hollywood system. THE HUDSUCKER PROXY
was their take on the 1950s screwball comedy and FARGO was praised by
everyone in the world as the perfect small-town murder fable. Add THE BIG
LEBOWSKI to the list, with a combination of all the elements from above, and
you've got an awesome career for two extremely private filmmakers. And oh
yeah, then there's this movie...
PLOT:
A simple-minded small-time crook and cute policewoman fall in love and
marry. The loving couple cannot have children of their own so they decide to
steal one from a local rich family who recently had quintuplets.
Unfortunately for them, it isn't long before everyone else, including two
ex-cons, a wife swapping foreman and a nasty bounty hunter, find out about
their shenanigans, and try to cash in on their own.
CRITIQUE:
A perfect film which improves with age, this movie takes all the various
elements needed to create an ideal motion picture and nails them right on
the head! Let's start from the top. Delivering a story like nobody's
business. This is a wonderfully rich and clever tale filled with many cool
characters, classic moments and interpretative showdowns. How I never saw
the obvious undertone connection between the "bad ass" Leonard Smalls
representing Cage's character's dark side is beyond me, but the more I see
the film, the more I realize that much of it is a struggle of Cage's own
psyche. But don't mind all that serious interpretation shtuff. This film is
just plain out hilariously funny! It roars with originality, features
dialogue that should be bronzed and saved for generations to come and
marinates it all with a charming score that'll have you humming it for
weeks. But that's not even the half of it. Let's talk about the
performances. All rock solid! Nicolas Cage showing us what he was all about
before he became a "big action star". Quirky, goofy, downtrodden hero with a
loving heart and a poetic mind. How could you not love this guy?
Holly Hunter playing the ultimate white trash wifey with a precious soul,
while others like John Goodman and Frances McDormand sweeten the pie,
stuffing the entire film with memorable performances all around. But there's
more. One of the most distinctive features of this film is its impeccably
stylized direction. I mean, foggedabouttit! Hand-held cameras running
around, crane shots, unbelievable stunt tricks (can anyone explain the knife
being thrown in the plank shot?), a classic car chase featuring a pack of
Huggies at its end and various wide-lensed sequences used only to accentuate
the film's over-the-top fantastical comedy feel. Amazing, just amazing. But
the Coen masterpiece wouldn't be complete without a touch of the
heartstrings as well. One of the last scenes featuring the husband and wife
team overlooking a child's crib gets me every time! Wow. A hilarious romp
that manages to poke a hole in our tender side, too? Whatta flick. Add all
that to the film's infectious prologue and ambiguous epilogue, and you've
got a movie that delivers on all counts and more.
A cool story, classic dialogue, excellent performances, a catchy soundtrack,
a unique visual flair, humor, drama, thrills, chases, love, hate and a
fantastical element soaking the entire film in a blanket of surrealism. So
if you love originality in film, if you love the stylized ventures a la Coen
and appreciate well-written words intermixed with slap-stick comedy, check
this flick out asap! "There's right and there's right and never the t'wain
shall meet." Okay, then.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars: (Courtesy of the IMDb)
The part of Edwinna was written especially for Holly Hunter. The Coen
brothers lived with Holly, Sam Raimi and Frances McDormand when they were
all first starting out in Hollywood. Of course, Frances and Joel Coen went
on to marry in 1984 and recently adopted a baby named Pedro.
Joel is the brother who usually gets the "credit" for directing their films,
but it is well known that both he and his brother Ethan direct their films
together. They also write and produce their films together, and edit most of
them under the pseudonym, Roderick Jaynes.
The shot in which the camera moves in on the mother discovering that Nathan
Jr. is gone is a direct homage to Sam Raimi's EVIL DEAD, a film on which
Joel Coen was an editor.
The alarm button the clerk presses in the convenience store reads
"Odegard-Trend Security." This is the name of the security company in Sam
Raimi's CRIMEWAVE, a film the brothers Coen co-wrote with Raimi himself.
The character Leonard Smalls (Randall "Tex" Cobb) is a reference to Lenny
Small from OF MICE AND MEN.
The acronyms "P.O.E" and  "O.P.E." spray-painted in the washroom and shown
in reverse in the mirror are references to the Stanley Kubrick films DR.
STRANGELOVE OR: HOW I LEARNED TO STOP WORRYING AND LOVE THE BOMB and THE
SHINING.
H.I. can be seen wearing a uniform with the name "Hudsucker Industries"
written on it during one of the film's earlier scenes. This is also the name
of the company in THE HUDSUCKER PROXY, also by the Coen brothers.
When Nathan Arizona is being interviewed one of the microphones has "KOEN"
written on it. This is a reference to the filmmakers, the Coen brothers.

Title
Review for End of Days (1999)
Fo more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
What movie do you get when you combine all of the better elements from films
like THE OMEN, THE DEVIL'S ADVOCATE, STIGMATA, SEVEN and COMMANDO? The
answer is "I don't know" but it ain't this movie, that's fer sure! Arnold
returns to the big screen after his embarrassing ice capading accident in
1997's BATMAN & ROBIN to present us with a new type of Arnold, a drunken,
suicidal ex-cop who's ironically caught in the middle of the hottest topic
du jour, the coming of the millenium and the arrival of Satan, of course.
PLOT:
Satan comes up to Earth to nail the "chosen" woman before the strike of
midnight on New Year's Eve of the year 1999, in order to end all existence
as we know it and unleash the gates of hell onto the world. A drunk ex-cop
and his wise-cracking buddy are out to stop this Angel of Death. Oh yeah,
the drunk ex-cop is played by Arnold Schwarzenegger. Nuff said.
CRITIQUE:
Nothing new here, folks. This uninspired rehash of various other better
thrillers left me indifferent at best and pissed at the missed opportunity
at worst. Ambitious this film was in attempting to tackle the apocalyptic
fears of the coming New Year. Ambitious was its star in attempting to tackle
a new type of role for himself. Unfortunately for both parties, their
respective ambitions lay unfulfilled in a script blotted with plot holes the
size of Arnold's accent, and a star who is truly difficult to accept in any
role separate from the ones which correlate his monosyllabism to strength of
character. Granted, Gabriel Byrne was outstanding as the devil incarnate,
chewing up all kinds of scenery in a role which finally allowed the man to
have a little fun at his job. In fact, there is one particularly great scene
between Arnold and Gabes in his apartment, but other than that, very little
memorable material here. Looking back, there is even less than I remembered.
Did I totally hate this movie? Not at all. In fact, some of its action
scenes were cool, Arnold "looked" the part and the pacing was okay, but
overall, the film lacked that special oomph that one expects from an "Arnold
movie", or even from an original thriller. The funniest part of this movie
(And no, it wasn't Kevin Pollak's one-line quips) is the way Arnold's
character discovers the identity of the girl who they are trying to locate
at the beginning of the film. It has got to be one of the most ridiculously
unbelievable scenes ever written into a serious thriller. "Christ in New
York" is all I will say about that. Anyway, you'll see what I mean when you
see the movie (On video, hopefully). Another little tidbit that ticked off
both my friend and I was the fact that this film made no bones about selling
itself via its hip, heavy soundtrack beforehand, but for some reason, the
final result barely included one noticeable musical ditty. Slap all of that
onto a weak ending, even weaker special effects and you've got yourself a
disappointment waiting to happen. Now if all you Arnold fans are really high
on this schtick or Gabriel Byrne is an actor whom you respect and admire,
than I might suggest you see this one, if only just for the fun of it. For
everyone else, skip this misfire and rent an Arnold classic like PREDATOR or
TOTAL RECALL, or better yet, bite into a much better film which takes place
during the last few nights before the big 2000, STRANGE DAYS.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Soon after 1997's BATMAN & ROBIN movie, Arnold Schwarzenegger underwent
heart surgery to correct a congenital heart valve condition. He has been
married to news reporter Maria Schriver since 1986, with whom he now shares
four children. Before his incredible career in Hollywood, Arnold was once
referred to as "the most perfectly developed man in the history of the
world", according to the Guinness Book of World Records, and was even
credited in one of his own films as Arnold Strong. Word on the street is
that he received $25,000,000 for his role in this movie.
Actor Rod Steiger , who's also in this movie, was once offered the
title role in the movie PATTON, but turned it down, saying that he was not
"going to glorify war." The role was then given to fellow actor George C.
Scott, who won the Oscar for it. Steiger calls this refusal his "dumbest
career move."
Director Peter Hyams used to be a Chicago news anchorman and generally likes
to include a character in all of his film named "Spota". He's also written
several scripts himself including THE STAR CHAMBER, 2010 and NARROW MARGIN.
Actress Robin Tunney's first movie role was in 1992's ENCINO MAN. Her
character was named Ella. His first big lead role was in 1996's witch movie
THE CRAFT.
This film was originally offered to super-kinetic director Sam Raimi, who
turned it down for a shot to direct Kevin Costner in FOR LOVE OF THE GAME
(7.5/10).
Screenwriter Andrew W. Marlowe's first produced screenplay was 1997's AIR
FORCE ONE with Garry Oldman and Harrison Ford.

Title
Review for American History X (1998)
For more reviews and movie trivia, go to http://surf.to/joblo
The mess that was the post-production of this film has turned into one
of the finest cinematic efforts of the year (See little known facts
below for more info on the mess). Director Tony Kaye wanted his name
removed from this film after meddling from "suits" and actor Edward
Norton (Kaye's allegations). A technicality prevented him from removing
his name, and out of these ashes comes forth a solid film about race,
hate and the human spirit.
PLOT:
Super-neo-nazi-skinhead Derek Vinyard (Norton) gets put into jail for
killing two black youths that were trying to steal his car. During his
stay in the bighouse, his younger brother Danny (Furlong) follows his
hateful ways and joins the nearest skinhead clan. While in jail, Derek
goes through many changes, and comes out with a new outlook on life.
Now, he wants to relay his newfound enlightenment to his impressionable
brother, before it's too late.
CRITIQUE:
Intense, powerful, stylish directorial debut from British director Tony
Kaye, pulls together all aspects of dramatic achievement, including a
solid and emotional story line, an original film style and solid
performances by its cast, most specifically, the genuinely flawless
portrayal by Edward Norton. This film drives home many of the
sentiments seething beneath the hate of many people in this country. It
probes to explain and unravel their seeds of antipathy, while
presenting us with a fair portrayal of the many sides of the human
development. Why do we hate? And even when we do, do we allow it to
serve any real purpose in our lives, or do we simply hate because we
need something or someone else to blame? One of the characters said it
best in the film, "Has anything you've done, made your life better?"
This film grapples with many of the hypotheses behind these questions,
and insists on educating us through creative and thought-provoking
imagery, and solid performances by its main protagonists. This film
reminded me of 1996's DEAD MAN WALKING (8/10), with the main
performance by Norton rating on the same scale as that of Penn in the
former film. In fact, I see Norton's performance as the more complex of
the two, since he actually portrays two polar opposite personalities in
this same movie. And despite Norton's real-life Ivy League background,
he manages to pull off an impressive acting gig as the head skinhead
who eventually clues in as to the hypocrisies of his peers. Mr. Oscar,
please save a seat for Edward Norton for the end of the year
nominations for Best Actor, because this is definitely one deserved
performance. All that and he's built like a champ in this film. Wow,
what a man!
The rest of the cast was also well qualified to handle their posts,
with the other Edward, Furlong, handing in another well-developed
performance of a sulken youth whose heart is pierced with sensitivity.
The only small issues that I did have with this movie was that it was a
tiny bit too long, and that the portrayal of Norton's girlfriend by
Fairuza Balk, was completely one-dimensional. The flashbacks were
handled extremely well, the style of the film enhanced its viewing, and
the film's gut-wrenching conclusion drove home every point made in its
previous two hours. The openness of some minds does not alleviate the
continued presence of hate and fear in our society. It is up to each
and every individual to manage their own rationale of hate, and
determine the truth within its purpose. Who does it really benefit? 
This film bleeds the truth, speaks the lingo, and delivers on all
counts of entertainment, socially relevant value and solid
performances. Definitely one of the best told movies of the year! 
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Director Tony Kaye wanted his name changed to "Humpty Dumpty" for this
film, because of his disagreements with New Line Cinema, but the
Director's Guild of America disallowed it (One of the rules in regards
to changing your name in movie credits, is that you have to agree not
to bad-mouth the movie in public. In Kaye's case, he had taken out ads
in the Daily Variety and The Hollywood Reporter, to do just that.) He
is presently putting together a documentary on the "Making of American
History X", which he hopes to premiere at next year's Sundance Film
Festival. His original cut of the movie was a mere 87 minutes, and he
also managed to be the cinematographer and camera operator on this
project.
Before this film, Tony Kaye had a lavish career as one of Europe's most
daring commercial directors, creating groundbreakingly gorgeous ads for
Guinness beer, Reebok and Volvo. 
Edward Norton lobbied hard for this role, and even offered to take a
pay cut (He claims that he only received about "one-fifth" of his then
$1million asking price.) He also put on 30 pounds of muscle for this
role. He has a history degree from Yale.
First-time screenwriter David McKenna is only 28 years of age.
Edward Furlong was discovered by a casting director at the Boys Club of
Pasadena, and won the part of John Connor in the 1991 film TERMINATOR 2
(8/10). He is presently involved in a live-in relationship with his
former tutor, Jackie Domac. She is 12 years his senior.
Actors Stacy Keach and Avery Brooks are better known for their
respective TV roles as "Mike Hammer: Private Eye" and Hawk from
"Spenser: For Hire". In 1984, Keach was jailed in England for nine
months for smuggling cocaine. Brooks spent 13 years as a Professor for
Drama-Science at Rutgers University in New Jersey from 1972 to 1985.
Fairuza (Balk) means turqoise in Turkish. 
Actor Ethan Suplee, who plays the fat skinhead Seth in this film, was
also in Kevin Smith's MALLRATS (6/10) and CHASING AMY (7/10).

Title
Review for Austin Powers: The Spy Who Shagged Me (1999)
For more reviews and movie trivia, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Okay, so I was a little distracted by the fact that I had Jacques
Villeneuve, Formula I race car driver, snuggling up to his better half a few
rows behind me in the theatre, but once the groovy tunes sounded off, the
colorful characters jumped on-screen and Austin Powers blasted into his
all-familiar mojo fever, there was no denying that the 60s were back, and
this shagadelic sequel had begun!
PLOT:
Dr. Evil time-travels back to the 1960s to steal Austin Powers' mojo (His
essence, his aura, his libido, if you will). With the absence of his horny
spirit, Austin loses focus and must also return to the 60s in order to
regain his essence.
CRITIQUE:
Clever, witty, enjoyable, fun and almost as fresh and original as the first
one, save for a few redundancies which didn't click and Heather Graham who
was not as interesting as Elizabeth Hurley in the original (although her
outfits are simply smashing!), this movie will definitely satisfy all
Austin/Dr. Evil lovers and guarantee a solid box-office summer for Myers and
crew. This movie starts off with a bang, as the first 20 minutes deliver
some of the film's funnier moments (The whole Jerry Springer sequence
cracked me up). It also seemed as though they put more emphasis on the Dr.
Evil character in this follow-up, which was all fine with me, cause I
personally found him to be more entertaining than Austin in the first place.
Nevertheless, kudos go out to Mike Myers once more for pulling off plenty of
smart one-liners, movie homages galore, and tossing a couple of new
characters into the mix. Mini-me, a midget Dr. Evil, seemed to be the
biggest crowd pleaser, and the Fat Bastard (Myers under 80 pounds of latex
fat), who I could've done without, save for one hilarious scene in bed with
a female spy.
A couple of other things which didn't truly delight me were the Austin
Powers dancing segues between scenes, which seem forced and self-indulgent,
and the song and dance numbers in the film, which appeared to be nothing
more than time-fillers. But on the whole, this movie is funny and will have
you cracking up at Dr. Evil's father/son silly banter, Mini-me's fight with
Austin, the multitude of sexual overtures delivered by Austin, and the
overall enthusiasm of the entire ride down the 60s free-wheeling, all-loving
shagfest. Folks who did not enjoy the first film, will undoubtedly scoff at
this sequel, which plot-wise, does even less than its predecessor. But for
all of you who enjoyed the first movie for what is was, a goofy, original,
over-the-top spy parody, chances are that you will most certainly enjoy the
bulk of this film, with its re-occurring characters (and jokes, at times),
Myers' fantastic performance as Evil and Powers, its fun loving,
self-deprecating attitude, and all the kitchy goodness that you could stuff
inside of ninety minutes of groovy cinema. Now does that make you horny?
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Cameos galore in this one as well (Don't read further, if you don't want to
know who they are). Tim Robbins plays the President of the United States of
America, Woody Harrelson shows up as, well, a character named Woody, and
Kristen Johnston plays some husky Russian babe, Ivanna Humpalot. Clint
Howard, Ron Howard's brother, also returns as the radar operator. Burt
Bacharach, Elvis Costello, Willie Nelson, Rebecca Romjin-Stamos and Jerry
Springer also show up as themselves.
The actor playing Mini-me is named Verne Troyer. He is 32 inches tall. You
may remember him as the tiny Santa Claus on top of Arnold Schwarzenegger in
1996's JINGLE ALL THE WAY.
Mike Myers claims that nearly 40% of the dialogue in this film was
improvised on the spot, and that he has agreed to do up to five Austin
Powers films in all. Even King Hussein of Jordan was a huge Austin Powers
fan according to Myers, and watched the tape when he was ill at the Mayo
Clinic.
The original AUSTIN POWERS film became Billboard's No.1-selling video in its
category in 1998, and has been there ever since (as of June 9, 1999...64
weeks and counting).
James Bond film references: (Entertainment Weekly#489) The title is a direct
rip-off of THE SPY WHO LOVED ME. When Austin and Felicity hit the beach in
bikinis, it's a reference to Ursula Andress in DR.NO. The new volcanic lair
of Dr. Evil is from YOU ONLY LIVE TWICE (Just as Dr. Evil is patterned after
TWICE's Blofeld character). The music for the sequel is very CASINO ROYALE,
and there's a bit of GOLDFINGER in the scene where Austin sees an assassin
behind him in the reflection of his glasses. There are also plenty of other
film references tossed in and around, such as INDEPENDENCE DAY, JERRY
MAGUIRE, THE EXORCIST, STAR WARS, THE THOMAS CROWN AFFAIR, and many more
which I just can't seem to remember at this time.
This film was originally titled IT'S SHAGGING TIME and THE RETURN OF DR.
EVIL.
In the U.S., "shag" is far less offensive than in other English-speaking
countries. Singapore briefly forced a title change to THE SPY WHO SHIOKED ME
("Shioked" means "treated nicely.").

Title
Review for Big Daddy (1999)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Adam Sandler likes to work with the same people. And why not. He went from
being just another schmucky "Saturday Night Live" alum trying to make it in
the movies, to a loud and proud member of the $20-Million a film club, and
friggin' huge in the movies! Back he is with his producer and screenwriting
buddies, Jack Giarraputo and Tim Herlihy from THE WATERBOY (5.5/10), THE
WEDDING SINGER (7/10) and HAPPY GILMORE (8/10), for a Sandler-look at being
a real-life big daddy.
PLOT:
Slacker/law school graduate cannot seem to get himself pumped up to do
anything until his girlfriend dumps his sorry ass due to his
irresponsibility. So he adopts a child to prove himself to said girlfriend,
but suddenly finds himself actually liking the kid more than just a vehicle
to cure his immature transgressions.
CRITIQUE:
Despite having seen his grown-up kid character umpteen times in various
other Sandler incarnations, this film still managed to be funny and cute,
filled with lowest common denominator jokes, an adorable kid and a
transparent plot. Now if you're not a Sandler fan, or have had just about
enough of his loveable loser characters-- sweet and nice on the inside,
unapologetic slackers on the outside, then chuck this one over to your video
rentals futures. But if you're like the rest of us, enjoy Sandler's idiocy,
and subconsciously live vicariously through his "never-wanna-grow-up"
adult-goof-boy characters (or Sandler himself...hard to distinguish really),
then sit back and enjoy this derivative character recycled in plenty of
laugh 'em up humor.
Yes, Sandler's character screams really loud when he gets upset and cracks
people up. Yes, there are plenty of easy piss jokes, barf jokes, gay jokes,
hooters jokes, and sports talk peppered throughout this
marketable-soundtrack-layered script. Yes, there are no less than three good
looking women in this film, who in real life wouldn't cross the street to
acknowledge Sandler's "if-not-a-movie-star" existence. But hey, this is an
Adam Sandler movie and I personally consider him to be a pretty funny dude,
despite his lack of creative Mike Myers flair. Unoriginality and weak story
aside, I suppose the film's contrived "emotional" ending also struck me as
somewhat artificial, but I guess we had to expect a slightly softer touch in
a film which treads superficially over a serious subject (adoption vs group
homes).
All in all, the kid's too darn cute to resist, Sandler does his regular
fun-loving schtick, chuckles abound, and many laugh-out loud jokes pop up
here and there (Although a lot of them are featured in the trailer.) I'm
curious to see how this film does with the general audience, seeing as
originality doesn't seem to be Sandler's strong suit. Oh yeah, please try
and remember to straddle your ears when Sheryl Crow wails into an
unnecessary version of the classic Guns 'N Roses hit "Sweet Child O'
Mine"...youch!
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
The script for this film was originally written by Steve Franks, his first
produced screenplay, but ultimately polished up by veteran comedy writers
Adam Sandler and Tim Herlihy. Herlihy is currently the head writer of TV's
"Saturday Night Live", member of the New York State Bar and played the
"Singing Kangaroo" in this film (Wow!). Producer Jack Giarraputo, who was
Sandler's third roommate alongside Herlihy at NYU, skipped out on his own
bar exam, and instead moved to Los Angeles and slept on Sandler's couch
(Great move!).
Director Dennis Dugan, who began his career as an actor, played double-duty
when he directed HAPPY GILMORE, as he was also one of its co-stars opposite
Sandler.
The kid who plays Julian in this film is actually two kids. Born identical
twins Cole and Dylan Sprouse, this duo make their feature film debut here,
despite some years experience as Brett Butler's youngest child on TV's
"Grace under Fire". Cole was actually the first actor to read for this role,
but is actually 15 minutes younger than Dylan. Both kids were born in
Arezzo, Italy, but raised in Southern California.
Julian's Scuba Steve toy is based on the Diver Dan doll that Adam Sandler
cherished as a child. When he lost his Diver Dan doll, his father dressed up
as Diver Dan and came to the front door. He said that the doll was with him
now, but "thanked me for watching over him while he grew up." Sandler
credits his father for doing "anything" to make him feel better.
This film marks actor Steve Buscemi's (Who will always be Mr. Pink from
RESERVOIR DOGS in my heart) fourth collaboration with Adam Sandler on film.
This film was originally titled GUY GETS KID. The film's dedication reads:
"This movie is dedicated to our fathers. Thanks for putting up with all of
our crap. We love you."

Title
Review for Replacement Killers, The (1998)
For more reviews, go to http://surf.to/joblo
Chow Yun-Fat makes his American movie debut in a shoot 'em up Hong
Kong-themed action thriller co-starring Quentin Tarantino's main
squeeze from the days of shooting, Mira Sorvino. This film is also the
first for music-video director (see Little Known Facts below) gone
movie director Antoine Fuqua.
PLOT:
Hitman Lee (Yun-Fat) must kill a police officer's son for his gangster
boss Mr. Wei. Before he kills the child, he develops a conscience, and
skips his task of murder. Mr. Wei is not happy with his killer
employee, and sends in some "replacement killers" to finish him off, as
well as the cop's kid. Lee must do battle with other killers, while
attempting to return home to his endangered family in China, with the
assistance of passport forger Coburn (Sorvino).
CRITIQUE:
Do you like guns? Do you like the gunplay? If your answers to the
previous two questions were a resounding "yes", then I suggest you get
up off your ass, jog over to your nearest video store, and rent this
gun smokin' fun-fest! If you're one that enjoys the plot of a movie,
the deep characterization of man and woman, and the existential meaning
of life, then I suggest you remain seated, and move onto another
review. This bullet-emblazoned film is all noize and explosions, and
anything but stimulus for your cerebral matter.
This movie is also filmed like a MTV music video, with the required hip
eclectic soundtrack, a dark moody look with sporadic use of green and
red filters, and the obligatory Tony Scott-famed rainfall. It also
boasts the required short runtime (less than 90 minutes- flat), an
extreme use of slo-motion when the bullets and the bodies are a-flyin',
and the less than impressive emphasis on plot. If there was a plot,
that is. Oh yeah, hitman develops conscience: Now, let's kill hitman.
Slap in some Sorvino running around in a bra for most of the film, and
you've got yourself a nacho-munching fool-fest for all those willing to
drop their brains off at the door (Guilty as charged.)
Yun-Fat's rookie American performance is also pretty lame in this
movie, with his entire dialogue based around three word monotone
sentences. Michael Rooker as the good cop plays Michael Rooker as the
good cop, and the rest of the cast is basically just a heap of bodies
to be counted later. Did I mention that there were a lot of gunfights?
In the tradition of the master himself, John Woo (co-executive producer
on this one), Fuqua also wastes no time in between gunplay scenes. Fat
walks into a hotel. Gun fight. Fat walks into an arcade. Gun fight. Fat
walks into a car wash. Gun fight. Highly stylized gunfights mind you,
but perpetual gunfights nonetheless. All in all, this is the kind of
stuff that seems to be receding our kids into the lobotomous zones that
we recognize them in sometimes. On the other hand, if this is your
taste of salsa, don't let me stand in the way of a man, his cheese and
his monster bag o' nachos!  
Little Known Facts: 
Mira Sorvino is the daughter of actor Paul Sorvino (Mob-boss Paul from
GOODFELLAS (9/10).) She won an Academy Award for Best Supporting
Actress for Woody Allen's 1995's MIGHTY APHRODITE (6.5/10). She dated
director Quentin Tarantino for two years, and he even named one of his
production companies Mighty Mighty Afrodite Productions in her honour.
Mira graduated from Harvard University in 1990, with a major in East
Asian Studies. She speaks fluent Mandarin Chinese.
Director Antoine Fuqua is famous for directing Coolio's "Gangsta's
Paradise" music video, as well as Prince's (or the Artist Formerly
Known as a Loser) "The most beautiful girl in the world".
Chow Yun-Fat has won the Hong Kong Academy "Best Actor" Awards three
times for A BETTER TOMORROW in 1987, CITY ON FIRE (7.5/10) in 1988 and
ALL ABOUT AH LONG in 1990. He was born in Hong Kong in 1955. 

Title
Review for Romancing the Stone (1984)
For more reviews, check out http://surf.to/joblo
The man behind FORREST GUMP (7.5/10) and CONTACT (6.5/10), Robert
Zemeckis, spent his formative years in "smaller" movie directions, as
his eighties ventures rumbled him through BACK TO THE FUTURE (8/10),
WHO FRAMED ROGER RABBIT? (7/10) and the dismal sequel to this film,
JEWEL OF THE NILE (6/10). 
PLOT:
Hopeless romantic and novelist Joan Wilder must deliver a map to
Columbia in order to save her sister's life from the hands of
kidnappers. Joan is a total urbanite, and falls prey to some
misinformation once in South America, and must survive the jungles
alongside her deputized guide, Jack Colton, who is only in it for the
money. Many other evil people want the treasure map, and inspire
several adventures.
CRITIQUE:
Entertaining, adventurous, short, and somewhat dated adventure movie
that stood out from the RAIDERS OF THE LOST ARK (8.5/10) copycats
through the mid-eighties. Good chemistry between stars Douglas and
Turner render this film bearable through many of its predictably
romantic liaisons, while the well-spaced spurts of action give the film
enough punch to designate a fun time. I veered from the nachos on this
one occasion (forgive me father), and tossed over some bills for a
thin-crusted pizza and breadsticks, but now recognize the error of my
ways, and apologize for my misguidedness.
This movie also balances many funny and light moments on one hand, and
suspense and action in the other. In the same vein, ROMANCING THE STONE
can be considered an all-family movie, because it does not contain any
scenes of extreme violence, sex or sailor-like swearing. It does
contain some nasty bad guys, despite their one-dimensionality, and
manages to skewer adventure through its entire meandering plot line.
Another great thing about this movie is the smoldering sexuality and
come-hither quality of the "young" and beautiful Kathleen Turner. This
film reminded me of the many reasons behind my puppy crush on her back
in the Duran Duran eighties (see wet nipple scene), and saddened me in
regards to her more recent acting work (see her latest TV movie of the
week.)
The one extremely bad aspect of this movie (and perhaps of most
eighties films, now that we look back on them) is the cheezy,
uninspired and ultimately annoying soundtrack and score from this
movie. The synchronized noises through most of the film did nothing but
harass my attention while I was enjoying the suspense and action, and
did very little in the way of enhancing any actual scenes. But I
digress on my small point, since for the most part, the film did manage
to generate great entertainment, some light and romantic moments, and
many scenes sprinkled with action and adventure.  
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Kathleen Turner spoke the uncredited voice of sexy Jessica Rabbit in
the toon-noir Zemeckis-helmed flick WHO FRAMED ROGER RABBIT? (7/10). 
Danny DeVito stands 5 feet tall.
Michael Douglas' smaller brother Joel, was also a co-producer on this
film, as well as being the 1st assistant director.
The phrase "Romancing the Stone" is a piece of jewellers' jargon,
referring to a step in preparing a gem for use in jewellery.
Eddy Grant recorded the title song, but it was never used.
Alan Silvestri was hired to do a temporary score for the film, but
director Robert Zemeckis like his work so much that he kept him on as
composer.

Title
Review for Get Over It (2001)
For more reviews and movie wallpapers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
PLOT:
A boy who gets dumped by the love of his life can't seem to get over her.
While she's moved on to the next guy, he still tries to win back her heart.
In the meantime, another girl likes him for what he is, but blinded by the
love for his ex-girlfriend, the boy does not notice her. Of course, sparks
fly all around when the whole gang join in the school's theatre production
and strands of truth begin to surface.
CRITIQUE:
What can I tell you...I was entertained! A cute, fun teen flick with many
scene-stealing moments from the incomparable Martin Short, an upbeat
soundtrack, believable performances from its leads and a predictable, yet
charming, romance angle. Believe you me when I tell you that I wasn't really
looking forward to seeing this movie. The first two months of this year had
jaded me in respect to bad teen and romance flicks altogether, and this
movie didn't seem to have much going for it. But low and behold, there I
was, laughing and giggling my way through this surprisingly potent vehicle
for the teen generation. This movie is a lot like SHE'S ALL THAT and 10
THINGS I HATE ABOUT YOU. It's entirely predictable, it's based on a more
renowned dude's writings (this one plays off Shakespeare's A MIDSUMMER
NIGHT'S DREAM), and is obviously set in high school. But the difference
between this and most other crappy teen movies is that this one actually
comes across as a fun ride, with little more on its mind than entertaining
its audience. Does the film have its problems? Absolutely. For one, it
unfortunately includes a couple of recycled jokes from other movies like the
girl getting hit by a car and flying through the air (SCARY MOVIE) and the
clutzy blonde chick who keeps bouncing into things (HEAD OVER HEELS).
Also, I simply could not get past the fact that two of the supposed
"teenage" actresses in this film looked like they were in their 30s. I
mean...really! (for those who care, I'm referring to Allison and the clumsy
girl). And the final act of the film, which essentially comes down to a
major school play, just went a little longer than I thought was needed. I
mean, did we really have to sit through 3-4 songs from the play itself? But
these were really small issues for me, and for the most part, I can't say
that I wasn't entertained by this movie. In fact, pretty much every word
that came out of Martin Short's mouth was funny to me. I don't know, maybe
it's just me, but his character definitely took this film to that "other
level". But the rest of the kids were pretty good, too. Sisqo did what he
does best, Tom Hanks' son was pretty solid as the best friend, the lead kid,
Ben Foster, played his character quite sympathetically and Kirsten
Dunst...well, looked great! Okay, she was pretty good in her role, too. And
geez, let's not forget Foster's parents in the movie, Swoosie Kurtz and Ed
Begley Jr. Very small parts but very funny characters. In fact, most of the
side players in this film made it a stronger one as a whole. Besides Carmen
Electra, who for some reason or another decided that a 10-second spot as a
leathered-up stripper in this film would be good for her career?!
Anyway, if you like cute boy-loves-girl, girl-dumps-boy, boy-wants-her-back
while another-best-friend-type-girl-wants-boy-also movies (oh, that again?),
then you'll enjoy this one. It's light, it's got a few "gross" jokes but
mostly solid humor with some nice touches from the director and a fun
soundtrack. All in all, an enjoyable time at the theatre. And who knows,
some of you adults might like it, too.
Where's JoBlo coming from?
10 Things I Hate About You (7/10) - Can't Hardly Wait (7/10) - Center Stage
(6/10) - Down to You (5/10) - Grease (8/10) - Save the Last Dance (7/10) -
She's All That (6/10)
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Not surprisingly, the screenwriter of this film also wrote the Freddie
Prinze Jr. teen flick, SHE'S ALL THAT.
This film was originally titled GETTING OVER ALLISON and was shot in
Toronto, Canada.

Title
Review for Small Time Crooks (2000)
For more reviews and movie wallpapers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
I'd sort of given up on Woody Allen after the majority of his work during
the 90s appeared to be more about getting "name actors" into his films, then
making original and quality productions (save for HUSBANDS AND WIVES and
BULLETS OVER BROADWAY). But don't look now cause the Woodman has returned to
his roots with an all-out slapstick featuring only one "big" name (Hugh
Grant) but plenty of funny one-liners!
PLOT:
A down-and-out dishwasher with a dubious past, comes up with a plan to clean
out a bank's vault with the aid of a few of his dim-witted buddies, and some
financing help from his gaudy wife. As a successful couple, the husband and
wife must then figure out how they are going to "fit in" with all the other
rich and cultured socialites.
CRITIQUE:
Welcome back, Woodrow! An easy predictable plot with funny, neurotic
characters and plenty of hilarious one-liners certify this film as one of
Woody's most accessible and entertaining of the past decade. Of course, it
helps if you are already a huge Woody Allen fan (which I am), but Dreamworks
knew something when they picked up this film, cause it is certainly does
pack many a guffaw, and is easily one of the more mainstream films of
Allen's career. Yes, fans of BANANAS and TAKE THE MONEY AND RUN won't be
disappointed, but I think most anyone looking for a few simple laughs laced
within a fast-paced and clever script will most likely enjoy this picture.
In fact, it is the film's first hour which probably holds the most bang for
your buck, with many audience members breaking out in large fits of
laughter. The second half slows the chuckles down a little, but even then,
enough smiles are provided to allow one to ease further into the film's
hokey plot.
Of course, there isn't much originality to the overall story, most of which
can be foreseen as the film moves along, but the characters are fun to
watch, Woody is his typical stuttering goofy self and the feel-good ending
will most likely satisfy the majority. I thought the conclusion was a little
too corny for my taste, but then again, I'm a jaded ol' critic, I am : ) One
thing to note is that the trailers make it seem like the film is all about
the bank robbery, when really it actually takes off from that premise pretty
early on. In fact, the three dum-dums who help Woody with the heist more or
less disappear about halfway through the film, as Hugh Grant enters the
picture. The standout in the cast would have to be Elaine May as the
not-too-bright cousin in the bunch, and Tracey Ullman, who nails her role to
perfection. It's also interesting to note that Michael Rapaport has finally
given up on his career as an actor, and affectionately embraced the odd
choice for a profession, playing the "doofus" in every other movie.
All in all, the film has plenty of laughs, delivers Woody firmly tucked back
in his humor saddle, and presents a story interesting enough, albeit
predictable, to satisfy all Allen fans, and even some of the rest of ya'll.

Title
Review for Mouse Hunt (1997)
This children's picture melds the comedic spirit of the original HOME
ALONE (7.5/10) picture, with the style and darkness of the ADDAMS
FAMILY movies.
PLOT:
Two unique brothers inherit a historically rich mansion from their
dying father. After valuing the house at over a million dollars, they
decide to hold an auction at which all interested parties could bid.
Unfortunately for them, there is one feisty little mouse in the house
that does not want to let anyone rest in peace. Mayhem ensues.
CRITIQUE:
Mostly enjoyable but redundant picture that pits two brothers against
the dynamic smarts of a two-inch mouse. This movie had many funny
moments, as well as many not-so-funny ones. Kids under ten should enjoy
this picture whole-heartedly, while all others might meander between
the "hit" and "miss" classifications. I guess it all depends on how
interested you are in seeing the hundreds of different ways that a tiny
mouse could frustrate two grown men. I personally was never really
bored during the entire picture, so I guess that's a pretty good sign.
Also, one of my favourite actors, Christopher Walken, makes an
incredible cameo as the "exterminator from hell" who owns every single
device known to man to deal with this defiant rodent. His fate is a
pretty slick sequence to behold. Other than that, not too many scenes
stick out in my mind, but the style of the picture is very cool and
Coen-esque. It's also very dark and colorless, unlike a lot of other
children's movies. This is an aspect that I embrace in pictures, but
you might not.
The actors are all fine in their roles, while the mouse also pulls off
an overall authentic vibe throughout the entire movie. All in all, I
guess that if you're in the mood to laugh at some morons getting
tricked by a cute mouse, this is your nacho plate for the night. If
not, skip this puppy and rent THE NIGHTMARE BEFORE CHRISTMAS (8/10) for
some real kid's dark, spooky fun.
Little Known Facts: 
Christopher Walken's real name is Ronald Walken (I wonder why he
changed it? :)). He was born in Queens, New York, in 1943, and has been
married to the same woman since 1969, Georgianne Walken. He won a Best
Supporting Actor Oscar for his role in 1978's DEER HUNTER (7.5/10). 
Ernie (Nathan Lane) greets Maury (Ernie Sabella) at the auction by
saying "Hakuna Matada", a reference to Lane and Sabella's roles in the
animated children's feature, THE LION KING (7.5/10).
Gore Verbinski was a TV commercial director before hitting the
feature-film realm. He directed the first "Budweiser Frogs" commercial.
Nathan Lane's real name is Joe Lane. He was born in New Jersey in 1956.
Lee Evans was born in Avonmouth, England.

Title
Review for Blair Witch Project, The (1999)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
This film made a major impression at the 1999 Sundance Film Festival. This
film made a major impression on moviegoers when it opened wide on July 30th,
with a box-office gross of close to US$30 Million, with only a $30,000
filming budget. This film also made major impressions with most movie
critics who agreed that this film was one of the creepiest rides of a
lifetime.
I must've missed that movie critic memo. This film made only a minor
impression on me.
PLOT:
Three young filmmakers go out into the woods to film a documentary about the
legend of the Blair Witch. They are lost and never heard from again, until
someone finds all of their videotape footage. This film is a compilation of
their footage from the woods.
CRITIQUE:
This film simply did not "do it" for me. I thought it was an original idea
with an extremely authentic look and acting from its main characters, but
God help if I didn't really find it all that interesting, scary or even
entertaining. The last fifteen minutes of this film get a little creepy, and
certainly leaves for an impression, but unfortunately, you have to sit
through an hour and more of watching these three kids walking, talking
shite, getting creeped out here and there, and whispering in the dark. I am
assuming that all of this activity absorbed others into the characters and
their plight, but I just thought it was pretty boring. It was like watching
a camping trip video of some friends that I could care less about. I felt
little tension, little suspense and absolutely no scares whatsoever. This is
definitely NOT a scary movie.
If there was ever a film to which you could stick the motto "Don't believe
the hype", it would be this one. And I'm not saying that the film is garbage
either. It's like I said, I thought the style and premise were interesting,
the actors believable and solid in their roles, with funny moments here and
there, but overall, the film just didn't do much for me. It got a little
spooky near the end, and certainly tied itself nicely to a story told at the
beginning of the film by a town person, but don't go into this film thinking
that you are going to get your pants scared off of you, cause that's not its
primary intention. In fact, if you have a problem watching a camera
jittering about for an hour and a half, you may just get nauseous watching
the film stock shot here.
Did Mrs. JoBlo like it? Nope. I even caught her staring at the ceiling of
the theatre every now and then. All in all, you obviously needn't take my
word for it, since there are many huge fans of the film surfing the Web as
we speak, but in my humble little opinion, the movie did not make any
special impression upon me, and certainly did not entertain my sorry ass for
its duration. And I think that is ultimately the main criteria of any film--
was it entertaining? In this case...no. See it on video, if interested.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
In case some of you still aren't sure...Is the film a real documentary or
not?
THE BLAIR WITCH PROJECT is entirely fictional. The entire thing is the
brainchild of the films' co-writers/co-directors, Ed Sanchez and Dan Myrick,
and was made over the past two years. The three student filmmakers are all
played by actors. The actors used their real names in the film, and the
conditions were a bit different than your average shoot. First off, the
actors actually had to agree (it was written into their contracts) that they
could be messed with psychologically. Then, they were sent off into the
woods for eight days, and literally shot the film themselves (Shot at the
Seneca Creek State Park in Maryland). Over 18 hours of raw footage was
generated from the excursion in the woods. The only contact that they had
with the crew was through notes and minimal rations left for them to pick up
daily (they also carried a GPS (Global Positioning Satellite receiver), so
they couldn't really get lost, and so that the crew knew where they were in
the forest and where to head for instructions and food.) They knew their
"characters" well, and knew the general setup of the "story", but everything
that happens as the story unfolds was a surprise to them. The film was shot
in October of 1997 and the directors spend more than a year editing the film
down to its final product.
Has the legend of the "Blair Witch" also been fictionalized? Yes, it was
also created by the filmmakers, as were all the supporting documents and all
the events in the Blair Witch mythology (See http://www.blairwitch.com/).
The filmmakers wanted to create a sense of history to add to the depth and
believability of the film.
This movie is the feature film debut of all three of its young stars,
Heather Donahue, Michael C. Williams and Joshua Leonard. Michael is already
set to co-star opposite Robert DeNiro and Cuba Gooding Jr. in a film
entitled NAVY DIVER, due out in the year 2000. Not too bad, eh?
An alternative ending was shot for Artisan Entertainment, but the studio
left the decision as to which ending to use to the filmmakers, so they went
with their original ending. Maybe we will see this and some of the deleted
scenes on the DVD release. Needless to say, ideas for prequels and sequels
are already being seriously tossed around.

Title
Review for Contender, The (2000)
For more reviews and movie wallpapers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
This little preamble doesn't have much to do with the film at hand, but I
just thought it was strange how three of the main actors from this film,
were also three of the main actors from 1988's TUCKER: THE MAN AND HIS
DREAM. A fine film in its own right and probably the best film that Francis
Ford Coppola has directed in the past 15 years. Jeff Bridges played the
president here and Tucker in the latter film. Joan Allen is vying for the
vice-presidency here, and played Bridges' wife in the other film. And the
young Christian Slater played Bridges' son in TUCKER, and a congressman in
this one. While both films are indeed inspirational, I would recommend
TUCKER to anyone who wants to see a real-life tale of a man pursuing his
dreams through an enormous amount of adversity.
PLOT:
The president of the United States must choose a new vice-president to
replace the previous one who died. The president chooses to elect a woman
for the post, a woman who must first proceed through confirmation hearings
run by a powerful political adversary. That adversary attempts to discredit
the nominee by digging up all of her past improprieties and bringing them to
the political forefront. Political clashes ensue.
CRITIQUE:
A solid political film which to my surprise, moved along at a speedy pace,
offered many strong performances, especially the incomparable Gary Oldman,
and provided great entertainment. This movie seemed to have it all packaged
and ready to deliver. An interesting and timely story line, debating the
personal nature of a politician's private life versus the American public's
"right to know". Twists and turns which I personally did not see coming, but
Mrs. JoBlo somehow did. Notable direction by Rod Lurie who admirably took an
extremely politically charged screenplay and turned it into a fascinating
drama, all without bogging it down in overripe political movie jargon. He
even spiced the whole affair up with perfect touches of humor throughout.
Who knew the president could be so loosey-goosey behind the scenes, but gosh
darn it, I bought it all with this film! But the true tip of the cap goes
out to the entire cast of this movie and the characters whom they chose to
inhabit. I loved them all.
Gary Oldman has always been one of my most favorite actors, a man who can
literally change his entire physical being to "become" someone else. In this
film, he completely personifies this character, creating a man who can only
be described as memorable beyond belief (he even managed to make him
irritating while chewing on a piece of meat...grrrr, stop making all that
noise, you bastard!). But he's not the only pearl in the bunch. More kudos
go out to Sam Elliott, a man not known for taking parts in "big" movies, but
certainly perfect as the president's right-hand man in this one. In either
case, I would be somewhat surprised not to see them nominated at the year
end recognition of talent awards. Joan Allen also drives home the intensity,
sensitivity and unshakable convictions of her character, while Jeff Bridges
surprises all as the amiable, yet shrewd president of the United States.
Although I could have done without the bombastic score during his final
sermon...I mean, speech. And yes, even Christian Slater worked as the
up-and-coming congressman looking to make something of himself. All in all,
I thoroughly enjoyed this film and especially its noteworthy performances.
If only this year's real-life candidates were even half as interesting any
of the main characters in this film... :)

Title
Review for Ninth Gate, The (1999)
For more reviews and movie trailers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Another devil movie?!? Well, not really. Sure this film is centered around a
man's search for ancient satanic books, but unlike STIGMATA which took the
MTV route or END OF DAYS, which took Arnie and dove head-first into thrill
mode, this film relies entirely on its mood, its haunting score, its
carefully laid out clues and its leading man to keep your interest. Think
EYES WIDE SHUT meeting ANGEL HEART.
PLOT:
An unscrupulous book appraiser is hired by an eccentric collector to find
and authenticate the two other copies of the "Book of the Nine Gates", a
tome which apparently holds the key to conjuring up the devil. It isn't long
before the book sleuth finds himself caught up in a mysterious game of cat
and mouse.
CRITIQUE:
Creepy, atmospheric, slow-moving mystery which drew me in with its awesome
opening credit sequence, kept me interested with its dark, moody look and
sound, and stapled my final approval with an unpredictable resolution worthy
of a second trip to the theatres. But let's talk real turkey here...Johnny
Depp pots yet another great role and takes full advantage of his
ever-expanding talent to present us with yet another unique and engaging
performance. This man is totally on top of his game right now (besides being
a great-looking individual!) and seriously has me looking forward to any of
his future roles. Harumph...but back to the review. This movie is definitely
not for your typical thrill-a-minute popcorn crowd. No way! In fact, its
mandate doesn't really include thrills as much as it does the creation of
feelings of uneasiness. I don't know if it was just me, the film's brooding
cinematography, its eerily seductive soundtrack or the general Euro-feel of
the entire movie, but this one definitely had me by the balls the whole way
through.
Of course, it's really more of a mystery film than anything else. A thinking
man's (or woman's) movie, if you will. No easy answers. No
wham-bam-thank-you ma'ams. Just a lot of subtle hints here and there,
something said, something shown, a person seen before...definitely a film
which asks its audience to pay attention and appreciate its drawn out
nature. And drawn out it is. The one thing I would have liked was if they
had cut it down a little, it felt like it ran on a little near the end. But
then again, once the final resolution revealed itself, I can't say that I
held much else against the film. Having said that, it is to note that the
ending is actually quite vague and surely in need of further discussion or
re-examination in order to fully appreciate its meaning. I mixed and matched
some of my ideas with that of my friend, and within a few minutes, we had
already uncovered several interesting theories to complete the puzzle.
Ironically, it is the film's ambiguity that left me further intrigued to
watch it all over again. Of course, I won't deny that its unclear ending,
peculiar pace and sheer length won't easily turn many people off, because I
am sure that they will, but for me personally, the film worked on several
levels, with the most important one being that of entertainment.
I really liked this film. Johnny Depp is always interesting to watch, the
plot has basically been seen before but not with all of its subtleties, the
score is Hitchcockian and flawlessly intertwined with the film's dark,
stylish look and best of all, the ending keeps your brain working even after
the final reel clicks the end. Don't expect action, don't expect many
thrills, don't expect Arnie with a machine gun. This is a simple mystery
film mangled in the supernatural with zero special effects and a lot of
depth. Interested?

Title
Review for Armageddon (1998)
The second asteroid movie of the summer (see DEEP IMPACT (6.5/10))
finds Michael Bay and Jerry Bruckheimer teaming up for yet another one
of their infamous summer blockbuster entries. This is their latest
collaboration after THE ROCK (7/10) and BAD BOYS (7.5/10). Bay used to
direct television commercials and music videos (Among many others, he
did "Falling in Love is Hard on the Knees" for Aerosmith in 1997, and
"I Touch Myself" by Divinyls.)
PLOT:
The end of the world is near. An asteroid that's the size of Texas is
going to crash into Earth in about 18 days, and obliterate all of
humanity. The only way to veer its course from our planet is to send up
a crew of professional drillers, who will attempt to insert a nuclear
bomb deep inside the monstrous rock. Time is limited, the best people
for the job appear to be misfits in every other dimension of life, and
the world awaits its fate.
CRITIQUE:
Two words: "fun stuff". This movie is exciting, packed with action,
humour, some tender moments, and doesn't pretend to be anything more or
less than it's supposed to be: a nacho-munching, popcorn-eating
cheese-fest of special effects, fun and 144 minutes of brainless
entertainment. And within those guidelines, it comes through like
gangbusters! Unlike DEEP IMPACT, this film flies along without too many
slow moments, and slaps you in the face every time things appear to be
slowing down. It's also packed with a little more special effect fun
than a mere tidal wave sequence (As slick as that sequence was in the
earlier asteroid movie, it doesn't compare to all of the festivities in
this one.)
Obviously, character development has never been the strong suit of any
Bruckheimer film, but even with that tidbit of knowledge in tow, I'm
not afraid to admit that I didn't suffer a touch of the ol' wet-eye
nearing the end of this well-rounded movie. The characters were
obviously interesting enough for me to care about them, and the style
of the film was fun enough for me to pay attention throughout its
entire whacked-out ride. The acting was passable, with Willis pulling
off a "regular guy" without too many wise cracks this time, Affleck
doing his shtick to perfection, and Tyler, well, being there. Steve
Buscemi of RESERVOI R DOGS (9/10) fame also deserves a nod for being
the perfect wise-cracker in this one (And boy, are his teeth ever
crooked or what??) 
On the negative side, I guess the film could've been trimmed by about
half an hour, as the training sequences at the beginning of the film
did seem to drag at times, as did the drilling scenes near the end. The
Aerosmith tunes were also a bit too obvious and a bore. I suppose one
could also complain about the implausibilities of some of the film's
events, but fortunately for me, I know not to go into a film of this
sort with expectations of a documentary. The superiority of the
wonderful land of America was also a bit of an eyebrow-raiser in this
flag-waving piece, but I suppose we can't expect more for the weekend
of Independence Day, right?
Overall, this film tied me to my seat, peppered me some great special
effects, plenty of rock 'n roll, a bunch o' fun, action, a decent plot
line, and an ending that tugged at most heart-strings (Mrs. JoBlo had
to let loose on this puppy as well, but not as much tearage was shed as
was in DEEP IMPACT.) I had a great time in this film, and I would
suggest it to all those people who like to go a film because of its
sheer entertainment value, and not necessarily because of a higher
meaning or intrinsic value to society. This flick was a blast! Get your
tickets, warm up the nachos, bring in some tissues, turn your brain off
at the door, and get ready to be genuinely socked around a
rollercoaster of fun and excitement for the first time of the summer of
1998!
Little Known Facts: 
Watch for at least three references to other films in this one. The
first takes a jab at GODZILLA (6/10), the other makes an obvious nod to
DR. STRANGELOVE (7.5/10), and then of course, the entire "slow-motion
astronauts walking to the shuttle" sequence with tips its hat to THE
RIGHT STUFF.
Some re-writes on this film were done by Scott Rosenberg, Robert Towne,
Paul Attanasio and Ann Biderman.
Liv Tyler stands 5"10, is the daughter of Steven Tyler (lead singer of
Aerosmith) and had a cameo role in Woody Allen's EVERYONE SAYS I LOVE
YOU (6.5/10), which was cut. Having said that, Allen was impressed
enough by her performance to write a personal letter explaining that
her part was cut in editing.
In 1995, director Michael Bay was honored by the Directors Guild of
America as Commercial Director of the Year. At Cannes, he also won the
Gold Lion for the best Beer Campaign for Miller Lite, and a Silver Lion
for his "Got Milk?" campaign.
Before taking up acting, Steve Buscemi tried to become a NYC Fireman.
Ellen Cleghorn of Saturday Night Live fame makes a cameo appearance in
this film as the doctor who performs the undesirable act of protruding
the crew's bottom-sides for clinical purposes.
Charlton Heston is the narrator of this film.

Title
Review for Evolution (2001)
For more reviews and movie wallpapers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
PLOT:
Two teachers at a local community college discover a meteor fallen to 
earth which may contain a growing alien organism. They try to keep it 
secret, but it isn't long before the government is all over it and 
Mulder, oops, I mean the two teachers, must work alongside a goofy 
teenager and a klutzy scientist in order to get to the bottom of things.
CRITIQUE:
An "okay" movie with some very cool, colorful alien creatures, a few 
laughs here and there, good performances from its leads, but ultimately 
nothing to go nuts over. I'm guessing that they were going for a MEN IN 
BLACK-type of thing here, but this film isn't as funny or as original as 
the latter. It does however feature a more interesting mE9lange of =
actors. Duchovny playing the straight man to perfection as usual. 
Orlando Jones finally getting a semi-decent role in which to showcase 
his obvious comedic talents. Seann William Scott, well, just acting like 
he does in all of his roles and doing it in a very funny way! And 
Julianne Moore...good for you, girl, stretching those acting muscles as 
a goofy scientist. All four worked very well in their respective roles, 
as well as their camaraderie (especially Duchovny and Jones). In fact, 
their chemistry is probably the main reason why I wasn't too bored with 
the first half of this film, which lacked a certain energy and moved a 
little too slow, in my opinion. Once the aliens got into the picture 
(literally), things did jazz up during the film's second half, but even 
then, it was never to a point where I was blown away or anything.
The movie also delivers some B-movie elements, like its last 15 minutes, 
which just screamed THE BLOB and films of that sort. A little 
blue-screen action was also a little obvious. It's the kind of movie 
that you will most likely enjoy while watching and then completely 
forget about an hour after you leave the theater. Which isn't 
necessarily a bad thing, just an observation. It will definitely not 
crack the pop-culture barometer as GHOSTBUSTERS did all those years ago, 
but you can certainly do worse with other films playing out there right 
now (now is that a solid recommendation or what?!? :) The film's also 
got some pretty neat "boo" scare moments and even a shot of Duchovny's 
ass (God knows that I've been waiting years for that!). In the end, I 
guess that I was expecting a "meatier" script with bigger laughs, more 
action and more moments of suspense, but ended up with something a 
little less ambitious. This is a simple movie, with sci-fi and comedic 
elements mixed within a little story and great performances. Not the 
best movie that you'll see this year, but certainly not the worst. 
Wow...I'm really "selling" this one, eh? Sheesh...what can I say, the 
film was somewhat entertaining while I was there, but not all that 
memorable looking back. In others words, it's a toss-up boys and 
girls...!
Where's JoBlo coming from?
Ghostbusters (8/10) - Mars Attacks (4/10) - Men in Black (7/10) - Road 
Trip (7/10) - X-Files (7/10)

Title
Review for Siege, The (1998)
For more reviews and trivia, go to http://surf.to/joblo
Director Ed Zwick teams up with Mr. Denzel Washington (A gracious man
according to one of my friends who ran into him on the streets of
Montreal last month, munching on a hotdog and a baseball cap planted
firmly on his once-a-garbage-man head.) for the third time in 10 years
for this modern thriller. They previously worked together on 1989's
GLORY (For which Denzel won an Academy Award for Best Supporting Actor)
and 1996's COURAGE UNDER FIRE. 
PLOT:
Super-straight FBI agent Anthony Hubbard (Washington), works alongside
his Lebanese-born partner, and  CIA agent Kraft (Bening), to solve the
maze of terrorist attacks plaguing the city of New York. When the
terrorists commit acts beyond the scope of the FBI and the local New
York City police department, the US Army is asked to intervene, led by
able General Devereaux (Willis). The entire city is placed under
martial law, and all Arab-American suspects are persecuted and grilled
for information. The siege is set.
CRITIQUE:
Mediocre, preachy, self-righteous, thriller starring the great actor
Denzel Washington, which manages to hit some high points, but delves
into too many lulls and plot holes, along with a weak ending, to
maintain my high interest throughout. This film was pretty interesting
for the first half, but once the Army, and the wooden acting by Bruce
Willis came into the picture, things just seemed to drag on without
much real intensity. The final resolution with Willis also seemed quite
anti-climactic and too politically correct for my taste.
This movie has apparently angered many Arab groups and after having
seen the film, I guess I could see why that is. In my humble opinion,
there have been too many terrorists represented as Arabs in movies,
without enough reciprocracy for the rest of their cultural makeup (And
that's about as political as you'll ever get to see JoBlo, so enjoy it
while you can!) But I digress. On the other hand, this film does seem
to want to portray the entire big picture, instead of this simple
minority, and I guess that on that level, it does so intelligently and
effectively. I never really did understand why and what the Annette
Bening character did for a living (She seemed to be absolutely
everywhere in this film, but without much clear explanation as to how
she received clearance for anything), or why anyone, anywhere at
anytime would trust her in this film (But somehow, they all do?!)
Add to that the fact that Bruce Willis seems to have forgotten his
acting chops back in PULP FICTION (7.5/10) and NOBODY'S FOOL (8/10),
and reverted back to his old style of impersonating a piece of mahogany
lumber for this role (good choice, Bruce!). But when you really get
down to it, Denzel Washington is the glue that holds this long-winded
picture together. Year after year, this man continues to reassure us of
his magnificent acting talent, and emotionally lure us into each and
every one of the characters that he inhabits (Okay, so I'm not counting
VIRTUOSITY (5.5/10) !!). Otherwise, Annette was just annoying, while
Shalhoub was passable in his see-through role as the token "nice-guy"
Arab rep. Overall, the movie did pack some thrills, some action, some
interest, little originality, little effect and little sweet movie
aftertaste. I suggest you catch it on a cheapie night in the theatres,
or more sensibly, wait for it on video and enjoy it during those long
winter months.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Denzel Washington was once used in a Newsweek cover story about the
biological basis of the perception of beauty. He was cited as a key
example in a scientific explanation of why he is considered an
extremely handsome man. He's been happily married to the same woman
since 1982.
Annette Bening has been married to the "man with the golden nuts",
Warren Beatty since 1992. They've had three kids together. Apparently,
Warren saw Annette in THE GRIFTERS (6.5/10) and was so impressed with
her work (The shots of her naked goodies probably had nothing to do
with it, eh Warren?), that he sought her out for the romantic role
opposite him in BUGSY (7.5/10).
Bruce Willis was born in Idar-Oberstein, West Germany.
Director Zwick executive-produced the famed baby boom TV drama
"thirtysomething" (1987).
Tony Shalhoub was born in Green Bay, Wisconsin, and married to actress
Brooke Adams (Who once turned down an offer to be one of the original
Charlie's Angels.) He played Antonio Scarpacci for several years on TV
"Wings" sitcom.
This film was previously titled AGAINST ALL ENEMIES and MARTIAL LAW.

Title
Review for World Is Not Enough, The (1999)
Test your skill at our James Bond Movie Trivia Quiz exclusively at
http://www.joblo.com/
For this special occasion, JoBlo's Movie Emporium was lucky enough to land
an exclusive interview with the man behind the men who have portrayed him
since this unstoppable franchise began in 1962...none other than James Bond
himself. The floor is yours, gentlemen.
JOBLO: How do you do, Mr. Bond?
JAMES BOND: Bond, James Bond.
JOBLO: Yes, I know. Uhhmm, Mr. Bond, I just came back from a preview of your
latest film called THE WORLD IS NOT ENOUGH, and I will be honest with you in
saying that it was a good film, but it didn't spark of much originality, you
know what I mean?
JAMES BOND: (looking around aimlessly) Do you know if the waitress is coming
around? Originality, you say, well tell me this, Mr. American, why mess with
a good thing, do YOU know what I mean?
JOBLO: Yes, I understand what you're saying, Mr. Bond, but what I'm saying
is, and this is with no disrespect intended-
JAMES BOND: I bet! (looking at another table) Is that Pussy Galore over
there?
JOBLO: It's a good movie, but I don't know, it just seemed to be missing
that spark. I mean, I've completely forgotten about the whole movie and I
saw it less than an hour ago. What does that say?
JAMES BOND: It says that you are slow of mind, my friend.
JOBLO: I don't know, Mr. Bond, I mean, it's weird, because the film starts
off with a bang, and I mean a real BIG bang, what a cool opening sequence.
JAMES BOND: No stunt doubles either, my computer geek friend, that was
aaaaaaall James!
JOBLO: Well, whoever it was, it was way cool. I can't say that I remember a
better opening sequence in any of your other movies. Also, the gadgets were
all there aplenty and very original, the action scenes were decent, but one
too many explosions for my taste-
JAMES BOND: I told Mike to cut a couple out, but would he listen? Noooooo-
JOBLO: You know what the bottom line is here, James? The bottom line is that
if people go into this film expecting a "James Bond" movie, that is exactly
what they'll get. James Bond. With all his cooky gadgets, his sexy "Bond"
girls, his cool cars, slick suits...
JAMES BOND: What organization did you say you were with?
JOBLO: (signaling to the waitress) One Martini for my friend over here,
shaken, not stirred.
JAMES BOND: You were saying?
JOBLO: One thing that did kinda bug me was the fact that it seemed to go on
forever. I mean, how long was this thing, over two hours at least!
JAMES BOND: I think it's about two hours and ten minutes, but that's WITH
the credits, which you shouldn't really count because--
JOBLO: Whatever, James. It could've been cut is all I'm saying. No need to
take it personally. Sheesh!
JAMES BOND: But what about the girls, huh? The girls were pretty, weren't
they?
JOBLO: Pretty, schmetty. Sophie Marceau was great but what's the deal with
Denise Richards, a "nuclear physicist" running around in a tight tank top
all movie? Plleaaaaase! I mean, don't get me wrong here, James, she looked
great and all, but boy-oh-boy, you guys really caught the Jennifer Love
Hewitt fever, eh?
JAMES BOND: (grabbing his Martini from the waitress) Hi there. I'm Bond.
James Bond. And your pretty name would be? (waitress grimaces and walks
away).
JOBLO: Ouch! Denied!
JAMES BOND: (looking into his glass) Excuse me, there's no olive in here!
JOBLO: Forget it, dude. All you are to them is a guy in a suit with horribly
corny pick-up lines. You're just like any other agent in this town. Which
reminds me, what's with all the corny lines in this film? Me thinks you guys
have totally overplayed your double-entendre card. Everything you say seems
to have a sexual connotation attached to it. You gotta get with the times,
James, it's the 90s man, AIDS and stuff.
JAMES BOND: What was your name again?
JOBLO: Blo. JoBlo.
JAMES BOND: Blow? Interesting. Have you ever thought about being in a Bond
movie?
JOBLO: Okay, take it easy, Jimmy, this is when things could get ugly. Let's
wrap it up, shall we?
JAMES BOND: Wrap away, ol' boy!
JOBLO: Well, I guess I could recommend this film to all people who want to
see a good James Bond movie filled with all of the typical James Bond
devices including some cool action sequences, an over the top villain and
worldly master plan, the Austin Powers-type "torturing instead of killing"
scenes-did you see that movie, by the way?
JAMES BOND: Overrated. Mike Myers is a genius though, that Dr. Evil
character was quite the hoot!
JOBLO: Like I said, if you don't mind the corny lines and the wet T-shirt
shots of the Bond girls jumping around while Bond saves the world, check it
out. It is what it is! All in all, a decent time at the movies.
JAMES BOND: I personally think you're being a little overcritical, but I
suppose you do have a right to your opinion.
JOBLO: That I do, dear Jimmy, that I do. All work and no play makes JoBlo a
dull boy.
JAMES BOND: By the way, what are you doing after this interview? Maybe you'd
like to come back to my place and I'll show you this new "device" that Q
built for me...
JOBLO: Uuuuhmm, no thanks, dude. I'm all good on this side of the road, if
you catch my drift? (To waitress) Check, please?
JAMES BOND: (reaching for JoBlo's hand) But I'm trying to "get with the
90s", Mr. Blow...
JOBLO: This interview has gotten waaaay out of hand, dude (gets up and
leaves). Thanks for your time, man. You're pretty cool for an ol' geezer.
MOONRAKER is still my favorite though. Jaws rocked!
JAMES BOND: (as JoBlo leaves) Oh, C'MON, I was just teasing for God's
sakes!! (to himself) Damn Yankees take everything a Brit says so seriously.
We can be funny too, you know. Doesn't anybody remember Benny Hill? (looking
back at the other table) Pussy, Pussy is that you!?
(The previous interview was not an actual event and did not mean to imply or
attempt to imply anything about Mr. Bond or his great franchise, other than
to present an alternative method for JoBlo to present some of his menial
observations on said film. James Bond does not really exist. We apologize
for the ruse.)

Title
Review for Body Shots (1999)
For more reviews and screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
The tagline to this film is "There are movies that define every decade..."
which in my opinion, refers to either THE BREAKFAST CLUB or WALL STREET from
the 80s, and yet unclear as to which movie from the 90s. FIGHT CLUB perhaps?
One thing IS for sure and that is the fact that BODY SHOTS isn't that film!
Creating this false sense of expectation sure isn't going to help this
film's success either. Wake up, fellas, execs don't decide which film
defines a decade...audiences do that!
PLOT:
Four single horny twenty-something guys prepare to go out to a nightclub in
order to hook up with four twenty-something single young horny females. They
drink, they meet, they dance and they f*ck. Some of the drinking, partying
and sex is cool and fun, and some of the drinking, partying and sex is not
cool and not fun. An accusation of date-rape is the center of the film's
second half.
CRITIQUE:
This film seemed to have two levels of entertainment. One part of the film
was about a bunch of guys and girls talking about sex like it was bubble
gum, while the second part of the film essentially turned into an ugly
date-rape situation, in which everyone is asked to figure out which half of
the "he said/she said" scenario they are more comfortable believing. Or then
again, as Roger Ebert mentioned in his review, this film is probably less
about date-rape than it is about alcoholism. I tend to agree. Everyone in
this film drinks...and I mean drinks! It's obvious by the end of this film
that alcohol played a large part in the night of every one of these "kids",
and that sex and alcohol could provide for a lethal combination. But does
all this make for an interesting movie? Not really. I thought the actors
were all okay, although not a one stood out of the pack. Actually, I take
that back.
Mr. Ron Livingston was the highlight of this film with his hip doofus
character sprinkling the movie with much needed humor from time to time. The
screenplay did also provide for some interesting insight into the different
perspectives on sex from both sides of the fence, with at least one
engaging, yet overlong, deliberation about blowjobs sure to keep most guys
interested for at least that little while. Other than that, most of the
characters were kinda boring, each with their particular "way of thinking",
and the direction of the film was needlessly over-stylized with several
slo-motion shots and views of the city feeling out of place in a
character-based story. The film also offered direct interaction with many of
the characters, as each one spoke to the camera every now and again. This
seemed like a good idea, but once again, the lack of charm or spark from
most of the actors, and the director's camera trickery, just seemed to take
away from anything which may have come from this addition. All in all, an
over-stylized TV Movie of the Week for those folks who actually don't enjoy
watching the classics like GO and SWINGERS over and over again. Luckily for
me...I am not one of those people. And if you're really in the mood for a
picture of rich, snooty kids who like to take drugs and f*ck the world,
check out LESS THAN ZERO...now there's a good movie!
PS: Note to studio. If you want to label a film as one that will "define a
decade", how about you make sure that all of the twenty-something characters
to which we're all supposed to be able to relate, don't drive Mercedes
Benz's, live in beach houses and have just signed $5Million contracts to
play for the Oakland Raiders. I'm sitting in the theatre in a Tee and
Bermudas with nachos running down my face, and somehow, I don't see myself
in the same boat as these rich brats. But I digress. Burp!
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
This film was originally titled JELLO SHOTS, but was forced to change its
moniker when the JELLO company threatened to sue. Considering the
transgressions that occur after most of the characters in this film drink
these "jello shots"- I can't say that I blame them. The film also went
through two other titles including LAST NIGHT and THE NIGHT BEFORE.
Strangely enough, the screenwriter of this film, David McKenna, is the same
fellow who wrote one of 1998's Best Pictures, AMERICAN HISTORY X starring Ed
Norton as a skinhead. This was only his second produced screenplay. His
third is entitled GET CARTER and is set to star Sylvester Stallone.
This is director Michael Cristofer's motion picture directing debut. He
previously wrote and directed the TV movie GIA starring Angelina Jolie. He
also wrote the screenplays for such films as THE WITCHES OF EASTWICK, THE
BONFIRE OF THE VANITIES and MR. JONES.
Actor Sean Patrick Flanery is a triathlete with a black belt in karate.
Jerry O'Connell's real name is Jeremiah O'Connell. He starred in his first
film, STAND BY ME, at the age of 11. After that film, Jerry went back to
school and did not become a full time actor until he graduated from college,
although he did appear in several things along the way.
Actress Tara Reid began her career on TV in such shows as "Saved by the
Bell: The New Class" and "Days of our Lives".
Actress Amanda Peet has also made her share of TV appearances including one
on "Seinfeld", in which she played a character named "Linette" in the
episode called "The Summer of George".

Title
Review for Dancer in the Dark (2000)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Several "experiments" were tested in the film industry this year. Director
Mike Figgis decided to put together a slew of actors with no script and tape
them for 90 minutes straight and turn it into a film entitled TIME CODE. An
interesting experiment which was also entertaining, at least, in my point of
view. Director Kenneth Branagh also tested a small experiment when he mixed
Shakespeare and old-time musicals in a bag and came out with LOVE'S LABOUR'S
LOST. Another interesting experiment which was for me, even highly
entertaining, despite its fluffiness.
And now comes Lars Von Trier, winner of the 2000 Cannes Palme D'Or award,
with a dramatic motion picture starring singer Bjork in her acting debut, in
a film which courageously attempts to mesh an extremely serious dramatic
story with Hollywood musical interludes? Yup...let's see how that worked
out.
PLOT:
An immigrant woman who is slowly losing her sight is saving up money to give
her kid an eye operation so that he will not go similarly blind in the
future. Her neighbor is a married copper who needs dough to pay the mortgage
and maintain his wife's standard way of spending money. The two become
friends and share their troubles with one another, until the day things
begin slowly disintegrating in both of their lives. Expect musical
interludes during the film, as the lead character escapes reality via a
fantasy world of Hollywood musicals.
CRITIQUE:
A very strange, provocative film which cannot leave you without an opinion,
featuring some great acting, some interesting musical numbers but ultimately
an experiment that runs too long and doesn't provide for much true emotional
attachment or appreciation. Now before every art lover begins to bust my
balls, here's what didn't work for me in the film. This movie reminded me a
lot of those modern pieces of art. You know, the kinds of pieces which
amaze, delight and touch many quite deeply, while others shrug them off as
just plain junk...and pretentious to boot! Well, I certainly wouldn't call
this film junk (pretentious, natch), in fact, I admire it greatly for its
courage to break all of the rules and try something very different, but for
me, the overall film wasn't anything more than that...an experiment. And
despite appreciating the acting throughout most of the film, I didn't
particularly get attached to any of the characters, and could not feel
anything for them as negative elements began to touch their lives. Perhaps
it was because of the musical interludes which led me to interpret it all as
one big fantasy, or perhaps it was because the film just moved too slowly
and the lead character was too irrational and sacrificial for me to believe,
but whatever the reason, the film itself left no emotional resonance on me.
That's not to say that the movie stunk, but it certainly didn't overpower me
as it did many others who apparently left the theatre deeply touched and/or
moved. I enjoyed the performances, particularly Bjork, who should definitely
get a nod for this, the songs and dance numbers, which were shot using 100
locked-down video cameras and a look different from the rest of the film,
and the ambitiousness of it all. Mind you, I didn't particularly care for
the lyrics of the songs, which were "spoken" rather than sung and just
seemed kind of...well, lame. You haven't seen a movie until you've seen
David Morse dance and "talk along" with a musical ditty. Trust me, see it
and be afraid...be very afraid.
But here you have this very, very serious story being told by a woman whose
motivations I just didn't buy into. She seemed to be writing off everything
else in her life, just to get her son that operation. And even though I
appreciate her altruistic sentiment, the film just wasn't able to pull me
into its corner in that respect. And let's not kid each other here, this
film is not for everyone. The so-called "art-house" crowd will undoubtedly
eat it up, but I don't see most regular movie-goers appreciating much about
this film. Films generally fall into several categories: fun cheese (which
this is not and doesn't pretend to be), entertaining and light (which this
is not and doesn't pretend to be), deep and emotional (which this wasn't for
me but does pretend to be) or just interesting as a watch (which this was
for me and did pretend to be). The film is also partly shot in Dogme95
style, natural lighting, lots of handheld cameras, a real "documentary"
feel, which may or may not turn off certain people. I enjoyed the acting,
appreciated the originality of it all and liked the songs by Bjork (but then
again, I've always been a fan of hers), but didn't really "get into the
story", thought it moved too slowly and ran way too long, and didn't buy
into the lead character's motivations. Admittedly, there was one pretty
harrowing scene in this film featuring one of the most realistic murders
that I have seen on screen, but I guess that overall, you could say that I
am on the fence with this one. I liked the experimental aspects of the
movie, but not so much the complete movie itself. Now that was easy, wasn't
it? Yipes.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Bjork's last name is Gudmundsdottir. She has one son with ex-husband Thor.
She comes from Iceland and used to be the lead singer for the pop-punk band,
"The Sugarcubes". Since leaving the band, she has led a successful solo
career of her own. She won the award for Best Actress for this film at the
2000 Cannes Film Festival, after which she apparently noted that she would
never act again. She was originally hired by director Von Trier to compose
the songs for his "radical anti-musical", but after spending a year
identifying with the doomed, self-sacrificing heroine in the script, she
finally decided to accept Von Trier's continuous pleas to portray the woman
on camera.
Director Lars Von Trier's advice to Bjork in regards to her character was,
"Please don't act. I hate acting; feel yourself through it." So Bjork claims
that she kind of "became her".
Ironically, this film features continuous references to one of the greatest
musical movies of all-time: THE SOUND OF MUSIC. In fact, Bjork's character
is set to play Maria in the theatrical version of the film in this movie.
Cameo appearances in this film include Stellan Skarsgard, Udo Kier and Joel
Grey.
Despite this film being set in the state of Washington, most of it was shot
in Sweden. The rumor is that this was done because director Lars Von Trier
doesn't take airplanes.

Title
Review for Mission to Mars (2000)
For more reviews and movie news, visit http://www.joblo.com/
So what do you get when you mix together plot elements from various
successful sci-fi films such as CLOSE ENCOUNTERS OF THE THIRD KIND, 2001: A
SPACE ODYSSEY, APOLLO 13 and CONTACT? Well, whatever it is, you'd sure as
hell hope that it would be a thousand times better than this shoddy attempt
at such a melange, considering the disastrous results we're left with here.
This is a film that takes a little bit of everything, but ultimately adds up
to a lot of nothing! It's like I said...this movie sucks.
PLOT:
A rescue crew of astronauts is sent down to Mars in the year 2020, after an
unknown energy force leads to a loss of contact with the previous gang of
space aviators to visit the red planet.
CRITIQUE:
Extremely underwhelming is the best way to describe this movie. Uneven,
would be another. The trailer for this movie actually showed some promise,
the buzz around it had been so-so, and even the film itself starts off with
a decent first twenty minutes, all leading you to believe that it's actually
going to go "somewhere". But it isn't long before the entire movie
downshifts into neutral, features more space walks than anything interesting
on the cherry-colored planet, tries too hard to get us into the "pain" of
some its characters and unsuccessfully tosses some romance into the mix. In
a sci-fi movie? Well, I don't know, much of it just seemed like a bunch of
nerdies talking techie jargon for about an hour and a half, only to figure
out some big secret in the end, a secret which practically had me yawning
with excitement. Ultimately, this is a movie that starts off with a decent
premise, joins the crew in their "misadventures in space" for the main crux
of its journey, and eventually settles down for one of the most
anti-climactic endings this side of CONTACT. Mind you, if you enjoyed that
film's shrug-of-the-shoulders ending, you might just enjoy this frivolous
ditty as well. Of course, I don't remember CONTACT having such obvious and
painfully distracting computer generated effects at its end of story. Ugh.
What a friggin' mess.
Films like this generally get me wondering about the brass in Hollywood
again. Didn't anybody recognize the crappiness in this script? Didn't they
read the bad dialogue, the cheezy lines, the obvious derivative nature of
the work (Mind you, with a director like DePalma at the helm, that ain't
saying much!). Of course, you can't really blame the brass for the inclusion
of Jerry O'Connell in this fine crew of thespians. 'Nuff said. Neither can
you blame them for DePalma cranking up the juice on the film's musical score
during the last fifteen minutes, presumably in order to wake the audience up
(Okay, we get it Brian, this scene is supposed to be
powerful...wow...yawn...my ears hurt!). So is anything salvageable in this
movie? Sure. Gary Sinise does another great job, as does Cheadle, the film
doesn't completely bore you as much as it just moves along slowly without
anything really interesting happening, and yes, the "sand-twister" effect
that you see in the commercial is well done. Other than that? I guess I
could say that I admire how filmmakers have become so much more devious in
their product placement strategies...oops, did I say "admire", I meant "am
disgusted"! All in all, this movie delivers very little in actual substance,
offers two-bit dialogue masked in a lot of sci-fi mumbo-jumbo, pretends to
be deep when really it's just sappy, and eventually just settles into an
ending which, other than presenting us with a pathetic computer graphic as a
part of the story, gives us little more to think about than how we might be
able to get our money back for sitting through this rehashed dreck. Go see
THE NINTH GATE...now there's a great movie!
And on a personal note, I think it's time for DePalma to stop worrying so
much about his proverbial 12-minute uninterrupted film sequences, and start
worrying more about how crappy his movies are getting.

Title
Review for Moulin Rouge! (2001)
For more reviews and movie scripts, visit http://www.joblo.com/
PLOT:
A British poet moves to France and finds himself in a position to write 
a play for the Moulin Rouge. Soon thereafter, he falls in love with one 
of its stars, Satine. But the play and the Moulin Rouge will not go on 
unless a certain Duke invests his money into it. The catch? The Duke is 
also in love with Satine and doesn't know about the secret love affair 
between the poet and Satine. Oh yeah...and people sing throughout!
CRITIQUE:
A surprisingly potent love story is placed inside a red-hot bottle of 
music, dance, colors and vibrancy, and splashed across your movie screen 
with love as its foundation. Will everyone like it? Certainly not, the 
film has a certain over-stylized energy about it which may not sit well 
with everyone (I personally enjoyed most of the film's unique camera 
trickery, but did get lost in its frenzy from time to time), but anyone 
who loves musicals is sure to at least appreciate Mr. Luhrmann's bold 
approach to reviving this lost genre of films. I never did like musicals 
myself but ever since I was pleasantly surprised by last year's LOVE'S 
LABOUR'S LOST, I've opened my eyes to them, and with this film, you 
simply could not close them back again (there's so much happening on 
screen all the time!). I've also gotta credit all of the actors with 
amazing performances across the board. Nicole Kidman, wow, I was never 
much of a fan of hers, but she really gives you everything in this film. 
Dancing, acting, loving, crying, singing, fainting...she covered every 
angle out there and actually got me to invest myself emotionally to her 
character. And yes, I will even go out on a limb and ask the Academy to 
remember her at the end of this year if no other major actress roles 
have come through for a nomination as Best Actress. But let's not forget 
McGregor either. His ying to her yang, Ewan also surprised me with a 
different side of himself, one which resonated a genuine sense of 
passion, love, anguish and song! Damn, that boy could sing! And even 
more kudos go out to Jim Broadbent and Richard Roxburgh, who played the 
Duke and Mr. Zidler, for presenting us with more than just your everyday 
one-dimensional secondary characters. They are also a big part of what 
makes this movie work.
Of course, the film's main draw was its use of modern songs and lyrics 
inside a world of the past, and that experiment on its own definitely 
won me over. Anyone who could successfully incorporate Elton John, Kiss, 
Madonna and Nirvana into the same movie song list is "okay" in my book! 
In fact, many of the song sequences were beautifully sung and 
choreographed, touched up with stunning sets and atmosphere, and left 
quite an impression in my mind. One of my favorites was when the whole 
"gang" from the Moulin Rouge was trying to convince the Duke to invest 
with them by dancing and singing a rapid-fire ditty inside the big 
elephant. A sure-to-be classic scene (I know that it might sound goofy, 
but when you see the movie, you'll see what I mean). But in the end, 
movies like this are ultimately going to be judged by their basic 
storylines and I have to tell you that I too was quite shocked to find 
myself attached and rooting for the characters in this film. Thumbs up 
to Baz Luhrmann on two counts then: one for creating an extraordinary 
vision of an underground world so delightful and peppy and two, for 
co-writing a touching, funny, original and romantically tragic 
screenplay. This movie works because it enraptures its energy, love, 
style and wonderful set designs with solid acting, captivating song 
sequences and a love story that is sure to touch your heart. Yeah, JoBlo 
ain't a wuss but he sure lapped up everything that the director was 
handing out at this fantasy land. What's next...Broadway?
Where's JoBlo coming from?
The Cell (8/10) - Dancer in the Dark (5/10) - Everyone Says I Love You 
(5/10) - Grease (8/10) - A Knight's Tale (7/10) - Love's Labour's Lost 
(8/10) - The Nightmare before Christmas (10/10) - O Brother Where Art 
Thou (7/10) - South Park (9/10) - The Sound of Music (9/10)

Title
Review for Being John Malkovich (1999)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
I've always loved director Spike Jonze's original music videos ranging from
the Beastie Boys' "Sabotage" to Bjork's "It's so quiet" to Daft Punk's "Da
Funk", so I was one of the first to applaud his transition to movies with
this, his motion picture directorial debut. With Jonze's obvious penchant
for the creative, I expected nothing less that a film that would be unlike
any other. And boy-oh-boy, did he deliver on that expectation.
PLOT:
An unemployed puppeteer finds himself a temporary "regular job" as a file
clerk in an office on the 71/2th floor of a corporate building. One day, he
discovers a tiny door and a room which apparently leads into the brain of
actor John Malkovich, allowing anyone who enters the portal to automatically
be inside the thespian for about 15 minutes before being spit out and onto
the side of a New Jersey Turnpike. Got that?
CRITIQUE:
This is one messed up movie! Messed up in a good way, of course. This is
probably the most creative film of the year with a script loaded with layers
of surreal cream, a cast playing against type and scoring with solid
performances all around, and an inventive look inside the infamous
Wharhol-annointed "everyone will get their 15-minutes of fame" parable. On
top of all that, this film actually makes sense (for the most part) unlike
many of the other "weird" films which attempt to break the calmness of
Hollywood's arrangement with the mediocre (see BREAKFAST OF CHAMPIONS) and
is genuinely funny! I could see Dali and Frued sitting around with some
over-salsa'd nachos and having a blast with this movie! Oh, and how I
wouldn't mind being a fly on the wall when they attempted to interpret this
film's many zings and zangs. Fry this egg, why don't you.
What was even cooler about this film was that I never knew what was going to
happen next. In fact, its main plot force of a portal leading inside actor
John Malkovich's head was just the springboard from which an even wilder
ride through one's own conscious and subconscious feelings of identity,
life, love and sexuality took form. Wonderfully written, succinctly directed
by Jonze, who could not have picked a more appropriate script for his own
paranormal sensibilities, and featuring an unrecognizable great performance
by Cameron Diaz, another solid show from Catherine Keener, and Cusack
showing us that he can play more than just a wise-cracking smart-ass. It
also needs to be said that actor John Malkovich, besides being a good sport
about the whole thing, plays himself and all the other characters extremely
well, and does quite the job of convincing everyone that he is himself (?).
Looking back, there were no specific scenes in this film which were
particularly memorable, and the script may have gone a little over-the-top
in certain respects (did they really have to be living with a monkey?), but
one cannot blame the genius when running rampant and dropping a couple of
their eccentricities by the wayside. All in all, an entertaining surreal
ball of confusionary psychological fun for the strange one in all of us.
Also, look for a couple of pretty cool cameos by some of Hollywood's
hipsters. Definitely, NOT for everyone!
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Director Spike Jonze's real name is Adam Spiegel. He was born in St-Louis,
Missouri, and recently married the daughter of legendary director Francis
Ford Coppolla, Sofia. This union would make actor Nicolas Cage his
cousin-in-law. Some of you may remember Spike as an actor in this fall's
critically praised flick, THREE KINGS, in which he played Conrad Vig, Mr.
White Trash himself.
Charlie Kaufman's next screenplay is an offbeat romantic comedy called HUMAN
NATURE and will feature Patricia Arquette as a woman with too much body hair
in love with a man with the world's smallest penis who, in turn, is in love
with a perfect French beauty. When a man, raised as an ape, enters the
picture, it throws things out of balance. Spike Jonze will co-produce.
Catherine Keener is married to fellow actor Dermot Mulroney.
Look closely and you will see actor Gary Sinise sitting behind John
Malkovich in one of the pictures of his upbringing, as he and Sinise
co-founded Chicago's Steppenwolf Theatre. Malkovich recently broke up a
street fight in Spain and lives in France with his family.
Cameron Diaz was set to play Sonya Blade in 1995's MORTAL KOMBAT, but broke
her wrist prior to filming and was replaced by actress Bridgette Wilson.
Yes, one of the producers of this film is none other than the lead singer of
the rock band R.E.M., Michael Stipe.
Orson Bean, the man who plays Dr. Lester in this film, was blacklisted by
Hollywood in the 1950s.

Title
Review for Out of Sight (1998)
Steven Soderbergh takes a shot at another one of Elmore Leonard's
famous crime novels. He follows the recent footsteps of Quentin
Tarantino with JACKIE BROWN (6.5/10) based on Leonard's "Rum Punch",
Paul Shrader's TOUCH (5/10) and Barry Sonnenfeld's GET SHORTY (7.5/10).
Soderbergh is best known for his award-winning debut film SEX, LIES AND
VIDEOTAPE (Winner of the Palme D'or at the 1989 Cannes Film Festival.)
Since then, he hasn't done anything of great interest.
PLOT:
Extreme bank-robber Foley falls into another caper with partner Buddy,
and a host of other lowlifes after his recent stint in the big house.
During his escapades, he meets US Marshal Sisco, who takes a liking to
this con man, who in turn, falls for the luscious government agent. 
CRITIQUE:
Great crime picture, with interesting performances, unique style and an
intertwining, captivating plot. This movie comes closest to PULP
FICTION (7.5/10) in its style and feel, and definitely delivers on the
appeal elements more successfully than Tarantino's
over-character-developed film JACKIE BROWN. Mind you, this movie does
lack the hipper-than-thou dialogue that was sprinkled throughout PULP
FICTION, but even still, it manages to pull off a great addition to the
crime genre. It's got its thrilling moments, its funny moments, and
even its sexy moments. Like PULP FICTION, the plot goes back and forth
through time, but it is never confusing, and never gets in the way of
the interesting crime-ridden plot line.
The characters are real, or at least feel real, and the developing
relationship between the two leading antagonistic characters is
well-done and believable. Soderbergh's shooting style is slick, and
reminiscent of some of the best '70's exploitation movies, as well as
the soundtrack which comes through like the era left behind, but the
sounds not forgotten. All of the stars are great in their roles, with
exceptional marks to Clooney (who's finally beginning to "act") and
Lopez, who comes through in sexy gangbusters! Also, both stars are
extremely "easy on the eyes", with a tip of the hat to Clooney for
getting in such excellent shape for this flick (my brother noted that
you could bounce a quarter off his well-developed six-pack stomach).
Also, Jennifer Lopez is both sexy and gorgeous. But did I mention that
already? 
On the down side, I did find the film to be a little too long on its
running time, but that's about all that I could say on that in regards
to negativity. Add to that, the superior cinematography of the film,
especially during the winter shots in Detroit which were particularly
well-shot, and you've got yourself a great story, told in an original
manner, with two great-looking and interesting leading characters, and
a plot that always keeps you guessing. Top that off with a couple of
cool cameos, and a slick directorial style, and you've got yourself a
nacho-munching cinematic extravaganza for the summer. 
Little Known Facts: 
Three stars from PULP FICTION also show up in this film.
Michael Keaton's character from JACKIE BROWN makes an appearance in
this film as the same character  he played in the former.
Soderbergh wrote the screenplay to NIGHTWATCH, and also had a hand in
the written form of MIMIC (6.5/10).
Jennifer Lopez was one of the "Fly girls" dancers on the "In Living
Color" TV Show. At the movie wrap party for SELENA, on Oct. 28 1996 in
San Antonio, Jennifer's boyfriend Ojani Noa grabbed a microphone and
proposed to her in the middle of the dance floor, presenting her with a
large marquis-cut diamond ring. She said 'yes'.
Nancy Allen of "Brian DePalma's wife for four years" fame, and star of
DePalma's BLOW OUT (7/10) and DRESSED TO KILL (7/10), plays Midge in
this film.
Screenwriter Scott Frank also wrote the screenplay to GET SHORTY,
another one of Elmore Leonard's novels.


Title
Review for 8MM (1999)
For more reviews and movie trivia, visit http://www.joblo.com
What do you get when you slap together the writer of one of the best
thrillers to come out in the last ten years, SEVEN (9/10), the cheezy
director of the awful BATMAN & ROBIN, and the acting talents of Nicolas
"Gimme some tights and I can play Superman" Cage? You get a mediocre
checkmark on the blackboard of gripping thrillers.
PLOT:
A discreet private investigator gets hired by an aging widow of a rich guy,
after she finds a snuff film in his wall-safe, and wants to know if the girl
killed on the grainy movie, was killed for real. The private dick slowly
delves into the sick, perverted world of underground porn, and slowly
uncovers the secrets behind the disgusting film.
CRITIQUE:
Dark, gritty thriller that starts off with a great premise, but loses you
with its snails pace, awful soundtrack and somewhat predictable and weak
conclusion. The film seems to have two endings, one which is quite
see-through and anti-climactic, and another longer, drawn-out finish, which
does score some points for daring, but not enough to make up for the film's
overall laggard inclination. The actors are all very good in their roles,
with Cage coming through as the man progressively being torn apart inside,
and Joaquin Phoenix as the wise-cracking, porn-shop-clerking, side-kick from
hell! Peter Stormare also turns in a fun role as Dino Velvet, one of the
film's more seedier characters. And yes, there are quite a few seedy
characters in this one, but not as many as I anticipated. In fact, for a
film that deals with murder, porn and the Hollywood underground, I didn't
find much to be shocked about. Some interesting scenes, but nothing overly
appalling or horrific. But then again, maybe I watch too much porn myself :)
I guess that if you're the type of person that enjoys lazy-paced films, with
a tinge of character development, then you might enjoy this one, despite its
impotent conclusion. But if you check into this film looking for a
fast-paced thrill-ride, you will be mightily disappointed, because the hop
of this film is not as swift as the mighty rabbit. Having said that, the
cinematography of the film is perfect, with the smell of the underground
practically carrying you out of your seat and literal darkness choking us
all around. But overall, the film doesn't generate enough real thrills,
tension or a full-filling conclusion, to be judged a recommendable thriller.
Rent SEVEN again, or wait for this SEVEN-lite to come out on video, so that
you could sit down with a beer in one hand, a remote in the other, and a
pillow nestled plumply behind your fat head.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Director Joel Schumacher has also directed several music videos, including
"Devil Inside" by INXS, "Kiss From a Rose" by Seal and "The End is the
Beginning is the End" by The Smashing Pumpkins. He has also written several
screenplays including the 1976 comedy CAR WASH and 1985's Brat-Pack hit,
ST-ELMO'S FIRE. He started his career as an art director for television
commercials, before becoming costume designer for such notable films as
Woody Allen's SLEEPER and INTERIORS.
Despite being born Joaquin Raphael Phoenix, at the age of four Joaquin
decided that he wanted a more earthy name, like his elder siblings River and
Rain. So while he was raking leaves with his father he decided on Leaf. In
the early '90's he would take back his birth name.
Actor James Gandolfini was born in Westwood, New Jersey. He graduated from
Rutgers University before beginning his acting career in New York theatre.
He made his Broadway debut in the 1992 revival of "A Streetcar named Desire"
with Alec Baldwin and Jessica Lange. He currently resides in New York.
Along with his success in the United States, actor Peter Stormare continues
to work in his native country of Sweden. He starred in the title role of the
Scandinavian thriller HAMILTON, also featuring Mark Hamill and Leno Olin,
which broke box-office records in Sweden and Norway.
Chris Bauer, the man who plays "The Machine" in this feature, is a graduate
of the Yale School of Drama, where he appeared in such productions as
Othello, The Tempest and MacBeth.

Title
Review for Legend of Bagger Vance, The (2000)
For more reviews and movie trailers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Why do people always insist on trying to make me like golf? It's like those
folks at weddings who always try to get everyone else to dance, when they
obviously don't want to. Hey man, leave me alone, I don't want to dance and
I don't want to play golf! Feels like a strange "cult-like" thing or
something. When I was in business school, it was all about "you gotta play
golf to mix business with pleasure". When I joined the corporate world, it
was all about "you gotta play golf to suck up to the managers" and even now,
my married friends will come around and say "you gotta play golf man, it's
not as boring as it looks on TV".
Well, I've taken a couple of swings at the ball, never played a real game,
but still don't feel any need to wake up at 6am and club a little white ball
for hours on end. Just not my style. And even though THE FIELD OF DREAMS
actually made me feel like playing baseball, this film STILL was not able to
convince me of any so-called "magic" connected to the game. But maybe I'm
just not holding my driver the right way...
PLOT:
A guy who used to be a great golfer goes to war and loses his touch. He
returns in shame, abandons the girl he loved dearly and drinks himself silly
until a local golf tournament needs him to raise the spirits of the
townspeople. At that point, a figure by the name of Bagger Vance helps the
man regain some of his old self-confidence, take a shot at the tournament
and his old glory.
CRITIQUE:
This movie wasn't bad but I honestly expected a deeper meaning behind it
all, a bigger inspiration to go out and do something great in my own life,
or in the very least, a little magic. Unfortunately, none of that came
through in this movie, a film which looked great and felt good, but
ultimately didn't say much to me. The acting was solid across the board, but
nobody really stood out. The message of the movie was nice, but nothing to
change your perspective as such. The costumes were beautiful, the dcor
authentic and even the golf courses majestic, all perfect accoutrements for
the events unfolding around them, but for me, most of the story seemed
pretty predictable from the start and nothing particularly fantastical or
surprising took me aback during the entire picture. Perhaps the film will
mean more to golf fans. I don't know. Perhaps there is a much greater,
deeper inspirational thought or message that I didn't pick up on. Not sure.
All's I know is that unlike the viewing of an actual game of golf, this film
did not bore me out my skull, and did manage to sustain my attention for its
entire two-hour run, so all in all, not bad. I didn't particularly care for
Will Smith's character, who I thought was a little too "nagging" and "glib"
to be of any inspiration to anyone, but he eventually managed to lighten up,
so no major harm done there. One thing that didn't grow on me was this one
particular continuity issue which just bothered me throughout. If Matt
Damon's character was supposed to have been this great golfer back in the
day, why is it that when he returns to the game all those years later, he is
still decades younger than the top golfers of that time? The fact that
Damon's character was this aged golfer who didn't look a day over 25 just
struck me as very odd and somewhat distracting. Or was that just me? Anyway,
other than that, the film was okay but nothing to go out of your way to see
on the big screen. Catch it on video and see Theron perfect the art of
crying in cinema, Smith finally show a little range as a dramatic character
and Damon, well, he's a good actor but a little too typecast for my taste. A
great looking picture with great looking people, a sad-sack romance, some
dopey lines and a so-so plot line. Interest you any?

Title
Review for Hard Rain (1998)
For more reviews and movie trivia, visit http://www.joblo.com/
PLOT:
Four criminals hold up an armored truck during its exit of a
"soon-to-be-flooded" town. Unfortunately for them, one of the drivers
escapes into the town with the dough, and turns the empty town's water
filled streets, into a cat-and-mouse playground between the bad guys,
himself and the local sheriff and crew.
CRITIQUE:
Popcorn Movie (definition): A movie which based on its merits of proper
story-telling techniques, unique style and believable characters, would fail
on all counts. A Popcorn Movie is a film that allows you to turn off your
brain before viewing, crunch down on plenty of nachos and popcorn without
having to worry about missing any relevant dialogue, and revel in its lunacy
of plot, excessive action sequences and shallow objectives. It is NOT a film
to take seriously. With depth of character non-existent, this type of film
allows you to enjoy the unemotional attachment to each person in the movie,
and soak in only its relevant goals of fun, divertissement and campy fodder.
With checks on all counts above, this kind of movie generally doesn't score
more than a respectable 7/10 (ARMAGEDDON topped 8/10 because it actually
managed to add some emotional attachment to some of its characters...a no-no
in "pure popcorn" film), but does provide some brainless entertainment to
all those looking for a quick fix of empty amusement.
Originally titled THE FLOOD, this movie is packed with superficial
characters (save Freeman who pulls off some three-dimension), endless chases
and gunfights, plenty of rain, water and more rain, and enough cheezy
dialogue and plot holes to make any other "Popcorn Movie" candidate beet-red
jealous. All in all, a wonderful representation of a Popcorn Movie done
right, with an extra nod to the editors who managed to keep this puppy timed
to the perfect length of any ideal Popcorn Movie...90 minutes. Bravo to all
involved!


Title
Review for Titan A.E. (2000)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
PLOT:
Set in the year 3028, many years after the planet Earth has been blown to
bits by an alien race named the Drej, a young boy is discovered to hold the
secret map of the Titan machine inside of his hand. The machine holds the
power to unleash another planet for the few surviving humans still roaming
around in space, and the opportunity to re-ignite their evolution.
CRITIQUE:
A visual parade of colors, animation and the darkest corners of the
universe, set the pace for an okay story featuring some not so interesting
characters and some really cool-looking aliens. One of the things that I
like best about movies is how they can so easily transport you into another
realm of life, taking you away from your daily problems, making you forget
where you are, and showing you things you'd never dreamt of ever seeing
before. Like many other sci-fi films before it, this movie manages to take
us beyond our own constricted little world and show us the supposed beauty
and darkness of the galaxy floating above around us. But unlike many of its
live-action predecessors, this film manages to truly create a vision of
another place that I've honestly never experienced before. The beautiful
orange-colored balls floating above the waters of one planet, the wondrous
lights, sounds and waves caressing the infinite space of another, and the
awesome spectacle of the Ice Rings of Tigrin. Wow. Just beautiful to see.
I would watch this movie all over again, even without sound for that matter.
In fact, one of the main problems that I did have with this movie was its
characters, all of whom just seemed a little too bland for my taste. Not
sure if it was the voices of Damon and Barrymore that just didn't click for
me, or if it was the way that the characters were written, very dry and
lifeless, but none of the featured players managed to capture my imagination
as much as the visuals did. I was also taken aback by the juxtaposition of
the amazing "outside" visuals of space, the planets, the ships, the
wonderful colors, and the cartoon looking TV character animation of the
"inside" visuals. Seemed like an odd and somewhat distracting combination.
The story was serviceable enough, with a little bit of action sprayed
throughout, and I definitely loved the soundtrack...an animation movie with
a rock 'n roll touch? Give me more, dammit! Overall, I would recommend this
film to anyone who loves their visuals, who wants to see a different kind of
animation movie, and certainly to all the pot smokers out there, who should
have no problem trippin' all over this film's massive colorful sponge of
delight. Of course, if a tantalizing tale, complete originality or strength
of characters are what you look for in a film, then this puppy might not be
the best thing for you.

Title
Review for Gone in Sixty Seconds (2000)
For more reviews and movie wallpapers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
The Entertainment Weekly magazine movie critic who reviewed this film called
THE ROCK ("big and half dumb"), CON AIR ("huge and moronic"), and ARMAGEDDON
("colossal and brain-dead"). Now those three films combined to gross a
little less than half a billion dollars domestically, so my guess is that
there were actually a few people out there who did appreciate the films on a
certain level. This has always been my main complaint about so-called real
"movie critics". Why review films which obviously don't appeal to your
sensibilities? Get another critic who appreciates certain aspects of that
genre to check it out instead. Phew! Okay...rant over. And oh yeah, the
critic in question gave this film a "D". Duh! Didn't see that one comin'.
PLOT:
A retired car thief is blackmailed back into stealing cool cars when his
little brother's life is threatened by a mean, ol' car thief ring operator.
The older brother basically has 24 hours to steal 50 specific high-priced
automobiles or his little brother bites the dust. Simple enough?
CRITIQUE:
A below-par Bruckheimer film which does satisfy with a couple of cool chase
scenes, a semi-interesting tale and car-stealing scenarios, but ultimately
doesn't blow you away with anything. I enjoyed this film because it looked
cool, the people in it were acting cool and all of the cars in it screamed
cool, but I can't honestly say that it was a good movie. I was never bored
during the film, but other than the last 30 minutes or so, I kept wondering
where all the action was. Just like every other Bruckheimer machismo guy
flick, there is always the prerequisite situation (I like to call it the
"A-Team scene") featuring the rounding up of a certain motley crew of
gruffy, down-and-out and badass MoFos, and the mobilization of the master
plan. Generally, this part only lasts a few minutes and we move on to a
whole lot of wham-bang-and-thank-you-ma'ams, but this film decided to spend
a lot more time on the set-up. Perhaps it was supposed to develop the
characters somehow, but despite the story being absorbing to a certain
extent, I did keep wondering when all the action was gonna take place,
especially when the holes started showing up in the plot.
And when they finally did begin stealing the cars, I was doubly surprised at
how little resistance (read action/fun blow 'em ups) there was as well. I
don't know, maybe I just expected too much popcorn for my buck, but despite
the film coming through as a whole, it did disappoint as an all-out nacho
flick. Cage was Cage once more, the staple hip, tough guy with a heart,
while the rest of the crew was a well-rounded bunch this time around. Lindo
was cool, Duvall is always fun to watch, Vinnie Jones is just waiting to be
discovered as the next action-hero superstar and Ribisi, well, I'll admit
that he's finally starting to get on my nerves with his down-and-out
character portrayals. I was also a little disappointed with the one-liners
in this film, which seemed a little weak this time around. But overall, the
film is a slick one to watch, offering a couple of rockin' action scenes,
some fun characters, and despite its plot holes (the cops know about their
entire plan the whole time, but they decide to send two incompetents after
them?), a somewhat interesting tale. And oh yeah...Angelina Jolie is barely
in it!
At this point, I think everyone knows what a "Bruckheimer movie" is, so
please don't go into this movie expecting anything more than that. With that
in mind, you might just enjoy yourself.

Title
Review for Down to You (2000)
For more reviews and movie trivia quizzes, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Teen flicks. Can a film still be considered a "teen flick" when it is set in
college, speaks of "true love", the path of one's professional career and
reflective issues such as pregnancy, cheating on one's mate and
long-distance relationships? Of course! Especially when it stars two of the
hot young actors from last year's teen flick hits, SHE'S ALL THAT (6.5/10)
and 10 THINGS I HATE ABOUT YOU (7/10), Freddie Prinze Jr. and Julia Stiles,
respectively.
PLOT:
A young man set to begin his life after college, ponders the moments that
led to his first true love, their misadventures within the world of the
tingles, and the happy and sad times of their topsy-turvy relationship.
CRITIQUE:
Kinda cute, kinda sweet, kinda corny, kinda predictable, kinda romantic,
kinda funny, kinda dramatic and kinda forgettable...and ultimately, kinda
so-so. I've generally given greater points to these predictable "teen
flicks" when they come saddled with a couple of charming stars who can hold
my attention for the entire 90 minutes, and this one had just that, with
Freddie Prinze coming through once again as the shy, goofy, romantic lead,
and Julia Stiles, as the cute, ambitious, engaging co-star. Does the film
offer us any new insights into those loopy men from Mars or women from
Venus? Well, not really, but I suppose I just happened to be in the mood for
a light, romantic, easy-going drama with a couple of laughs (The "Cooks!" TV
show was pretty funny), and I guess this movie offered me just that with not
much else. Truth is, this film is probably more of a "video movie" than
anything else. Rent it with your better half, cuddle up next to a
wood-burning fire, warm up some nachos and get jiggy with it for the rest of
the nite. You might also want to bring a date to this film, seeing as it has
a lot to do with people meeting and getting to know each other better, and
be prepared to jostle over the film's depth for a maximum of five minutes
afterwards.
You'll also be happy to know that there are no fart, poop or vomit jokes in
the entire film (Although those types of jokes do have a place in some
movies), and that the two sing-a-long sequences from the respective stars,
despite lacking originality, were quite lovey-dovey and adorable in their
own sugar-coated, manufactured way. I have to admit that I didn't much care
for the exaggerated side characters in the film, especially Selma Blair and
Zak Orth, who just seemed to be there as "bizarre" distractions to the main
cute couple. All in all, I guess it would help if you were in a relationship
yourself when you see this movie, or at least have savored a touch of the
big L sometime in your lifetime. Otherwise, suck in all the sap and goofy
romance still rolling around in your grey ol' heart, and enjoy this light
feather of a film for nothing more than what it is: the simple love story of
a couple of cute kids.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
One of Freddie Prinze Jr's earliest roles was playing the role of "Tough
Guy" on the February 10, 1995 episode of TV's "Family Matters". He had a
four-line part playing some punk kid who brought a gun to school. He then
went on to star in several after-school specials, including one called
"Detention: Siege at Johnson High", co-starring the man who plays his dad in
this picture, Henry Winkler.
Some of you might remember Julia Stiles from one of her earliest roles as
Bridget O'Meara, daughter of Tom O'Meara, played by Harrison Ford, in 1997's
THE DEVIL'S OWN.
Selma Blair is probably best known for her "shocking" french-kissing scene
with Sarah Michelle Gellar in 1999's CRUEL INTENTIONS (7.5/10). Ironically,
Selma herself once auditioned for the role of Buffy the Vampire Slayer, a
role which Gellar has owned since the show's debut in 1997.
This is director Kris Isacsson's first feature film. In 1996, he was
credited as being Barbra Streisand's "assistant" for the film THE MIRROR HAS
TWO FACES (7/10).

Title
Review for Waterboy, The (1998)
For more reviews and movie trivia, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Another comedy pic starring the ever-loving, dumbass character that Adam
Sandler's been portraying ever since he ended his days as a regular cast
member of TV's "Saturday Night Live".
PLOT:
An ignorant football waterboy from the Bayou suddenly discovers a unique
talent for crunch-tackling the opposition, and against the orders of his
overly-protective mother, joins the worst team in the league.
CRITIQUE:
Uninspired, one-joke film gathers very little in momentum, is forgiven for
its obviously standard plot, but not for its lack of constant humor or
originality. This Cajun movie can't even hold a candle next to Sandler's
best comedy up to date, HAPPY GILMORE (8/10). That movie was filled with
jokes left and right, enjoyable characters all around, and many fresh ideas.
Sandler is okay in this one, and does receive a wonderful supporting
performance from Kathy Bates, in a role that seems to have been inspired by
Elvis and his momma, but overall, this flick offers very few chuckles, many
repeat gags, and Henry Winkler. I love "stupid comedies" as much as the next
guy, but this Bourbon-bred story just doesn't have enough mustard to
complete the sandwich. Mind you, if you're really in the mood for some fun,
not-to-be-taken-seriously humor, check out the aforementioned HAPPY GILMORE,
Woody Allen's classic BANANAS (8/10) or the Farrelly brothers' overlooked
KINGPIN (8.5/10). Unfortunately for Sandler and crew, there is very little
in comedic "whoop-ass" in this dud.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
This film grossed close to $160 million domestically, and is famous for
turning actor Adam Sandler into the $20-million-salary-man.
Look for Rob Schneider in an uncredited role as the "townie" who keeps
shouting "You could do it!".
The late comedian Chris Farley's two brothers both have roles in this film.
John Farley plays the character of Tony Dodd, while Kevin Farley plays Jim
Simonds.
Many actual football personalities make appearances in this film as
themselves, including Lawrence Taylor, Lynn Swann, Jimmy Johnson, Dan Fouts,
Chris Fowler and Brent Musburger.
The director of this film, Frank Coraci, also directed the Adam
Sandler-vehicle, THE WEDDING SINGER (7/10). He also plays the role of Adam's
crazy dad Roberto in this picture.
Writer Tim Herlihy, producer on TV's "Saturday Night Live", has co-written
four of Adam Sandler's films with Adam himself. They consist of this one,
HAPPY GILMORE, BILLY MADISON, and the upcoming BIG DADDY. He was the only
one credited for writing THE WEDDING SINGER. He is also a member of the New
York State Bar.
The writer, Tim Herlihy, director, Frank Coraci, and producer, Jack
Giarraputo, of this film were all roommates with Adam during his days at New
York University.


Title
Review for Return to Me (2000)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
You gotta admire David Duchovny on several levels. First of all, he sues his
bosses over at FOX for allegedly screwing him out of certain moneys.
Secondly, he makes use of his time off to do films different than his role
as Mulder on the X-Files. And last but certainly not least, he marries a
sweet, li'l honey-bunny named Tea Leoni, a decision not many other men would
hold against him. Then again, I can't honestly admire him for choosing to
take on this sappy, predictable and ultimately, boring role. And that is the
truth, Mulder.
PLOT:
A happily married man becomes despondent after his wife dies in a car
accident. After some time, the man decides to get back into the "dating"
circuit, only to find himself falling for another woman, who may or may not
have the transplanted heart of his dead wife.
CRITIQUE:
Overly dramatic, monotonous, lagging comedy (?) featuring a decent
against-type performance by Mulder aka David Duchovny, a so-so showing by
Minnie Driver (who managed not to make me hate her as much as usual in this
role), and an interesting premise which ultimately travels straight down the
path of utter predictability. The sad part about it all is that this movie
seems to mean well deep down on the inside, but unfortunately for the
viewer, there's just not enough of anything to get excited about on the
outside. There are a couple of small laughs, but not much more. A few
dramatic moments, but nothing that succeeds in truly grabbing hold of the
ol' heart strings. Just a lot of grade "A" sap. There are also a couple of
shots at romance, but once again, the target is high and the corresponding
tosses are low. Not a horrible movie, but not a good one either. Perhaps if
the large supporting cast had been better utilized, instead of the endless
parade of dull conversations which we are forced to endure, the film
might've enjoyed a success on some other peripheral level. The old men crew
was especially annoying with their uninteresting card games, exaggerated
accents and attempts at being cute and charming. All of which gave my eyes
ample time to practice rolling around in their sockets.
Of course, I do not doubt that others out there might find some of their
idle banter to be funny and interesting, but I personally did not find any
of it amusing. Oh, an Irish/Italian restaurant...how clever. Yawn. And let's
get Archie Bunker to pretend that he's the "Lucky Charms" leprechaun. Well,
he ain't magically delicious! Boring. I don't know, maybe this is just a
film for people with a higher maturity level than myself, or those who don't
mind a simple story with a couple of easy jokes, a safe romance and a touch
of faux-dramatics. Not sure. Maybe predictability and a safety net works for
some people in movies. All I know is that James Belushi had a few good
lines, David Alan Grier always cracks me up, and that's about all the movie
had to offer me, comedy-wise. Add that to the fact that the film started off
reaaaaal slow and dramatic, added barely anything original or charming or
compelling to the tale, and ended off with just about the most obvious
ending this side of the Pamela & Tommy Lee reconciliation, and that's about
all she wrote, people. Duchovny fans may stomach it to see their man in a
role atypical from his others, Minnie Driver fans may like it because of
what she does which apparently is interesting to some people, and lovers of
the standard no fun, no fantasy, no surprise romance "comedies" might also
get their money's worth.
To anyone else, might I suggest renting the always-wonderful-to-watch
romantic classic, WHEN HARRY MET SALLY for the umpteenth time. Trust me,
that is one movie that does make you want to return year after year after
year.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Who knew that David Duchovny had an accident while playing basketball in
high school and is now blind in his right eye? He apparently uses dye to
keep the color right and to keep his pupil from dilating too much. David is
also known to have dated a few starlets before his days as a married man,
including such rumored flames as singer Lisa Loeb, actress Perry Reeves,
Sheryl Lee and Winona Ryder. And to top all that off, David apparently tried
out for the role of Batman in BATMAN & ROBIN, and even holds a degree from
Princeton University, as well as a graduate degree in English from Yale.
Nepotism anyone? Bonnie Hunt, the woman who co-wrote, directed and starred
in this film, graciously inserted four other members of her Hunt clan into
this film's cast (Her directorial debut...taking lessons from the Coppollas,
I see). In fact, her brother, who is physician at Michael Reese Hospital in
Chicago, arranged for the hospital to be used as a setting in the film.
Bonnie's own initial foray in a major motion picture was 1988's RAIN MAN.
Later on, she co-starred once again with Tom Cruise in 1997's JERRY MAGUIRE.
This film was originally titled DISTANCE CALLS.

Title
Review for Blast from the Past (1999)
For more reviews and movie trivia, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Brendan Fraser revisits his role as the "fish out of water" from his famous
ENCINO MAN (7/10) hit back in 1992, while Alicia Silverstone continues to
don her title as the Queen of the cuties, in this romantic comedy released
just in time for the big Valentine's weekend.
PLOT:
It's 1962, and an extremely paranoid man suddenly fears the launch of a
nuclear war. He locks himself and his wife in a bomb shelter underground for
the next 35 years (until the radiation clears away), where they raise a baby
from birth. When the time comes, the boy, now a man, has to go "up" and get
more supplies, and if possible, meet a nice, healthy girl to love as a
companion.
CRITIQUE:
Utterly predictable, this movie touches upon a cute little love story while
sprinkling itself with some jokes that work, others that don't, an overly
emphasized soundtrack and a nice chemistry between the two main leads. And
this is despite the fact that Brendan Fraser does seem to have played this
endearing dimwitted role once too often, and Silverstone yet to have
conquered her puppy-eye and droopy face acting chops (Darn all that, cause
she's still damn cute, and that's notwithstanding the slo-mo shot of her
triple chin chugging up and down near the end of the movie). Their cutesy
but highly foretold love story is one reason that I barely recommend this
film, but the goofy performances of the two seasoned actors, Christopher
Walken and Sissy Spacek, is yet another. Mind you, if you don't like either
one of these actors, skip this flick altogether, cause there ain't much here
that you haven't seen before.
I actually thought that the script could've been much, much funnier, and the
story a hunka-hunka more original, with most of the semi-funny scenes having
been covered in the TV adverts anyway. This film is obviously geared towards
those film-loving teens again, and I guess that in their respect, it might
just be a hit, with the presence of two charismatic actors, an overly slick
soundtrack and a Valentine's weekend love connection release date. But as
for the rest of us, I doubt that it will register any higher than a late
summer Saturday night video rental night tied to some nachos. Maybe even a
Sunday night rental. All in all, a brainless revisited concept done with a
hip 90's soundtrack, a couple of solid veteran actors playing funny,
charming leads, and an overall unmemorable time.
Oh yeah, and their characters are named Adam & Eve. Cute or corny? You
decide.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Brendan Fraser was raised in Holland, Switzerland, and Canada. He was
educated at the Upper Canada College in Toronto, the Actor's Conservatory
and the Cornish College of the Arts in Seattle. He stands 6'3".
Alicia Silverstone became legally emancipated at the tender age of 15 in
order to work the hours required for the shooting schedule of THE CRUSH. She
was turned down for the role of Juliet in 1996's ROMEO & JULIET (6.5/10), a
part that later went to Claire Danes. Her first ever acting role was on TV's
"The Wonder Years" in 1988. She was 12 at the time. She is also well-known
for her starring role in three of Aerosmith's coolest music videos "Cryin",
"Crazy" and "Amazing".
Sissy Spacek is cousins with actor Rip Torn, the man who played the
wonderful role of the producer "Arty" on TV's "The Larry Sanders Show".
Actor Christopher Walken was assaulted in a street in New York in 1980 when
he asked two men to turn down their music. His nose was broken in the
incident. He also worked briefly as a lion tamer in a circus at age 15, and
has a phobia of going too fast in cars.
Director Hugh Wilson's big-screen directorial and writing debut was on the
infamous 1984 POLICE ACADEMY. He's best known for having created, written,
produced, directed and even guest starred in the slick TV sitcom "WKRP in
Cincinnati".
Renny Harlin, the producer of this movie, is also a director in his own
right. He's done THE LONG KISS GOODNIGHT (7.5/10), DIE HARD 2 (7.5/10) and
CLIFFHANGER (7.5/10), amongst others. He was married to actress Geena Davis
for about four years.
Review Date:  February 11, 1999
Director:          Hugh Wilson
Writers:           Hugh Wilson and Bill Kelly
Producers:      Hugh Wilson and Renny Harlin
Actors:             Brendan Fraser as Adam Webber, Alicia Silverstone as Eve
Rustikov, Christopher Walken as Calvin Webber, Sissy Spacek as Helen Webber
Genre:             Comedy
Year of Release:  1999

Title
Review for Dark City (1998)
Alex Proyas' visionary follow-up to his big hit from 1994, THE CROW
(8.5/10), is a stunning success on all counts of movie-making magic.
PLOT:
Some eerie "people" named The Strangers living under a "dark city"
attempt to identify the constitution of human beings in a futuristic
setting.
CRITIQUE:
Grand vision. Out of this world special effects (not one bit of cheese
either). Deep story line that allows us to ponder the ramifications of
our childhood, memories, and future behaviour. This movie is set on a
quick pace, and doesn't let up till the very end. It's a very original
story, set to Mr. Proyas' unique style, and dark motif. I never thought
I'd see a movie that was darker than the original Crow, but here it is,
ladies and germs! Obviously, if "dark films" are not your cup o' tea, I
suggest you skip this piece of blackness.
This movie brought back images of BLADE RUNNER (7.5/10) and the
original BATMAN (8/10) (before Joel Schumacher turned the series into a
fantasy cartoon for him and his friends...) in regards to its grandeur
and scale, and certainly will be remembered in the years to come as a
cult classic. On the down side, Kiefer Sutherland's performance as the
Doctor ran a little too close to a bad impression of the Hunchback of
Notre-Dame, but I digress. The love story was also a bit weak, but then
again, if you want to see a good love story, you wouldn't go see a film
called DARK CITY in the first place, right?
Overall, I must say that this film is one that I thoroughly enjoyed
from frame one to frame last, and look very forward to watching it over
and over again, with nachos by my side, and mind set to "absorb". Try
to see this flick on the big screen, boys and girls, it will certainly
make for a stronger impression. Until then, I'm off to find a poster of
The Strangers to plaster all over my walls.
Little Known Facts: 
Film was originally titled DARK EMPIRE and DARK WORLD.
Director Proyas was apparently extremely distraught after the shooting
of THE CROW (and more specifically, the accidental shooting of his
young star, Brandon Lee) and took several years to recover. I would
venture to compare the meaning behind this film with the thoughts that
Mr. Proyas experienced for his ill-fated star.

Title
Review for You've Got Mail (1998)
For more trivia and reviews, go to http://surf.to/joblo
Director/writer Nora Ephron continues her string of carbon copied films
that began with her participation on the screenplay of one of the best
romantic comedies around, WHEN HARRY MET SALLY... (9/10). In 1993, she
decided to write and direct her own romantic comedy about two people
who were meant for one another, but didn't meet until the end,
SLEEPLESS IN SEATTLE (6.5/10), a poor man's WHEN HARRY MET SALLY, in my
opinion. Now, she even goes as far as to take the same stars as
SLEEPLESS IN SEATTLE, basically the same premise, and shines on in her
quest for complete and utter unoriginality.
PLOT:
Man and woman meet on an Internet chat line and begin a
cyber-relationship via emails back and forth. Eventually, both of them
decide that it's time to actually meet each other face to face, without
the knowledge that they are, in fact, bookstore competitors in
real-life. 
CRITIQUE:
Boring, unoriginal, long-winded rehash of two of this writer's earlier
scripts, based on the 1940 film entitled THE SHOP AROUND THE CORNER,
this movie is a perfect example of what Hollywood knows to have worked
in the past, and believes will keep working in the future (i.e. will
keep making money). Take two cute and personable stars of the day, add
a fabricated smidgen of romance, a contrived tinge of comedy, a slew of
wise-cracking and one-dimensional costars, a script comprised of lines
that would only be found in a script, various beautiful shots of NY
during all four seasons, and a baby-boomer soundtrack that will just
have the audience's hair standing up in recognition factor alone, and
you've got yourself a perfect recipe for the lowest-common-denominator
type films that Hollywood keeps cranking out from year to year, without
a hint of originality or enthusiasm.
This movie is not funny, barely romantic (the last 15 minutes are okay,
but only if you want to sit through the first 105 minutes of people
typing, a lot of scripted narration and a grand sub-plot about the
corporate giant stores getting rid of the mom & pops nowadays) and not
at all inspirational or creative. Does this mean that you won't like
this movie? I don't know. All I know is that if you're at all like me,
and you believe in the all-and-mighty theory that when a film's trailer
doesn't seem "do it" for you, the film generally doesn't do it either,
then this film is not for you. Having said that, it was Mrs. JoBlo's
idea to see this movie in the first place, she who actually found this
movie's trailer to be appealing, and she was also quite bored and
uninspired with anything this film had to offer.
The actors are okay, with Meg Ryan shining once more as the
cute-as-a-button store owner, who makes you smile when she smiles, and
ache when heart aches. Tom Hanks, on the other hand, does a decent job,
but between you and me, seems to have put on quite a few pounds of
late, and doesn't project much of a leading man role anymore (Remember
Brando, Tom? Put the desserts down from time to time, buddy. Trust me
on this one.) All of the secondary players are screenplay-generated
fluff parts that seem to want to be clever in every scene, and who are
generically divided into the "good clan" and the "bad clan". Nothing of
three-dimensions here, folks. The soundtrack was nice and the
cinematography beautiful at times, but these are supposed to be layers
of cream added to a solid script, not a replacement thereof. Both
elements seemed to be used in abundance whenever the script needed some
"stalling time", along various montage sequence of Hanks and Ryan
bouncing around. 
This is not a good movie. It offers no originality, very little real
humour, and even less tangible romance. One kick that I did get out of
this film, was the fact that it majestically announced the "selling
out" of yet another independent film actor, in Parker Posey, who plays
the role of one of the most one-dimensional characters that I have ever
seen on film. Congratulations Parker, you are now part of the Hollywood
mold. This film may appeal to some of you who go in with extremely low
expectations, but either way, I suggest you go out and rent WHEN HARRY
MET SALLY instead, and thank me in the morning.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
After a one-shot guest appearance on TV's "Happy Days", producer Ron
Howard asked Tom Hanks to read for a secondary part in SPLASH, and got
the lead instead. He met his second wife, actress Rita Wilson on the
set of the 1985 movie, VOLUNTEERS. They have two children together and
Tom has another son and daughter by his first wife.
Meg Ryan's full name is Margaret Mary Emily Anne Hyra. She is also
married to a fellow actor, Dennis Quaid, with whom she has one son,
Jack Henry. She received $10.5 million for her role in this movie.  
Nora Ephron was married to writer Carl Bernstein, the man who had "a
little bit" to do with the whole Nixon Watergate scandal. They had two
sons together, and Ephron wrote her film novel and film, HEARTBURN,
starring Jack Nicholson and Meryl Streep, based on their marriage. She
is presently married to the writer of the Martin Scorsese-helmed
GOODFELLAS (9/10) and CASINO (7.5/10), Nicholas Pileggi.
The two screenwriters of this script, Delia and Nora Ephron, are
sisters. All of Delia's movie-writing credits are associated with
projects involving her sister, Nora.
Producer Lauren Suler-Donner is the wife of the LETHAL WEAPON movies
director, Richard Donner.

Title
Review for Bounce (2000)
For more reviews and movie wallpapers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
First, Juliette Lewis was dating Brad Pitt. Bounce. Then Brad Pitt hooked up
with Gwyneth Paltrow and Juliette Lewis visited a rehab center. Bounce. Then
Gwyneth Paltrow moved on to the next best thing in Ben Affleck and Brad Pitt
got cozy with Jennifer Aniston. Bounce. The next thing you know, Brad Pitt
marries Jennifer Aniston, and Gwyneth Paltrow and Ben Affleck break up.
Bounce. Then word on the street is that Ben Affleck and Gwyneth Paltrow are
still dating. Bounce. Then, JoBlo realizes that he has to get a life and
stop coming up with cheap gimmicky ways to start his movie reviews. Bounce.
PLOT:
A cocky guy who wants to stay in town to nail a girl he just met in a bar
gives his plane ticket away to a nice guy who wants to get home to his
family in time for Christmas. The plane crashes and everyone aboard it dies.
The cocky guy suddenly feels very bad about his place in life and the wife
of the nice guy is heartbroken about the loss of her husband. One year
later, after getting out of rehab, the cocky guy turns into a nicer guy and
follows his guilty conscience to meet the widow of the deceased man. Without
her knowing who he is, they start to develop a nice relationship together.
CRITIQUE:
A solid relationship movie which cannot be brushed aside with the simple tag
of a "chick flick". This film delivers on many fronts including an
interesting story, drama, humor, engaging characters and surprisingly, a
decent helping of multi-leveled acting. I could generally tell if a "sad
movie" touches me just by the appearance of water in my eyes, and this
son-of-a-bitch had me tearing up left and right. Nice. I call this is a "sad
movie" because it is not an upbeat film by any stretch of the imagination.
It's serious, it deals with a very painful subject and it doesn't pretend to
phony up to many of the Hollywood standards. The ending is left ajar, the
complicated feelings associated with the characters in the film are massaged
from top to bottom and the relationship is not automatically cured with a
catch phrase. Basically, the film gives us a true to life tale of a bad
stretch in the lives of two people, during which they must come to terms
with their own feelings of guilt and unworthiness, before tackling a
relationship with another. The film is also moved along by this whole
connection between the two main characters, but that part of the film didn't
interest me as much as their own inner-struggles. In fact, I thought that
the revelation of the so-called "secret" to Gwyneth's character took a
little too long to be divulged.
I mean, as an audience member, we are in on the concealment from the get-go
and the waiting game just starts to weigh on you after a while. Acting-wise,
I was quite surprised by the performance put forth here by Ben Affleck, who
has proven to be a pro at banging out the charisma, looking great and
running and shooting at the same time, but here he takes it all onto another
level. He makes you like his character despite his many, many flaws. He also
made me cry, and for that, kudos go out to you, young man. Keep up the solid
work. Gwyneth was also very believable as the other half of this film,
especially since she had to play against type, a regular woman with regular
problems. In the end, the characters and the chemistry between the two leads
are what make this story work because you believe in their sorrow, their
hurt and their eventual resolution of issues. I can't say that I found too
many things wrong with this movie. The story was an interesting one. The
characters were believable and well played out. The touching moments were
touching and the lighter moments light. I guess I would've preferred less
time spent keeping the secret away from Gwynnie, but that's just a small
miscalculation, in my humble opinion. Overall, I doubt that this film will
win any awards or cha-chink its way through the box-office, but for me, it
was definitely one of the nicer surprise movies of the year. The kind that
you'll either really like or really think sucks.

Title
Review for Isn't She Great (2000)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Isn't she great? Well, she's actually a boisterous 2nd rate actress who
strikes it big after writing a gossipy trash novel filled with all of the
dirtiest stories she'd ever heard and calling it "Valley of the Dolls".
Hmmm...not so great in my eyes, but definitely an interesting
behind-the-scenes look into the life and times of one Jacqueline Susann and
her rise to fame. She's actually pretty so-so.
PLOT:
Director Andrew Bergman claims that this film is "loosely based" on the life
of Jacqueline Susann, a woman who began her career in showbiz with two-bit
parts and radio spots, and ended up as one of the most controversial and
successful novelists of her generation. Starting from the 1920s and into the
late 60s, this movie also accentuates the impact of her relationship with
husband/publicist Irving Mansfield.
CRITIQUE:
Interesting, funny at times, well cast, this movie works when taken in as
the story of an underdog whose determination, persistence, flair and tinge
of talent take her to the top, but surrenders to mediocrity when considering
itself an all-out comedy or romance drama. I didn't really know what this
film was about before entering the theatre, so just the fact that it was
able to keep me interested all the way through, is a point in its favor.
Having always held a strong interest in discovering the background of all
grass roots success stories, this film handed me a fine helping of
nutritious facts, despite some apparent "loosening" of her real-life story.
One of the areas of this film which didn't quite work for me on the other
hand, included the relationship with her husband/publicist, which seemed
arbitrary and just plain odd in my eyes. The humor was also pretty spotty,
with some solid guffaws from Midler, Lane and Channing from time to time,
but overall, it felt more like a chuckle-and-smile film than anything else.
David Hyde Pierce was also pretty solid as the tight-ass WASPy character, as
was John Cleese, whose small role was actually funny just for his 60s jive
and clothing. In fact, I really did enjoy most of the cast, despite my
reluctance to accept some of their obvious overacting early on, but when the
curtain call came to set, the whole thing just left me with a "whatever"
feeling. I suppose that the many people who do know of this lady, her books
or the movies made in their name, might enjoy this on another level
altogether, but if you're like me, and know little about this woman or her
sleazy novels, I don't think you'll be taken on to any kind of ROCKY
"let's-go-out-there-and-kick-some-ass-in-the-world" type feeling. I would
say that it's a nice movie, enjoyable to watch, but even easier to forget.
See it if you're in the mood for light laughs or appreciate the work of any
of its principals, and enjoy its underdog-done-good story in the meantime.
Otherwise, you could always wait until this puppy shows up on your local
video rental shelves or skip it altogether. Trust me, she's not that great
and your life will be fine without her.
Also, if you're like me, and you happen to live in Montreal, Canada, well,
you could also make a game out of this film, and try to spot any of the
local hangouts which were dressed up like New York in this camouflaged
movie.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Ironically, it turns out that the real Jacqueline Susann wasn't particularly
funny, and that her relationship with Irving Mansfield was actually
"somewhat unconventional", but I guess that's just showbiz!
Well-known critic Roger Ebert has one movie screenplay credit, and it came
by the way of his gig as screenwriter on the so-called "sequel" to the
original VALLEY OF THE DOLLS movie, called BEYOND THE VALLEY OF THE DOLLS.
Known for having written and directed such films as STRIPTEASE, THE FRESHMAN
and HONEYMOON IN VEGAS, this is the first time that director Andrew Bergman
directs a picture based on someone else's screenplay. Interestingly enough,
Bergman received his first writing credit along with four other men,
including Richard Pryor and Mel Brooks, for the 1974 hit comedy BLAZING
SADDLES. Bergman also has a Ph.D. in American History from the University of
Wisconsin.
Interesting casting note in the scene featuring Steve Lawrence and Eydie
Gorme singing at Jackie's "Valley of the Dolls" best-seller party: the part
of Steve Lawrence is played by their actual son, singer/songwriter David
Lawrence, and Debbie Gravitte, who has appeared as Eydie Gorme in the past.
All exterior shots in this film were completed in Manhattan, despite the
rest of the production being shot in Montreal, Canada, due to economics.
Screenwriter Paul Rudnick, best known for his screenplay of IN & OUT, is
rumored to be the writer of a monthly satirical film review column in
"Premiere" magazine, under the name Libby Gelman-Waxner.

Title
Review for Enemy at the Gates (2001)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
PLOT:
It's 1942 and Hitler's German army is making their way across Europe and
Russia. The city of Stalingrad is now in play and the Russians are losing
soldiers in droves. But along comes a young Russian sniper who starts
dropping German leaders like peanuts. The Germans worry and bring in their
own top sniper to whack out the Russian. The two men square off in a beaten
down city as the war rages on around them.
CRITIQUE:
A very tense, cold, authentic-looking movie, featuring an engaging
mano-a-mano battle between two captivating characters and stars, Ed Harris
and Jude Law, many stunning artillery sequences and enough unpleasantries to
turn anyone off to war forever. Here's a movie which takes place during the
second world war, but isn't really about the war at all. This film focuses
solely on the smaller battle within the grander fight for Stalingrad,
featuring two marksmen searching for one another amid the greater chaos. A
concept which might not sound too exciting on paper but once you're in the
theater, this film pulls you in and dropkicks you across enemy lines. It
starts with yet another awesome combat sequence a la SAVING PRIVATE RYAN,
planes dropping bombs, soldiers getting drilled by bullets, pandemonium all
around, but quickly, the story's foundation is revealed to you. Here are the
Russians getting their asses whupped by the Germans and along comes a small
town dude with an ability to strike things down from afar. Is he the hero
needed to boost the morale of the Russian troops? You bet, and the film
really gives you that sense of despair, that lack of leadership and that
much needed fighting spirit required from the Russians. And then of
course...there's Jude Law. What else could a film as such ask for?
Here's a great looking man, admired widely by both sexes, oozing more of his
on-screen persona in this film and then upping the ante with a solid showing
as the sniper who may not be the person that everyone believes him to be.
Here's a character shown to be human with weaknesses of the heart and the
soul. A man caught up in something larger than himself, but able to come to
the forefront and do the things which he believes will help his country win.
Kudos to Law for holding up his end, Joseph Fiennes for coming through as
his nerdy comrade, and the ever-stoic Ed Harris for keeping his eye focused
and standing firm as Law's persistent adversary. This is also a film of
moments. As you might expect, a film focusing on two snipers is likely to
have a few scenes featuring guys staring each other down. And this one does
have plenty of those. But because of the strength of its characters, the
believability of its surroundings, its sheer grandness and its tight story
line, you cannot help but be truly engaged in every second of this film's
suspenseful moments. This movie might not have the grand scope of a SAVING
PRIVATE RYAN, the deep message of a PLATOON, or the poetry of the depressing
THE THIN RED LINE, but it does succeed in telling an interesting story and
delivering on various fronts of entertainment as well. There is also a wide
richness of detail in the film, a superb score which resonates way past the
film's unique credit crawl and some across the board eye-opening
cinematography.
This film was a definite treat for me, especially in the year of crapola
movies thus far. Here's a picture that gives you lots to look at, lots to
pay attention to and lots to care about. And yes, they've even added a small
romance angle for the ladies, which thankfully didn't take up much of the
film's runtime and is, for the most part, credible and touching. A grand
movie filled with suspense, impressive visuals and an absorbing story line!
Where's JoBlo coming from?
The Patriot (7/10) - Platoon (9/10) - Saving Private Ryan (8/10) - The Thin
Red Line (5/10)

Title
Review for Along Came a Spider (2001)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
PLOT:
A bad guy kidnaps a little girl and teases a down-and-out detective with
some clues. Soon thereafter, the detective hooks up with a secret service
agent, who was in charge of overlooking the girl, and the duo set out to
catch the psycho.
CRITIQUE:
I might've actually recommended this movie for video viewing if it weren't
for its final 15-20 minutes, in which several "convenient" plot twists (aka
holes) basically turn this film into mush. How a great actor and a director
who has shown such admirable skill in his previous work (ONCE WERE WARRIORS
and THE EDGE) could've associated themselves to a project so generic and
predictable during its first half and ridiculous and far-fetched in its
second half, is beyond me. Yes, Morgan Freeman can play a great detective,
but does he have to keep proving this point to us every other year?
Actually, I wouldn't really have minded his redundancy if the film was a
solid effort on the whole, but sadly, it just falls apart under its own
overbearing weight of irrationality. I mean, when a detective goes into
someone's apartment, sits down in front of a computer, can't access any
files because of a password, and devises the keyword by thinking back to a
random moment he shared with the owner of the apartment, types in the words
that he remembered and is right on, in one shot...well, that's just plain
stupid! I mean, what are the friggin' chances that those words are the exact
password, dude!?! C'mon...give the audience just a little more credit than
that!
And even though I did greatly admire this film for attempting to do
something original with its ending (a couple of neat twists and turns), it's
all in a wasted effort since the plot points simply do not stick! I mean,
it's nice to surprise an audience but when they don't buy the actual basis
behind the surprise, well then, it's pretty much worth shit, right? And I'm
not exactly sure what Hollywood sees in actress Monica Potter, but to me,
she's basically a charmless version of Julia Roberts in a blonde wig and
half the talent. I mean, there ain't much happening there (other than the
great looks, of course). No zing, no zang. And even though Morgan Freeman
plays another solid detective role, the film's slow pace and ultimate
illogical turns, just don't keep you in the game long enough to care. I
mean, I might see this movie slightly entertaining some who are willing to
forego its goofy twists and leaps of faith, but I think most people want
stories that are believable and realistic, right? And even though most of
this film does give us that, it's generally just photocopied moments from
other movies, with some spots of bad dialogue, a pretty good score and an
ending which certainly goes for the gold, but falls plenty short. Sure,
Michael Wincott was a blast to watch, and his gravelly voice enjoyable to
hear, but aren't we all getting a little sick of these misunderstood "bad
guys" who always seem to want to "play games" with the cops? I mean, c'mon
dudes...let's go for some originality here, some punch, some friggin' new
ideas!!! Skip this one babies, unless you're looking for a low-rent rehashed
version of many better thrillers with a crappy ending to boot.
PS: Whatever happened to Penelope Ann Miller's career? In this film, she's
basically reduced to about three scenes and all she does in them is blubber.
Sadly for us, I think we all know why she's crying...
Where's JoBlo coming from?
The Bone Collector (7/10) - The Cell (8/10) - Fallen (7/10) - Fargo (7/10) -
Hannibal (7/10) - Kiss the Girls (7/10) - Proof of Life (7/10) - Seven
(10/10) - The Watcher (6/10)

Title
Review for Bowfinger (1999)
For more reviews and movie quizzes, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Eddie Murphy is back and I for one am glad for it! Who can blame the guy for
straying towards a couple of kiddie flicks that garnered him millions in
cash ($17M for DR. DOLITTLE), while slowly losing his real fan base of
people who grew up with him on TV's "Saturday Night Live", and his earlier
"funny" movies? I certainly did. But with his two superb performances in
this film, and the wonderfully original script written by Steve Martin, it
doesn't look like I need to worry so much anymore...at least...for now.
PLOT:
Down-and-out producer of films, Bobby Bowfinger, has a good script written
by his Indian accountant, and he wants one of the biggest Hollywood stars,
Kit Ramsey, to star in it. When Kit turns him down flat, Mr. Bowfinger
decides to shoot the movie anyway, by secretly following Kit around with
cameras, and shooting his scenes without his knowledge.
CRITIQUE:
A very entertaining and inventive script tagged alongside some fresh and
revived performances by Eddie Murphy and Steve Martin, turn this film into
an enjoyable time at the cinema. This movie is based on a very funny
premise, features plenty of laughs, great acting and a fun soundtrack. I had
recently given up on Eddie Murphy and his capacity to make me laugh in his
latest pictures, but boy was I wrong, as this humorous film quite clearly
indicates. Murphy apparently improvised some of his lines in this film, and
he is just a wonder to behold. He is perfect as the over-the-top paranoid
superstar Kit Ramsey, and just as hilarious in his other role as Jiff, the
nerdy looking loser who is hired to shoot Ramsey's wide shots. The rest of
the cast is also diverse and a joy to watch, with writer Martin holding them
all together with his absolutely patheticly charming character.
The one reason I didn't score this film any higher than I did was because
the premise of the film is essentially the whole film. There isn't much more
to it than that, and despite never being bored, I did find myself wanting a
few more surprises than I ultimately received. That being said, I am happy
to report that the chuckles did not cease spewing out of my mouth during
this film's entire run, with many potshots at Hollywood types sprinkled
throughout, and a surprisingly sweet ending. Certainly the most original
summer comedy of this hum-drum season, with the prime return to form of
Eddie Murphy, an inventive and Tinseltown-skewering script by Steve Martin,
and an overall fun time at the movies.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
The part of the stalked actor, Kit Ramsey, was originally written for a
white actor, but with Murphy's help, Steve Martin rewrote the script, and
turned his neurotic thespian into an action star, who is an angry black man
with a doozy of a conspiracy complex.
Steve Martin dated actress Anne Heche for two years before she turned into a
lesbian and began dating comedienne Ellen DeGeneres.
Up 'til now, actress Heather Graham has dated director Stephen Hopkins,
actors Elias Koteas, James Woods, and is currently snuggled up to
actor/director Edward Burns.
The Eddie Murphy "running across the freeway scene with zooming cars flying
by" was actually not as scary as it looked in the film, since many of the
speeding autos were actually added later in digital mode. Despite that, the
scene still took months to be approved by leery L.A. highway officials.
Eddie's real-life middle name is Regan.
Now despite brewing up the idea for this film about 10 years ago, according
to Steve Martin, the script for BOWFINGER grew our of his recent playwriting
success with "Picasso at the Lapin Agile". It is only after he had written
"Picasso", that he thought about writing a screenplay in that same spirit,
where he would not care or think about anybody ever seeing it. I don't think
he has to worry about that with this film!
Director Frank Oz is also known throughout the universe as the eternal voice
of "Yoda" in the STAR WARS movies. His full name is Frank Oznowicz.
Actor Jamie Kennedy, who plays Dave the movie-camera-stealing friend of
Bowfinger in this film, may be remember by some of you from his quirky roles
in the two SCREAM movies.
Robert Downey Jr. is a very good actor with serious drug problems (but I
guess that isn't really a "little known fact", eh? :)

Title
Review for Mulan (1998)
Based on an old Chinese folktale, this movie becomes Disney's 36th
animated feature, and its best since THE LION KING back in 1994.
PLOT:
The Huns have invaded China. One man from every Chinese family must
join the Army and serve in the country's defense. Recognizing that her
father is very old and incapable of effective combat duty, Mulan chops
her hair into a boy-cut, and pretends to be a man, so that she can take
her father's place in the war. She does effectively join the troops,
and fight for the honour of her father, her country and herself.
CRITIQUE:
Funny, interesting, and mostly entertaining animated Disney feature
made for the marketing summer of 1998. Having gone in with little
expectations, I must say that I was pleasantly surprised to find many
humorous moments in this animated fable, along with some pretty cool
action sequences, and an interesting lead character in Mulan. Of
course, it goes without saying that the real star of this film wasn't
Mulan, but the tiny disgraced dragon Mushu, voiced by Eddie Murphy.
This little creature managed to get a crack out of the audience during
every single one of its wonderful appearances on the big screen.
Reminded me a little of the "young" Murphy on Saturday Night Live,
before he got all pretty and serious (Surely, many of the lines in this
film were ad-libbed by Murphy himself.). 
The story of this film was also very interesting to absorb, seeing that
it went within a culture that I knew very little about (Mind you, I
really have no idea how accurate this film's facts are, but still...).
The animation was also very well done, especially during the winter
scenes in the mountains, which really looked like the real deal. On the
down side, I guess that the songs in this movie could be considered its
weakest link, but then again, I've never been much of a musical guy
anyway, so that didn't bother me too much. 
Overall, I would say this movie was a touch better than HERCULES
(6.5/10), and just about as good as the unexpectedly decent ANASTASIA
(7/10), but on a much funnier level, thanks mostly to the wonderful
talents of Eddie Murphy. Kids will love it (As loudly expressed in the
theater that I attended with Mrs. JoBlo), and most adults should also
enjoy it. The cinema or video question is one that I would just as soon
leave in your hands considering that I don't know of everyone's
financial situation. But if the movie sounds interesting enough to you,
or your lover's begging you to take her/him, by all means, go ahead and
see it on the big screen. It's fun and genuinely harmless (At 88
minutes run-time...how could you go wrong?)
Little Known Facts: 
Two of this film's previous titles were CHINA DOLL and THE LEGEND OF
MULAN.
Ming-Na Wen also starred in ONE NIGHT STAND (5/10) opposite Wesley
Snipes.
Lea Salonga does the voice of Mulan singing in this movie, as Donny
Osmond does the voice of Shang belting out the tunes.

Title
Review for General's Daughter, The (1999)
For more reviews and movie trivia, visit http://www.joblo.com/
By-the-numbers: A film which introduces characters, situations, dilemmas and
developments that we've seen before in a parade of other films. A film which
can easily be guessed out by the end of frame number one. A film which is
packed to the cap with predictability, leading to very little tension,
excitement, suspense or interest on the part of its paying audience. In
short, a clich-ridden formula film. Welcome to my review of THE GENERAL'S
DAUGHTER.
PLOT:
An undercover Army detective and a rape counselor find themselves locked
inside an investigation into some bigwig General daughter's rape, torture
and murder. They must delve through all of the unspoken Army rules and the
hush-hushes, to figure out the conspiracy behind the shocking murder.
CRITIQUE:
By the numbers (see above). This film is just there. It sits there on the
big screen for a couple of hours, floats around, goes away, hopefully never
to be heard from again. It is so predictable that even a blind man could see
its plot points coming a mile away. It's as suspenseful as a leaf dropping
from a tree. It's as action-packed as a Canadian curling tournament. Get the
picture? I sure did...it's too bad that it took my friend and I less than
two minutes to figure out the entire plot, and to break down each scene
before it was even completed. Easy as pie. It's unfortunate because James
Woods and John Travolta actually have one extremely enjoyable scene together
near the beginning of the film, but alas, t'was not to be (That scene alone
scored two of my four points allotted.) Woods chews it up in the few scenes
that he's in, Travolta passes the test, Cromwell plays, well, Cromwell, and
Stowe is window dressing with a smile (MIA since 12 MONKEYS (8/10) it
seems).
And this predictability isn't reserved only to those who have seen films
like COURAGE UNDER FIRE or A FEW GOOD MEN, it runs deep inside every one of
us who knows to suspect someone as soon as they see their obvious guilty mug
on the big screen. It's like riding a bike. Other scenarios which sponge out
any tension, suspense or interest from this film include every single
character eventually "breaking down" to the investigators without much
reason given, a ridiculously placed background relationship between two of
the lead characters, as much action as my grandparents bedroom nightly, and
a directorial style that can only reward director Simon West with a solid
nomination for the "Best Poor Man's Michael Bay Doing his Best Poor Man's
Impression of Tony Scott" (Add two scenes with sunlight shining through some
half-open shades for grit and integrity, and an all-out rainfall for the
finale for further chaos, and you're a great director. Yawn. Yeah, whatever
Tony...I mean, Simon.)
And aren't we all sick of hearing about these Army "bad boys" and their
overdone "code of silence"?! Enough already! Next subject, please. See it on
video if you wanna fall asleep after seeing a much better movie like AN
OFFICER AND A GENTLEMAN (8.5/10). Otherwise, save yourself the trouble and
go take a crap instead. You'll feel much better afterwards. Trust me.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Ironically, John Travolta turned down the lead role in AN OFFICER AND A
GENTLEMAN, which eventually went to little Dickie Gere. Ironically on James
Woods' part, he completed one of his earliest acting roles on TV's "Welcome
Back, Kotter", starring none other than John Travolta.
Actor James Woods recently confirmed reports of his "big dick" on Howard
Stern's radio program. Unlike rocker Tommy Lee, Woods is also alleged to
have an IQ of 180. He apparently scored a perfect 800 on his verbal SATs and
a 779 on the math section. What a man!
John Travolta is married to actress Kelly Preston, and they have a son named
Jett (Travolta loves them planes!). Word on the street is that the kid was
apparently conceived during a weekend at Demi Moore and Bruce Willis' home.
Director Simon West's first film was the Jerry Bruckheimer produced CON AIR
(6.5/10). Before that, he directed TV commercials including the Budweiser ad
with the dancing ants. Yippee!
Veteran director John Frankenheimer (RONIN (7.5/10), THE MANCHURIAN
CANDIDATE) portrays the character of General Sonnenberg in this film. The
IMDb reports that when Senator Robert Kennedy was shot at the Ambassador
Hotel in Los Angeles on June 5, 1968, it was his good friend John
Frankenheimer who had personally driven him there that day.
Clarence Williams III, who plays Colonel Fowler in this film, is known to
some from his role as "Linc" in the original "Mod Squad" TV series. Younger
folk may remember him as Prince's father in PURPLE RAIN.

Title
Review for Stag (1997)
For more reviews and movie trivia, visit http://www.joblo.com
Look out VERY BAD THINGS (7.5/10), you've got company! Or should that be the
other way around? This film is based on the exact same premise as the
previously mentioned film, but offers a dramatic narrative, rather than the
VERY BAD THINGS black comedy touches, and actually came out a full year
before the former ever saw a movie screen. This film is the slightly better
of the two, because it tackles the issues seriously, and really makes you
feel like this situation could happen to any one of us, and encourages you
to cringe at that very thought.
PLOT:
A bunch of guys get together at a friend's place for a surprise stag party
for their groom-to-be buddy. Once the two hookers/dancers arrive, the party
really gets going, but not until one of the party-girls drops dead via an
accident caused by the fellas. Another accident erases their male escort,
and suddenly all of these men have to face the fact that they have two dead
bodies in the house, and a live dancer wailing to squeal.
CRITIQUE:
This movie grabs you by the balls from its opening scenes, and draws you
closer and closer to the reality of their dire situation as it
systematically touches upon all of the needed elements of a great thriller.
The premise is fantastic and real. The execution and development of their
deeds are sure and believable. And most importantly, the tension and the
intrigue laced throughout this movie, lend a perfect balance to this film's
greatest asset, which is the authenticity of its characters, and the true
appreciation of the unknown future that these very men have to face in every
single scene. The film's conclusion is one of the best that I've seen in
years, and something to be proud of in any production's regard. Think 12
ANGRY MEN meets THE BACHELOR PARTY gone awry.
Add to the film's success, a pretty solid cast of actors, including an
against-type Andrew McCarthy, a genuine Mario Van Peebles, and a
strong-as-ever Ben Gazzara, and you've got yourself a fun time with the
boys. The soundtrack is also very unique and appropriate (Any film that
starts off with a Tom Jones tune is allright in my book), as is its style
and suitable runtime (barely grazes an hour and a half). It's quick, it's
filled with tension and moral issues, and it's got singer-turned-actress
Taylor Dayne stripping down to her skivvies. What else could you ask for? :)
The only semi-negatives in this film were perhaps the tiny plot holes which
are inevitable in a cast and breadth of scope as such, and the lack of oomph
from some of its actors, but in a cast of this size, one can't expect the
Oscars all around. This is a great tension-filled drama that effectively
ponders over every conceivable option and moral issue that would arise
within this very traumatic situation, and adds fuel to that fire, by
providing a respective point of view from a varied crew of men, all carrying
their own concerns, grudges and emotions over their shoulders. Watch it with
your buds or your loved one, and discuss it over a beer afterwards. It's a
great film.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Kevin Dillon, who plays the character of Dan in this film, is actor Mat
Dillon's younger brother. He also played the character of "Bunny" in
director Oliver Stone's classic 1986 film PLATOON (8/10).
John Stockwell's real name is John Samuels IV.
Mario Van Peebles earned a B.A. in Economics from Columbia University in
1978. His father is director Melvin Van Peebles. Mario also directed several
films of his own, including his first, and my personal favourite, NEW JACK
CITY (8/10).
Actor Andrew McCarthy was once considered a part of the "Brat Pack" during
the 1980's. He's played the character of Larry Wilson in both WEEKEND AT
BERNIE's films alongside Jonathan Silverman.
Ben Gazzara's real name is Biagio Anthony Gazzara.

Title
Review for Tomcats (2001)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
PLOT:
A bunch of guys make a bet that would score the last remaining bachelor
among them a pile of money. When one of the buddies falls into a large debt,
he tries to get his last friend married, so that he could win the loot.
Hilarity ensues?
CRITIQUE:
The funniest scene in this movie involves a man chasing a testicle down
hospital hallways...'nuff said! I personally thought that was a funny
sequence, but unfortunately the rest of the film doesn't attain that level
of "high-brow" humor, with flat jokes for the most part, lame sketch pieces
and plot holes the size of my big ass!! Okay, okay, so we don't exactly go
to see these movies for the story lines...that's a given. So what about the
T&A, you might ask? Nada! What the hell's up with teen T&A flicks nowadays,
when the only asses we get to see are those of Jerry O'Connell and not
Shannon Elizabeth?! C'mon people...I get enough teasing in my personal life,
when I go to see these kinds of movies, I wanna git what's coming to me, for
God's sakes!! Alright, alright...I'm gonna calm down now. Harumph, okay back
to the movie. Basically, this film is exactly what you'd expect: stupid,
mindless and at very few times, funny. Unfortunately, most of the film is
lame, with idiotic scenes of guys jerking off in sperm banks, a sweet
librarian turning into a S&M mistress (a scene that went on for waaaay too
long) and unrelated parody scenes of MI2 and AMERICAN BEAUTY.
And don't bother trying to make sense out of the story, since the filmmakers
are more interested in showcasing over-the-top sexual situations which go
nowhere, than filling out the gaping holes in the plot line. I mean, they
actually try and build up Shannon Elizabeth's character at one point, only
to have her disappear for about twenty minutes midway through the film. What
the &*#@? Anyway, I might still recommend this sucker extremely reluctantly,
but only on video, and even then, only if someone else pays for it, and even
then, only if you're drunk! At that point, I think you might enjoy the movie
for what it is. Admittedly, I did dig Garry Marshall's small but funny cameo
appearance, the energetic opening credits and the outtakes during the
credits, which were actually funny for once. And no matter how much I tried,
I couldn't help but see the actual fun that Jerry O'Connell was having in
this role, and I guess that's gotta count for something, right? Uhhhmmm,
then again, it's your money you'd be wasting on this dog, so maybe not. So a
quick recap says that there is no actual T or A in this movie, practically
no big laughs, a lame story line and lotsa cleavage? I don't know, this
movie doesn't try real hard to be much, so I guess maybe I shouldn't try so
hard to dissect it so much.
So let's end it on this note: are you ready to spend your hard-earned cash
on a film whose high point involves a testicle chase? Well, if your response
is a big hearty "yes", then this movie is made for you. If not, skip it and
go jerk off instead...you'll feel a whole better, trust me! BTW, what the
hell was Bill Maher doing in this thing?? Ugh.
Where's JoBlo coming from?
American Pie (7/10) - The Ladies Man (6/10) - Road Trip (7/10) - Saving
Silverman (5/10) - Say It Isn't So (3/10) - Swingers (10/10) - There's
Something About Mary (7/10) - Very Bad Things (8/10)

Title
Review for Fear (1996)
A thriller set in modern day Seattle, that marked Marky Mark's
migration from the "Good Vibrations" and "Calvin Klein undie ad" guy,
to Mark Wahlberg, thespian-at-large, and a mighty good one at that. 
PLOT:
Boy (Wahlberg) meets girl (Witherspoon). Boy likes girl. Girl likes
boy. Boy and girl begin dating. Parents of girl aren't crazy about the
boy. Girl steps to boy's defense. Family problems occur. Girl learns
more about the boy. Boy goes nuts. Fun ensues.
CRITIQUE:
Ever wonder what would happen if your better half turned out to be
someone other than the person that you had come to cherish and love?
Well, if you ever have, then this film is definitely for you. It isn't
the most original premise in the world, but it is handled pretty well
here, and pretty quickly for that matter (a speedy 90 minutes). I think
one of the main reasons this film worked for me is the groundbreaking
performance by Mark Wahlberg (of BOOGIE NIGHTS infamy (7.5/10). He
completely captured all the goodness, and badness, of the main
character of this film, and always kept me wanting to see more and more
of him (his performance scored him a solid nomination from his core
target audience, as "best villain" at the 1997 MTV Movie Awards).
The soundtrack is also very effective in this setting, and of course,
the slutty performance by Alyssa Milano is something we could all
indulge in (look for the nice bikini and butt shots...if you're into
that kind of thing, that is :). I didn't much care for the father/David
relationship which seemed to be a little too contrived, but for the
most part, I was really into this movie. Then again, daddy dearest did
have one of the coolest lines in the movie when his wife is asking him
what the "big deal" was about his daughter dating David. His reply:
"The big deal is that the guy gives me the creeps, and the girl is my
daughter."
All in all, the movie kicked some fun ass, mindless as it was, and
effectively demonstrated every parent's worst nightmare. Mind you, I
still can't tell if Reese Witherspoon is good looking or a douchebag,
but hey, life goes on. And on a personal note, we finally decided to
add some Taco meat onto our nacho fiesta of usual, and let me tell you
all...it was a flaming success !! Another firm recommendation by Joe
Schmoe!
Little Known Facts:  
Director James Foley was the man responsible for the critically
acclaimed GLENGARRY GLENROSS (8/10) back in 1992, AT CLOSE RANGE
(7.5/10) in 1986, and even directed an episode of TWIN PEAKS in 1990.
Mark Wahlberg stands 5"9, is born in Massachusetts, dropped out of
highschool (later got his GED), and was convicted of several minor
felonies before starting his career as the lead singer of Marky Mark
and the Funky Bunch. His brother is Donnie Wahlberg of New Kids on the
Block fame. He is also testing the waters on the acting front.


Title
Review for Dogma (1999)
For more reviews and screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Please note that I have written this review with a great strain on my
objectivity. You see, besides Quentin Tarantino, there has been no greater
writing influence in my life than Kevin Smith, the director of this film. I
say this because I do not want you to think that I am pretending to forget
or put aside my grand respect for the man, because I couldn't do that even
if I tried. In fact, besides being a great writer/director, I simply believe
him to be an upstanding human being as well. Okay, now that you know my
dirty little secret, let's see what I have to say...
PLOT:
Two renegade angels attempt to get back into Heaven through a loophole that
they find at a church in New Jersey. A woman who works at an abortion clinic
is chosen by the voice of God to stop these men, along with the help of two
"modern" prophets, the 13th unknown apostle and a muse/stripper, before the
angels cross the threshold and lead to the end of all human existence.
Simple enough?
CRITIQUE:
Ambitious, original, funny film about a bunch of religious figures pasted
into a modern fantastical world environment with a lot of tedious
theological speak and a lot of "dick and fart" jokes (as Kevin would say).
It's hard to say who this type of movie is going to attract, since the
young, non-religious hipsters (okay, I'm not so young but I still consider
myself part of this group) will probably not appreciate all of the religious
points made in this film, and the older, religious non-hipsters will
probably not appreciate any of the more juvenile humor, which I thought was
hilarious. Maybe the older, non-religious, hipsters or the younger,
religious, non-hipsters? Either way, I personally enjoyed it for most of
what it represented which was an alternative point of view on religion,
Catholicism in particular, and the unrelenting humor written by Smith for
his Jason Mewes and Chris Rock characters. Jay simply rocked! I could
honestly say that if Silent Bob and Jay were not in this movie, I might be
hard pressed to recommend it so highly.
One thing that you have to know going into this film is that it is a
fantasy. A modern-day comedic fantasy, but a fantasy nonetheless. On the
whole, most of the mythical elements seemed to meche flawlessly within the
modern-day environment, but others just appeared too fake for me to get
around, like the wings on the angels and the horns on Jason Lee. Also, as
much as I tried I could not help but think "that's singer Alanis Morissette"
when God made her first appearance. I just couldn't help it! The more I
tried not to think about it, the more I did. Isn't it ironic? Anyway, I
recommend this film under the two main conditions that I liked it which were
the overall story, which was interesting, and the humor-laced script which
was peppered with particularly great lines for Jay and Rock. I thought the
Affleck, Damon and Rickman characters were a little too drowned in their
explanatory religo-babble (a 20-minute trim-job might've helped), and Hayek
distracting (well, in some good ways but also in some bad), but overall, the
film was original, funny and certainly inventive.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
A convention premiere of DOGMA in Atlanta during the first week of November
1999, provided some more insights into the man better known as Kevin Smith.
1) Kevin claimed that he only wants to direct ten films in total and that he
only has three ideas for future films ready now, so it might turn out to be
only seven. The one idea that he did mention was an adaptation of Mage
(comic book).
2) Kevin said that Jay and Silent Bob would probably be in one more film and
then would only appear in the comics and the Clerks Animated Series.
3) He also explained that one of the major problems that he had with
Superman producer Jon Peters while he was still attached to the project was
that Peters wanted Braniac to have a "gay" robot sidekick (similar to C3Po).
He even wanted the black guy from CHASING AMY to do the voice.
4) Other than Ben Affleck, Chris Rock and Matt Damon, Smith said he would
not try and get big name actors for his movies.
5) He said that the reason Jeff Anderson (Randall from CLERKS) wasn't in
MALLRATS or CHASING AMY was that Anderson had a falling out with Smith over
some money from CLERKS. The good news is that Anderson does have a small
role in DOGMA as the gun store clerk. Note that Brian O'Halloran (Dante from
CLERKS) also has a small role in DOGMA as the reporter.
Kevin Smith wrote the DOGMA script before he had ever written his first
flick, CLERKS, but shelved it because he wanted to do it with the proper
special effects.
British actress Emma Thompson was originally slated to play the part of God
but pulled out before filming began in order to have a baby.
As usual, dozens of other movie references show up in the film (too many to
enumerate here, but I'm sure they'll show up on many a Kevin Smith fan page
over the next few weeks), but at least five John Hughes films were referred
to directly in this film. Smith has always said that he "grew up" on John
Hughes comedies and admires them.
Smith got married to reporter Jennifer Schwalbach in 1999 and had a daughter
soon thereafter. The child was named Harley Quinn (also the name of a
character in TV's "Batman: The Animated Series").
This should also go without saying but Kevin owns his own comic book store,
"Jay and Silent Bob's Secret Stash" in Red Bank, New Jersey. He had
apparently sold his comic book collection for money to film CLERKS (which
cost about $27,000), but bought it all back once the film became a huge
success.
The "guy on the bus" character is played by none other than producer Scott
Mosier.

Title
Review for Almost Famous (2000)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
My ability to relate to this film's protagonist has exponentially grown over
the past few months, as I too have recently been given the opportunity to
interview some of the stars whose films I end up reviewing for my website,
JoBlo's Movie Emporium (http://joblo.com/). It was, and continues to be,
quite strange to balance my task as a so-called "movie critic" and "movie
fan", since my love of movies ultimately surpasses my interest in film
criticism. Having said that, despite not being paid for my reviews or
reporting to any editor (I run my own site), I do take my task of writing
film reviews very seriously and always report the truth, no matter how nasty
(or great, as in this case!). I've always maintained this personal motto of
truth in my own life as well, and honestly believe that you ultimately do
your counterpart a favor by presenting them with the reality of the
situation, as you see it.
Now I'm sorry about this little personal preamble before my review, but I
think it's important for my readers to know where I'm coming from before
reading some of my criticisms, especially when it hits so close to home. In
the end, my goal is to remain the "joblo" of film criticism, and I hope that
I can continue to achieve that down-to-earth quality throughout all of my
reviews. Thanks for tuning in.
PLOT:
A precocious high school boy gets the opportunity to write an article about
an up-and-coming rock band, by joining them on the road for a few days.
Along the way, he struggles with the concept of reporting the truth vs his
friendship with the band members, and meets a pretty girl who also likes to
hang out with the band.
CRITIQUE:
An entertaining movie from top to bottom: an interesting story, superb
actors, rockin' soundtrack, well-developed characters, a strong message, a
nice love story, top-notch directing, humor, drama and two star-making turns
in Billy Crudup and Kate Hudson. Think about whatever it is that you
generally look for in a movie, and it will be in this one! A tribute to the
music that is rock 'n roll, this film lets you ride along with various
participants of the game, checking out the different sceneries along the
way. It gets behind the music, behind the fans, behind the band, behind
everything! It will definitely bring back a flood of memories to anyone who
actually lived through those times, and certainly connect to anyone else who
has ever been a major fan of any rock band or ever wanted to be a musician
(rock star) themselves. It's nice to see that in a year of film mediocrity,
a movie such as this can still come out and remind us all why we love movies
so much in the first place. This one takes you away for a couple of hours,
tells an interesting tale through several interesting characters, and
certifies its participation in the year-end Best Picture race by wrapping it
all up in a wonderful bouquet of entertainment. And despite a little bit of
over-romanticism of the music and the times, this film still manages to
present us with some great insight into the main players of the music biz
including the musicians themselves, the fans and the reporters who cover it
all.
And with a solid script as its base, this film takes off to another level
with the excellent performances shot forth by its lead actors. Billy Crudup
has been tooling around Hollywood for some time now, but this film will
undoubtedly catapult him off the charts. I hope that this film does to him,
what GLADIATOR did to Russell Crowe. And where the heck did Kate Hudson come
from? Brought into this world by actress Goldie Hawn, known primarily for
her pranky roles in easy comedies, Hudson takes on this lead role with the
edge of a pro, and the charisma of a newfound sensation. Two more
nominations for awards should be reserved for these two well-deserved
thespians at the year-end ceremonies. And tag those great roles on to
several other smaller showings, including Frances McDormand, perfect as the
over-protective mom, who can't help but look out for her children, Jason
Lee, coming into his own as the pseudo-Jim Morrison like lead singer, and
Philip Seymour Hoffman, who remarkably cannot seem to pick any bad roles in
movies, and you've got yourself an all-around rock-solid cast. This film
puts rock 'n roll on a pedestal but that's not all it does. It's really a
journey about finding yourself. Characters all floating around their lives,
unsure of who they are or what they stand for, until their day-to-day
interactions eventually help them find their true selves. See it for the
music, if you like. See it for the great performances or see it simply
because of its greater entertainment value, but the bottom line is that this
movie is one of the best films of the year, and no matter why you think you
want to see it, just see it, dammit! Who knows, maybe it'll help you "find
yourself", too.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Much like this film's protagonist, William Miller, writer/director Cameron
Crowe got his start as a rock journalist at the age of 15. In 1973, when he
was just 16, he joined the staff of "Rolling Stone" magazine, where he
eventually became an associate editor. While still in his teens, he managed
to profile many of the era's most influential artists, including Led
Zeppelin, Bob Dylan, David Bowie, Joni Mitchell and Eric Clapton. In 1979,
Crowe, then 22, returned to high school to research a book, which resulted
in the best-selling novel FAST TIMES AT RIDGEMONT HIGH, which was eventually
written into a screenplay by him, and directed into a movie with Amy
Heckerling at the helm.
Lester Bangs, the character portrayed by Philip Seymour Hoffman and the
editor of Creem magazine, was in actuality a very influential person in
Cameron's own life as well.
If you stay tuned to the entire film credits at the end of the movie, you
will note the unusual disclaimer about the character of Penny Lane actually
having been "based on an actual individual". Cameron Crowe appears to have
given us an insight into his own muse...
Other than Billy Crudup and Jason Lee, the two other members of the group
Stillwater are real-life musicians, Mark Kozelek and John Fedevich.
Billy Crudup made his feature film debut in 1996 in Barry Levinson's
SLEEPERS, starring Robert DeNiro and Brad Pitt, and was then featured in
Woody Allen's EVERYONE SAYS I LOVE YOU.
Actor Patrick Fugit makes his motion picture debut in this picture. He was
chosen for the role of William Miller over hundreds of other young actors.
And pay close attention otherwise you might miss the unrecognizable
performance put forth by SNL cast member Jimmy Fallon, as the "new manager"
about 2/3 of the way through the movie.
A certain "William Mapother" plays the "bartender" role in this movie. Tom
Cruise's real name is Thomas Cruise Mapother. Not sure what his connection
to Tom is, but he is definitely related. Tom Cruise starred in Cameron
Crowe's last picture entitled JERRY MAGUIRE. They remain good friends.
Besides being a technical consultant on this movie, singer Peter Frampton
makes a cameo appearance as "Reg", the road manager for Humble Pie. He first
came to prominence as a member of the actual group Humble Pie.
This film was initially titled STILLWATER and SOMETHING REAL.

Title
Review for Corruptor, The (1999)
For more reviews and movie trivia, go to http://www.joblo.com/
Chow Yun Fat continues his ascent into the American action genre alongside
BOOGIE NIGHT-man (8/10) Mark Wahlberg, who stars in his second film for
director James Foley (This is Foley's follow-up to their previous gig FEAR
(8/10)). They're New York city cops, there's bad stuff happening in
Chinatown...have a blast!
PLOT:
As two rival Chinese underground factions fight the turf war in NYC's
Chinatown, good-time cop Wallace joins the Asian Gang Unit of the 15th
Precinct, under the watchful eye of top cop, Nick Chen. They must fight the
bad guys, work the underground, respect the feds, and avoid the plethora of
corruption running rampant on their streets.
CRITIQUE:
Is this an original idea for a movie? No way. Is this a good movie? You bet.
I thoroughly enjoyed this film from beginning to end. There were no dull
moments, lots of action, a solid story, a cool car chase scene, and plenty
of grit to rub into your scalp. Admittedly, I still have a problem
understanding every other sentence that comes out of Chow Yun-Fat's mouth,
but hey, at least most of Wahlberg's whisper-talk made its way across. It's
sad because I really do think that there were plenty of one-liners that were
missed by the audience because of Yun-Fat's muffled English pronunciation.
Having said that, I don't think it is the acting that draws people to go see
a movie like this in the first place, it's generally the action, the
interesting story line, and the capacity to keep you interested for close to
two hours. This movie was able to keep me entertained for that period, and
even tossed in some over-stylized direction for real Hong Kong effect.
This movie doesn't necessarily need to be seen on the big screen. It's one
of those movies that would go down great on a Saturday night at home with
your friends, beer and nachos. The plot is a little complex at times, but
all in all, it goes down like a bottle o' salsa alongside your nachos.
Slowly, but surely. There is a lot of corruption going on in this movie,
there are some nasty bad guys, bad good guys, and everyone in between. Half
the fun is figuring out who stands for what in the end. Think RONIN (7.5/10)
by way of YEAR OF THE DRAGON (7.5/10) through the dirty dealings of SERPICO
(7/10). Is this film gonna revolutionize the action genre and change your
view of all films action? Not a chance! It just doesn't carry enough
originality in its Chinese take-out box. But will it show you a good time,
quite a bit of violence and a decent plot for a few pockets of green? It
sure will! And if that's your gig, and you dig this kind of fun-junk, check
this gritt-meister out! Either way, the title of this film is still pretty
lame.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
The actor playing bad-guy Uncle Benny in this film, Kim Chan, played a
character with that same name in LETHAL WEAPON 4 (Courtesy of Rogert Ebert
via the IMDb).
Infamous writer/director Oliver Stone acts as executive producer on this
project, alongside Terence Chang, known to be director John Woo's right-hand
on his films.
Chow Yun-Fat's name is actually Yun-Fat Chow. He is born on the 18th of May,
1955 on Nam Nga Island, in Hong Kong.
Word on the street is that Mark Wahlberg is apparently dating his co-star in
his upcoming movie, THE YARDS, Charlize Theron. He's also known as musician
Marky Mark.
The man who plays Mark Wahlberg's dad in this movie, also plays the
character of Dr. Guggenheim in RUSHMORE.
This film is Robert Pucci's first full-feature script.

Title
Review for Rules of Engagement (2000)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Listen...I'm just about as sick of these Army/Navy/Air Force/Marine/lawyer
movies as you are, but for some strange reason (note: THE GENERAL'S DAUGHTER
(4/10) grossed over $100Million last year), Hollywood keeps churning them
out by the truckload. This one slaps Tommy Lee Jones in as your
rough-around-the-edges lawyer (see any previous Lee Jones movie for similar
feel) and Sam Jackson as the man accused of a crime for which he claims to
be innocent (see any previous Jackson movie for similar feel). Put 'em all
together and you've got a recipe for disaster, right? Well, it wasn't so
bad... : )
PLOT:
A highly decorated Marine and his troops are sent into Yemen with orders to
oversee an apparently peaceful demonstration outside the U.S. Embassy. When
Marines start dropping like flies, the Colonel orders his troops to fire
into the crowd of demonstrators, slaying many an innocent victim. It isn't
long before the entire world is up in arms about the incident and demanding
justice. At this point, the U.S. government puts the Colonel on trial for
murder and the rest, as they say, is...well, a court case.
CRITIQUE:
An okay movie submitting nothing unique to the genre, sprinkled in some
decent drama, involving points of view, solid telegraphed performances from
its leads and an ending which surprisingly had me paying attention. Don't
get me wrong, you won't catch me running around trying to tell the world
about this film, but if you're into this kind of movie, like the actors, and
enjoy watching films which don't really offer any visible right or wrongs,
this might just be the trip for you. It's really more of a "video movie"
than anything else. In fact, despite being intrigued by everything which led
up to the ending, I felt kind of blah about the whole thing afterwards. Not
exactly sure why I felt that way, but I've deduced it down to the fact that
the film really didn't cover any fresh ground or the thing about the extra
salsa on my nachos.
Either way, the film does deliver a couple of riveting action sequences,
with the whole "fire at the demonstrators" scene topping that cake, a decent
pace, which doesn't bog itself down with too much legal mumbo-jumbo and an
interesting plot, in that it never really crucifies one person as the
proverbial "bad guy", thereby leaving the audience with the opportunity to
form their own opinions of Jackson's dilemma. Granted, Anne Archer looks
like a mess, Ben Kingsley is barely in the film and Guy Pearce does an
incredibly annoying/convincing Brooklyn accent, but aside from the staple
Jackson "screaming aloud" scenes, the gist of the film was quite convincing.
All in all, you won't find the word "original" in this review (doh!), but if
you're looking for a decent bi-polar story, a couple of good action scenes,
a generally compelling courtroom case and one goofy sequence featuring
Jackson/Jones duking it out as two old has-beens, than it might be just be
worth checking out for yourself. For me...it was an okay movie. That's it.
That's all. Next!
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Tommy Lee Jones has never taken an acting class in his life and likes to
play polo.
Sam Jackson is also well-known for having played a lot of small roles in big
movies, earlier on his career. He played Eddie Murphy's "uncle" at the
beginning of his concert movie, RAW, was the "hold-up man" in Murphy's
COMING TO AMERICA, the "black guy" in Al Pacino's SEA OF LOVE, and "Stacks
Edwards" in Scorsese's GOODFELLAS.
Incidentally, despite the fact that this film presents us with final caption
cards with the fates of all its principal members, the film itself is not
based on actual facts by any means. Personally, I don't appreciate this type
of thing, find it sort of misleading and all, but there you have it...now
you know.
According to fellow online critic, James Berardinelli, former Secretary of
the U.S. Navy, James Webb, the man who is credited for having developed this
story, apparently asked that his name be removed from this film after a few
scenes in the final cut betrayed his original vision. Only after a few
changes were made, did Mr. Webb decide to rescind his request for  removal.
According to the IMDb, a complete replica of the Marine Corp Base at Camp
Lejeune, NC was built at the Vint Hill Farm Station, South Manassas, VA.
Upwards of 800 Marines were hired for the combat and other action scenes.

Title
Review for Switchback (1997)
This film is Jeb Stuart's big-screen directorial debut. Before this, he
wrote 48 HOURS (7.5/10), DIE HARD (8/10), LOCK UP (7.5/10), and THE
FUGITIVE (7.5/10), among several other solid scripts.
PLOT:
This movie is cut into two stories, which alternatively switch back and
forth from one another (hence-Switchback). The first has an extremely
serious FBI agent (Quaid) tracking down a serial killer, while the
second deals with a hitchhiker (Leto) and his transportation savior
(Glover) trekking across the snowy mountains on their way to Utah. The
identity of the killer is what engulfs the rest of the movie.
CRITIQUE:
Overly long, barely interesting retread of a dozen other serial killer
movies, this picture offers us as much excitement as Dennis Quaid's
stiff demeanor (Dennis might think that his cold look made him look
serious, but really it just made him boring.) This film was interesting
at first, as you try to figure out who the killer and/or his
motivations might be, but eventually (after the first hour or so), you
start to realize that this explanation will not come until the very
end, and by then, you just don't care anymore. I think I see what the
writer was trying to do here, in that he wanted to keep the audience
guessing throughout the entire movie, but unfortunately, there aren't
enough effective scenes, action sequences, or possible suspects to
really keep it interesting for that duration. In the end, you're just
begging for the damn thing to finish!
And even after its conclusion, I still found myself wondering about the
actual motivations of the serial killer, which were never really
explained, and/or why so much of the story focused on the local sheriff
and not on a more interesting character like Quaid's wife or something.
On top of all that, the typical Hollywood sugar-pie ending further
impressed this script's unoriginal nature into my negative point of
view. 
In regards to the acting, I would have to give Danny Glover some points
for taking on this kooky role, but take plenty others away from Quaid
who just hasn't been able to punch in a decent acting gig since he gave
that piss-awful over-performance as Jerry Lee Lewis in GREAT BALLS OF
FIRE! back in 1989. Maybe he should give up the day job, and allow his
wife Meg "the cutest human being on the face of this Earth" Ryan to
support their family. The man's facial expression didn't change once
during this entire picture. 
The atmosphere of the film was actually well manufactured, and the
sights were pretty to behold, but that would be it in regards to praise
for this film. Other than that, I suppose one could get a little into
the movie, if one were really a mystery buff, but even then, the movie
just drags, and drags, and drags. No extreme graphic violence either.
Now if you're looking for an excellent serial killer mystery with some
great action, suspense and atmosphere, pick up David Fincher's
wonderfully rainy SEVEN (8.5/10) starring the ever-loveable Brad Pitt
and Morgan Freeman.
Little Known Facts: 
Originally titled GOING WEST IN AMERICA and GOING WEST.
Dennis Quaid is the younger brother of fellow actor Randy Quaid.
Danny Glover stands 6"4, graduated from San Francisco State College,
and received an honorary Doctorate of Fine Arts Degree from San
Francisco State University on May 31, 1997. His film debut was in 1979,
in the film ESCAPE FROM ALCATRAZ.
---------------------------------------
Visit JoBlo's Movie Emporium
http://surf.to/joblo
---------------------------------------
(c) 1998 Berge Garabedian

Title
Review for Dracula 2000 (2000)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Can you ever have enough Dracula movies? Yeah, probably. But this time
around, filmmakers have given the ol' man a little MTV twist for the kids
and a new look at his origins. Was I looking forward to seeing this movie?
Certainly not. The trailer was pretty lame and it basically looked like
another generic teen horror flick with Dracula in there just for kicks. I
was expecting bad acting, plot holes galore and some pretty bad effects.
What did I get? Find out below.
PLOT:
The most popular vampire in the world, Dracula, is once again unleashed upon
an unsuspecting modern-day world. This time around, the bloodsucker wants to
grab himself a specific soul, one that belongs to the daughter of the man
who caught and incarcerated him for over 100 years.
CRITIQUE:
A fun vampire movie. This film was quite the surprise for me. It actually
featured some okay acting, an interesting plot line, lotsa blood and some
pretty cool effects. It also wasn't as cheesy as I thought it was gonna be,
and featured plenty of bloodsucking, decapitations, neck bitings and sexy
women with heaving bosoms. Now how could you go wrong with that? Seriously
though, this flick is sure to be a nice treat for anyone who enjoys vampire
flicks and heavy soundtracks, and those who don't mind a new twist on a
renowned character. In fact, the revelation at the end of this movie about
the origins of Dracula is both unique and believable. I bought it and I
certainly bought most of the movie, which despite a nice groove, doesn't
really offer a lot of depth (if that's what you're looking for). But the
movie never bored me either, as it moved from bloody impalings to bloody
Matrix-esque fights to bloody heads flying all over the place. And you gotta
admire that in any vampire movie! God knows that any film featuring a man
who sucks blood for a living, is required to have lotsa crimson wetness
splashing around.
I was however disappointed with the lack of T&A in the movie. I mean,
there's a time and place for T&A and this was it! Mardi Gras? Sexy
vampiresses? C'mon! If you're gonna have this much violence in a movie, how
about lightening up our mood every now and then with some nifty boob shots.
Then again, maybe that's just my Jerry Ryan fixation talking...hehehe. In
the end, the movie entertained me and that is what I generally look for in
most films. If the film manages to entertain me during its entire runtime,
it's generally worthy of at least one look (according to me). One thing did
kinda stick out in my mind though. Despite enjoying the lead Dracula's
performance in the film, I do think that a "cooler" looking Dracul would've
been a better choice. This dude just looked too much like that singer from
the 80s, Richard Marx, and his puffy hair just bothered me throughout. A
slicker Prince of Darkness might've been able to elevate this film to a
certain cult-ish level. But in the end, I still consider this movie to be a
novel adaptation of an old time legend. Definitely geared more towards the
teens, but enough cheap scares for pretty much anyone looking for some
enjoyable bloody fun.

Title
Review for Return of the Jedi (1983)
For more Star Wars reviews and screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
PLOT:
The gang of our favorite futuristic rebels must save their buddy Han Solo
from the evil clutches of Jabba the Hut, attempt to break through the shield
of the Empire's brand new Death Star complex, blow it up, and allow for Luke
Skywalker to partake in a showdown with Darth Vader (aka Dad), while saving
the galaxy. All that and....meet the cute and cuddly Ewoks!
CRITIQUE:
The most kid-friendly film of the trilogy, this one features plenty of great
special effects, cool hover-scooter chases in the Forest Moon, a better
understanding of the entire Star Wars universe and the players' roles
within, and a few surprises thrown in for effect. The ending is also a
complete 180 degree turn from the darker Empire conclusion, with just enough
space left over to maneuver a few more episodes, if they so desired. I
especially liked the last 45 minutes or so, which featured three separate
scenarios happening all at once, with the action in the film alternating
effectively between the three.
Quite entertaining to say the least, and while the Ewoks were pretty
childish, I did still enjoy their goofy presence, and Leia in a skimpy
belly-dancer's outfit was just, well....inspirational! :) One thing that
totally stuck out with me during the first few scenes, was the obvious use
of puppets as some of Jabba's henchmen, and the god-awful blue screen
techniques utilized in the underground monster scene with Luke (And I was
watching the digitally re-mastered version...go figure!). Other than that
little scaffoo, all else was very cool, with plenty of great new added
scenes, cool space fights and mechanical monsters, a better grasp of Darth
Vader's origin, and a surprisingly tender father/son moment near the end of
the film. All in all, a formidable bookend to the greatest science-fiction
trilogy of all-time.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars: (Most facts gathered from
the IMDb)
Director David Lynch, was originally offered the chance to direct this
episode of the series. He turned it down because he believed it was "Lucas'
thing." Director Richard Marquand died of a heart-attack in 1987.
Lando Calrissian and The Millennium Falcon originally scripted to perish in
the Death Star explosion, but this was changed after a poor preview audience
reception. Note Han's line when departing in the stolen Imperial shuttle: "I
got a funny feeling, like I'm not going to see her again."
Several Ewok lines are in the Filipino (Tagalog) language.
Jabba's sail barge was filmed in Yuma, Arizona. The film crew had problems
avoiding the 35,000 dune buggy enthusiasts in the area. To preserve secrecy,
the producers claimed to be making a horror film called "Blue Harvest
(Horror beyond your imagination)", and even had caps and t-shirts made up
for the crew. A chain-link fence and a 24-hour security service could not
prevent die-hard fans from entering the set and sneaking some photographs.
*The dancer that Jabba drops into the Rancor pit loses her top as she falls
in.
The Endor shots were filmed near Crescent City, California. Forest work was
especially hard on the Ewok actors. Production Assistant Ian Bryce arrived
on the set one day to find a note from the Ewok actors saying that they had
all had enough and they were on their way to the airport. Bryce tried to
drive to the airport, but got a flat tire not far from the set. He found
another car and was about to leave when the Ewoks' bus pulled up, and all
the Ewok actors got off wearing "Revenge of the Ewok" t-shirts.
One of the songs that the Ewoks sing sounds like: "Det luktar flingor har",
which is Swedish for "It smells of cereal here."
Darth Vader's body was played by David Prowse, his voice by James Earl
Jones, and his face by Sebastian Shaw.
The title "Revenge of the Jedi" was leaked early in production, so that
pirated merchandise could be easily spotted when the film was released. The
official reason for the change was that "...a Jedi would not take revenge".
Some authentic pre-release movie posters actually had "Revenge", and are
worth a lot of money today.

Title
Review for Halloween H20: Twenty Years Later (1998)
Michael Myers (AKA The Shape) return as the little brother who never
dies, in this seventh installment (called H20 because it takes place 20
years after the original story/movie took place) of the coveted
HALLOWEEN series. The original was directed by horror-meister John
Carpenter.
PLOT:
Laurie Strode (Curtis) has moved on with her life. She is now the
headmistress of a private school, of which her son is a proud 17-year
old member. She's changed her name and assumed a new identity, because
she still fears that her crazy little brother, who murdered her friends
and sister twenty years ago, will return and try to kill her again.
Halloween night approaches. Michael Myers returns. Let the killing
begin.
CRITIQUE:
The horror genre is back, and so is Mr. Kevin Williamson's wonderful
touch on all things scary. This movie's packed with all the screams,
cheers, laughs and gross-outs that you could swing a spooky stick at.
It's everything you ever looked for in a scary popcorn movie. Period.
And on those fronts, this movie delivers just like SCREAM (8/10),
SCREAM 2 (7/10) and I KNOW WHAT YOU DID LAST SUMMER (7.5/10) did over
the past couple of years. All films signed by Kevin Williamson. Advised
be those who did not care for any of the previously mentioned films, to
avoid this teenage-bludgeoning, blood-letting, LL Cool J-costarring
funfest.
In case anyone is worried about not having seen any of the previous
Halloweens-don't worry, the whole back-story is explained pretty
quickly, and frankly, the story is that this man with the eerie mask is
f-cked up real bad, and wants to kill people, most prominently his
sister. The film does start off a little slow, and did offer up one too
many "fake scares" in my humble opinion, but once the action gets
going, it really takes off! Another cool thing about this movie is that
it's barely an hour and a half long. It doesn't get bogged down in
explanation after explanation, but does demonstrate various ways in
which a psychopath could stab people. Speaking of which, there are at
least two PSYCHO (7/10) references in this movie, one alone, coming
from Ms. Psycho herself, Janet Leigh, who has a throwaway part in this
film as the school's secretary.
People screamed, people laughed, people screeched (Mrs. JoBlo got the
guts scared out of her), people farted...let's just say that people had
a blast! (Mind you, I saw this film on the first showing of the first
night that it came out. Real horror fans only, please.) Oh yeah, and
did I mention that John Carpenter's "theme to Halloween" remains one of
the eeriest scores to run a movie over? Good stuff. All in all, if
you're a horror fan, and like all of the other Kevin Williamson-based
films, there's no good reason why you shouldn't truly enjoy this one
(Besides the fact, that it's not jam-packed with hip, young, successful
Hollywood stars and starlets.) And if you don't dig horror, well, I
guess there's always THERE'S SOMETHING ABOUT MARY (7/10)!
Note: Double up on the salsa for this one. Trust me, the nachos will
thank you later.
Little Known Facts: 
Jamie Lee Curtis was paid a hefty sum of $8000 for her role in the
original HALLOWEEN, and $100,000 for the follow-up.
At one point during this movie, you could clearly see SCREAM 2 playing
on a television set. At one point during the original SCREAM film, you
could see the original HALLOWEEN playing on the television set.
Janet Leigh is Jamie Lee Curtis' mother in real-life. Actor Tony Curtis
is her real-life father. Janet Leigh was the lady who "got it" in the
infamous shower scene from Alfred Hitchcock's PSYCHO. 
Other titles for this movie were "Halloween 7", "Halloween 7: The
Revenge of Laurie Strode", "Halloween: H20 (20 Years Later)" and
"Halloween: The Revenge of Laurie Strode."
TV's "Dawson's Creek" connections: Actress Michelle Williams stars in
the show. Director Steve Miner has directed episodes of the show. And
wunderkid Kevin Williamson created and produces the show.
Jamie Lee Curtis met her husband Christopher Guest after she saw a
picture of him in the Rolling Stone magazine, and cleverly made sure
that his agent got her number.

Title
Review for Avengers, The (1998)
For more reviews and movie trivia, visit http://www.joblo.com/
This is the film that cost $60 million to produce, and earned only $25
million at the domestic box-office. Check. This is the film that had a lot
of Hollywood actresses coveting the principal role of Emma Peel before its
release, and the same many thanking their lucky stars after the film came
out. Check. This is the film that was tagged "an absolute mess" by movie
critic James Berardinelli, and not liked as much by many others. Check,
check, check! So is it really that bad? Naaaaaaaah! Then again, I liked
HUDSON HAWK (7/10), so beware of what you may find in the paragraphs below.
PLOT:
Secret agent John Steed hooks up with one fine looking doctor in Emma Peel,
in an attempt to figure out what is happening to the world's weather system.
Believing that one Mr. August de Wynter is behind the whole conspiracy, the
duo set out to stop him and save the world from his meteorological
concoctions.
NOTE: I've never seen one episode of the old TV show, so I cannot base my
review on any of that. Besides, I like to rate a movie on its own merits.
CRITIQUE:
This movie's got a truckload of style, a bunch of funky fashions and mod
retro-fun, a decent amount of action, but less than I would have expected,
some cool special effects and slick gadgeteries, a quick runtime, but a
hole-filled plot line that's just too complex for its own good. There are
many things that just didn't work in this movie's narrative, but on the
whole, the film was fun for me because it offered just enough style, action
and humour, to allow myself to dismiss the entanglement of its plot. The
film was also very tongue-and-cheekish from the get-go, and laughed at its
absurdity as much as we were supposed to. Sure it had a lame bad guy in Sean
Connery. Sure the preposterous idea of one man controlling the world's
weather is ridiculous beyond mere words. But seeing that 90% of all action
movies that hit our movie screens nowadays have the suspension of disbelief
factor grilled up to the highest fantastical levels anyway, I didn't feel
like this movie asked for much more than just that.
This movie is bubble-gum for the style lovers, and a spit wad for those not.
It had a pretty cool spy-laced score, a bevy of wonderful set designs, and
many other original ditties to occupy my mind as it floated through this
90-minute festival of cotton candy. And if you really think that the plot is
overly complicated, just look at it this way: Peel and Emma= the good guys,
Mr. August de Wynter= the bad guy. Everything else is just pudding after
that. Now you may all think that I am reviewing this film positively because
I'm high on pot or something, or that my ground-level low expectations
elevated this sub-mediocre discovery to decent time. Well...maybe. The truth
is that I'm not high, but I certainly did go into this picture with the
lowest of expectations. But despite all that, I came out with a smile on my
face, and a pretty sweet flick in my noggin. Ocular junkfood for your eyes,
cloudy fodder for your mind.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Uma Thurman's full name is Uma Karuna Thurman. She recently married fellow
actor Ethan Hawke, and had his child on the 8th of July, 1998. They named
their child Maya Ray Thurman-Hawke (natch!). She was previously married to
actor Gary Oldman for a brief period between 1990 and 1992. Uma's dad,
Robert, is a professor of Asian religion, and named her Uma, after a Hindu
Goddess. He was also the first westerner to be ordained a Tibetan Budhist
monk. Uma's born in Boston, Mass.
Sean Connery once said that he thought that the James Bond movies were
stagnating and that Quentin Tarantino should direct the coming ones. He has
two small tattoos on his right arm. One says "Scotland forever", the other
"Mum and Dad". He got them when he enlisted in the British Navy at the age
of 16.
Sean Connery wore a toupee in all of his James Bond movies. He started
loosing his hair already at the age of 21. Privately and in most other
movies, he wears none.
Ralph Fiennes wants people to pronounce his first name as "Rafe", and has a
middle name of Nathaniel.
Director Jeremiah S. Chechik is born in my own city of residence, Montreal,
Canada.

Title
Review for Human Traffic (1999)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Have you ever been to a rave party? Have you ever smoked a lot of dope, done
some Ecstacy or just gotten really ripped with some of your best buddies
over a weekend? Well, I hope for your sake that you have, since the fantasy
world of intoxication has always been known to drop many an inhibition,
loosen the faade of reality, and if anything, grant us with more than just
one memorable story for our friends. But if you're a straight player, have
only heard of the parties and the drugs and the sex, well maybe this movie
is just what you need. Buckle your seatbelt, Dorothy...it's gonna be a bumpy
ride!
PLOT:
This film follows the lives of five close friends during one typical rave
party evening, with a little bit of background on each of the main players,
a setup to the nite's activities, the parties, parties and parties, and
inevitably...the crash end of the evening.
CRITIQUE:
Hard to truly rate this film since I did quite appreciate its visuals, its
soundtrack and its authentic portrayal of the rave/drug scene, but I just
couldn't get past the fact that the characters were uninteresting, the story
absent and the overall sense...deja-vu. Of course, movies like TRAINSPOTTING
and GO worked because they presented us with an overall picture including
intriguing characters and engaging storylines, two elements which were
ultimately missing from this fast-paced movie. In fact, this film could
actually be considered more of a documentary on the rave scene, with its
believable insights, actual drug depictions, which are generally glanced
over in other teen-party flicks, and its innovative filming style.
Unfortunately for the audience, at least in my case, all five of the main
characters were just annoying, unentertaining and generally, over-the-top.
Add that to the fact that the two lead girls looked like they were in their
forties, and not much investment went into these characters from my end.
Without that bond with the characters, without much of a story, and without
much of a high while watching this picture, I can't say that much of it
"did" anything for me.
Sure, there were a couple of definite funny scenes, including one which
broke down the politics of "passing the spliff" at a party...very funny! And
another one which showcased the uncomfortable feeling one has when
constantly running into someone whom you only know as an acquaintance, and
all of the bullshit conversation that you must carry on with that person. So
true, and pretty darn funny as well. Many of the other moments in the film
featured movie references attempting to be clever (both the TAXI DRIVER and
STAR WARS conversations didn't work for me), as well as kids basically
screaming, jumping up and down, and telling us how cool it is to be high. I
know what they're saying, but watching it for ninety minutes just didn't
click much for me. The ending was especially weak with a dopey romance angle
coming out of nowhere, but I will give the first time writer/director Justin
Kerrigan this much...the camera tricks are abundant and certainly quite
inventive.
Being a fan of stylish movies and not being afraid to admit that I have
personally "inhaled" some friendlies of my own, I might recommend this film
to those who love the raves, like to smoke a little doobie before watching a
movie, and anyone who doesn't mind watching a film with no actual plotline.
For the rest of ya'll, I would suggest skipping this puppy, and renting many
of the better films to which this movie makes mention, including TAXI
DRIVER, CLERKS, SCARFACE or THE SHINING.
Incidentally, I got the chance to interview 26-year old writer/director
Justin Kerrigan for this film, a conversation which you could read by
following this link: http://www.joblo.com/kerrigan1.htm

Title
Review for Final Destination (2000)
For more reviews and movie trailers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Television. What is it good for? Beats me. Movies have always been my game,
especially over the past few years. Once "Cheers" and "The Larry Sanders
Show" left the airwaves, I was left tinkering around with "Seinfeld" and
"The Simpsons" for a while, but all's I got left nowadays is my weekly
ritual of Mulder & Scully...also known as "The X-Files". Which brings us to
this film, which features the directing and producing debut of two writers
from some of the X-Files' most memorable shows, James Wong and Glen Morgan
respectively, and hopefully a good dose of dark, supernatural, creepy
shtuff!
PLOT:
A high school kid aboard an airplane to France freaks out when he has a
premonition about the plane's deadly fate once airborne, and gets himself
and a few friends kicked off the airlines. It is only when his prophecy
becomes reality a few minutes later, that the handful of survivors suddenly
find themselves in an adversarial position against death, who apparently
doesn't take too kindly to folks bailing out on his cataclysmic plans.
CRITIQUE:
Creepy, dark and unlike many of your standard teen slasher flicks that have
been tossed our way over the past few years, this movie combines an original
and realistic premise, a quick pace, many gruesome and creative death scenes
and a pretty cool ending, if I don't say so myself. Were there many "stock"
characters ready to die like in many of these other thrillers? Well, not
really, but I will admit that there was one dude who was pretty badly
written and did piss me off with his unrealistic attitude throughout most of
the film (without naming any names...Carter), but on the whole, the rest of
the kids were decent with the highest kudos going out to Devon Sawa in
another solid leading role. He truly bit into this character and delivers an
effective portrayal of a kid who finds himself fighting the battle of his
life...against death! This film's first 15 minutes are probably its
creepiest, with quick cuts, tense moments and a dark, rainy night adding a
real authenticity to the proceedings, and having me think twice about ever
flying again. This got me hooked.
After that, the film does wind into a pretty basic routine of a "killer" on
the loose with only the order of the victims to be determined, and yet, this
film didn't allow itself to be trite or boring at any point. In fact, the
killing scenes are probably some of the most original that I've seen in
years, and plenty of back-end intrigue via the FBI agents following the
case, the twists and turns discovered by Sawa's character and the general
intelligence of the script take this film above and beyond most of the teen
hokum out there. Granted, I thought they could have spiced up the FBI agents
a bit, and certainly removed an entire scene featuring Tony Todd from
CANDYMAN fame essentially reliving his role from that film, but all in all,
the film's originality, dark undertones and solid performance by Sawa won me
over. Also, it was nice to be scared by something that you couldn't really
"see" for once in a horror film (I guess that's how most people felt about
BLAIR WITCH...an overrated movie in my opinion), and be spared the two-bit
special effects gallery. And if you thought the last shot from BLAIR WITCH
was a keeper, well, let's just say that this one goes out with a bang! A
real scream... :)
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Devon Sawa was born in Vancouver, British Columbia, Canada.
Actress Valerie Cloke, who plays the teacher character named Valerie Lewton
in this film, is married to producer/writer Glen Morgan in real life.
Devon Sawa's main co-star in this movie, Ali Larter, is probably best
remembered for her awesome debut role as the "whipped cream naked girl" from
VARSITY BLUES (7/10).
The characters' names in this film were apparently written as homages to
some of the greats of the genre. Alex's surname is Browning, as in Todd
Browning who directed FREAKS and the original DRACULA. Billy's surname is
Hitchcock, and Valeri is a moniker for Val Luten, whose credits include CAT
PEOPLE and WALK OF THE ZOMBIE.
Earlier drafts of this film's script featured no connection between any of
the characters who leave the plane early on in the movie, having them seek
one another out instead.
This film was originally titled FLIGHT 180, which is the number of the
flight the kids were to have taken early on in the film.

Title
Review for Payback (1999)
For more reviews and movie trivia, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Mel Gibson switches costumes with the "bad guy" role, and stars in the
directorial debut of the 1997 Oscar winner for Best Screenplay for L.A.
CONFIDENTIAL (7/10), Brian Helgeland. This film is a remake of John
Boorman's 1967 film POINT BLANK, starring Lee Marvin and Angie Dickinson.
Both scripts were based on the novel by Donald E. Westlake (as Richard
Stark) called "The Hunter".
PLOT:
Porter is a two-bit robber who gets fudged over by his partner and girl.
They take $70,000 from him, and leave him for dead. Having survived, Porter
wants his money back, and is willing to go through anybody to get it,
including the prominent crime syndicate ("outfit" if you like), that
ultimately pocketed the cash from his ex-partner.
CRITIQUE:
Grimy, violent, funny, smoke-filled tribute to bad guys from vintage movies,
this film features another captivating performance by Mel Gibson, in a
radically different role for him, an entertaining story, a distinct
finger-snapping musical score, and an overall fun guy-time at the movies!
Will women like this film? Not sure. I guess it would depend on their
particular taste in film, but I trust that most
raw-meat-eating-cigarette-butt-smoking-cops-and-robbers-loving fellas are
gonna dig on this movie like they do a double-cheeseburger with bacon, mayo
and spit after a few days of nutritional abstinence. I liked this movie
because it was simple-- the man just wants to get his money back, violent--
a few tense moments are sprinkled around this movie, and quite humorous-many
chuckles were heard during the film's funnier twinklings.
The pacing of the movie was also perfectly set, with an original style from
Helgeland, a witty script, and a thump-thumping score, that reminded me of
the film-noir flicks of the old. The actors were all very good in their
roles with many of the secondary characters coming up with wickedly engaging
performances, most specifically Gregg Henry as Gibson's ex-partner and
future nemesis. The movie also contains some shocking and unexpected
moments, a solid if fluffy ending, and some great tunes tossed in for an
extra-crispy flavour on the outside. And for all those who might complain
about the fact that the whole film is essentially filled with "bad people",
none of whom have any redeeming qualities, I must heartily disagree. Within
the context of their "world", this film has many characters who strive for
power, while others fight for the "principle of the matter". Now if you've
ever fought for a principle in any matter, whether it be for a grade in
school which you deemed unfair, a police officer who pulled you over for a
bogus ticket, or a partner who stole $70,000 from you, you should be able to
appreciate Gibson's character within the seedy, underground world in which
he resides.
This movie's tagline totes the "Get ready to root for the bad guy" motto,
and as much as I hate those damn marketing plugs and the word "root", I must
admit that I did find myself engulfed in the world of this guy Porter,
wishing that he would keep kicking mighty ass, slicing the cheese over the
"even worse guys", and chain-smoking and outsmarting folks like it was going
out of style. Hubba-hubba-hubba indeed !!!
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
This film was heavily re-shot in early 1998 at the request of Mel Gibson,
whose Icon Productions produced the movie. This was due to concerns that the
original version, shot in the summer of 1997 by writer-director Brian
Helgeland, hadn't tested well. Word on the street claims that Gibson was
advised to re-shoot sections of the film by friend and action maestro Joel
Silver, producer of Gibson's LETHAL WEAPON films. Anyway, Helgeland resigned
from the picture rather than shoot the new scenes, which were requested by
Gibson and written by co-screenwriter Terry Hayes. Gibson then hired an
unidentified hack to direct the extra footage, or roughly 30 percent of the
final cut.
So what are the reshot scenes? 
(1) all of Kris Kristofferson's scenes
(2) Gibson's torture scene in which his bare toes get hammered
(3) Gibson getting hit by a car and later getting slammed into a pile of
boxes
(4) the bomb-under-the-bed device and the action that results from it
(5) some of the scenes between the Asian dominatrix (Lucy Liu) and Gibson's
betrayer Val (Gregg Henry)
Mel Gibson's dad, Hutton Gibson, moved the family from upstate NY to Sydney,
Australia in 1968 after winning as a contestant on TV's "Jeopardy" game
show. His brother Donald Gibson is also an actor. His sporadic repertoire of
film credits includes three of his more popular brother's films: CONSPIRACY
THEORY, BRAVEHEART and MAVERICK. Mel is about to have his 7th child with his
wife since 1980, Robyn Moore. He is a devout, traditional Catholic.
Three of director Brian Helgeland's screenplays made their way to the big
screen in 1997. THE POSTMAN starring Kevin Costner, L.A. CONFIDENTIAL
starring Russell Crowe and Kevin Spacey, and CONSPIRACY THEORY (5/10) with
Mel Gibson and Julia Roberts.
The man who plays the black cop in this movie is actor Bill Duke. You may
remember him from his roles in early Arnold Schwarzenegger films like
COMMANDO (7.5/10) and PREDATOR (8/10). He is also a director in his own
right, having filmed such films as SISTER ACT 2 and 1997's HOODLUM.
This filmed was tentatively titled PARKER before the name change.
Novelist Donald E. Westlake, whose book this movie is based on, has written
several screenplays including 1987's THE STEPFATHER (7.5/10) and 1990's THE
GRIFTERS (6.5/10).
Co-screenwriter Terry Hayes has also written Mel Gibson films before. He was
the man who penned MAD MAX 2 and MAD MAX BEYOND THUNDERDOME.
Actress Maria Bello is better known for her role as Dr. Anna DelAmico on
television's drama show "ER". Her role was solidified on the show after a
guest appearance on the final three episodes of the third season, marked
with good performances, convinced the producers to ask her back as a regular
for the series.
Actress Lucy Alexis Liu, originally from Queens, NY, graduated from the
University of Michigan with a degree in Asian languages and cultures while
also studying acting, dance and voice. She is fluent in Mandarin Chinese and
practices martial arts, including Kali-Eskrima-silat, which is knife and
stick fighting. She has an ongoing role on TV's "Ally McBeal" as Ling Woo.

Title
Review for Finding Forrester (2000)
For more reviews and movie trailers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Directed by Gus Van Sant, the story focuses on a young man with intellectual
gifts beyond those of his fellow peers. A boy with a soft heart, little
faith in himself and no real desire to stand out. A kid who only begins to
believe in his own self-worth when taken under the wings of an older, wiser
man, who himself, has also got issues to overcome. That was the plot line
for GOOD WILL HUNTING, a film which garnered an Oscar in screenwriting for
the buddy-acting duo out of Boston, Ben Affleck and Matt Damon. Three years
later, director Gus Van Sant has decided to take another shot at a very,
very similar film. In my humble opinion, the former was a much better movie.
This one is only passable. And the cameo is cute, but more distracting than
anything.
PLOT:
A young black man living in the Bronx is dared by his friends to break into
the house of an older man considered by all to be nothing more than a
hermit. After their initial encounter, the two strike up a friendship as the
older gentleman helps the younger one improve his writing skills. It turns
out that he is none other than William Forrester, a long-lost writer who
penned one incredible novel over 50 years ago and then disappeared.
CRITIQUE:
The great performance given here by first-time actor Rob Brown and the
semi-inspirational story of the film doesn't save it from feeling dj vu,
telegraphing most of its scenes from the start and wasting plenty of its
side characters. Other than the main duo in this film, who did provide for
some great moments and solid chemistry, the rest of the cast here felt quite
underwritten. Anna Paquin is barely given any soul, Busta Rhymes is funny
but presented with little background and none of Brown's friends in the
movie have anything more than a few lines to distinguish themselves. The
worst case goes out to F. Murray Abraham, who is nothing more than a
one-dimensional "road-block" inserted into the story for obvious conflict
reasons. With that in mind, his character's shenanigans didn't really
provide for any real tension, since his obvious "destructive" nature, left
little doubt as to the film's outcome. Anybody who has seen even one other
"inspirational" movie should be able to see what is ultimately going to
happen once the relationship between Connery and Brown blossoms. But even
more importantly, their story simply did not pull me in emotionally. Brown
was really good as the young boy with the genius brewing under his tough
exterior, but Connery was simply okay as the crabby Scottish drunken guy.
I don't know, maybe I just predicted too much of this film from the get-go,
but I can't imagine anyone else not doing the same. And with very little
development around the two main protagonists of the story, I just didn't get
into their characters as much as I was hoping to. I would have liked more
background on both of them as well. The little we did learn wasn't enough to
satisfy all of my queries. And despite the film moving at a decent pace
(it's long but I didn't feel it go by), Van Sant made some very odd choices
in directing, which stood out for me as a viewer. The slo-mo shots seemed
out of place in this straight-forward drama and the final speech given by
one of the characters was drowned out by a grand score, meant to tug at us
emotionally. Only I was left wondering what the words were that he was
saying. I mean, the film is about writers after all and yet we are barely
treated to any words written by either of the two main players. That was too
bad. With that in mind, I would suggest anyone interested in this topic to
check out WONDER BOYS starring Michael Douglas. That film also covers just
about the same points made in this one, only it focuses more on the older
character instead of the younger one, and does provide for a much stronger
story and better developed secondary characters. All in all, this movie was
an interesting watch, mainly because of the great chemistry between the two
leads, but left me with very little to take home and even less to recommend
to others.

Title
Review for Crow: Salvation, The (2000)
For more reviews and movie wallpapers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
I really liked the original CROW film. Many elements of the film worked for
me, especially the lead role inhabited by Brandon Lee, the fresh approach to
the "death avenger" theme, the fantastic soundtrack, the artful direction,
the entire look and feel of the movie, and whether I liked it or not, the
irony and sadness connected to the film's actual production. The follow-up
to the original film sucked because its lead was weak and carried a heavy
and distracting accent, the plot was lame and the ending...just
embarrassing. This third installment is now being paraded around in hopes of
finding a proper distribution outlet. Is it any good? Well, it's definitely
better than the second one... :)
PLOT:
Despite his continuous pleas of innocence, a 21-year old man gets the
electric chair after he is found guilty of murdering his girlfriend. Once
electrocuted, the dead man returns to the world as a "ghost" (for lack of a
better word) and attempts to piece together the real story behind the brutal
slaying of his love, and avenge both of their deaths.
CRITIQUE:
A great looking picture which did sort of remind me of the "feel" from the
original, but without any of its edge, passion or freshness. All I kept
thinking as I watched this movie was "haven't I seen this exact same movie
before?!?". There wasn't really anything new here. Same ol'- same ol' story.
Guy and his lover die...he wants to extract revenge on the bad guys...he
comes back from the dead and starts kicking ass. The only problem in a
situation like that is that since you already know just about everything
that is about to happen, you basically just sit there connecting the dots
without much invested in the story. In fact, the film's only real salvation
could have been in its key characters or interactions, but despite Mabius
putting forth a valiant effort, the rest of the cast, and overly poetic
dialogue, just plain sucked. In fact, many people in our audience (granted
it was a midnight premiere and a few people were...uhmm, let's just say "a
little tipsy") were cracking up during many of this film's "supposed" tender
moments of sincerity (and that's WITH both O'Barr and Mabius in the audience
with us).
I too found much of it to be a little overly melodramatic. Then again, this
is what we have pretty much come to expect from the CROW films, since the
dude is essentially heartbroken and poetic, but in this film, the premise
just didn't seem to fly anymore. The film itself was definitely a little
more entertaining that the second installment with some pretty slick gory
death scenes, a loud but cool soundtrack, and a lead who doesn't throw you
off with a cheesy accent. In fact, I credit Mabius for pulling off a decent
outing despite my initial skepticism (A teen Crow? Never!). Unfortunately,
you don't really care about ANY of the characters, especially the bad guys
or the family left behind, so all you're basically left with is a low-rent
CROW retread with a decent lead, a nice look, but plenty of bad dialogue,
zero originality or depth.

Title
Review for Raising Arizona (1987)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
The Coen brothers have been known to do many different types of movies.
BLOOD SIMPLE was their ode to the noir murder mysteries. MILLER'S CROSSING
tipped a cap at the stylized gangster flicks. BARTON FINK left much to
interpretation and played on the old Hollywood system. THE HUDSUCKER PROXY
was their take on the 1950s screwball comedy and FARGO was praised by
everyone in the world as the perfect small-town murder fable. Add THE BIG
LEBOWSKI to the list, with a combination of all the elements from above, and
you've got an awesome career for two extremely private filmmakers. And oh
yeah, then there's this movie...
PLOT:
A simple-minded small-time crook and cute policewoman fall in love and
marry. The loving couple cannot have children of their own so they decide to
steal one from a local rich family who recently had quintuplets.
Unfortunately for them, it isn't long before everyone else, including two
ex-cons, a wife swapping foreman and a nasty bounty hunter, find out about
their shenanigans, and try to cash in on their own.
CRITIQUE:
A perfect film which improves with age, this movie takes all the various
elements needed to create an ideal motion picture and nails them right on
the head! Let's start from the top. Delivering a story like nobody's
business. This is a wonderfully rich and clever tale filled with many cool
characters, classic moments and interpretative showdowns. How I never saw
the obvious undertone connection between the "bad ass" Leonard Smalls
representing Cage's character's dark side is beyond me, but the more I see
the film, the more I realize that much of it is a struggle of Cage's own
psyche. But don't mind all that serious interpretation shtuff. This film is
just plain out hilariously funny! It roars with originality, features
dialogue that should be bronzed and saved for generations to come and
marinates it all with a charming score that'll have you humming it for
weeks. But that's not even the half of it. Let's talk about the
performances. All rock solid! Nicolas Cage showing us what he was all about
before he became a "big action star". Quirky, goofy, downtrodden hero with a
loving heart and a poetic mind. How could you not love this guy?
Holly Hunter playing the ultimate white trash wifey with a precious soul,
while others like John Goodman and Frances McDormand sweeten the pie,
stuffing the entire film with memorable performances all around. But there's
more. One of the most distinctive features of this film is its impeccably
stylized direction. I mean, foggedabouttit! Hand-held cameras running
around, crane shots, unbelievable stunt tricks (can anyone explain the knife
being thrown in the plank shot?), a classic car chase featuring a pack of
Huggies at its end and various wide-lensed sequences used only to accentuate
the film's over-the-top fantastical comedy feel. Amazing, just amazing. But
the Coen masterpiece wouldn't be complete without a touch of the
heartstrings as well. One of the last scenes featuring the husband and wife
team overlooking a child's crib gets me every time! Wow. A hilarious romp
that manages to poke a hole in our tender side, too? Whatta flick. Add all
that to the film's infectious prologue and ambiguous epilogue, and you've
got a movie that delivers on all counts and more.
A cool story, classic dialogue, excellent performances, a catchy soundtrack,
a unique visual flair, humor, drama, thrills, chases, love, hate and a
fantastical element soaking the entire film in a blanket of surrealism. So
if you love originality in film, if you love the stylized ventures a la Coen
and appreciate well-written words intermixed with slap-stick comedy, check
this flick out asap! "There's right and there's right and never the t'wain
shall meet." Okay, then.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars: (Courtesy of the IMDb)
The part of Edwinna was written especially for Holly Hunter. The Coen
brothers lived with Holly, Sam Raimi and Frances McDormand when they were
all first starting out in Hollywood. Of course, Frances and Joel Coen went
on to marry in 1984 and recently adopted a baby named Pedro.
Joel is the brother who usually gets the "credit" for directing their films,
but it is well known that both he and his brother Ethan direct their films
together. They also write and produce their films together, and edit most of
them under the pseudonym, Roderick Jaynes.
The shot in which the camera moves in on the mother discovering that Nathan
Jr. is gone is a direct homage to Sam Raimi's EVIL DEAD, a film on which
Joel Coen was an editor.
The alarm button the clerk presses in the convenience store reads
"Odegard-Trend Security." This is the name of the security company in Sam
Raimi's CRIMEWAVE, a film the brothers Coen co-wrote with Raimi himself.
The character Leonard Smalls (Randall "Tex" Cobb) is a reference to Lenny
Small from OF MICE AND MEN.
The acronyms "P.O.E" and  "O.P.E." spray-painted in the washroom and shown
in reverse in the mirror are references to the Stanley Kubrick films DR.
STRANGELOVE OR: HOW I LEARNED TO STOP WORRYING AND LOVE THE BOMB and THE
SHINING.
H.I. can be seen wearing a uniform with the name "Hudsucker Industries"
written on it during one of the film's earlier scenes. This is also the name
of the company in THE HUDSUCKER PROXY, also by the Coen brothers.
When Nathan Arizona is being interviewed one of the microphones has "KOEN"
written on it. This is a reference to the filmmakers, the Coen brothers.

Title
Review for Idle Hands (1999)
For more reviews and movie trivia, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Finally, a teen flick that deals with the real issues that conflict our
generation of Xers from day to day: kids smoking pot, watching TV all day,
getting horny, getting their hand possessed by the devil, listening to heavy
rock music, killing folks in the gruesomest of manners, and oh yeah, smoking
more pot.
PLOT:
Young man with nothing but time on his hands, suddenly finds one of his
hands possessed by the devil, and looking for murder. After his hand kills
two of his good friends, they return as the undead and try to help their
buddy solve his little hand problem, and save the girl of his dreams from
the wrath of his five fingers.
CRITIQUE:
A poor man's rehash of two true horror/comedy classics: Sam Raimi's EVIL
DEAD 2 (8/10) and John Landis' AN AMERICAN WEREWOLF IN LONDON (8/10), this
film features a lot of hit-and-miss black humor, some overly disgusting
killings, a beautiful damsel in distress, and a lot of head-banging music,
that will have you momentarily amnesia-ing its lame plot and overall weak
impact. This movie is easy enough to watch if you enjoy this type of gore
and humor, but nothing to brag about to your horror-fiend buddies. Weak
believability is another detriment to this film, as his right hand's
"possession" is never really explained, and his love interest, for reasons
unknown to anyone, never ever notices one little thing about his major
problem. Hello?!? McFly? Anybody home? In its defense, the film actually
does pull off the delicate balance of comedy and horror, but somehow lacks
the conviction or originality in either of the two arenas to score as a
complete hit.
Some cinematic newbies might enjoy it because of its original premise
(Unoriginal to me, having seen the themes covered better in earlier films),
the loud and hip music (The punk-band-de-la-jour "The Offspring" actually
make an appearance in the movie, and officially staple themselves as
sell-outs, or horror movie aficionados?) and the T&A sprinkled here and
there (Well actually, there is only some T, but unfortunately for all of us,
no A whatsoever). The actors are all very good with Devon Sawa pulling off a
great performance as the Mary-Jane-slacker-kid with the possessed hand, and
Seth Green continuing his streak of solid comedic showings as one of the
lively undead. All in all, a passable horror/comedy time for those looking
for exactly this type of gruesome action (Potheads also more than welcome!),
but a definite skip-me to all others who might be looking for something
original, all-out funny and/or terrifying. Recommended slightly higher on
video.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Devon Sawa was born in Vancouver, Canada. You may remember him from his
title role of CASPER as the ghost's human persona, opposite the lovely
Christina Ricci.
Seth Green made his film debut at the tender age of eight in THE HOTEL NEW
HAMPSHIRE and starred in Woody Allen's RADIO DAYS four years later. He was
born in Philadelphia, and might be best remembered of late as the son of Dr.
Evil in Mike Myers' AUSTIN POWERS movies.
In love with the idea of becoming an actress from the age of five, Jessica
Alba was twelve before she took her first acting class. Nine months later,
she was signed by an agent.
Vivica A. Fox hasn't stopped working ever since she was discovered in a
Sunset Boulevard restaurant more than ten years ago. Her big break came in
1996's INDEPENDENCE DAY (6/10).
Director Rodman Flender cut his teeth on the horror genre under the watchful
eye of film legend Roger Corman. A Harvard grad, Flender was made
Vice-President of Worldwide Marketing and Distribution at Corman's company,
and eventually, VP of production, after having sent his student film BLOODY
MUTILATORS to Corman himself. He also directed LEPRECHAUN 2.
This is the first produced screenplay for writers Terri Hughes and Ron
Milbauer.
Producers Suzanne Todd and Jennifer Todd are sisters.

Title
Review for How the Grinch Stole Christmas (2000)
For more reviews, movie wallpapers & screensavers, visit
http://www.joblo.com/
Bah humbug! It seems as though the season of cheer has arrived, along with
the bells, the whistles, the remake of a classic American Christmas
tale...huh?!? Stop the presses. Okay, so nobody really needed to renovate
this timeless cartoon featuring the memorable narration by Boris Karloff and
the symphonic rhymes of the Doctor they call Seuss, but alas, we're dealing
with Hollywood here, and classics equal money, right? Let's see how things
turned out.
PLOT:
The Grinch lives with his dog, up in a mountain, overseeing a town called
Whoville, inhabited by the happy-go-lucky Whos. The Whos are a joyous folk,
they love their Christmas and they are afraid of the Grinch. The Grinch
doesn't like the Whos or Christmas for that matter, and upon this very
evening, the Grinch has taken it upon himself to visit this little town, and
steal Christmas away from the Whos.
CRITIQUE:
Your appreciation of this film will likely hinge on whether or not you enjoy
the character of the Grinch in this movie, and for me, well, he just didn't
click. Carrey did play the character brilliantly but I just didn't think any
of his many shticks were funny. But I might be in the minority here because
many audience members around me (mostly kiddies) were crackin' up quite
some. To me, it just felt like Carrey doing his old MASK character in a
Grinch suit. I'm also a huge fan of the original story upon which this film
is based, and was quite disappointed with many of the over-the-top
"Hollywood" additions to the film. Like the prerequisite "bad guy" in
Whoville (where'd he come from?), the phony baloney romance with the Grinch
(you'd think that they could've come up with a better back story than the
fact that he was laughed at in school) and some of the kooky things that
they made the Grinch say ("The sun is right, and the powder's bitchin"?).
Brrrrrr. And what the heck happened to the classic "You're a Mean One"
song?!? Yikes! Bells and whistles don't always make things better, folks.
And despite a great "feeling" of Whoville all around, and solid effects to
boot, I wasn't sure if everything in this movie was supposed to look like
one big set filled with fake snow, or if that was just part of the whole
Whoville lore (looking conspiciously like Disneyworld's ToonTown, I might
add). But overall, I dug the "feel" of the film.
Mind you, it would've been nice to see more special effects added to the
film, to give it that extra level of fantasy. Any-who, don't let me
completely discourage you here because some of the elements in this film did
work. I liked the way that the whole thing was shot, much like a cartoon,
big and bulky and shiny and happy. I also loved the girl who played Little
Cindy Lou-Who, she was absolutely adorable! And the narration was another
highlight, hearing Anthony Hopkins deliver many of those classic lines felt
just right. But overall, the film seemed to be produced for a new generation
of Grinch fans. Children whose parents have stacked wallets to purchase
mucho Grinch products! And that is something I certainly won't
dispute...kids should really dig this flick! I don't generally compare
remakes to their originals, as I feel that every film should be critiqued
based on their own merits, but sadly I could not help but draw comparison
here, seeing as this was based on one of my personal favorite childhood
memories. Sigh. But even without those memories, this film simply didn't do
enough to win me over. If you like Carrey's Grinch character in this film,
with all of his one-liners, his exaggerated facial expressions et al, you
will probably enjoy this movie for what it is. A frivolous sock-hop at the
movie house. For me, the Grinch will always be that quiet, misunderstood
green dude at the top of that mountain. The guy with a mysterious past, an
uncertain future and a knack for meanness. Grinchy-poo, you used to be a
mean one...now you're just a goof. Sigh. Cha-chink.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Anthony Hopkins narrated all of his dialogue for this movie in one day.
Screenwriter Jeffrey Price also had a hand in writing WILD WILD WEST and WHO
FRAMED ROGER RABBIT.
Wanna know how much "snow" was used on the sets for this movie? Apparently
enough to cover nine football fields. Number of ornaments in the film? 8200.
Number of candy canes? 1938.
You don't have to look too hard to see director Ron Howard's family members
packed into this cast. Brother Clint is there, as well as his dad Rance and
Bryce Howard. And who's this Jeremy Howard? Any relation?
Hmmmm, I didn't notice him myself but Mini-Me, Verne Troyer, also has a part
in this movie.
Jim Carrey actually sings "You're a Mean One" in this film.

Title
Review for No Way Out (1987)
For more movie reviews and trivia, visit http://www.joblo.com/
PLOT:
Hero Navy-boy gets a posh job as a liaison in the Pentagon under the
Secretary of Defense, and soon starts up a secret affair with the same man's
mistress, initially unbeknownst to him. When the woman in question is
killed, our Navy-boy heads up an investigation for the Secretary to find the
other man with whom she was having an affair, also believed to be the
murderer.
CRITIQUE:
A taut political thriller, this film offers us a touch of sex, plenty of
suspense and intrigue webbed inside a cliched 80s soundtrack, a powerhouse
performance by Will Patton, and a fascinating look behind the covert walls
of the US government's big-wigs. Kevin Costner also pulls off his greatest
looking part, while Gene Hackman continues his standout work, chewing right
into every one of his morally-challenged lines with fervor. The film itself
does take a little while to get going, but once the "chase" is on, it
doesn't let up until the very last visually-resounding scene. On the down
side, besides the dated soundtrack, I did not particularly enjoy Sean
Young's performance or the very last two minutes of the film, which seemed
gratuitously tacked on for inexplicable reasons. But even those small
oversights don't take away from the fact that this film comes through on all
cylinders in respect to plot, tension, acting, suspense and intrigue. All in
all, one of the best thrillers to come out of the 80s, and certainly one
that still holds up to the test of time.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Ten years after working together as actors, Kevin Costner co-starred and
directed Will Patton in the ill-fated THE POSTMAN.
The character of Nina is played by none other than international model, Iman
(full name Iman Abdulmajid), who happens to be married to the Thin White
Duke himself, David Bowie. She was born in Somalia.
Plot hole anyone? The Pentagon is one of the largest buildings in the world,
with 17 miles of corridors alone. For a single group to search it in two
hours is preposterous. Oh well, it's just a movie!

Title
Review for Mummy, The (1999)
For more reviews and movie trivia, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Brendan Fraser, action star? Yessiree-Bobby!! Take him, slap him into an
adventure/horror flick with a bunch of other semi-unknowns, some superb
mummy special effects, and an updated version of the 1932 Boris Karloff
classic of the same name, and you've got yourself a good ol' rock 'n roll
time at the movies!
PLOT:
Set in 1923, 3,000 years after the horrific mummification of a man who
fooled around with the Pharaoh's mistress, this tale follows three divergent
personalities searching for the ancient City of the Dead, where the mummy
and some awesome treasures are said to be buried. A librarian with a
penchant for all things ancient, her goofy brother, looking for the fortune
of his life, and Rick O'Connell, your modern day hero.
CRITIQUE:
The fun summer thrill ride of action-packed popcorn movies with extra cheese
has begun with a major Egyptian blast, in this part-romance, part-action,
part-horror, part-comedy kick in the entertainment nuts! I would qualify
this film as being one of the closest deemed worthy of the title of
Indiana Jones Jr., with its charismatic lead actor, in Brendan Fraser, its
non-stop adventurous tone, and its mouth-dropping special effects of the
Mummy and his wonderfully wicked world of evil. This is the perfect movie to
go see if you want to escape to a place of the past, with breath-taking
images of the desert, damsels in distress, swash-buckling and gun-toting
heroes and a gallery of mummies ready to skin you to the bone, in hopes of
regaining their own livelihood. Check your brain at the door, and enjoy the
bumpy ride, cause this one will have you laughing, screaming and sighing
your way into the mysterious world of ancient Egypt and its spooky-dooky
myths.
Credit the special effects department with most of this film's greatest
moments, but don't take away from the always entertaining script written by
the director himself, Stephen Sommers, and the enjoyable action sequences
which mixed comedy and a slick choreography of guns, knives, swords, kicks
and punches. The cast is also very good, with Fraser leading the way as the
man who likes to kick mummy ass, John Hannah as the always amusing brother
of the leading lady, and Kevin O'Connor as the quirky weasel who gets into
cahoots with the bandaged corpse himself. All in all, a fun time at the
movies, with plenty of action, comedy, adventure and romance to satisfy
everyone waiting impatiently for THE PHANTOM MENACE, and some of the coolest
special effects this side of THE MATRIX (7.5/10). In fact, it's a perfect
place to take your own "mummy" on Mother's Day this weekend. Then again,
thousands of flesh-eating bugs munching a man alive might not be her cup o'
tea :)
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Brendan Fraser was born in Indianapolis and raised in Europe and Canada. He
was the fourth son of a Canadian career bureaucrat whose job for the office
of tourism required him to say the least, do some travelling. His first
screen role was opposite River Phoenix and Lily Taylor in the
underappreciated film DOGFIGHT (8.5/10). He currently resides in L.A. with
his wife Afton and dog Wylie. He stands 6'3".
You may remember actor John Hannah from his gay role in FOUR WEDDINGS AND A
FUNERAL (8/10) and SLIDING DOORS (7.5/10) with Gwyneth Paltrow. Before he
decided on a career as an actor, John was an apprentice electrician for four
years. He gave this up after being accepted by a drama school in Glasgow.
The man who plays the Mummy is born in South Africa and his name is Arnold
Vosloo.
After director Stephen Sommers attended St-Johns University and The
University of Seville in Spain, he spent four years performing in theatre
groups and managing rock 'n roll bands throughout Europe. From there, he
relocated to L.A., and attended the USC School of Cinema-Television for
three years, earning a Master's Degree. He also wrote and directed his last
film called DEEP RISING.
Several follow-ups to the original MUMMY film from 1932 include THE MUMMY'S
HAND, THE MUMMY'S TOMB, THE MUMMY'S GHOST and THE MUMMY'S CURSE.
This film took 17 weeks to complete filming in Morocco and the United
Kingdom. The political climate in Egypt during the pre-production period of
this film, made it impossible to set up such a major movie with all of its
inherent logistical problems.

Title
Review for Election (1999)
For more reviews and movie quizzes, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Actor Matthew Broderick finally comes full-circle after several failed
attempts at a respectable career as a working actor in Hollywood, and
becomes a teacher in high school, a role diametrically opposed to his most
famous acting role to date, as the uncatchable student Ferris Bueller in
1986's classic John Hughes comedy FERRIS BUELLER'S DAY OFF (8/10). Anyone?
Anyone??
PLOT:
Overly ambitious student Tracey Flick is running for the student body
presidency and will not let anybody stand in her way. Not her twelve-year
veteran teacher Mr. M, not the most popular boy in high school who is also
running for the political prize, nor his lesbian sister, the other nominee
on the ballot.
CRITIQUE:
Clever, somewhat predictable, stylish film features Reese Witherspoon's
greatest performance to date as the most annoying overachiever that you'd
ever NOT want to meet. Now despite generally enjoying this film, I could not
help but compare it to (what seems like its male counterpart) the superior
1998 film, RUSHMORE (8/10), which featured a stronger performance by its
co-star, Bill Murray, a more entertaining script, and many funnier moments.
But since any direct comparison is inherently unfair, I would say that this
film does succeed in its root of black comedy, with no huge laughs, an
interesting plot, and several great performances, with Witherspoon's showing
topping them all.
By its very nature, this scathing satire contains various contemptible
characters who essentially think of no one but themselves, and create that
sort of "Seinfeld" mentality in which the person making the least immoral
mistakes will win, if only by default. The one character that did feature
some conscientious behavior, the football playing popular-boy, struck me as
too big of a moron to appreciate as a true character, but maybe that's just
me. Too goofy, for my taste. One other thing to note is that this film is
definitely a comedy for adults, not for kids! Some teenagers may appreciate
it, but overall, me thinks this feature is geared towards the more cynical
segment of our modern day adult population. All in all, a superb performance
by Reese Witherspoon, a clever script, some funny moments, but ultimately
too similar to RUSHMORE to appreciate as an original story (for me, that
is).
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Actress Reese Witherspoon is currently engaged, and carrying the child of
fellow actor Ryan Phillippe. Interesting little story about her from the
IMDb, "Shortly after she started acting she had an audition for a role in
CAPE FEAR (8.5/10). She was supposed to meet with Robert DeNiro and Martin
Scorsese for the audition, but at the time didn't really know who they were.
On the plane she was talking to the man next to her about her audition, and
the man started to rave to her about DeNiro and Scorsese. This made her so
nervous that she completely blew the audition and the role eventually went
to Juliette Lewis."
Matthew Broderick was at one time engaged to actress Helen Hunt, and another
time, to actress Jennifer Grey. He has now been married to actress Sarah
Jessica Parker since May 1997.
For first-time movie actor Chris Klein, it was during his senior year at
Millard West High School in Omaha that he literally bumped into director
Alexander Payne as he was scouting Klein's high school as a possible
location for ELECTION. After an audition for Payne, and only four weeks into
his first semester at Texas Christian University where he is studying
dramatic arts, Klein received the offer to star in ELECTION.
It is also the first time acting gig for actress Jessica Campbell, who plays
Chris Klein's sister in the movie. Her former acting coach asked
writer/director Alexander Payne to take a look at Campbell's audition tape
in consideration for a role in the film, subsequently landing one of the
production's lead roles.
Director Alexander Payne's first feature film was 1996's critically
acclaimed CITIZEN RUTH. Originally from Omaha, Nebraska, Payne received B.A.
degrees in history and Spanish literature from Stanford University. Payne
then earned an M.F.A. from UCLA's prestigious filmmaking program. His thesis
film, THE PASSION OF MARTIN, was screened at the 1991 Sundance Film Festival
and more than 20 other festivals around the world.
A couple of scenes in this film are in obvious homage to director Alfred
Hitchcock's PSYCHO.
This film is based on a novel of the same name by writer Tom Perotta.
Actress Thora Birch left the filming in Omaha on her third day because of
creative differences with director Alexander Payne.

Title
Review for Ravenous (1999)
For more reviews and movie trivia, visit http://www.joblo.com/
So you've been waiting for ages for a decent cannibal movie to come along,
eh? Well, wait no further, this one's got all the blood and horror that you
could sink your teeth into. Robert Carlyle of THE FULL MONTY and
TRAINSPOTTING (9/10), and Guy Pearce from L.A. CONFIDENTIAL
(6.5/10) (He was the square cop) star in this entertaining plate of human
hors d'oeuvres. Bon appetit!
PLOT:
A cowardly soldier is sent to a small village of eight in response to his
weak character. One night, a strange man falls among them with tales of
starving folks in the mountains eating one another for survival. It is only
when the villagers actually go into the hills to investigate, that they find
more than what they bargained for.
CRITIQUE:
An extremely original tasty feast of suspense, disgust and human delicacies.
If you've been waiting for an original movie to come to dinner this year,
wait no longer, because this film's got a solid premise, great actors, an
entertaining and gory story, and all the trimmings of a cannibal
movie...with laughs! This movie starts off slooooow, but once it gets going
about thirty minutes in, it doesn't let up until the last bone is licked
dry. It's even got an eerie DELIVERANCE-type, addictive score that takes the
edge off the serious tip of the film, without ever losing focus of the
drive, interest and human drama engaged in this film about men who eat one
another!!! Overall, this movie is played pretty seriously, but you can't
help but find yourself laughing at some of the extraordinary situations
presented to some of these men. Now that's finger-lickin'-good!
This movie is not for those who are faint of heart. In fact, I noticed a few
people shuffling out during my screening. But for all those of you who are
sick of seeing Hollywood churn out one old TV-show-into-a-movie after
another, enjoy a little bloody fun, and don't have a problem with people
discussing the benefits of eating human beings, you will most certainly
relish this flick. You might never look at a piece of steak the same way
again, but that's beside the point. All in all, this movie does take its
time to get started, slow pace and all, but once the eating begins, it's all
about sitting back, belching enjoyably, and trying to take your eyes off the
screen. Look mom, there's an arm! And there's a leg! Fun for the whole
family. Well, maybe the Addams Family.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
When this movie's first director, Milcho Manchevski was fired from the set
by Fox 2000 (as reported in Premiere magazine, May 1998), star Robert
Carlyle is reported to have personally requested that director Antonia Bird
be brought on to the project. A few months later in May 1998, shooting
resumed with Bird at the helm. Carlyle had starred in two earlier films
directed by Bird called PRIEST and FACE.
MORE COMING SOON to JoBlo's Movie Emporium

Title
Review for Red Corner (1997)
For more reviews, go to http://surf.to/joblo
Richard Gere follows his heart and stars in this picture that
ironically pits his character against the government of China. Let it
be known that Gere, a devout Buddhist, does not generate a huge
following amongst the officials of the Chinese government, as his
stance for the freedom of Tibet has been widely documented. 
PLOT:
Businessman Moore (Gere) goes to China to negotiate distribution rights
to American television programs with the government of China. During a
reckless night out, Mr. Moore hooks up with a sexy Chinese woman,
bringing her back to his apartment for a little nightcap. The next day,
Moore is awakened by the Chinese police, who charge him with the murder
of said sexy Chinese woman, now lying dead in apartment. If found
guilty, Moore could face the firing squad. The US embassy, many
high-ranking Chinese officials, and an intelligent Chinese defense
lawyer all get involved in this mysterious case. 
CRITIQUE:
Interesting, insightful, somewhat derivative, and a tad overlong,
suspense tale that managed to keep me awake and entertained through
most of its hackneyed tactics and plot twists. Granted, I recently saw
RETURN TO PARADISE (7.5/10) set in Malaysia, which was much more
original and gripping. True, the ultimate
American-caught-in-a-foreign-jail-cell film will always be MIDNIGHT
EXPRESS (8/10). But having said that, this film was good enough for
what it was (mindless entertainment for Mrs. JoBlo, me and some nachos
on a Saturday nite), and even offered some small moments of actual
suspense. 
The acting was so-so on Gere's part, who seems to be walking through
most of his roles of late, (on his way to the Dalai Lama's pad, I
imagine) but a great performance by his defense lawyer, Bai Ling, makes
the characters much more compelling than they might've been on paper.
Another thing that I liked about this film is the fact that it didn't
just show the Chinese justice system as an ancient, unfair system
compared to our "great"American counterpart. The film made sure that we
saw some of the strengths in their system, while simultaneously
demonstrating the real weaknesses that remain in ours. 
All in all, the film is no masterpiece by any stretch of the "fish out
of water movies" book of imagination, but I guess it didn't really hurt
while swallowing and left very little taste in my mouth, so check it
out if you feel like a decent thrilling flick set in a foreign country
starring the wonderboy of salt-and-pepper hair, Richard Gere (Note:
There's also a decent shot of Rick's big white ass at one point in this
picture...if you're into that kind of thing, that is.) Keep in mind
that I found the ending to be rather anti-climactic, and that the film
could have been cut by about twenty minutes or so, but with my nachos
warm and my Coke cold as ice, what the heck did I have to complain
about ?!?
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Richard Gere was married to supermodel by day, playboy centerfold by
night, Cindy Crawford for about four years. He was born in
Philadelphia, and was banned from the Oscars once after making
anti-China comments on the air at the 1993 ceremony.
Screenwriter Robert King also wrote the script for one of the 90's
biggest flops: CUTTHROAT ISLAND. 
Bai Ling played the character of Myca in the original CROW (8.5/10)
film opposite Brandon Lee. She was born in China, in the year 1970.

Title
Review for Gojira ni-sen mireniamu (1999)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Looking back, it seems as though I was a little kind to Roland Emmerich's
version of GODZILLA (6/10) a few years back. I apparently really liked the
special effects, despite them being wrapped in a garbage stench of a plot
and characters, and stamped it with a "barely recommendable" nametag. I
don't know, I might've been drunk when I wrote that review :). But if you
look at this film, many of the same issues apply, with the major difference
being that this film is so over-the-top cheesy that it actually provides for
a sizeable amount of entertainment. So if you don't expect HAMLET and campy
flicks are your bag, this one should fill it up real nice.
PLOT:
Big giant green monster named Godzilla comes out of the Tokyo waters at
sundown to pummel down all that is in his path. Scientists and government
officials attempt to stop it. But what's this? An alien flying saucer is
discovered underwater and it seems to want Godzilla for something too. Slap
them all together, and get ready for a big showdown featuring bumbling
scientists, Godzilla and nasty aliens.
CRITIQUE:
Can a movie packed with cheesy acting, cheesy dialogue, cheesy effects and a
cheesy plot actually = a good movie? Yup! In this case, this is just that
kind of movie! Cheese with plenty of mustard, relish and a deep appreciation
for films that are really bad. But don't get me wrong, the film isn't all
that horrible. In fact, many of the special effects in this film are
actually quite good, especially during the film's first 10 minutes. The plot
is also goofy but definitely more original than the lame "let's lay some
eggs" plot from Emmerich's GODZILLA, and the action scenes deliver plenty of
cool sequences. So will you enjoy this movie if you go in thinking that it
will be good? I doubt it. The whole point of a film like this is that you
know that it is "bad", but you end up laughing and enjoying it anyway. Well,
at least I did.
The only reason that I didn't score it higher is because even as a good
"bad" movie, it lacked somewhat. There were way too many scenes of Godzilla
slowly making his way through the city...and I mean reaaaaal slow! Step it
up, slowpoke, you're a fiery beast!! The film also lost me about halfway
through when they decided to leave Godzilla in the background for a while
and concentrate more on this whole side-plot involving a dude getting
trapped in a building which is just about to blow up. You don't really need
that kind of thing here. Slowed the film down somewhat. But it was all good
when the big green rubber-looking monster came growling out of the water and
kickin' that major Tokyo ass. Who wouldn't enjoy two giant rubber dolls
trading swings and fire rays?! I know I did. Overall, this is NOT the kind
of film that "regular" movie-goers will likely enjoy. It's a film for people
who like making fun of the bad dubbing, watching over-the-top actors deliver
bad lines and obvious sets. Overall, I would say that it's a fun ride...but
only if you've chosen to be on that ride. Know what I mean?
PS: The best/worst, and I mean BEST line in this whole movie comes from a
scientist near the end of the film, who gives us his reasoning behind
Godzilla's humanistic qualities. You will ROLL in the aisles!! "it's because
there's a little Godzilla in..."

Title
Review for Go (1999)
For more reviews and movie trivia, visit http://www.joblo.com/
The director of one of my favorite films of all-time, SWINGERS (9.5/10),
Doug Liman, joins a hip script written by rookie scribe John August, slaps
in a bunch of young kids acting nutty, and demands you to GO see his movie!
PLOT:
Christmas time in Los Angeles just isn't like Christmas anywhere else. One
evening takes us through a drug deal gone bad, a rave scene gone right,
accidents galore, a fun "boys night" out in Vegas, shootings, homosexual
under-and overtones, and an all-around jolly time via the selected lives of
several slick teenage candidates.
CRITIQUE:
A mini-PULP FICTION for the quirky kids of today, this movie cranks you
through three separate stories taking place on the same night to a raving
cast of entertaining characters, chock-full of black humor, non-stop
excitement (except the third story, which was my least favorite of the
three), a pounding soundtrack, and all the originality that's been lacking
from every other crappy teenage flick to come down the pike this year.
Forget SHE'S ALL THAT (6.5/10) and NEVER BEEN KISSED (6/10), this movie
rolls their humdrum cinematic existences into a joint and smokes it! This
film's got punch, plenty of action, many over-the-top scenes, and a
convenient, but still satisfying ending, that'll have you crackin' up and
cringing all at the same time. The one sour note in the entire meal was the
"third story" which was particularly slower than the first two, and did
manage to bend my interest for a while, but all the same, the conclusion of
this film stapled my approval locked, stocked and two smoking barrels! (I
don't even know what that means, but the point is...I enjoyed this movie!)
All of the actors were effective, save for Jay Mohr who is just getting way
too many bit parts for his own good. Sarah Polley stood out in them all,
while the Vegas boys all deserve a tip of the hat. Director Liman is also to
be congratulated for making a film that is still fun, stylish, and quite
different from his well-known hit, SWINGERS. Both films do have an
underground scene and Vegas in common, but that's where the similarities
stop. GO plays with X-tasy, female lap dancing, oral sex jokes, and Amway
products, all tied up in a nice Christmas bow. I also like the separate
point of view way of telling each story, the drug-induced sequences (DAZED
AND CONFUSED, look out!), and the overall flow of the entire picture (save
part trois), which culminated into a fantastic, ravelicious conclusion. Now
if you've ever come home high as a kite, or wasted out of your gorge...or if
you've ever had one of those days that you wish would just go away...well,
slap them both together, add some drug-laced seasonings, a little pulp-noir,
a cast of hipsters and have yourself a jolly ol' Saint Nicholas of a time,
and don't forget to GO to this awesome, little movie!
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
This is writer John August's first produced movie screenplay. He is 27 years
old, and also served as co-producer on this film. He found his inspiration
for this film amid the checkout clerks at the rundown Ralphs Grocery on
Sunset Boulevard in Los Angeles, known as "Rock 'n' Roll Ralphs" due to its
proximity to various guitar academies. Originally written to be a short
film, the script-then titled "X" expanded over the next two years into its
current feature length.
Scott Wolf landed the first job he ever auditioned for and has continued to
work steadily ever since. He attended the same elementary school as Ian
Ziering from TV's "Beverly Hills 90210", and has a degree in Finance from
George Washington University.
You may remember actress Sarah Polley from her earlier role at the age of
nine in THE ADVENTURES OF BARON MUNCHAUSEN (8.5/10). Her character was named
Sally Salt. Later on in life, she dropped out of high school to become a
political activist for Socialist groups, and once tried to pick up JoBlo
Movie Emporium's own Coop the Scoop (read all about that incident here:
http://www.joblo.com/scoop3.htm).
Taye Diggs made his feature film debut starring opposite Angela Bassett in
the film adaptation of Terry McMillan's HOW STELLA GOT HER GROOVE BACK. He's
born in New Jersey and counts Syracuse University as his alma matter.
Desmond Askew (the British guy) made his American feature film debut in this
movie.
Born and raised in Toledo, Ohio, Katie Holmes (middle name Noelle, which
means "Christmas" in French...She was born on December 18, 1978) began
acting in high school theater productions. She attended Notre Dame Academy,
which was an all-girls parochial school. While attending a national modeling
and talent convention in New York City, she met a manager who encouraged her
to come to Los Angeles for the television pilot season. Holmes landed the
role of Joey on the hit series "Dawson's Creek", the highest rated show on
the WB network.


Title
Review for Fight Club (1999)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, scripts & trailers, visit
http://www.joblo.com/
Wow. Director David Fincher has now made three extremely original and
powerful films in a row. He created SEVEN (9/10), the best thriller of the
nineties, THE GAME (8/10), an excellent film featuring a labyrinthian script
with plenty of twists and turns, and now, FIGHT CLUB, a man's movie which
accentuates the director's uniquely creative touch alongside an impeccably
written script sure to elicit plenty of insight and discussion. All in all,
I would say that the man is having a great decade!
PLOT:
A young, disheartened male hooks up with another cool rockin' young male who
likes to live life to its rawest, and the two men start up a local "fight
club", which no one (including this critic) can talk about. When the high of
the fights are no longer enough to satisfy the duo, they decide to take
things to another level.
CRITIQUE:
Every now and then, a film comes along with balls big enough to pull you by
the hair, bang you against the wall and order you to "wake the fuck up!" and
question your entire purpose of life. AMERICAN BEAUTY was a variance of that
type of film, primarily targeted to the baby-boom family audience. FIGHT
CLUB is the fantasy answer to many of the questions facing the doomed male
"generation Xers" of the nineties. When contemplating your reality is a
task too depressing to reflect upon, why not invent your own tangible
existence and allow it to replenish your lost spirit and sense of direction?
This film gave me a strong sense of power, a visceral energy, opening my
eyes to aspects of my life which had previously laid dormant. I understood
Norton's character. He spoke to me. He understood me. He understood a lot of
my buddies. We understood him. This film is NOT for everyone. It's quite
long at close to two and a half hours, it's deeper than the commercials make
it out to be, and it's definitely going to be appreciated on certain levels
more by men than women. And that ain't sexist, that's just like I think
THELMA & LOUISE is a great movie, but some women considered it to be their
wake-up call. FIGHT CLUB would be ours.
Most importantly, besides all of the philosophical poignancies of this film,
is the fact that the movie entertained me thoroughly. It had a Fincher-feel
(We could say that now), many unique ways of presenting the film's
developments, a dark, brooding look, excellent portrayals by all of the
actors involved, a pounding soundtrack, which I wish they had utilized to a
stronger degree, black humor (!), and a conclusion which can only make you
want to see the film all over again. Toss all that in with plenty of LOST
HIGHWAY-type touches, homosexual undertones, and oh yes...a hot, steaming
plate of the ol' ultra-violence!! Unlike some people, I do not think any of
the violence in this film was overdone, in fact, once you understand the
message of the film, you should truly be able to appreciate its precise
raison-d'etre. It's not even about the fight clubs themselves (Nuff said)!
Another thing I loved about this film is its trailer, which thankfully gave
us very little about the plot, and left so much more to the imagination.
Excellent appetizer! Another sign of a great film is when it has me
chattering it up with my buddies afterwards. FIGHT CLUB kept us yapping for
hours on end. Figuring this thing out, then another thing, and yet another.
Very cool!
One piece of advice that I will hand over to people who have yet to see this
film is that you should go in with a completely open mind. It is very
important for you, much like the main character in this film, to flush all
of your preconceptions and expectations of a film. See it as a painting and
study its texture while discovering its many sorted hidden messages. Or
better yet...see it so that you could check out Brad Pitt's crazy six-pack
abs!! Wow, what a man and whatta movie! See it or I'll have to fight you in
the parking lot after work!
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Seeing that comparisons to the Kubrick classic CLOCKWORK ORANGE seemed
inevitable (Fellow online movie critic James Berardinelli called it "the 90s
version of CLOCKWORK ORANGE), it's nice to see that the screenwriter also
saw the connection as he included the word "clockwork" in one of Norton's
dialogue pieces. Listen for it during the last half hour of the film.
Another "in-joke" in this movie has Pitt and Norton walking out onto a
sidewalk which features a movie theatre in the background. The marquee on
the theatre reads SEVEN YEARS IN TIBET, Brad Pitt's 1997  unsuccessful film.
Helena Bonham Carter's character of Marla was the last role to be cast by
director David Fincher who reportedly chose the Oscar-nominated star over
Rosanna Arquette, Courtney Love, and Winona Ryder. Originally, the title
role of Tyler Durden was open to Sean Penn as well.
I don't think that I'm the only one who caught these, but during the first
half hour of the movie, I noticed several "subliminal" Tyler Durden
appearances pop up in scenes in which he was not a part. Think about it.
In order to look the thuggish part, Brad Pitt had a dentist chisel out
notches in his front teeth.
The 8 Rules of Fight Club are: 1) You do not talk about Fight Club 2) You do
not talk about Fight Club 3) When someone says "Stop" or goes limp, the
fight is over 4) Only two guys to a fight 5) One fight at a time 6) No
shirts, no shoes 7) Fights go on as long as they have to 8) If this is your
first night at Fight Club, you have to fight.
According to his publisher, novelist Chuck Palahniuk (pronounced
paul-ah-nik) is a thirty-four-year-old Caucasian male, five-foot-eleven, one
hundred ninety pounds, brown, green. Of French and Russian descent, he is
attributed to Carol and Fred Palahniuk. He has no distinguishing marks, and
was a technical writer churning out manuals on trucks, service and cars
before he hit it big with his first novel entitled "Fight Club". Fight Club
inspirations? "I did some volunteer work in a hospice for the terminally ill
a couple of years ago and that's where a lot of the stuff in the book came
from. I really loved how people who were really facing it - facing death -
could be really honest and funny and I found that really inspiring to be
around. Furthermore, many of the things that happen in Fight Club are actual
things that have happened to people I know. It's funny, friends who have
recognized themselves in the book come up to me and are really flattered
that I remembered them at a party two days ago. People recognize their cars,
houses and their story and they're so thrilled to have read it in a book."

Title
Review for Hamlet (2000/I)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Regular readers of my reviews should know by now that Shakespeare and I just
don't mix. I think that I was one of the few critics in the world who didn't
care much for SHAKESPEARE IN LOVE (5.5/10), and I certainly have done my
best to stay away from films which feature the traditional dialogue of the
Bard. The fact is that I never studied Shakespeare, never read Shakespeare
and never understood what the heck Shakespeare was saying half the time, so
why bother? With those reservations in mind, I walked into this latest
cinematic presentation of one of the big man's most famous writings, and
came up with this...
PLOT:
The President of the Denmark Corporation is dead. To everyone's surprise,
the widow quickly remarries his brother soon thereafter, leaving son Hamlet
wondering about the nefarious behind-the-scenes shenanigans of it all. Of
course, when the ghost of Hamlet's dad comes to visit him with some more
news regarding his untimely demise, it isn't long before everybody and their
uncle begin to suspect Hamlet of going mad. Revenge, death and a lot of hip,
modern-day gadgets ensue.
CRITIQUE:
Decent enough for a film whose dialogue was mostly Greek to me, this movie
scores points on style and acting, but ultimately runs too long, features
one too many monologues and just completely lost me in the end. Strangely
enough, I actually did enjoy this picture early on, with its modern day
setting, its hip leading man, and its solid score, but as the film drove on
further and further, I soon found myself straining to figure out what the
heck was happening. In the end, I just couldn't get by with just the "gist"
of the conversations, I really needed to know what these people were
babbling about, but unfortunately for me, the dialogue was just a little too
"Shakespeare" to decipher. Having said that, the film also seemed to lack
the proper character development, especially in the case of Ophelia and
Hamlet, whose "romance" I never really bought into.
On the other hand, I did enjoy most all of the performances in the film,
especially Bill Murray, an actor who I was extremely skeptical about before
seeing the film. In the end, he won me over with a sort of flighty
performance of Polonius, delivering his lines with much authenticity, while
still being able to inject it all with a little bit of that "Murray" charm.
Julia Stiles was also quite charming and nice to look at, despite her
character's lack of true involvement in the story, and Ethan Hawke certainly
delivered a good rendition of Hamlet, the slick techno-geek with a little
bit of a head case. I also liked the whole look and feel of the flick, which
was actually shot entirely in New York City, but didn't care much for the
pacing of it all. After a strong start, it seemed as though, every now and
again, the characters would slow the whole thing down with long
conversations with one another, or better yet, inner-monologues with
themselves. Now I imagine this sort of thing might work in a play, or
certainly in a book, but when you're watching people babble on about
something which you barely understand for a minutes on end...well, it gets
kinda lame after a while.
Of course, I would definitely recommend this to any true Shakespeare fan,
only as to compare it to all the others, and even some non-fans, if you like
any of the actors, who truly do shine in this film (yes, even Kyle
MacLachlan was pretty good). Most anyone else could certainly miss this film
and not worry too much about the impact that it will have on their lives. I
liked it better than most of the other stuffy Shakespeare flicks, but in the
end, this one just packed in too much of that ol' Bard dialogue, and not
enough coherence.
Little Known Facts about this movie and its stars:
Diane Venora, who plays the character of Queen Gertrude in this film, once
played Ophelia in a made-for-television version of Hamlet in 1990. She also
portrayed the character of Gloria Capulet in the 1996 modern-day Shakespeare
movie ROMEO AND JULIET. Boy, she really loves that Shakepeare, eh?
Actor Dechen Thurman, who play the Bard's comic relief character of
Guildenstern in this film, is the brother of actress Uma Thurman, wife of
Hamlet in this film, Ethan Hawke.
Casey Affleck is credited as being in this film, but other than one shot of
him on a television screen, I honestly can't say that I remember him being
in any of it. I'm guessing that most of his stuff was left on the cutting
room floor?

Title
Review for Chocolat (2000)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
How many movies are they going to make in which someone prepares food which
by itself seems to magically transform folks into more vibrant, horny and
happy people? I personally really liked both LIKE WATER FOR CHOCOLATE and
WOMAN ON TOP, both of which followed the same tradition, but now it seems to
be getting a little out of hand. It was a clever idea at first, Mr. Holly
and Wood, but how about holding off on any new incarnations unless an
extremely creative touch is added to the now-dated concept.
PLOT:
A mystery woman and her daughter enter a "tranquil" town and open their own
chocolatterie (chocolate shop). Soon enough, the puritan locals fall in love
with her confections but not without much backlash from the town's mayor,
who considers her to be a troublemaker.
CRITIQUE:
An interesting, uneven, if entirely predictable fairy-tale comedy featuring
some solid acting all around and a cute story which needlessly sticks around
way past its final course. I enjoyed this movie for the most part. It was
light, fluffy, romantic, funny and it played out very well in the little
village in which it was set up. The intros were well done, the characters
sharpened by the experienced actors and the set-up, despite feeling quite
deja-vu for me, interesting enough to keep my eyes wide awake.
Unfortunately, the movie just didn't seem to know where to stop. It went on
and on and on and on and on. Near the end, it just started feeling like it
was never gonna stop. With its purposely magical feel, I expected a cutesy
story, some romantic and funny moments, which I received, and a quick and
easy ending. But the filmmakers seemed to veer off course about 2/3 of the
way in. That's about the time Johnny Depp entered the picture for the first
time, a man who looks great in just about anything that he does, and
suddenly the film took on a "darker" tone. Things got ugly, death entered
the picture and the film suddenly became...dare I say, realistic! Of course,
realism is fine in most films but with the whole mythical amusing feel of
the movie up until that point, the ending just seemed out of place. It was
like the director wanted to create a fun-loving movie, and get us all
emotional as well. For me, it didn't work.
But the whole movie wasn't an entire waste. In fact, not at all. The actors
were all great, especially Alfred Molina, who by all counts, should be the
one and only choice to redo the part of Inspector Clouseau in any future
PINK PANTHER movies. A great character actor, always! Binoche was good as
well, with enough range to make her character real and believable, and
Carrie Anne-Moss, great move by you and your agent! I barely recognized her
out of those black leather pants...good show! Sadly, Johnny Depp was
woefully underused. This was even more disappointing to me because 1) I love
the man...uuuh, the actor, that is...harumph and 2) Uhhhm, his face is
plastered all over the poster! He might draw people into theatres, but many
will leave disappointed once they acknowledge his grand absence. Anyway, his
character was also very underdeveloped, and I wish we could have had more
time with him, instead of some of the more serious moments near the end of
this film. In the end, the movie was simple enough for me to enjoy for the
most part, thanks to all of the interesting actors in the film and the cute
premise, but it truly does outlast its stay and doesn't really have all that
much to say when you think about it afterwards. Oh yeah and did I mention
that Johnny Depp is one great looking man? Me go eat some chocolate now...

Title
Review for Celebrity (1998)
For more reviews and trivia, go to http://surf.to/joblo
Woody Allen's 29th cinematic feature celebrates the blinded attention
that people pay celebrities in contemporary society. Another jam-packed
cast of celebs ironically pepper this picture, with Woody, the actor,
sitting this one out himself. The film is shot in black & white, of
which Allen self-deprecates himself in the film via one of the
characters when he notes a famous, pretentious director to be the "type
of asshole that shoots all of his movies in black and white!"
PLOT:
This film follows the parallel lives of Lee (Branagh) and his wife
Robin (Davis), after their 16-year marriage ends in divorce. Lee the
writer, covers the celebrity beat, and meets various types of famous
people from the really important to the wannabee importants, while
Robin, attempts to seriously reconstruct her confidence, and her
ability to love again. Some vignettes behind the closed doors of
celebrity ensues. 
CRITIQUE:
Mediocre, mostly unfunny, sometimes interesting piece of cinema that
doesn't really blow you away in any sense or proportion, offers very
little real insight into the lives of celebrities, but does present an
excellent sequence with Leonardo DiCaprio, playing the role of the
unbridled, young movie actor. Over the years, I've noticed that most
Woody Allen movies are predeterminedly enjoyed by those in the Woody
Allen fan club or not. I mean, most people I know either hate the guy,
or love the guy. I personally love the guy and his films, but his most
recent crop has been less than original or interesting. Most recently,
he seems to be writing his scripts in his sleep, with only the
exhaustive Hollywood cast list lingering at the top of his priority
template.
This film was much like DECONSTRUCTING HARRY (6/10) in that it had some
really funny lines, but it mostly played out like a drama, and didn't
succeed exceptionally well in either forum. I was expecting a lot of
behind the scenes insight into celebrities and the public's fascination
thereof, but this film just presented me with a bunch of scenes of
Kenneth Branagh (doing his best Woody Allen impressions) trying to get
it on with different celebrity types. Not that interesting or funny, to
tell you the truth. The rest of the cast was also pretty fair, but for
the exceptionally well-written and well-played scenario with Leo
DiCaprio venting out on his girlfriend and an innocent hotel room,
which proudly stood out like a sore thumb. The whole scene was quite
funny, extremely well-written, and played out very naturally by the
Cap-man himself.
All in all, the film never sold me on any insight into celebrity,
barely worked on a relationship level with Branagh and Judy Davis
trying to get over their divorce, but did offer several very funny
lines and a pretty slick Leo DiCaprio scene. Unlike MANHATTAN, this
movie also had very little in cinematography to get excited about, and
even less in originality, as Allen's New York-style-humor well seems to
be drying up in the 90's. I loved 1994's BULLETS OVER BROADWAY (8/10),
but since then, the Woodman has done very little to impress this
life-long fan. Oh well, I won't give up on you just yet, Woodrow, but I
would not recommend this mediocre entry into someone else's weekend
movie plans, that's for sure. For those interested, go rent BULLETS
OVER BROADWAY, BANANAS (8/10) or ANNIE HALL (8.5/10) and enjoy the
Woody of young, and hope that his next few films revive his creativity,
and rejuvenate his capacity to wow us all over again! 
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Leonardo DiCaprio's full name is Leonardo Wilhelm DiCaprio. He was born
in Hollywood, California. Leo received $2,500,000 for his role in
TITANIC (7/10). To this day, that film has domestically grossed over
$600,000,000. Leo once turned down the role of Robin in BATMAN FOREVER
(6/10), and also considered starring in a movie about actor James Dean
but turned down the role because he felt he wasn't experienced enough
to do the film (1996). When Leo was 5 years old he was in an
educational kids program called "Romper Room". He was nearly kicked off
for uncontrollable behavior. His father George was a comic book dealer.
In 1991-92, he played the homeless boy Luke in the TV sitcom "Growing
Pains".
Winona Ryder was born Winona Laura Horowitz and named after the town in
which she was born, Winona Minnesota. Director David Seltzer spotted
her and cast her in 1986's LUCAS (Her first film.) When telephoned to
ask how she'd like to have her name appear on the credits, she
suggested Ryder as her father's Mitch Ryder album was playing in the
background. Winona was selected for the part of Mary Corleone in THE
GODFATHER: PART III (7/10), but had to drop out of the role after
catching the flu from the strain of doing the films WELCOME HOME, ROXY
CARMICHAEL and MERMAIDS back to back. She said she didn't want to let
everyone down by doing a substandard performance. Others have suggested
that she pulled out from the part because of problems with boyfriend
Johnny Depp, with whom she had been going out since she was 17. The
part eventually went to director Coppola's own daughter Sophia.
This is Judy Davis' fourth presence in a Woody Allen film, with
previous appearances in ALICE (6/10), DECONSTRUCTING HARRY (6/10) and
HUSBANDS & WIVES (7.5/10). She attended drama school with Mel Gibson.
They played Romeo and Juliet together.
Kenneth Branagh was born in Northern Ireland. He was originally cast as
the lead in AMADEUS before the production company decided on an
American cast. The role eventually went to Tom Hulce. Ken was married
to actress Emma Thompson from 1989 to 1996.
Producer Jean Doumanian plays Leonardo DiCaprio's agent in the
limousine scene.

Title
Review for Detroit Rock City (1999)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Every summer, there is at least one movie that gets caught in the landslide
of film releases, and gets lost in the shuffle. Unfortunately for DETROIT
ROCK CITY, it appears as though it has fallen victim to the BLAIR WITCH
hype, a lousy marketing campaign, and the lack of "name" stars to attract
its first weekend audience. But don't let that discourage you, folks...this
is one fun movie!!!
PLOT:
Set in the late 70s, four wryly teenage boys spend an entire day and night
trying to get to Detroit to attend a KISS concert. On their way, they are
led astray by various obstacles including Elvis the hall monitor, the
church-loving mom, Disco geeks and their own stupidity. Rock 'n roll music
burns throughout.
CRITIQUE:
I had a blast at this movie!!! This is a fast-paced, rock 'n roll
soundtrack-induced joyride of nostalgia, hilarity, camera tricks and fun
times! I loved this movie the whole way through, starting with its wonderful
collage of 70s memorabilia credits, the plentitude of references and
in-jokes to all things from that time period, the dead-on performances from
all of its stars, and of course, its satisfyingly predictable finale. I
laughed a lot during this movie, but I was also entranced by the plight of
these kids. I don't think I've ever seen anyone so determined to get
anything in my entire movie-going life! Anyone who's ever had to fight for
something they badly wanted, should be able to relate to these bad-lucked
geeks.
And yes, I also loved the filming style of director Adam Rifkin which went
way over-the-top but managed to mushroom into a perfect match to the rock
music, the "we don't give a fuck" attitude, and all of the wonderfully
cartoonish characters. I'll admit that nostalgia surely had a hand to play
in my over-exuberance for this movie, and maybe I'm just a sucker for shit,
dope and puke jokes, but there was definitely more to this picture than just
those simple factors. All of the actors played their parts flawlessly with
the mom (Lin Shaye) and pothead friend Trip (James DeBello) standing a
little above the rest. The soundtrack was superb, with a constant stream of
songs from the 70s bursting through the background. The settings were also
ideal, with the little touches certifying much authenticity, and more than
anything, the enjoyable, self-mocking style, along with the fun-loving
plight of the youngsters, made this movie an all-around good time. Much like
a moving comic book.
As you can see, the band KISS is not really a major player in this
movie...more like the goal. Now I may be going out on a limb here, but I
predict that this film will find its success in the realm of cult film
status. Natch.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
KISS members: Bassist Gene Simmons' real name is Chaim Witz, and he is born
in Haifa, Israel. Singer/guitarist Paul Stanley was born in Queens, New
York, and his real name is Stanley Eisen. Guitarist Ace Frehley hails from
the Bronx, New York, with his full name coming in at Paul Frehley. While
drummer Peter Criss hails from Brooklyn, New York, and used to be called
Peter Crisscoula.
Shannon Tweed, the actress who seduces Edward Furlong's character in this
movie, was once married to Gene Simmons, the bassist from KISS. She was also
Playboy Playmate of the year in 1982, and sired two kids with the
long-tongued man. She's originally from St-John's, Newfoundland, Canada.
Gene Simmons has also dated actress/singer/all-around weirdos Cher and Diana
Ross.
Edward Furlong got involved in a live-in relationship with his former tutor,
Jacqueline Domac, at the age of 15 (she was 27 at the time). She recently
went to the courts to request 15 percent of Edward's earnings for the last 3
years for abuse and breach of contract.
Natasha Lyonne's real name is Natasha Braunstein. She is currently known to
be dating co-star Edward Furlong.
Porn star Ron Jeremy, known to have a big dick, played the part of the strip
joint announcer in this film. He also had a small part in director Adam
Rifkin's 1994 film, THE CHASE. The IMDb lists him as having been in at least
500 porno movies. Wow. Now that's a lot of porn!
The budget for this film was approximately $15 million, and was filmed
entirely in Canada. Much was done in and around Toronto, including the
Cedabrae Collegiate Institute (high school) in suburban Toronto. The concert
scene was filmed at Copp's Coliseum in nearby Hamilton, Ontario.
Pain in the butt mom, Lin Shaye, has been a staple in all Farrelly Brothers
films. She played the "old lady" Magda, in THERE'S SOMETHING ABOUT MARY
(7.5/10), the infamous "landlady" in KINGPIN (8.5/10), and Mrs. Neugeboren
in DUMB AND DUMBER (7.5/10).
Marijuana-head, James DeBello, who plays "Trip" in this movie, also had the
part of "enthusiastic guy" in the summer of 1999's big teen hit AMERICAN PIE
(7/10).
Director Adam Rifkin has also been known to act in many of his own films,
and has also written several side projects. He was one of the co-writers on
SMALL SOLDIERS, and wrote 1997's kid flick THE MOUSE HUNT (6.5/10) all by
himself.
First-time screenwriter Carl V. Dupr, was once the assistant editor on such
classic films like TOP DOG, LEPRECHAUN 2, and BARB WIRE.
Giuseppe Andrews also co-starred opposite Edward Furlong, in one of 1998's
best films, AMERICAN HISTORY X (8.5/10). He portrayed the character of
Jason.
Some of you many remember the drummer in this film, Sam Huntington, from his
starring role in Disney's 1997 film, JUNGLE 2 JUNGLE.

Title
Review for Hak hap (1996)
For more movie reviews and trivia quizzes, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Originally released in 1996, this film was obviously re-released to take
advantage of Jet Li's newfound American fame, after his attention-grabbing
performance in last summer's fourth installment of the LETHAL WEAPON series.
PLOT:
After the government's project 701 to transform certain people into
super-human fighting machines goes awry, one of the 701's has to protect the
rest of the city from the remaining super-warriors, who are all programmed
to fight like nobody's business, withstand bullets, fire and much, much
pain.
CRITIQUE:
How do you rate a movie that has some of the worst dialogue that you've
heard in a film in years, a plot that can only be described as a static
framework in which to insert many action sequences, and some of the best
fighting scenes this side of the crazy kung-fu battles from THE MATRIX
(7.5/10)? (No coincidence either, since Yuen Woo-Ping, is the same man who
choreographed the fighting stunts from both films.) Well, I guess I would
really recommend this movie to all those people who love to see eye-popping
fight sequences, since these are some of the coolest that I've seen in a
while. Most of them are set in fast-motion and incorporate all the creative
wizardry of a Jackie Chan fight, alongside the slickness of newcomer Jet Li,
and a frenetic shooting style via the eye of Daniel Lee. Now, if you like a
lot of action, but also prefer a good story with interesting characters,
that you'll be out of luck with this piece of film.
Also, prepare yourself to appreciate the dubbed voices of obvious phonies,
and the contrived hip-hop/rap soundtrack, which is somehow supposed to make
us feel more comfortable within this Hong-Kong film? I would've preferred a
less intrusive soundtrack myself. I think the wonderfully choreographed
battle sequences alone would entice folks to keep their goggles glued to the
screen. I know mine were whenever an action-packed scene popped up, while
everything else of mine quickly slinkied away whenever the cheesy plot,
melodramatic touches and awful dialogue returned to the proceedings. Check
it out if ONLY for the fight scenes, because they are truly a sight to
behold, but skip it altogether if cool combat scenarios within a crappy plot
and over-the-top enemies don't warm your salsa.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Beijing born Jet Li was a member of China's national Wushu demonstration
team in his early teens and was invited to perform for President Richard
Nixon. He was a Wushu world champion several times, stands 5'6", and was
born on April 26th, 1963.
Jackie Chan fans may recognize this film's lost former lover Yueh-lan as
actress Francoise Yip, who played Jackie Chan's love interest Nancy, the
motorcycle girl from RUMBLE IN THE BRONX.
This film's Hong Kong title is Hak Hap, and it was nominated for Best Action
Choreography, Best Art Direction and Best Costume & Make-Up Design, in the
1997 Hong Kong Film Awards.

Title
Review for Long Kiss Goodnight, The (1996)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
PLOT:
Woman with amnesia is living the life of a simple schoolteacher & doting
mother when her memory suddenly jogs up her past as a professional assassin
for the US government. Along with the help of a two-bit, wise-cracking
gumshoe, she hits the road to discover her true identity.
CRITIQUE:
Fun, unique action-thriller finally offers us an interesting female hero who
alongside the humorous verbal quips from Sam Jackson, keep the film moving
at an entertaining pace, despite a couple of small lulls here and there. I
will admit to being biased in this case, since I do generally enjoy action
films that are set during Christmas time, but this film should be fun for
others as well, since it does offer a cool heroine, some great action
sequences, a few over-the-top moments and Sam Jackson firing off jokes left
and right. It's obvious that writer Shane Black drew his inspiration from
the French classic LA FEMME NIKITA, which is a much deeper film with less
humor, but for what this one is, it does okay. Don't expect the greatest
action film of all-time, since the movie does seem to plod on at some
points, but all in all, it is a fun time at the movies. I especially fell in
love with the cooler than cool Casino hotel room that they bunked down in
while in Atlantic City. Now THAT'S a room! Great dialogue, much funniness by
the way of Jackson's character, some decent action scenes, a good premise,
and definitely NOT a film to be taken seriously. If you're looking for
mindless fun...look no further than this movie!
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Writer Shane Black collected $4M for this script. In the first draft of his
screenplay, Mitch, the character played by Sam Jackson, died of his wounds.
One of my favorite lines in this film came from a Christmas well-wisher who
toasted folks along the lines of "This year, I am thankful that I do not
drink, smoke or curse....", which he quickly followed up with, "Shit, I DO
smoke and drink!".
Not sure if this was meant as an inside joke to one of Sam Jackson's most
popular character roles (Jules from PULP FICTION), but at one point in this
movie, Sam stands there with a gun at and says "I am one bad mutherf**cker".
A nod to one of Geena Davis' most popular roles (Thelma from THELMA &
LOUISE) came in the form of a scene featuring Davis riding a convertible
with sunglasses.
The two main characters in this film drink Finlandia Vodka. Director Renny
Harlin is from Finland.
Director Renny Harlin (Birth name: Lauri Mauritz Harjola) and actress Geena
Davis (Birth name: Virginia Elizabeth Davis) were a married couple while
making this movie. They separated in 1997.
Sam Jackson was nominated for a 1997 Image award for Outstanding Lead Actor
in a Motion Picture for his role in this film.
This film represented actor Craig Bierko's first major movie role. He
recently starred in THE 13TH FLOOR (6.5/10), and is apparently dating
actress Janeane Garofalo.

Title
Review for Romeo Must Die (2000)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Jet Li busted onto the American action movie scene, when he stole the show
in 1998's LETHAL WEAPON 4, with his wicked looks, his nasty moves and his
undeniable charisma. It only took another two years for mega-producer Joel
Silver to set him up in an all-American movie, primed to take over some of
the empty action-hero seats left by alleged coke-head Van Damme and that
pudgy guy named Steven Seagal. Would this film take Li past his rival Asian
action counterparts, namely Chow Yun-Fat and Jackie Chan? Let's find out.
PLOT:
Rival Chinese and black gangster organizations fall further out of favor
from one another, when members of their respective families start turning up
dead. That's when badass Jet Li blasts into the picture to find out who the
men were behind his brother's death and to exact some of his own style of
revenge.
CRITIQUE:
Three words: not enough action! Simple enough? Not enough Hong Kong kickass
Jet Li action to compensate for a horribly predictable screenplay, bad
actors, crappy dialogue and oh-so many over-the-top melodramatic moments.
And a romance angle? Why, one must ask...why? I love fight scenes and I
really dig Jet Li too, but this little ditty barely contained three
memorable action sequences, and Jet, well, the poor dude was barely in the
movie. And I thought this was supposed to be his big break? How 'bout giving
the slickster some more opportunities to show us his kung-fu fighting chops,
slap him in a few more scenes, and give him more chances to practice his
acting/English abilities? What a letdown. Even BLACK MASK was more
entertaining than this glossed up, empty shell of a film. In fact, I am sure
that more time was spent gathering the "hits" for the soundtrack of this
film, than were on the so-called "screenplay". I felt like I was watching a
soundtrack rather than a movie most of the time.
The sad part about the bad script is that it wouldn't matter so much if the
film actually had some decent actors spouting out the tacky lines. But no,
save Lindo and Aaliyah, who weren't too shabby, I thought the rest of the
cast was picked primarily from their inability to deliver lines
convincingly. And what was the deal with the whole NFL franchise deal run by
some 15-year old looking guy, acting like he's the overlord of a drug ring?!
What a mess. Then again, I don't want it to seem like I'm complaining solely
about the story which was completely foreseeable, since we all go to see
these movies for the action anyway, not the story. Well, I guess that's what
disappointed me the most out of this film. There were a couple of cool fight
scenes with Li, but simply not enough to satisfy my overall craving. Also,
as much as I love the way they incorporate wires and special effects in some
of their stunts, a couple of the exaggerated fight scenes were simply too
obvious a stunt. It should be seamless, fellas, not necessarily against the
laws of gravity! The one cool thing that was original in the movie was the
way in which the director showed us some of the inside cracklings of the
human body when penetrated by a blow, but that simple creative touch
couldn't save the rest of this film's uninteresting plot movements.
I'm disappointed for Jet Li that this film didn't give him the real
opportunity to star in a good story with many great action scenes.
Hopefully, the next time will be a charm for this charismatic actor. For
now, I just hope that for his sake, the film's title isn't a premonition of
the movie's ultimate fate at the box-office.

Title
Review for Lost in Space (1998)
This film is based on the campy TV show from the 1960's under the same
appellation. Mind you, most people (including yours truly) who will see
this movie will not have seen any episodes from the original series.
The movie is really a stand alone in that regard. The family
Robinson...lost in space.
PLOT:
Set in the year 2058, the family Robinson is chosen to sail out into
space in search of other planets that might contain the natural
resources Earth needs in order to survive its future. A colonization
process, if you will. They are joined by able pilot West (LeBlanc), and
evil uninvited stowaway (Oldman), who does not want to see the trip
conclude on a successful tip. Eventually, their trek goes awry, and all
are "lost in space". "How do get back to Earth?" is the question that
infests the rest of this sci-fi epic. 
CRITIQUE:
This film reminded me a lot of THE FIFTH ELEMENT (6.5/10) from the
summer of 1997. It's a film with a lot of flash, but very little actual
substance. Admittedly, there isn't an annoying character like Chris
Tucker from the other film, but this film does run a little too long,
and did lose me in regards to its complex time-travel /
multi-dimensional story line. Having said that, the special effects in
this movie were amazing, and the overall look and feel were also way
above average. You really felt like you were in the future, and riding
through space with these poor souls. 
Unfortunately for this chosen family, their 10-year old son is the
smartest one in the group, and the father is too wrapped up in his work
to notice the rest of his family (Ever heard that one before? Yawn!).
The acting is OK, and I was especially surprised at the solid
performance by TV Friend's Matt LeBlanc who shows us all that he's
definitely more than just a pretty face. 
On the down side, the family riff-raff that cuts through most of the
picture is lame and time-consuming (even though we gotta give them
credit for "trying" to develop characters in a sci-fi pic), the story
line is hard to follow, the evil character in the movie actually tells
people that he's "evil", and the movie goes on for about 20 minutes too
long. 
On the slick side, many of the special effects are really cool (the
sequence in which the family is "paralyzed" during the hyper-drive is
awesome, and the animated monkey that joins the family halfway through
the flic is mucho cool), the credit presentation at the end of the film
is slamming, and the adventures that they fall into are somewhat
thrilling (I will also admit that "somehow" they got me to semi-tear up
near the conclusion of this picture....very odd.....). 
Overall, if you're a big sci-fi fan, check this movie out for the
special effects and challenging narrative, and if you're not, I would
still suggest seeing this movie, but then you could probably wait until
it comes out on video so that you forward past some of the boring
parts. 
Little Known Facts: 
This film will always be remembered as the movie that knocked TITANIC
(7/10) out of the top spot at the box-office after 15 straight weeks at
number one.
Garry Oldman is British, and was once married to Uma Thurman for about
six months.
Mimi Rogers was Tom Cruise's first wife. 
Visit JoBlo's Movie Reviews @ http://www.microtec.net/~drsuess/

Title
Review for Bicentennial Man (1999)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
The last time that director Chris Columbus and Robin Williams teamed up for
a movie, the result was 1993's MRS. DOUBTFIRE, a film which domestically
grossed over to $220 Million dollars. This time around, the duo take on a
movie which appears to be a frothy little children's pic from the looks of
its trailer, but actually is a pretty serious film dealing with the various
aspects that make one human.
PLOT:
In the year 2005, a rich family buys a made-for-the-home robot/servant
created to help them around the house. Over the years, the robot and others
notice that he is different from the rest of his peers, this android appears
to have some artistic talents, a personality and emotions. The film covers
200 years in the life of said machine, as he attempts to "evolve" into a
human being, by the way of our world's ever-changing technologies.
CRITIQUE:
This ain't a kids movie, folks! It only took about thirty minutes into this
film for the kids in my theatre to start chattering it up. And that's about
where most of the "real comedy" ends and the existential drama begins. Don't
get me wrong here, the robot doesn't suddenly begin quoting Kierkegaard or
anything, but the movie is essentially an interesting adult film peppered
with a few funny moments, all within a much deeper context of what defines a
"human being", how technology might affect our conditions in the future,
what constitutes "freedom" and how love transcends all. Pretty deep for a
Robin Williams movie, eh? Some of the things I liked about this film
included its span time of 200 years, which I don't remember ever seeing done
in the same way, the concept itself, which dealt with one's identity, the
need for acknowledgment from others, and to a certain extent, racism or
robotism, in this case. I also dug on all the cool little gadgeteries which
became slicker and slicker as the years went by, as well as the consistently
healthy performance from Oliver Platt.
What didn't I like about the movie? Well, this also has to do with the fact
that it spanned 200 years, since I wasn't able to truly identify with any
one human character across the entire film, save for the robot, to whom, I
personally did not invest much emotion. I did however enjoy some of the
human characters in the movie, but as you may have guessed by now, after 200
years, not too many of them were around at the end. And looking back, I
think the film might have benefited more had it stuck to its sci-fi route,
rather than its heavy-handed/humorous presentation here. I for one would
love to see such a film done entirely in serious tone, as opposed to the
generic humor that was tossed into this one every now and again (Maybe if it
starred someone not known to most for comedy?). The film also ran a little
long near the end with what eventually started to feel like a revolving plot
door as the robot just continued to work on his condition year after year
after year. In the end, despite the fact that it was set to touch our human
emotions, I felt little more than the robot did at the beginning of the
film. Interested yet cold and distant. All in all, the film was pretty
engaging to watch all the way through, but seemed to have sacrificed further
scientific depth in return for an unconvincing show of romance and humor. A
nice try, but overall, no dice.
I'd suggest you see it on video just for its original vision.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Robin Williams' middle name is "McLaurim". His first major movie role was
his starring gig as Popeye in 1980's Robert Altman flick POPEYE. When he
auditioned for the role of Mork for TV's "Mork and Mindy" show, Robin met
with producer Gary Marshall who told him to sit down. Robin immediately sat
his head on the chair. Gary Marshall immediately chose him saying that he
was the only alien who auditioned.
Actor Sam Neill's birth-name is Nigel Neill. Sam met his current wife Noriko
Watanabe on the set of 1989's DEAD CALM where she served as a make-up
artist. He was also one of the original candidates for the fourth and fifth
actor to portray James Bond in THE LIVING DAYLIGHTS and GOLDENEYE. Of
course, those parts went to Timothy Dalton and Pierce Brosnan respectively.
Actress Embeth Davidtz birth-name is Gretta Milano. She hails from the state
of New Jersey. Her first big role was in Sam Raimi's 1993 film ARMY OF
DARKNESS.
Director Chris Columbus was first inspired to make movies after seeing THE
GODFATHER at the tender age of 15. After enrolling into the NYU film school,
he sold his first screenplay (never produced) while a sophomore there. Chris
is apparently writing screenplays for two comic-book film adaptations
including DAREDEVIL and THE FANTASTIC FOUR.
Writer Nicolas Kazan is the son of famed director Elia Kazan. His other
writings include FALLEN (7/10), MOBSTERS and REVERSAL OF FORTUNE, amongst
others.
This film was originally titled ANDREW MARTIN, and is based on the story
"Bicentennial Man", by Russian-born author Isaac Asimov.

Title
Review for Message in a Bottle (1999)
For more reviews and movie trivia, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Forget the three-hour supposed mess that was THE POSTMAN. Forget the fact
that he left his wife of 16 years to cuddle up to some supermodels. Forget
the fact that he once called a Madonna show live in concert "neat". Kevin
Costner is back in top romantic form, in his Dockers and comfortable shirts,
soft-spoken nature, and everything else the Valentine-less women might be
seeking over this lover's weekend.
PLOT:
Man loses a wife. Man writes her letters in a bottle and tosses them into
the ocean to ease his pain. Another woman finds the messages and sets out to
find the man behind the beautifully honest words. Once found, the two share
each other's pains and experiences, and find some solace, and more, in each
other's company.
CRITIQUE:
An ironic adult story of love and mourning. This movie is a bit slow, has
some nice romance, bordering on sappiness, some solid acting performances,
and a hokey ending. For all those who go to see this film expecting to find
a wonderfully romantic time at the movies, well, you might be quite
disappointed. This movie does have some tender moments, along with some
romantic touches, but over and above it all, it caters to a story line
drenched in the incapacity of a man to move on with his life, after his
loved one has passed away. This film might even be a success in the hearts
and minds of all those people whose lives have suddenly halted after the
loss of someone dear to their hearts. Don't get me wrong, there is an
obvious love story that brews up between the two leads here, it's just that
I didn't expect the grieving undertones of the film to be as accentuated as
they are.
The actors are all very good with Costner pulling off another vulnerable,
nice, tough and rumble everyguy with his eyes closed and his hands tied
behind his back. Wright Penn is also decent in her role, but nothing to
write into a bottled letter and drop into the ocean. Newman on the other
hand seemed stereotyped from what I had seen of him in the previews, but
actually zings it up as the gruffy ol' dad, reminiscent of his wonderful
performance in NOBODY'S FOOL (8/10). Mood-wise, the whole "feel" of the
movie is very comfy and authentic, especially during the wooing sequences
over the first half of the movie. If you're a sea lover, you might love this
film even more, since the water does seem to permeate these peoples' lives
quite deeply. Overall, the cinematography is nice, the actors are all very
good, but I found the whole piece to be a little too slow and uneventful for
my taste. It seemed to be much more of a cathartic picture rather than
romantic, but all in all, not an awful movie. And yes, Mrs. JoBlo and I did
catch it on Valentine's Day!
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Kevin Costner auditioned three times for the role that eventually went to
Nicolas Cage in the wonderfully, outrageous RAISING ARIZONA (8/10). His role
in THE BODYGUARD was originally written for Steve McQueen. He played the
dead body in THE BIG CHILL. He stands 6'1".
Robin Wright Penn backed out of the role of Maid Marian in ROBIN HOOD:
PRINCE OF THIEVES, starring Kevin Costner, after getting preggers with Sean
Penn's kid. She played the role of Jenny in 1994's award-winning FORREST
GUMP (7.5/10) opposite Tom Hanks. Her first acting gig on TV's "Santa
Barbara" soap opera garnered her three Emmy nominations.
Actor John Savage, whose real name is John Youngs, may be best remembered
for his portrayal of the character Steven in 1978's classic THE DEER HUNTER
(7.5/10). He also spent 6 years, from 1988 to 1994, in South Africa, working
with Nelson Mandela for the anti-Apartheid movement.
In respect to actor Paul Newman, by the time the Academy of Motion Picture
Arts and Sciences honored him with its Jean Hersholt Humanitarian Award in
1994, he had raised over $80 million in support of various charities through
his many philanthropic activities (and his own food product line called
"Paul Newman's Own"). He is an avowed lifelong beer lover. He has six kids
and has been married to actress Joanne Woodward since 1958. His only son
Scott Newman died of a drug overdose in 1978.
Actress Illeana Douglas dated famed director Martin Scorsese for a few years
during the 90s.
Actor Robbie Coltrane is British. He played the newspaper columnist in this
picture.
Director Luis Mandoki is not a stranger to melancholic, romance stories. He
also directed Meg Ryan in WHEN A MAN LOVES A WOMAN, and Susan Sarandon in
WHITE PALACE (8/10). Mr. Mandoki hails from Mexico.
Producer Denise DiNovi has collaborated on five of director Tim Burton's
projects.
Review Date:  February 14, 1999
Director: Luis Mandoki
Writer:   Gerald DiPego (based on novel by Nicholas Sparks)
Producers:  Kevin Costner, Denise DiNovi and Jim Wilson
Actors:   Kevin Costner as  Garrett Blake, Robin Wright Penn as Theresa
Osborne, Paul Newman as Dodge Blake
Genre:   Drama
Year of Release:  1999

Title
Review for Bringing Out the Dead (1999)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Twenty-three years after dropping the ultimate ode to loners everywhere onto
the world, TAXI DRIVER (9/10), director Martin Scorsese re-teams with TAXI's
screenwriter, Paul Schrader, to revisit the filth and grime of New York's
city streets. This time, the protagonist is an after hours ambulance
driver/paramedic, who finds himself haunted by patients lost and distraught
over the continued hopelessness of his situation.
PLOT:
A stressed-out ambulance medic finds himself haunted by the ghosts of people
whose lives he was not able to save during his fast-paced graveyard shifts.
The film takes place over a period of 48 hours in which the man essentially
moves from one emergency situation to another.
CRITIQUE:
Think a softer, kinder, less psychotic, and much longer TAXI DRIVER! This
underlying story behind this film is no different than many others that you
have already seen. A man obsessed by the mistakes from his past, feels
guilty and attempts to finds redemption in his present state. Much like TAXI
DRIVER, the man in this case drowns himself in drink, finds little time to
sleep and gets fixated on "saving" a girl. Much unlike TAXI DRIVER, this
film doesn't have much depth, doesn't carry broad political or social
connotations, and does not feature an actor completely engrossed in his
character. Don't get me wrong, I thought Cage did a good job as the
burnt-out, over-worked stressball, but nothing could really compare to
DeNiro's possession of Travis Bickle. But I suppose that's another review
altogether. All in all, I thought this was actually a pretty good movie with
some good performances from the leads, and some even better showings from
supporting characters such as Marc Anthony, Ving Rhames, Tom Sizemore and
the drug dealer, Cliff Curtis.
The story itself is not necessarily overpowering, in fact, it basically just
moves along its path, predictably strolling down certain emotional avenues,
until its final resting spot at the conclusion, which we all foresee early
on. Repetitive it is as well, with the basic story essentially featuring
Cage et buddy flying from one crisis scene to the next. Thankfully for us,
director Martin Scorsese looked waaaay down into his visual bag o' tricks
and came up with many new and unique camera games with which to amuse us
during the film's two hour runtime. A runtime which basically outlasts its
visit by about 20 minutes or so. You can actually feel the last half hour go
by, as opposed to the general rapid pace of the first hour and a half. For
Martin Scorsese fans, this one should be seen if only for its excellent
stylish demonstrations. Cage fans should also check it out as he basically
reverts back to his pre-action star days, a la LEAVING LAS VEGAS (9/10),
when he actually did some interesting work as an actor. But for everyone
else, I can't say that this will be a film that will draw you in with its
meaningful story or original undertones. If you enjoy new ways of shooting
film or creating motion across a movie arc, then you might also want to see
this flick, but overall, I wouldn't recommend it to your "basic movie-going
audience". Scorsese and style fans only! Now don't make me take off my
glasses!!
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Director Martin Scorsese recently got married for the 5th time, a lengthy
laundry list which has included such luminaries as actress/model Isabella
Rossellini and producer of many of Marty's films (including this one),
Barbara DeFina. He also heavily dated actress Illeana Douglas for a few
years. He was once offered the opportunity to direct SCHINDLER'S LIST in the
mid-1980's, but declined because he didn't think that he could make as good
a film as a Jewish director possibly could. Steven Spielberg went on to
direct the film and won the 1993 Oscar for Best Director, an award that
Martin Scorsese has never won.
Writer Paul Schrader has been married to actress Mary Beth Hurt since 1983.
She has a small role in this film as Nurse Contance.
Interesting to note that two famous people take credit for the dispatch
voices which you, along with Cage and his ambulance driving co-hort, hear
during the film's constant calls for emergency action. The male voice is
none other than the director himself, Martin Scorsese, while the female
voice is actor/rapper Queen Latifah.
Actor Marc Anthony, who plays Noel in this film, is actually a very famous
Latin singer, who most recently released his first full-length English
album. He also sings a duet on fellow Latin singer/actor Jennifer Lopez's
debut album.
This is the fourth film collaboration between writer Paul Schrader and
director Martin Scorsese, with TAXI DRIVER, RAGING BULL, THE LAST
TEMPATATION OF CHRIST, being the previous three.
This film is based on the similarly titled novel by Joe Connelly.

Title
Review for Cell, The (2000)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Perfect timing! This movie is being released at the best moment for me
personally, having just begun my "Hollywood movies are getting so cliched,
lame and predictable" stage, with the recent crop of summer flicks just not
popping any of my corn. But here comes a movie that doesn't let you just sit
down and watch, it rather asks that you stare in awe and experience a new
kind of movie! The kind that will have you taking notice whether you like it
or not. A breath of fresh air. A nice kick in the stomach. A visual feast.
It's nice to be back.
PLOT:
A serial killer who gets off on watching his victims drown to death is on
the loose, but not for long. As the FBI bust his ass, the killer falls into
a deep coma, while his final missing victim only has a few hours left to
live. Enter a therapist hip to a new technology that allows her to enter the
mind of a comatose person. Once inside the killer's mind, the doctor tries
to uncover the location of the missing girl.
CRITIQUE:
Not for everyone, this film moves at a quick pace, delivers a decent serial
killer story, and seduces you through an infectious ride of cinematic
paintings, ripe with originality, surrealism and otherworldliness. A big
thank you to director Tarsem for slapping me across the face with this film
and forcing me to wake out of my year 2000 cinematic nap. This is the kind
of movie that sets a new standard for moviemakers. It takes the cinematic
canvas and rewrites the rules with its daring use of staggering imagery,
visual experimentation and camera tricks. Imagine a painting come to life. A
story unfolding in a dual world, one set in our day and time, with
characters attempting to find the solution to a mad man's insanity, and
another dripped in a dream-state, a place where the unseen thoughts, loves
and fears of one's mind are visually transformed into breathtaking sequences
never before seen on the big screen. I wasn't sure if the balance of the two
"worlds" would work, whether or not things would start getting complicated
or if the director would just slow the whole film down to a pretentious
halt. But my fears were quickly laid to rest, as the film grabbed me by the
balls at scene one and didn't let go until I was transported back to my seat
a little over an hour and a half later.
But there were many other things that I really liked about this movie as
well. I liked the pace of the film, which didn't waste much time on
scientific mumbo-jumbo or inappropriate romance. I liked all of the
performances, especially Vaughn, whose always been a favorite of mine and
who delivers a good showing here, and Lopez, who surprisingly really clicked
as the intelligent shrink with a big heart. And if you love her ass, you
also get a side shot of it hiding behind its underwear, right after Lopez
smokes a joint in front of her iMac. I also liked the soundtrack, which got
really chaotic and pronounced when downloaded into the subconscious world,
but perfectly so. And despite the actual story of the "serial killer chase"
not breaking any major ground, I did really appreciate the new way that they
decided to chase after the nutball in this movie. Go inside his head...it
works! Oh yeah, one more thing. This movie actually creeped me out in
several points. Not sure if it will give me any nightmares or anything
(although I might regrettably find that out tonite), but the visual panorama
of the serial killer's ultimate evil mindset just struck a chord of terror
right through me.
But in the end, it is the film's unique style that will set it apart from
all of the other serial killer movies in the years to come. It's a brave
move on the part of the filmmakers, attempting to visually portray the deep
rooted evil set inside the mind of a madman, and in this case...it works!
Suspense-wise, the film certainly doesn't compete with SEVEN (then again,
what film does?), but it more than makes up for it through its bold,
cinematic experimentation. Kudos to Tarsem and Protosevich for pumping some
life into this year's regurgitative movie season.

Title
Review for Unbreakable (2000)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
You gotta hand it to M. Night Shyamalan. The man practically came out of
nowhere and suddenly he's written and directed two of the most memorable
movies of the past two years. First SIXTH SENSE, which blew everyone away
with its ending and its unbelievable box-office success, and now this movie,
whose trailer is easily the best teaser for any movie that I've seen over
the past year. It's mysterious, it's intriguing and it makes you want to see
the movie. Excellent! And with that in mind, I will be writing this review
knowing full well that nobody wants any of the film ruined for them, so I
assure you that I will not be including any spoilers about the movie's plot
in this critique. I just love a good mystery and sure wouldn't want to ruin
it for anyone else.
PLOT:
Set in Philadelphia, this film stars two diametrically opposed men. One man
is black and has a disease which makes his bones very easy to break. The
other man is white and seems to be unbreakable. He is the only survivor of a
train wreck and can't seem to figure out why. The first man helps the second
man come to some kind of understanding about his situation.
CRITIQUE:
M. Night Shyamalan continues to impress. Here's yet another original
creation of his that manages to successfully slap together a unique mystery,
interesting characters, real life situations to which we could all relate
and a touch of the paranormal. I love this guy! I hope he keeps it up
because more movies like this is what we need. Of course, much like any
other great film, this one is not for everybody. The film does have quite
the slow pace, might come off as repetitive to some people and also manages
to parallel THE SIXTH SENSE in various ways. But for me, I was
hooked-lined-and-sinkered from its first two scenes, which much like the
film's teaser trailer, just made me sit up and say, "What's up with that?
Intriguing...now tell me more." The sequences in question basically set up
the foundation of the two main characters in this film, and let me tell you,
they grabbed me and that was that. I couldn't wait to find out why they were
the way that they were, and what it all meant. But Shyamalan draws the film
out slowly. He already seems to have developed a great eye for the camera,
setting up angles just right, enough to give us a taste of the scene, but
not the whole bite. There are also little hints dropped here and there, red
herrings and a Hitchcockian score providing just enough background to allow
for a gradual development of the richer points in the script. Like
Hitchcock, Shyamalan also seems to be finding himself a small part in his
own films. Here, he shows up as a suspicious "drug dealer" at a sports
stadium.
But don't expect a horror with this film. That's not what it is. It's not a
thriller either. No major "thrill" scenes in this movie. In fact, it isn't
until the last twenty minutes that the film's leisurely pace is disturbed by
some invigorating energy. I would consider this picture to be more like a
good ol' fashioned mystery a la Twilight Zone. Set in an ordinary
environment with believable characters, this film manages to creep us out
with elements which just don't seem to make sense in our reality. Of course,
much like any other good story, this film would not be a complete success
unless we connected to the characters on the screen, and in this movie, I
did. In fact, we could all relate to what Bruce's character is essentially
going through. He doesn't understand his place in the world. He is confused.
He is not sure why he is what he is. What is his destiny? We've all felt
like him at some point or another in our lives and you learn to recognize
that in his character early on.
Bruce downplayed his character as much as he did the one in THE SIXTH SENSE
(almost seemed like the same guy but in a different circumstance), while Sam
Jackson was surprisingly restrained as the bizarre dude with the love of
comic books. And as for the ending...don't worry I won't be giving anything
away here, but suffice it to say that unlike THE SIXTH SENSE, a movie which
I believed was taken to another level with that slap-in-your-face
conclusion, this film's finish felt much more like a "Hmmmmm, yeah okay,
that makes sense" kind of thing. Of course, some might scoff at the ending,
but that all depends on whether or not you were "into" the film as it moved
along. It certainly didn't make or break the movie for me, and I doubt it
will blow anyone else away either. This film is not about the ending
necessarily. It is about the journey, a journey that is deliberately
unhurried, melancholic and intriguing. My guess is that anyone who was
greatly interested in this film by its teaser, will more than likely be
impressed with this film's brilliant manner of storytelling. It looks like
Shyamalan is here to stay. Of course, once the movie is over, and this seems
to be developing into a very cool Shyamalan tradition, you will undoubtedly
feel the need to discuss the film with others. It's engaging, it's
mysterious, perhaps even unbelievable to the more cynical in our society,
but ultimately the film is an excellent demonstration of what a great
director, a solid script, a deeper, meaningful message and well crafted
characters can bring to a theatrical presentation as such. For me, the film
worked on various levels and I hope that many others like it just as much.
That's it and I hope I didn't spoil anything for you...that's half the fun!

Title
Review for Jackal, The (1997)
For more reviews, go to http://surf.to/joblo
Semi-remake of the 1973 film, THE DAY OF THE JACKAL, this thriller
about the internationally renowned terrorist known as "The Jackal" is
brought to us by director Michael Caton-Jones, famous for 1995's ROB
ROY and THIS BOY'S LIFE (8/10) with the young Leo DiCaprio. This was
one of two "Jackal" films to come out in 1997. The other was THE
ASSIGNMENT (7/10) starring Aidan Quinn.
PLOT:
The Russian mob hires the Jackal to assassinate someone high up the
U.S. political ranks. The FBI and Russian police work together to
identify, find and arrest the Jackal, but come up empty. With few
alternatives remaining, they recruit help from a jailed Irish terrorist
who has already seen and met the Jackal. This is when the international
chase begins.
CRITIQUE:
Overlong, action-less, semi-interesting but mostly boring so-called
"thriller" which showcases some solid acting performances by Poitier
and Gere, but does very little else to keep the audience awake. I have
not seen the original movie upon which this movie was based, but word
on the street is that it is one of the best thrillers ever! This film
on the other hand, has very few thrills in it, a couple of small scenes
of action, and sprinkles of intrigue. It's basically just a chase movie
that reminded me a lot of THE SAINT (7/10), with all of the clever
costume changes, and THE PEACEMAKER (5.5/10), with its cat-and-mouse
hunt around the world.
I was pleasantly surprised to find Richard Gere finally stretching his
acting abilities by actually playing a character other than a rich,
smug guy in a nice suit! I also liked his Irish accent and his
ever-popular salt-and-pepper hair. Sidney Poitier also lent some much
needed credibility to this project, and pulled off a strong performance
as the FBI agent struggling to find the Jackal. Willis didn't do much,
but it wasn't really his fault, since the script didn't really call for
him to do much more than switch disguises every now and again (Oh yeah,
and he also got his Canadian accent down pat, by adding an "aye" at the
end of his sentences.)
Despite all of these negative points, and the film lasting about thirty
minutes past its welcome, I wasn't totally bored at any point, and did
like the international aspect of the plot. I also dug the fact that the
final scene of the movie was shot in the exact Metro station that I
used to stand in every day of my life for three years during my years
of College. Ahhhh yes...the sweet, sweet memories. But enough about me!
The bottom line is that this thriller does not provide many thrills or
suspense, but does offer a semi-interesting plot and some decent
performances from Poitier and Gere. Having said that, if you want to
see a better Jackal movie, toss some coins the way of THE ASSIGNMENT
(7/10), and have yourself a good time!
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
This film was originally slated to be released as THE DAY OF THE
JACKAL, but was later changed.
Bruce Willis' full name is Walter Bruce Willis. He was born on the 19th
of March 1955, in Idar-Oberstein, West Germany. His song "Respect
Yourself" reached number five on the music charts in January of 1987.
Bruce received US$15Million dollars for his role in ARMAGEDDON
(7.5/10), and US$5Million for his role in the original DIE HARD (8/10).
He had three children with his ex-wife Demi Moore (they divorced in
1998 after 11 years of marital bliss). Their names are Rumer, Scout
Larue and Tallulah Belle.
Bruce grew up in New Jersey and waited tables and tended bar for a
living until he began to get roles in plays. He broke into the business
when he was seen tending bar in New York by a casting director who
liked his personality & needed a bartender for a small movie role.
Christopher Reeve was offered US$1Million for the lead role in AMERICAN
GIGOLO (6.5/10), but turned it down. John Travolta also turned down the
lead in this film (which later went to Richard Gere), and AN OFFICER
AND A GENTLEMAN (8/10) (which also went to Gere.)

Title
Review for In the Company of Men (1997)
For more reviews and movie trivia, go to http://surf.to/joblo
Neil Labute's writing and directing debut delves deep into the sickest
and most inhumane part of men's psychology, and comes out with an
independent look at the twisted head games that some degrading people
could play, and the real emotional consequences that are regurgitated
upon all involved.
PLOT:
Two third-tier businessmen with a history of negative experiences with
women, decide to turn their 6-week stay at an out-of-town corporate
setting, into an opportunity to play an emotional head game with an
unsuspecting woman employee. They both agree to wine her, dine her and
romanticize her for the period of their stay, up until the day on which
they have to leave, at which time they will both unceremoniously dump
her, and laugh about it for years to come.  
CRITIQUE:
Interesting, original premise starts off with a slow burn, but
eventually challenges you into watching the screen without a cringe, as
the actors work their thespian chops, and the script gets more
involving as it moves along. I did however find the cinematic style of
this film to be quite distracting, as a lot of shots were taken from
long-view, and felt too symbolic and impractical. I found myself
waiting for the camera to zoom in on the characters, rather than
attempting to listen in closer to their far-away conversations. That
aside, the three main characters had strong showings, with the
character of Chad, as played by Aaron Eckhart, rating the highest as
the bastard with the heart of ice. Eckhart looks like he chewed into
this part like a rabid dog on a bloody bone. 
This movie does not have any other side-stories to offer the viewer,
and doesn't even recognize any real secondary characters either. The
film is based solely on these three characters and the dysfunctional
dynamic of their respective relationships. And despite my patience
being tested during the film's initial slow build-up, I did find myself
engrossed enough by the end of the film, to warrant a thumbs up in
regards to character development. Having said that, I did find some of
LaBute's writings manipulative and exaggerated just for the effect on
its audience, but mostly interesting to watch. The conclusion left me
satisfied to a point, but did not wholly resolve all of my
reservations. It also felt a bit set up, and unbelievable in respect to
Chad's destiny. All in all, the acting and the dialogue were good, the
pace very slow, and the premise very original and brave to tackle.
Watch it with your buddies or your loved one, and try to figure out if
you know anyone as disgusting as Chad in your life. If you do...you're
in trouble!!
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
In the press kit for this film, director LaBute described the movie
thus, "It's a simple story: boys meet girl, boys crush girl, boys
giggle." He apparently filmed the picture for a little under US$25,000.
Despite playing a deaf woman in this film, actress Stacy Edwards is not
deaf in real life. She was born in Glasgow, Montana, the daughter of an
Air Force officer, and grew up all over the world, from Guam to
Alabama. At 18, she received a scholarship to the Lou Conte Dance
Studio in Chicago and began her performance career as a dancer and
actress. She is married to actor Eddie Bowz, and currently stars as Dr.
Lisa Caterra on TV's "Chicago Hope". 
Originally from Northern California, Aaron Eckhart was a college friend
of director Neil LaBute's at Brigham Young University where he appeared
in several of LaBute's plays.

Title
Review for House on Haunted Hill (1999)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Forget THE HAUNTING! Forget those kids running around in their backyard with
a VHS camera! Forget your common sense, grab some friggin' nachos and an
ice-cold Coke and prepare to have yourself a mindless haunting of a time! I
have never seen the original of this film, so you don't have to worry about
me boring you with useless comparisons. I saw it clear-minded, ready to be
thrilled (Halloween), and well, I'll admit, a little sleepy. Well, it all
worked for me!
PLOT:
Five people get invited to spend a nite at a "haunted" house by a reputed
master of terror and his weirdo wife. He offers them each the purse of
$1,000,000 if they are able to last the night, without being killed. It's
not long before everyone begins to feel the real horror oozing out of the
house itself. Terror ensues.
CRITIQUE:
I had a blast at this movie! It was pure, unadulterated fun set perfectly on
the weekend of ghouls and goblins. It's funny because due to the lack of
press screenings by the studio, I was convinced that soon after the film's
slick opening credit sequence, the other shoe would eventually fall off. So
I waited and waited and waited, but never a shoe did fall. The film began on
a campy B-movie feel and kept going strong with enough blood, gore,
creepiness and thrills to give me a haunted woodie. The soundtrack also drew
another one of my thumbs up, as well as the main over-the-top performance
from the Vincent Price-esque Geoffrey Rush. And unlike THE HAUNTING, this
film didn't waste any time to get going, and resorted to very few CGI
special effects, and even then, only in the last twenty minutes or so. I'll
admit that the special effects and the ending were this film's weakest
links, but all in all, it kept me interested, creeped out, full of energy
and believe it or not, guessing...the whole time!
Were most of the characters in this movie based in stock wood? Did they put
themselves in unbelievably stupid situations like in most other horror
flicks? Sure, but it didn't matter since these type of movies aren't about
character development, they're about thrills, blood, murders and overall
creepiness, and stab me in the back if that ain't what this film delivered.
I also enjoyed all of the film's grungy sounds, whispers and screams which
seemed to be resonating throughout the movie and the unique style delivered
by director William Malone. The one thing which I did find amiss was the
humor aspect which seemed to have been forgotten in the script, but then
again, maybe that's what kept me more "into" the movie (Granted, Chris
Kattan did have some pretty funny lines). No pop references galore and no
teeny-bopper girls bouncing around in their tight tanktops (although there's
something to be said about them as well:). It's a straight scary movie done
in a campy way with plenty of energy and a handful of twists and turns. See
this movie if you're in the mood to be taken through a fun haunted house at
an amusement park without the long waits in line. Skip this movie if you
want a deeper terror a la SHINING and expect to be blown away by its precise
narrative. It's easy, it's loud, it's fun, it's gory, it's junk food for the
scary bastard in all of us, and I'll be damned if it ain't my guiltiest
pleasure of the year! It's cheesolicious!!
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
COMING SOON to JoBlo's Movie Emporium...

Title
Review for Deep Impact (1998)
Mimi Leder's follow-up to the Dreamworks studio's first ever cinematic
feature, THE PEACEMAKER (5.5/10), leads the twin set of comet movies
set to hit the theatres in the summer of 1998. ARMAGEDDON with Bruce
Willis will follow this early-riser in late July.
PLOT:
A gigantic comet is set to strike Earth within the next year. A sextet
of qualified personnel are sent into space to blow the comet up before
it smashes into ground zero and annihilates all of mankind. Meanwhile,
all of the inhabitants of dear planet Earth must begin to deal with the
not-too-unrealistic approach of Doomsday. Panic and suspense ensues.
CRITIQUE:
Mostly interesting, flawed, piece about the circumstances that would
follow an end of the world scenario such as this. The special effects
are great (especially near the end of the film), but overall the film
plays more like a drama than any kind of special effect or
science-fiction extravaganza. For the most part, I didn't really "get
into" the characters' personal lives, as they would have liked us to,
but I must admit that these characters are a little more developed than
your basic summer special-effect blockbuster (Mrs. JoBlo on the other
hand, heartily felt for the characters, as displayed by her excessive
unleashing of tears through most of the second half of this flick.)
The actors in the movie were also pretty good, with Freeman and Duvall
showing up with the strongest performances. Leoni didn't really impress
me in her role as the feisty, yet sensitive, reporter, but the crew of
the "Messiah" (the spaceship sent up to destroy the comet) were
genuinely tough and believable. Of course, I hold a special place in my
heart for John Favreau, who wrote and starred in my favourite picture
of 1996, SWINGERS (8.5/10). 
All in all, if you're in the mood for a decent time at the movie
theatre, with some great special effects (when needed), I would suggest
you go see this film but without too many high expectations. If you're
into character development and believable personalities, I recommend
you skip this sucker and go straight to your nearest video store for
the latest in your "wear-care-and-tear" movies.  The movie does run
close to two hours, but you won't really feel it, because it does move
at quite a rapid pace. Overall, a decent improvement for Ms. Leder from
the dismal PEACEMAKER, but still, nothing to write home about. Oh, and
one more piece of advice for Ms. Leder: try to sprinkle your films with
a slight touch of humour once in a while, and things might not seem so
grim to the audience. Both of her films lack highly in this regard. 
Little Known Facts: 
Ta Leoni's real name is Ta Pantleoni (Ta means Goddess). She was
born in New York and stands 5"7. She married X-files star David
Duchovny in 1997, and has been quoted as saying, ""I don't do T&A very
well because I haven't got much of either." She actually auditioned for
a Charlie's Angels (1976) remake role (as a dare) and got the part. A
writer's strike in Hollywood meant the series was never made, but the
pre-publicity was enough to get her noticed.
Robert Duvall once said, ""When I started taking theater classes I
began to make all As. Before that I didn't even know what an A was."
When he first moved to NY to pursue his acting career, he shared an
apartment with his older brother and four other aspiring actors, among
them a young fellow by the name of Dustin Hoffman. 

Title
Review for Erin Brockovich (2000)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
The similarities between this film and the John Travolta lawyer drama A
CIVIL ACTION (6.5/10) are uncanny. Both films are based on actual events,
feature strong leads pursuing legal cases against major multinationals that
have allegedly contaminated the water supply of local towns. The main
difference between the two films would have to do with the former featuring
a cutthroat, rich, successful lawyer going against the system (also a man),
while this one features a twice-divorced, uneducated, sexpot with three kids
doing the same thing (oh yeah, and she's a woman!).
PLOT:
A sexy divorcee with no formal education and a lot of debt forces herself
into a filing job at her lawyer's office, only to run into a lot of internal
politics and lack of respect from her co-workers. It isn't until one day
while filing away a case that she is intrigued by the details, and takes on
the task of researching the case further on her own. After much hard work,
determination, and personal sacrifice, she and the firm begin to put
together one of the biggest direct-action lawsuits in U.S. history.
CRITIQUE:
Despite its slow moments, extended runtime and similarities in plot to A
CIVIL ACTION, this film managed to make me like it based entirely on its
excellent performances by its shining star Julia Roberts and her rough-gruff
counterpart Albert Finney. I know it's still early in the year, but Albert
should definitely be remembered come Oscar time next year in the category of
supporting players. I don't remember the last time I truly enjoyed seeing
this type of love-hate relationship work so well in a film, especially
without it involving sex between the couple in question. The characters
drawn here are quite opposite, save for the mutual respect that both
obviously feel for one another, but to watch them go head-to-head on various
issues is just great cinema. The story itself isn't extremely original or
particularly engaging to behold (in spite of it being based on real events),
the pacing sometimes slow, and the predictability factor pretty high on all
counts. But what generally makes or breaks films of this type are their
focus on character, character, character, and this film succeeds in
radiating light through its stars.
Even Aaron Eckhart, the only other significant player in the film, comes
through as the boyfriend standing by his strong female companion as she
takes on, what seems like, the world. And even though this film was a little
foreseeable, I did find it refreshing to finally soak in a movie that
focused more on the achievements of a woman, rather than that of men. So if
only for that reason, check it out and "watch them women, hear them roar!".
Of course, some of the roaring is also being handled by the flock of
mini-skirts and push-em-up bras that Julia's character dons during this
picture, but it is not as much of a focus as the film's trailer makes it out
to be (Them marketing folks is smart!). So does the movie present the viewer
with a lot of conflict, obstacles or tension? Not really. I was barely ever
anxious to see what would happen next and rarely felt as though things
wouldn't work out for everyone involved, but then again, this film doesn't
pretend to be a thriller. It's an interesting, small tale of a woman who
never knew what she could be in life, until she actually went out and became
it. It's pretty inspiring, it's got one of the most feel-good last scenes in
a movie this year, and once again, features a couple of charming
performances by two great actors at the top of their game.
If you love Julia Roberts, you will most likely enjoy this run-of-the-mill
story, despite it running a little too long, and you will definitely come to
further appreciate the broad talent of Mr. Albert Finney, who pulls off one
of his finest performances in years. All in all, a decent "lawyer movie",
which consciously avoids any long, boring courtroom scenes. Thank you for
that, Mr. Soderbergh.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Pay close attention to one of the earlier scenes with Julia and her kids in
a restaurant, since the waitress serving them is none other than the REAL
Erin Brockovich-Ellis herself! As an inside joke, she is apparently wearing
a nametag that reads "Julia".
Julia Roberts reportedly earned $20,000,000 for her role in this film.
Collectively, her films have grossed more than $2 billion worldwide.
Albert Finney was born in Manchester, England and is apparently the only
person in history to ever call Audrey Hepburn a "bitch"...in the film TWO
FOR THE ROAD (okay, okay...so it was a line in the movie).
Writer Susannah Grant's previous work as a screenwriter was on the
Cinderella tale, EVER AFTER (7/10), starring Drew Barrymore. Her next
writing gig also stars a woman, Sandra Bullock in the drama 28 DAYS. And for
once, the events depicted in this film are apparently very accurate in terms
of what really happened to Erin in her own life. Only some of the peripheral
characters are fictitious or amalgamations of real people from her life. In
fact, photographs shown to the crew by the real Erin prove that she really
did sport 8-inch mini-skirts, 3-inch heels and plunging necklines during
these trying times. A look that she still abides by to this day and
apparently looks terrific!
This film was spawned from an appointment that executive producer Carla
Santos Shamberg had with her chiropractor. For it was as she was lying on
her practitioner's table that she overheard a conversation about another
patient whose story was larger than life. And yes, that other patient was
none other than Erin Brockovich. Carla told her husband Michael about the
story, Michael told Danny DeVito and Stacey Sher, with whom he runs Jersey
Films, and the rest is movie-making history.

Title
Review for Flintstones in Viva Rock Vegas, The (2000)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, http://www.joblo.com/
I'm gonna be honest with you on this one, folks. I really didn't want to see
this movie! I love the cartoons, don't get me wrong, love both Hanna and
Barbara, but geez-louise, the original FLINTSTONES movie just didn't do a
thing for me. In fact, I barely even remember any of it (probably blocked it
out of my memory), save for the enchanting performance by Halle Berry, and
from what I do remember, it stunk to high heaven. All that to say that this
film was actually pretty okay. That's right people...it didn't suck!!
PLOT:
Based on the popular cartoon series, this film takes a look at the lives of
our favorite Bedrock residents before they got married and had their own TV
show. Fred and Barney just graduating from school and applying for jobs at
the quarry. Wilma and Betty meeting for the first time. We even get to see
where Gazoo and Dino came from. So will love bloom? Will Fred bowl once
again? Stay tuned to find out.
CRITIQUE:
Not bad, not bad at all. Definitely a crowd-pleaser with all the kids
bellowing at my premiere, this film manages to balance a throwaway plot with
some great special effects, a very cool and funny Gazoo and a quick,
colorful pace. Of course, you don't go into a movie like the Flintstones
expecting an Oscar-worthy script, but suspicious curiosity always abounds
whenever I see the names of more than two people on a screenplay (this film
credits four screenwriters). Some jokes work in this film, others don't, but
for me, the only thing that really kept me going was the oh-so cool
production values. I mean, there it is on the big screen, a whole
prehistoric world filled with cool animal gadgets, oversized hamburgers and
martini glasses, and yup...dinosaurs. I don't remember the original film
impressing me as much with its extras (it also tried to tie a story in there
as well...brrrrr), but this movie is chockfull of fun eye-candy, starting
with an excellent representation of Gazoo.
Give this little green bastard his own movie, dammit! He ruled! Having said
that, Gazoo seems to disappear about halfway through this film, coinciding
with the movie's lame attempt at creating some tension between the
characters (note: bring in a "bad guy"), and the manufactured Vegas
story-line could only take you so far. I swore that if I saw one more scene
with Wilma staring wistfully into the night, I would shit myself. Thankfully
for all involved...no soiling took place. Performance-wise, I definitely
appreciated the new casting choices much more than those in the original
(Rosie O'Donnell as babelicious Betty...what were they thinking?!?), with
the Rubbles scoring even higher points for getting their laughs down pat.
And Stephen Baldwin even managed to go the entire film without shooting Nic
Cage down once! Not bad, dude.
In a nutshell, I would say that this film delivers on various fronts
including its authentic and exaggerated look, its nifty special effects
(Dino is darn cute), and its quick pace. Plot-wise, things run pretty thin,
as do some of the jokes, which hit and miss all around the campfire, but
this movie isn't really targeted to lovers of classic cinema or to all those
messy teens sweaty-palmed over GLADIATOR coming out next weekend. This movie
is made by kids...for the kids! Huh?!? Well okay, it wasn't made by kids,
but it will certainly be those very kids who will most likely appreciate the
mindless frivolity of this movie, as well as certain "child-like" adults.
And yes...guilty as charged.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
The bassist of the 80s supergroup "Duran Duran", John Taylor, makes an
appearance in this film as one of the members of Mick Jagged's band. The
character of Mick Jagged is played deliciously by actor Alan Cumming, a man
who also does a great job of portraying the character of Gazoo in this film
as well.
Ironically, two actors in this film were also among the cast of Stanley
Kubrick's final film EYES WIDE SHUT. Bad guy Thomas Gibson, as well as Alan
Cumming, who played the cheeky hotel clerk.
Director Brian Levant is a veteran at the children's movie game. He was also
the man behind the camera of the original FLINTSTONES movie back in 1994, as
well as Arnold's foray into kid's films, JINGLE ALL THE WAY, as well as
BEETHOVEN and PROBLEM CHILD 2.
One of the producers of this film is a gentleman by the name of Steven
Spielberg. I'm not exactly sure what this guy has done before, but people
tell me that he's famous and that he's made a couple of "interesting" movies
himself. Oh well... ;)

Title
Review for Top of the Food Chain (1999)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
This is a B-movie...actually, this is probably more like a parody of a
B-movie, but a connaisseur of the B-movies you must be in order to truly
appreciate it. Remember that rash of sci-fi/horror flicks from the 50s with
such titles as IT CAME FROM ANOTHER PLANET, THEM! and THE ATTACK OF THE
GIANT LEECHES? Well, consider this a polished up version which combines all
those films with their proverbial small towns being taken over by aliens, a
bearded scientist with a pipe, your attentive damsel falling for the egghead
and enough cheesy scares and ridiculously funny lines to qualify as a
midnight movie success.
PLOT:
A world famous atomic scientist visits a small town during the 1950s, just
in time to witness the beginning of various strange disappearances and
murders. With the town's crazy sheriff, the only cute girl and her dumbass
brother in tow, the doctor begins to suspect the invasion of aliens, as more
and more bodies begin to pile up.
You will either really like this movie or not "get" this movie at all. Now
am I insulting those who won't enjoy this movie? Not at all, in fact, I
could see why some people wouldn't like it, but that's the whole point of
its existence. It's basically only made for those people who like cheesy
B-movies, enjoy the goofiness of some of those over-the-top 50s flicks,
appreciate the purposely bad dialogue (as opposed to those who think it's
"stupid") and essentially know enough about the genre to truly "give it up"
to all involved with this creation. This movie is funny, it's original, it's
engaging, it has gore, it has pseudo-romance, clever dialogue, and most
importantly and unlike those films that it's satirizing, it actually has
some great actors impersonating bad ones. One actor who truly made this film
stand out was Campbell Scott, playing an admirable scientist who is always
spouting such insightful lines as "that interference in the transmission is
definitely being caused by...oh, some sort of interference to be sure". This
is the man who actually believes that "with our government in place, no harm
will come to us". Campbell plays his straight man perfectly, delivering
every cheezy line with grand bravado and utter confidence. I'd watch this
movie again just to watch him work the script over so well. Whatta man!
But parody aside, this film still managed to hold my attention and entertain
me fully with its albeit flimsy story line, goofball characters and fun
dialogue. In fact, that's probably what I liked most about it. Its story was
simple, but fun to watch. Unlike many of the movies coming out nowadays,
this film actually kept my interest the whole way through, didn't go past
one hour and thirty minutes, and even managed to slip in some pretty gross
scenes and even a couple of decent special effects. What can I say...this
was a perfect remake/parody of a bunch of bad, sci-fi horror flicks that
seemed to achieve most its goals. Okay, so the film started off a little
slow, and a few of its jokes were really over the top (such as a couple of
scenes which featured characters singing that simply didn't work for me).
But all in all, the movie took a little bit from the INVASION OF THE BODY
SNATCHERS, a piece of NIGHT OF THE LIVING DEAD, plenty of those 50s sci-fi
flicks and a lot of obvious loving care for the genre, and created a fun,
contemporary cinematic souffl. So if you like screaming close-ups, enjoyed
the kitchiness of those ol' sci-fi/monster movies, want to see Campbell
Scott pull off a hilarious straight man doctor and have been waiting for
something original to come down the pikes, well wait no longer, cause this
movie is it!
And if you really want to have some fun, gather up your friends, drinks some
beers, get a cheap buzz going, bring along a sack full o' nachos and catch
the midnight show, cause that's what this movie is all about.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Screenwriter Phil Bedard was at my screening and when asked, told me that
the film would be released in Canada on the 10th of March, 2000, but that it
has yet to find a distributor in the U.S. He said that it would all depend
on how well the film plays up here, but that it might just end up on HBO.
Either way, I suggest you catch this fun movie wherever you can.
Actor Campbell Scott is the son of legendary actor George C. Scott and
actress Colleen Dewhurst.
Director John Paizs is probably best known for the last movie that he
directed, which was way back in 1986, called CRIME WAVE. Also known as THE
BIG CRIME WAVE on video.

Title
Review for Kiss the Girls (1997)
Gary Fleder's sophomore film after THINGS TO DO IN DENVER WHEN YOU'RE
DEAD (7/10) explores the seedy world of the serial killer.
PLOT:
Forensic doctor and cop Cross gets heavily involved in a serial
killer's dossier, after his niece becomes one of the psycho's kidnapped
victims. Kate also gets nabbed by this lunatic (the self-professed
Cassanova), but quickly escapes and teams up with detective Cross to
locate her sick captor and the rest of the victims.
CRITIQUE:
Eerie, dark and effective serial killer thriller. I like to call it
SEVEN (8.5/10) "light". It certainly has a lot of the qualities of
SEVEN, with the competent acting of Freeman, a pretty neat and at times
claustrophobic directing style, and a decent "who donnit" twist. Mind
you, that's about where the similarities end. This film goes deeper
into the "backdoor" shenanigans of said killer, and shows his
techniques and despicable methods of capture. The scene in which Judd
gets kidnapped by the psycho is also very terrifying.
The premise of the film is good, and so is most of the build-up,
although I did find some of the methods used to find the homicidal
maniac a bit far-fetched, the overall film worked for me on a suspense
level. The bad guy was totally creepy and mysterious. The plot twists
were good, but admittedly full of holes. And the style and acting in
the film was top-notch (I'm also a big Ashley Judd fan, so sue me!).
On the down side, I guess that it was a little too much like SEVEN and
SILENCE OF THE LAMBS (7.5/10), but without their great plot lines or
extreme suspense. Also, the plot did contain many holes, the ending was
weak, and Elwes' Southern accent was awful. But overall, it still works
as an effective thriller with some thrills, a couple of chills, and a
good night of fun stuff!   
Little Known Facts: 
Ashley Judd's mother and sister are country singers Naomi & Wynona
Judd. She had a role in Oliver Stone's NATURAL BORN KILLERS (8/10), but
it was left on the cutting room floor. The movie does contain evidence
that she was in it though. She is fluent in French and once dated Bobby
DeNiro, Matt McConaughey, and Mickey Bolton.
In the early seventies, Morgan Freeman became widely known for his role
as Easy Reader on PBS's educational television program, The Electric
Company.
Cary Elwes' real name is Ivan Simon Cary Elwes. He was born in London,
England. 

Title
Review for Apt Pupil (1998)
For more reviews, trivia and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
PLOT:
A teenager discovers one of his neighbors to be an ex-Nazi from the World
War II death camps, and blackmails the man into telling him all about the
atrocities that he committed.
CRITIQUE:
It seemed as though the premise of this film had a certain amount of
promise, but the film lacks any real suspense or action, doesn't provide us
with any real sympathetic characters to care about, but does offer some
excellent acting performances by the main leads, Ian McKellen and Brad
Renfro. The one thing they never really explain in this film, which surely
lightened my intensity for it, was WHY the teenage kid wanted to hear all
those awful stories? Did he get off on it? Was he as sick as the Nazi man
himself? We are asked to commit to his plight solely on the fact that the
kid is interested in the subject. I for one, would have liked a better
background construction for the teenager, so that I could have appreciated
his character on another level. As it was, I disliked his character even
more than the ex-Nazi, and never really cared about the story, which didn't
provide for any real tension, save for the tacked on "incident" which occurs
near the end. And what's with all the homosexual undertones? Right over my
head. You know something strange is going on in a film review, when I
actually praise David Schwimmer for his role as well. Forgive me, father.
See it if the subject matter interests you, you like director Bryan Singer's
style, or you want to see some great acting performances from the two leads,
otherwise there is no real reason to see this movie. For a much better
story, greater performances and stronger characters, rent AMERICAN HISTORY X
(8.5/10) instead.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
The novel by Stephen King has a much darker ending. The Brad Renfro
character of Todd goes mad and starts shooting innocent people on a highway!
It is also to note that Todd's high school mascot (the Pirates) and school
colors (green and gold) are the same as director Bryan Singer's old high
school. Also, the number on Todd's varsity jacket (85) is the year Bryan
graduated.
The first attempt to film this story in 1987 ran over budget and was
stopped. It starred Rick Schroeder and Nicol Williamson, and was directed by
Alan Bridges.
In real-life, actor Ian McKellen has been very frank about his preference of
the company of men to women. He is one of the few openly gay actors in
Hollywood.
The release of this movie was delayed for almost a year. It was in major
turmoil over a shower scene in the film that supposedly featured nude
underage males. It took about a year to clear everything up until it was
eventually released.
Director Bryan Singer graduated from USC cinema school in 1989, and has
named his production company, Bad Hat Harry Productions, after a line from
JAWS, one of his favorite movies.
Brad Renfro made his motion picture debut in the 1994 Joel Schumacher film
THE CLIENT opposite Susan Sarandon. He played the main lead kid. Before
that, he had acted in school productions, and was discovered in a national
talent search at the age of 10. In 1998, he was arrested for possession of
marijuana and cocaine. Es tu another Robert Downey Jr. in wait?
This film was originally titled GOLDEN BOY.

Title
Review for Mirror Has Two Faces, The (1996)
For more movie reviews and trivia, visit http://www.joblo.com/
PLOT:
A nerdy College professor believes that the perfect relationship between a
man and a woman should be based entirely on matters other than physical
attraction and sex. He decides to prove this theory to himself by choosing a
physically unattractive woman as his companion. She also seems to agree with
his theory but ultimately falls into the traps of the human heart.
CRITIQUE:
Pleasant film with an interesting premise managed to keep me entertained
through all of its lengthy runtime, which is a little over two hours, with
some funny lines, original points of view on relationships, and a simple but
applicable musical score. One of the only problems that I had with this film
was the casting of Barbra Streisand as the "ugly ducking" woman.  I would have rather seen an actress that would really have been able
to alter herself much more for the ending, since I didn't find Barbra's
changes to be more than just cosmetic. And to show her exercising in padded
clothes, and then svelte in a tight black dress, is not a terribly
convincing way to fool us into believing that she'd lost weight. Other than
that, the film is fun to watch if you're interested in seeing this theory
put into practice (This exercise was quite frustrating to Mrs. JoBlo), some
fluffy romance, and an overly nerdy professor performance put forth by Jeff
Bridges. Pierce Brosnan also has a throwaway role in this movie, and Lauren
Bacall, despite her decent performance, showed me nothing worthy of all
those Oscar calls back in 1996.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Dudley Moore was originally cast in the role that went to George Segal.
"Creative differences" were cited for his reason for leaving.
This film is a remake of the 1958 French film LE MIROIR A DEUX FACES.


Title
Review for Paper, The (1994)
For more reviews, go to http://surf.to/joblo
Ron Howard, also known as Richie Cunningham from the famous 80's sitcom
"Happy Days", scrapes out another entertaining picture, following the
great success of BACKDRAFT (7.5/10) and PARENTHOOD (7.5/10).
PLOT:
This film covers one day, behind the scenes, in the life of a big-city
newspaper. A possibly untrue story breaks out about two
African-American youths who appear to have killed a pair of out of town
white businessmen. As the day, and the story unfold, we get entangled
in the personal, and professional, lives of every single person needed
to put a news article, and paper, together. Is the truth more important
than a story?
CRITIQUE:
Entertaining, extremely informative, rapidly-paced film that literally
puts you on the front lines with the cast and crew who fabricate the
news stories which we read in our newspapers every day. This film was
interesting for me because it seemed to give me a lot of insight into
the high-flying antics of a big city newspaper, without dumbing it down
for the sake of the lowest-common audience member. Having said that, I
didn't buy most of the extreme dinky personal stories that ran through
their lives during this one day (it seemed like that one day was the
biggest day in the lives of every single person in the movie!), but
then again, I guess they needed to jazz up some of their stories in
order to make their characters a little more interesting than Woodward
and Bernstein. 
The acting was top-notch on all fronts, with Keaton pulling off another
quirky, stressed-out guy role, and Tomei demonstrating some depth as
the pregnant reporter wife who feels her husband's life slowly
trinkling away from her own. Close plays her cold, bitchy editor role
superbly, and Duvall also steps up to the plate as the old, editorial
coot with ailing health and family issues (his "uncomfortable for
everyone in the room" coughing sequence was very cool and authentic.)
One might argue that the film is a little too engrossed in its own
world of high-stakes stories and jargon, but I guess I didn't mind that
aspect one bit. In fact, that's exactly what I liked about the movie.
Overall, this picture will be extremely interesting to all those that
want to know more about the business of selling newspapers, and/or
those looking for some extremely bright acting moments from some of
today's best actors. If neither point interests you in any way, then I
suggest you stay away from this rat-race of a flick, and check out
Howard's more inclusive cinematic vehicles like PARENTHOOD and
BACKDRAFT.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Director Ron Howard frequently casts younger brother Clint Howard in
small roles. Ron also went to high school with one of the stars of his
movie RANSOM (6.5/10), Rene Russo.
Screenwriters David and Stephen Koepp are brothers. 
When Glenn Close was 13, her father opened a clinic in the Belgian
Congo (now Zaire) and ran it for 16 years. During most of that time,
the Close children lived alternately in Africa and at boarding schools
in Switzerland. Close once dated the ultimate Boston Bruin, Cam Neely.
Jason Alexander's (George from TV's "Seinfeld") real name is Jason
Scott Greenspan. In 1985, he appeared in a commercial for McDonald's
McDLT sandwich.
Critic's note: This film was watched during a weekend layaway in New
York City with Mrs. JoBlo by my side. Chinese take-out food was
thoroughly enjoyed during our screening, which may or may not have, in
some shape or form, altered my enjoyment of this film. Thank you for
understanding.

Title
Review for Three Kings (1999)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
David O. Russell is a man to be reckoned with. He starts his career off with
a "comedy" about incest between a mom and son called SPANKING THE MONKEY.
Follows it up with yet another very original story packed with a slew of
interesting and quirky characters called FLIRTING WITH DISASTER (8.5/10).
And now this film, which at least one critic (Roger Ebert) has called a
"masterpiece".
PLOT:
Operation Desert Storm has just ended. Now, four military men find a map
leading to the gold stolen by Saddam Hussein in a prisoner's ass, and decide
to take it upon themselves to find the stash and retire in wealth upon their
return home. But what do you know...things are never that simple.
CRITIQUE:
This film is like no other "war film" that I have ever seen. Sure, it does
actually take place after the war, and isn't necessarily based on action or
heavy machine gun shootouts, but you can still consider it a war movie
considering the goings-on in the film. It's got a style, a feel, a unique
look, unlike any of those other murky combat flicks. Could it be the fact
that it actually toys with comedy as much as it does drama?
Perhaps...although I personally found some of the humor to be misplaced in a
film with so many disturbing images. Having said that, this film is no
SAVING PRIVATE RYAN (8/10) in that regard either, it actually presents us
with various original scenarios featuring gun fights which I have never
encountered before in any film. Very interesting to watch. It also decided
to show us, in graphic detail, what a bullet does to someone after it enters
their body. Kind of icky to see, but interesting nonetheless.
That aside, this film basically offers us a unique war perspective with some
decent action scenes, a creative style, some good humor, a spic-and-span
ending, but not much more than that. The acting performances were also very
good, with George Clooney really coming into his own with this picture.
Wahlberg also comes through, despite another gratuitous shot of him running
around without his top (Who am I kidding, if I had half the six-pack that
bastard's got stacked, I'd be going to work without my shirt every day!).
Even Ice Cube and Spike Jonze (That's right, the music video director!) got
into the act with some pretty effective scenarios. The film as a whole
worked for me because I was never bored while watching it, enjoyed its
creative take on many Hollywood staple scenes, and was even a little touched
here and there. Not a great film, but certainly one worthy of earning your
hard-earned cash in the local movie houses.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Director David O. Russell has written and directed his first three pictures
all by himself, although this one has a "story" credit to John Ridley, the
man who wrote the novel "Stray Dogs", upon which Oliver Stone's U-TURN was
filmed. Russell got his first picture made when he was in his mid-thirties,
and apparently spent 18 months exhaustively researching the Gulf War and its
aftermath before writing this movie.
Director/actor Spike Jonze's real name is Adam Spiegel. He recently married
famed director Francis Ford Coppola's daughter Sofia. His only two other
"acting" performances before this movie were as a "Airbag EMT Beltran" in
1997's THE GAME and as a "teenage drug customer" in 1993's MI VIDA LOCA (No,
not the Ricky Martin music video!). He's best known for having directed many
unique music videos such as "Sabotage" by the Beastie Boys, "Buddy Holly"
from Weezer, "Da Funk" by Daft Punk and "Praise Me" by Fatboy Slim. And yes,
that is him dancing around like an idiot dance teacher in the video. He will
be making his directorial debut in this fall's BEING JOHN MALKOVICH.
Rumors were floating around when this picture opened about the use of an
actual cadaver during the "let's show the bullet inside one's body" scene.
It turned out to be a completely unfounded rumor, since no dead body would
ever be used for such an unnecessary exercise.
George Clooney is the nephew of singer Rosemary Clooney and the cousin of
actor Miguel Ferrer. George's middle name is Timothy. He says he will never
get married, nor have any children, but Michelle Pfeiffer and Nicole Kidman
have bet $10,000 each that he will be a father before he turns 40 (2001).
Ironically, Clooney's first role was in a 1984 TV series called "E/R", and
ten years later, he returned to TV drama with another small hit called "ER".
Ice Cube, real name O'Shea Jackson, started rapping when he was 14 in South
Central Los Angeles, where he pushed his notion of gangsta rap, a genre he
virtually invented and defined with his old group N.W.A., to new levels.
Actor Mark Wahlberg will also co-star alongside George Clooney in his next
picture called THE PERFECT STORM, and have George as a producer on his next
project after that.
This film was shot in three places: El Centro, California, three weeks among
deserts and sand dunes; Mexicali, Mexico, its unobstructed landscape served
as the backdrop for the film's opening sequence; and Casa Grande, Arizona.
This film was originally titled THE SPOILS OF WAR.

Title
Review for Reindeer Games (2000)
For more reviews and movie trailers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Allow me to get philosophical on you for a minute. If a bad ending were to
fall in an otherwise "okay" movie and you were sitting in the audience to
witness it...would it be considered a "bad" movie? Well, in the case of this
film, the ending was so over-the-top that it just tore away any cozy
feelings that I had burrowed in me during the hour and a half previous. A
note to writer Ehren Kruger: it's called over-writing...look into it : )
PLOT:
A convict gets out of jail and finally meets the girl that he'd heard so
much about during his stint in the big house. Unfortunately for the tender
loving duo, the girl's older brother decides to crash their party and
blackmail the ex-con into helping him and his gang of hooligans rob the
Tomahawk casino.
CRITIQUE:
An okay movie with a few decent one-liners, a couple of semi-interesting
action sequences and Charlize Theron looking great is dramatically killed
with an ending so ridiculous that it practically washes away the entire
entertainment value of its previous ninety minutes. I say "practically"
because I do not like to blow a movie off just because "one aspect" of the
film didn't click for me, so let me tell you what I did like about this
film. First of all, Charlize Theron is now officially a grade A movie star!
She's the type of actress that can make you love her no matter what she
says, does, wears or doesn't wear. She is a beauty to behold, a solid
thespian in her own right and a sparkplug of charisma, all wrapped in one.
Fans of Charlize will love her in this film, as will fans of Theron's
boobies, which make an uncredited cameo about halfway through the picture.
Ben Affleck does an okay job, but his performance in this film won't be
putting him on the Brendan Fraser action-hero map anytime soon (To be fair,
Big Ben also flashes us some ass during an early sex-scene). And let's not
forget Sinise, who fills the shoes of the official "bad guy" pretty well, as
well as his tank top, which he fills rather nicely with his newly buffed
body. Nice biceps, dude!
So the actors were are all pretty good, the film started with an intriguing
shot (Five dead bloody Santa suits spread across old man winter), and it
even included a couple of neat twists and turns. So what went wrong?
Unfortunately, the film on the whole just runs along with a little humor
here and there, a little bit of pseudo-romance, which actually drags the
film down especially at the very beginning, a little bit of action and an
even smaller bit of suspense. All in all, nothing to majorly crow about, but
certainly a film which I would have had no problem recommending to people
who liked Theron or Affleck, like "winter" movies and Christmas songs and
didn't mind suspending their disbelief every now and again. But
unfortunately for Frankenheimer and crew, they decided to finish the movie
off with one of the most absurd endings that I've seen in a while. So
whatever little recommendation there was left in me by that point
disappeared along with all sense of reality in the script. Of course, to
each his own, and God knows every single one of us has our own barometer of
far-fetchedness, so who knows, maybe you won't mind the ending so much. But
as much as my buddy and I tried to make sense of the cards that we were
dealt during this film's final moments, it was obvious that neither one of
us could pretend that any of it made much sense.
An okay movie...with a laughable ending.
Little known facts about the movie and its stars:
Charlize Theron stands 5'9". She is fluent in Afrikaans. Ben Affleck stands
6'3". He speaks decent Spanish. Apparently, poor ol' Ben was accidentally
knocked unconscious by football player Dana Stubblefield during the filming
of this movie when Stubblefield slipped and knocked Affleck down. Bennie was
quickly taken to the hospital, and fully recovered.
Clarence Williams III is best remembered for his part of Linc Hayes, his
big-ass afro role in TV's "The Mod Squad".
When Senator Robert Kennedy was shot at the Ambassador Hotel in Los Angeles
on June 5, 1968, it was his good friend John Frankenheimer who had
personally driven him there that day.
Writer Ehren Kruger is the latest flavor of the month in Hollywood, with no
less than three films carrying his writing credits in the past year alone.
Besides this one, he also wrote the thriller ARLINGTON ROAD (7/10) and the
last of the Scream movies entitled SCREAM 3 (7.5/10).
Watch closely and you will notice singer Isaac Hayes in a small cameo part
at the beginning of this movie, as the convict in jail who finds a roach in
his jello, eventually leading to a food fight. You will also note the acting
debut of Washington Redskins tackle Dana Stubblefield who plays another
fierce convict named Alamo. Apparently while casting for the film, director
Frankenheimer told his associates that he "wanted a mean, tough guy to play
Alamo. I want a guy like that Dana Stubblefield". When the filmmakers
contacted the ballplayer, he was more than willing to play the part.
Thankfully the filmmakers decided not to change this film's title from the
pretty cool REINDEER GAMES to the very lame DECEPTION.
This film was shot entirely in the province of British Columbia, Canada.

Title
Review for One Night Stand (1997)
Mike Figgis' follow-up to the critically acclaimed LEAVING LAS VEGAS
(8.5/10) from 1995, examines the repercussions of marital infidelity,
and another man's struggle with HIV contamination.
PLOT:
A married man with two kids has a one-night affair with a married woman
during a weekend business trip to New York. Once back in LA, he
contemplates his life and the consequences of his sinful act.
CRITIQUE:
Comparing this film to FATAL ATTRACTION (8/10) or PHILADELPHIA (7/10)
would be doing a great disservice to either one of those films, but
nonetheless, the plot line doesn't stretch far from their respective
story lines. Marital infidelity and a close friend dying of AIDS are
the main topics in this film. Unfortunately, Figgis resolves absolutely
nothing in regards to the infidelity topic, and scores only a few
points in respect to the horror of a man dying of this disease. The
film concludes on an absolutely ridiculous circumstance, which doesn't
actually show anyone working through any of their complex issues.
The main problem I had with this film was its lack of honesty and
realism in regards to the after-effects of a one-night affair. Nobody
in this story seemed hurt, angry or despondent about the situation,
while the better half of the film concentrated on a friend's struggle
with the fatal disease. Robert Downey Jr. played his part as the man
dying of AIDS remarkably well, while the rest of the cast didn't offer
any mentionable performances. I found Kinski's character weak in
persona, but did like Ming-Wa's strong and independent wife character
(Mind you, I've had a thing for her since TV's "The Single Guy").
Overall, this film had very little entertainment value, no grand moral
conclusions or solutions, and nothing exceptionally interesting to
offer anyone. Figgis' directorial style was cool at times, but he did
overuse the "fade to black" shot during one too many internals. If you
are interested in either subject matter of this movie, I suggest that
you rent either one of the two films that I mentioned earlier on, and
save yourself some time and money. 
Little Known Facts: 
Joe Eszterhas was an uncredited writer on this film (This might explain
a lot of things...:)).
Wesley Snipes appeared in Michael Jackson's "Bad" music video. You can
only see him in the full length, 16 minute, black & white/color music
video. And despite the fact that Wesley does not often acknowledge it,
he did attend the State University of New York (SUNY) at Purchase and
graduated with a BFA in 1985.
Robert Downey Jr. lived with fellow actor Sarah Jessica Parker for 7
years during the 1980s, and studied ballet in London when he was young.
Nastassja Kinski has a daughter with Quincy Jones, and is fluent in
English, German, French, Italian and Russian. 

Title
Review for Stuart Little (1999)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
PLOT:
An orphaned mouse gets adopted by two human parents. The real son of the duo
does not take well to the mouse at first, but eventually begins to
understand and appreciate him better, until one day, the mouse's real micey
parents show up to claim back their child. Who will Stuart, the cute little
mouse, end up with?
CRITIQUE:
I expected more fun and laughs from this cute mouse tale. It was an okay
movie, great special effects with the talking mice and cats blending right
into their human entourage, some fun moments including a mafia cat ring
looking out for revenge, but not enough punch to recommend with much
enthusiasm. In fact, I think the filmmakers went a little too far on the
sentimentality bit, chiming in with sad music during every conceivable
moment of uncertainty. Mrs. JoBlo also liked it but nothing more than that.
There just seemed to be something missing, something that could've been
there, should've been there, but in the end, just wasn't. Will kids dig it?
Yeah, I'm pretty sure they will but don't expect them to start dusting off
their shelves for a new spot next to their TOY STORY and BEAUTY AND THE
BEAST videos.
I did love the way the mice all happened to be accepted in modern day
society as a matter of fact, and the excellent close-ups of the cats talking
and emoting their feelings, but when all was said and done, most of their
jokes fell flat, and I suppose that after the amazing spectacle that was TOY
STORY 2 (8/10), most other kid movies have to seriously drum up their
bang-for-a-buck factor, in order to be appreciated by today's expectant
movie-going audience. It's really too bad because I was thoroughly impressed
by the superior computer-generated character of Stuart Little, whose cute
face and impeccable body movements certified him as a truly original film
personality. Unfortunately, the film lacked that slickness, that hipness,
that humor, that action-packed craziness that takes a kid's movie and rises
it above the rest. All in all, it was okay, a couple of funny moments, a
couple of decent action scenes, a quick runtime, one too many emotional
moments, but a fun time for most kids. See it just for the slick mouse
effects and all of the cats talking shtick...that is, if you're into that
kind of thing.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Michael J. Fox was born in Edmonton, Alberta, Canada, but currently makes
his home in New York City with his wife, actress Tracy Pollan, and their
three children. Michael stands 5'4" and recently revealed that he was
diagnosed with Parkinson's disease in 1991.
Actress Geena Davis has been married to two really tall showbiz guys: actor
Jeff Goldblum and director Renny Harlin. She is also a member of the
geniuses-'R-us organization of MENSA, speaks Swedish and placed 24th out of
28 semi-finalists for the American Olympic Archery Team in 1999. Her full
name is Virginia Elizabeth Davis.
No doubt you all remember the cute boy in this film, Jonathan Lipnicki, from
the 1996 Tom Cruise film, JERRY MAGUIRE (8/10), which also happened to be
his big screen debut. Ironically, his endearing portrayal of Ray Boyd earned
the kid the "1996 Best Child Performance of the Year" award presented by the
National Broadcast Film Critics Association.
Many familiar guest voices make appearances as characters in this film
including Nathan Lane, Chazz Palminteri, Steve Zahn, David Alan Grier, Bruno
Kirby and Jennifer Tilly.
Screenwriter M. Night Shyamalan is the man behind one of the biggest movie
successes of 1999: THE SIXTH SENSE (8/10). He wrote and directed that film.
By the time he was sixteen years old, he had already completed his 45th
short film, and at the tender age of 17, he stood before his parents, both
doctors, surrounded by pictures of the other 12 doctors in his family, and
informed them that although he graduated cum laude and received academic
scholarships to several prestigious medical programs, he had instead decided
to attend the New York University Tisch School of the Arts to study
filmmaking. The rest, as they say, is history.

Title
Review for 13th Warrior, The (1999)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
After lying on the shelf for over a year, this epic tale based on Michael
Crichton's novel is released with little fanfare right before the Labour Day
weekend, a time generally reserved for servings of crap cinema. Is it that
bad? Not really. In fact, it does generate several scenes of decent combat,
but all in all, a wasted opportunity.
PLOT:
An exiled Arab is chosen to be the 13th warrior in a pack selected to defend
a king's homeland against the legendary half-man/half-bear predators from
the mist. The man is reluctant at first, but slowly acclimatizes himself to
the group and acquires the aptitudes of a true warrior.
CRITIQUE:
This movie starts off real slow and boring, has way too many scenes hidden
by darkness, way too many lines lost due to badly spoken dialogue, but does
offer a few invigorating sequences of violent battle and a couple of gory
scenes as well. If you are expecting another epic classic a la BRAVEHEART,
you may as well save your money right now, and rent a quick & easy pornos
instead. But if you don't mind a rinky-dink story and enjoy seeing
Viking-like men kick bear ass, this film might be of healthier interest to
you. I thought the second half of the film was much more enjoyable than the
first, but could not help but feel like there could have been so much more.
For one thing, it would have been nice to SEE many more of the battle
sequences, most of which were unfortunately masked by the darkness and lost
to my weak eyes. It also would have been nice to toss some speech therapists
the way of Antonio Banderas and the mighty Nordic men who all seemed to be
mumbling their incoherent lines through the entire gig.
On top of that, this is not necessarily a picture that needs to be seen on
the big screen. In fact, you may want to check it out on a lonely video
evening sometime next year, when the bad blood behind the making of the film
has all but dissipated. It may just go down better at that point. I also
think this film would have benefited from a name change. Forget THE 13TH
WARRIOR, which centres around the Banderas character, who to me, seemed
little more than a whiny beeyatch. How about the original novel title of
"Eaters of the Dead"!? Yeah, now there's a cool title! And those crazy
man-bears sure were creepy enough to merit that designation. Which reminds
me of a film that came out earlier this year, a cannibal tale it was, which
entertained me so much more than this sub-par offering. It was called
RAVENOUS (7.5/10) and supplied plenty of narrative, action and cannibalism
to whet anybody's bloody appetite. Now there's a movie to see! This one,
well, see it if you like films which start off slow, have plenty of scenes
in the dark, a few good battle sequences and incomprehensible men talking
bunk. Otherwise, stick to the cooler cannibal tale of 1999 and check out
RAVENOUS!
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Antonio Banderas' full name is Jos Antonio Domnguez Banderas. Born in
Mlaga, Spain, Antonio originally wanted to play soccer professionally. His
dream crashed when he broke his foot at the tender age of fourteen. That's
when he started acting. He was a staple in the Pedro Almodovar films of the
'80s, and he crossed over to American films in 1992 with THE MAMBO KINGS,
which he did phonetically. He is a Libra, and currently married to
big-breasted actress Melanie Griffin.
Actor Omar Sharif's birth name was Michael Shalhoub. He was born in 1932, in
the city of Alexandria, Egypt. He is also known to be a world-class bridge
player.
Author Michael Crichton stands 6'9" and was apparently exorcised in 1986. He
may be best known for having written the novels upon which the hugely
successful JURASSIC PARK films were based.
Director John McTiernan is probably best known for directing the original
DIE HARD movie with Bruce Willis. He also directed the third and crappier
one, called DIE HARD: WITH A VENGEANCE.
After an earlier version of this film performed badly in sneak previews, new
scenes were reportedly shot under the direction of author Michael Crichton.
The budget of this film apparently ballooned close $100 million.
Screenwriter William Wisher Jr. is known to have written the screenplay for
TERMINATOR 2: JUDGMENT DAY.
This film's title was changed from THE VIKINGS to THE EATERS OF THE DEAD to
THE THIRTEENTH WARRIOR.
Ironically, much of the movie was shot on location in British Columbia and
other parts of Canada.

Title
Review for Coyote Ugly (2000)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
This film can now officially be crowned as the first "trailer-tease" that I
have ever witnessed. What's a "trailer-tease", you may ask? Well, consider
another derogatory term that some men use to describe some women who tease
them sexually and then give them NOTHING in return (starts with a C, boys
and girls). Of course, my first clue should've been the PG-13 rating.
It's sad too, because this really could have been a great movie had they
concentrated more on the bar, the chicks, the sex, the swearing, the
drinking, and all of the other fun stuff that the trailer makes you think is
packed into this movie. Unfortunately, the movie itself concentrates more on
the sappy ho-hum plot about this small-town girl trying to make it in the
big city. Yawn...
PLOT:
A small-town girl moves to the big city with hopes and dreams of making it
as a singer/songwriter. But when times get tough, she gets a job at a local,
rowdy bar and starts kinda liking her new digs. At the same time, she falls
for a guy who's intent on helping her singing career take off.
CRITIQUE:
Uneven. Splashed with various energetic bar scenes, this movie loses power
when focusing on its sappy plotline. Its awesome soundtrack makes you want
to get up, toss a few shots back and grab your neighbor by the hand, but not
before the awful music sung by the main character drains us right out of it
again. Boy, I sooooo wish this movie took place entirely in the bar, focused
more on all of the girls and included some authentic swearing and sexual
gratuity (okay, maybe not so much the last two items, but definitely the
first two!). Unfortunately, the high energy of the bar, its music, its
bartenders and its clientele are a lot of fun to watch when they do frolic
across the big screen, but the sad-sack love story and regurgitated "I wanna
be a star" byline, just zoom you right back down this rollercoaster ride.
And where the hell was Tyra Banks?!? How dare the filmmakers spray her
assets across the posters, the website, the TV commercials and barely give
her ten minutes of screen time? More Tyra, people!! And what about the rest
of the girls? They're all so pretty but what's their story? God knows,
because this movie focuses solely on the lead big-lipped girl named Piper
Perabo, a semi-interesting character, who unfortunately is not enough to
carry an entire movie.
I will offer my thumb up to this film's extremely potent soundtrack, the
excellent gritty look and feel of New York City, the bar itself, and its
high, high energy level when in the bar! Too bad that my thumb has to do a
loop-de-loop for the film's stinky "real music" sung by the lead, the
by-the-numbers story of her trying to "make it in the big city" and the lack
of character development for any of the other girls! (they're people,
too...sniff, sniff). If you really want to see a good movie about a
small-town girl trying to break into the music biz, rent THE THING CALLED
LOVE, a wonderful drama featuring River Phoenix's final performance, and
thank me in the morning (Note: the music in that film is country...you have
been warned). Overall, I really liked the performances in this film: Maria
Bello was perfect as the tough lady running the unruly bar, Perabo was good,
but after seeing her in ROCKY & BULLWINKLE, I'm hoping that she gets rid of
that "confused, shy" look real fast, cause it's already getting old. The
Australian love-interest was also effective and John Goodman perfect as the
overweight daddy with a big heart. And look for a very funny scene featuring
Ellen Cleghorne as a pissed-off secretary. You go, girl!
In the end, I would probably recommend this movie to anyone who doesn't mind
being titillated for little bits and pieces, only to be brought back down by
the reality of the very hokey plot. Great fashions, great soundtrack...the
bar scenes alone might actually be worth it, but prepare to take those blue
balls home, fellas!
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Pay close attention to the man portraying a photographer in this film
because he is none other than ARMAGEDDON, THE ROCK and PEARL HARBOR
director, and Jerry Bruckheimer favorite, Michael Bay.
Yes, there really is a COYOTE UGLY bar in New York City. It is located on
1st Avenue in the heart of the East Village, and has been around for about
10 years. The bar in the movie is similar in design to the real one, but
many other drinking establishments were visited in Manhattan and surrounding
areas, in order to devise the look of the film's fictionalized bar (wow, I
wonder whose "difficult" job that was?).
All the singing done by Piper Perabo in this movie was voiced by singer
LeAnn Rimes, who also makes a cameo appearance near the end of the film.
This is director David McNally's motion picture debut. He joins us from the
world of television commercials (a Bruckheimer prodigy from TV
commercials...who would have guessed?), with his most popular one featuring
a certain "Lobster" in a Budweiser commercial. He dropped out of college to
tour with his popular Canadian rock band "The Pinups" (Uuhm, I'm Canadian
but I ain't ever heard of them) and even directed a couple of Celine Dion
music videos (but we forgive him, don't we?).
THE COYOTES:
Piper Perabo won the title role in this film after an extensive
cross-country search. She's a graduate of Ohio University, and was actually
born and raised in Toms River, New Jersey.
Maria Bello is probably best known for her role as the passionate and
headstrong Dr. Anna Del Amico on TV's "ER".
Izabella Miko makes her American motion picture debut with this picture,
even though she has been working virtually her entire life. Born and raised
in Poland, she aspired to become a professional dancer and at the age of
seven began studying at the Chopin Music School.
Bridget Moynahan is probably best known for her recurring role of Mr. Big's
fiancee Natasha on the HBO series "Sex in the City".
Tyra Banks, probably the best-known of the coyotes (and for her coyotes!),
is an international fashion icon whose image can be seen around the world
(so why not give her more screen-time, you dummies!?). She is a model, an
actress and an author.

Title
Review for See Spot Run (2001)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
PLOT:
A goofy postman offers to baby-watch his sexy neighbor's kid (a neighbor for
whom he cares for deeply, BTW) but ends up in over his head when a stray dog
also enters the picture. Unbeknownst to them, the dog is actually a FBI
agent's drug-sniffing pooch who just escaped the witness relocation program
and is being chased by mobsters intent on whacking him out. Ooooooh, that
same ol' story again! :)
CRITIQUE:
This is not so much of a "bad" movie, as it is just a movie that we've seen
a thousand times before. The dog with the "super" powers, the bumbling bad
guys after him, the nice goofy dude who loves his next door neighbor, but is
afraid to tell her, the cute kid who you feel really sorry for, especially
when he cries, etc... It's also a kid's movie, which I generally don't
bother reviewing since my sensibilities and those of 10-year olds are not
exactly on the same plane, but every now and again, I like to take a stab at
one. I guess this one wasn't an awful one to check out, since it did
actually have a few funny moments, a nice performance by Michael Clarke
Duncan and a darn cutey-patootie kid, but sadly the film on the whole,
relies too much on fart, caca jokes and pratfalls for laughs. Then again,
isn't that what kids want? It's basically HOME ALONE with a dog! The
difference being that with the latter film, you actually gave a crap about
the kid in question, and the premise was somewhat believable and sometimes
even...touching.
This movie isn't necessarily as mean-spirited as some of the other gross-out
flicks that have come out over the past couple of years, but there certainly
wasn't much in the characters for anyone to truly identify with. Of course,
the basic idea of any of these kids movies is simply...will it make kids
laugh? I guess in that sense, some of the stuff in this film will definitely
work for the toddlers, as sight gags, over-the-top antics and many a goofy
character permeate the movie, but not really enough to recommend it on the
big screen, I'm afraid. If you wanna tie up the children for an easy ninety
minutes on a lazy Sunday afternoon, there are worse ways to do it. Of
course, don't expect the film to change their lives, or give them any
further insight into the human condition as we know it, but I think ya'll
hear what I'm saying here. Adults, stay away from this one, it's not for
you, and kids, well, see it if the parents want you to. Otherwise, no big
loss.
Oh and by the way, if you don't like David Arquette and "the character" that
he redundantly plays in all of his movies, stop seeing his goddamn movies! I
mean, am I the only one who's sick of people complaining about him playing
the same character over and over again? Dudes/dudettes, if you don't like
him, don't see his movies. Simple as that. Personally, I don't mind his
"goof character", but then again, I don't really think about David Arquette
all that much. Courteney Cox on the other hand...
Where's JoBlo coming from?
102 Dalmations (5/10) - Dinosaur (4/10) - The Grinch (4/10) - Home Alone
(8/10) - Lost and Found (4/10) - Mousehunt (6/10) - Ready to Rumble (7/10) -
Stuart Little (6/10) - Toy Story 2 (8/10)

Title
Review for Office Space (1999)
For more reviews and movie trivia, visit http://www.joblo.com
Mike Judge, the man behind the infinitely stupid and funny BEAVIS & BUTTHEAD
animated series, jots down his first live-action movie, based on his
infamous "Milton" sketches from TV's "Saturday Night Live", and helms the
picture to boot. This movie is made for anyone who has ever worked in a
Dilbert-type office environment, hates their job, and doesn't mind laughing
at it all.
PLOT:
A guy working in a run-of-the-mill tech company hates his job. After some
help from a relaxation expert, the guy develops the capacity to become
indifferent to his stress, and ironically lands himself a position of higher
power. But when his friends are slated for downsizing, our boy and his
buddies decide to get even with a half-assed money-making virus scheme.
CRITIQUE:
This movie has many chuckles, some laugh out loud scenes, other shrugs of
the shoulder, in a humorous and poignant office setting, which touches upon
much of the inhumanity and hypocrisy that permeates the high-tech cubicles
environments of our day. I personally saw MUCH of myself in the main
character, since I, much like him, find myself wondering about the worth of
my cubey-employment every other high-tech-flying day. I sense this capacity
to identify with the main characters in this film, as a strong correlation
point to your appreciation of the humor within. And it is within that
environment that the authenticity and parody of the actual office rapport,
the insincere stooge bosses, the phony empowerment signs all over the walls,
and the daily frustrations that people face with the technological office
"advancements", were all dead-on perfect!
Having said all that, the plot of the film itself is actually quite thin,
with an irrelevant and cheesy romance with Jennifer Aniston (wasted in this
role) tossed in for effect. I would have liked to have seen more office
scenarios and incidents, as opposed to the last third of the film, which
essentially down-shifts into a semi-crime caper. The actors were all very
good with Ron Livingston playing an excellent laid-back dude, and his Bill
Gates Jr. buddy coming through as the geek with the love for the gangsta
rap. All in all, I would recommend this movie to all people who live, or
have survived, this kind of an office environment, are looking for a light
comedy, and don't mind a thin plot. Either way, always try to remember that
WORKS SUCKS!
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Director Mike Judge apparently plays the role of Jennifer Aniston's idiot
manager at Chotchkie's in this film. He was born in Guayaquil, Ecuador.
A nod to actor Ron Livingston's better-known role in SWINGERS (9/10), comes
by the way of a button on Jennifer Aniston's restaurant costume which reads
"We're not in Kansas anymore". An infamous line from the film featuring the
then-unknown Vince Vaughn and Jon Favreau.
The guy playing the spectacled-nerd in this film, David Herman, has directed
two documentaries of his own. He's also done voices for the Mike
Judge-created TV series "King of the Hill".
The real-life Milton in this film, Stephen Root, has also done voices for
"King of the Hill", and might be better known as his character of Jimmy
James from TV's "NewsRadio". He's also had plenty of movie appearances in
such films as BLACK RAIN, GHOST and BUFFY THE VAMPIRE SLAYER.
Actor Gary Cole, who plays the condescending boss in this film, also played
the role of Mike Brady, father of the Brady's, in both of THE BRADY BUNCH
movies.
Paul Willson, who plays the second "Bob" consultant in this film, may be
best remembered as Paul, the character that he played in the wildly
successful TV sitcom "Cheers". He was the "other fat guy", besides Norm.
Goofy neighbor Diedrich Bader plays Oswald Harvey on TV's "The Drew Carey
Show".

Title
Review for Wonder Boys (2000)
For more reviews and movie news, visit http://www.joblo.com/
I was suspicious about this film's rave reviews before going to see because
it centered mostly around a writer going through a rough period of his life,
and imagined that most critics' love for the film stemmed from their
inevitable ability to relate with the protagonist, rather than the film's
actual merits as a good ol' fashioned dose of entertainment for Joe Q.
Public. Well, I'm happy to report that my suspicions were mostly unfounded
and that, as a writer, I was able to relate stronger to the main character,
but more importantly, as a movie watcher, the film was wholly entertaining
and consistently gratifying.
PLOT:
A teacher whose career as a writer peaked with one successful novel suddenly
falls upon a couple of extremely unlucky days. First, his wife leaves him.
Then, his mistress tells him that she's pregnant. And to top all that off,
his eccentric editor comes to town looking for his latest novel, a book
which he seems to have been working on forever. All the while, the man also
has to deal with a brooding, young student of his who's loaded with
potential but very difficult to get a handle on.
CRITIQUE:
Inspirational. It's been quite some time that a movie was actually able to
make me feel refreshed after a viewing, or simply nudge me into revisiting
my own life under a different source of light, but this movie did just that.
A great film featuring some notable performances all around, an excellent
script which manages to simultaneously entertain and motivate those who fear
that their best days are far behind them and enough interesting characters,
plot twists and surprisingly, laughs, to gently embrace any willing audience
member. I'll be honest and tell you that I was barely intrigued by this
film's trailer, and basically just expected to be bored with the life and
times of a hack writer currently undergoing a mid-life crisis, but boy, was
I ever wrong! This movie didn't bore me for one second, in fact, it only
took a few minutes for it to wrap me entirely within its cozy shell of
wintertime and real-life characters. Their problems seemed genuine, their
reactions all engaging, their emotions running deep and leading to more
questions, a wonderful film to decipher and enjoy.
But besides its inspirational undertow, which drew fuel from the sparkplug
talent of a younger writer opening the eyes of an older, worn man, it was
this film's natural sense of irony and consistent humor that made me love it
so much more. Excellent performances from Michael Douglas and Tobey Maguire
also helped elevate this movie to its superior level, as well as the solid
supporting cast led by the always strange Robert Downey Jr. (whose career
seems to have taken off ever since he went to jail), Katie Holmes and
Frances McDormand. Easily one of Michael's least stock and sincerely layered
performances in years. Of course, it goes without saying (but I'll say it
anyway) that the director of the film is also to be given a lot of credit
for having the capacity to bring this interesting small tale to the big
screen, elevating the level of his cast's talent and giving the film an
absorbing feel and satisfying finale. Please don't go see this movie
expecting to be bombarded by inspiration, because this film is more likely
to invigorate if you enjoy watching good movies about intriguing, real
people with various vices, simply trying to live through their difficult
moments with a general sense of aloofness and determination.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
This film includes the last role that Robert Downey Jr. played before
returning to jail on drug charges. Robert claims that it was his father who
introduced him to the arena of drugs, when he offered him a marijuana joint
at the age of 8. Good parenting, ol' chap!
Tobey Maguire's first big-screen role was in 1993's drama THIS BOY'S LIFE
starring his present-day buddy Leonardo DiCaprio. Tobey began acting only
after his mother offered him $100 in high school for him to take drama
instead of home ec. The rest as they say...is history. Tobey has acted with
Katie Holmes before in the 1997 drama ICE STORM (6/10).
Did you all know that director Curtis Hanson, who now commands respect after
his Oscar-nominated and critically acclaimed film L.A. CONFIDENTIAL used to
direct shlocky thrillers? His reign before L.A. CONFIDENTIAL included THE
RIVER WILD, THE HAND THAT ROCKS THE CRADLE, BAD INFLUENCE and THE BEDROOM
WINDOW.
Actress Frances McDormand is married to writer/director Joel Coen, of "Coen
Brothers" fame.
This movie is based on a book of the same name by Michael Chabon. The novel
was transformed to script by Steve Kloves, a director in his own right.
Steve has directed movies on his own, including the Michelle
Pfeiffer-starring THE FABULOUS BAKER BOYS back in 1989, and 1993's FLESH AND
BONE starring Meg Ryan.

Title
Review for Big Hit, The (1998)
Semi-spoof of all action movies, this film attempts to combine the
humour of Tarantino's scripts with the action of a John Woo flic. Mark
Wahlberg's theatrical follow-up to the highly acclaimed BOOGIE NIGHTS
(7.5/10) has Terrence Chang and John Woo of FACE/OFF (8/10) and BROKEN
ARROW (5.5/10) fame sitting on as executive producers.
PLOT:
Four professional hitmen, who happen to be regular Joes in "real life",
kidnap the daughter of a rich Japanese businessman, in order to extort
some large money from the gentleman. As per usual, the kidnapping goes
somewhat awry, and that's when the cookiness and action takes over. 
CRITIQUE:
Flawed attempt at combining humour and action in one picture. LAST
ACTION HERO (7.5/10) was a film that handled this genre successfully,
but this picture just doesn't have enough real wit, or stand-out action
to merit that moniker. I laughed out loud at some parts, and cringed at
others (like when someone asks one of the hitmen how much money they
make and he replies "we make a killing"....haha, I think not). The
action sequences were all very good, but not enough were spread around
the entire picture. Also, the best scenes are in the first 10 minutes,
and then a very cool action scenario that rolls off the last 20
minutes.
Lou Diamond Phillips was the standout in the cast, whilst delivering a
bad guy rendition that flip-flopped between the Gary Oldman pimp in
TRUE ROMANCE (9/10) and Samuel L. Jackson in PULP FICTION (7.5/10).
Mind you, he did have most of the funny lines in this passable piece.
Wahlberg was so-so, as was the rest of this purposely generated
stereotypical cast. The soundtrack was very good, as was the style of
the picture, but I guess the biggest problem was its lacklustre script
(many weak attempts to correlate the idea of "bad guys doing regular
things" with successful screenwriting didn't pan out). If interested in
this story, I suggest you wait until it comes out on video, since
nothing of great interest is worth the trip to the movie houses for
this so-so adventure through the land of cinema.
Little Known Facts: 
Christina Applegate was one of the last people to see late actor River
Phoenix alive the night that he passed away in front of the Viper Room
(Johnny Depp-owned bar in Hollywood) from an apparent overdose of
drugs.
Lou Diamond Philips' real name is Lou Upchurch, he was born in the
Philippines, and was left by his wife Julie Cypher in 1990 (after four
years of marriage) after she hooked up with singer Melissa Etheridge.
This film was China Chow's first film experience. She has modeled for
designers Calvin Klein and Tommy Hilfiger, and was rumoured to be
dating Mark Wahlberg after the release of this picture.

Title
Review for Disturbing Behavior (1998)
For more reviews and movie trivia, visit http://www.joblo.com/
PLOT:
A group of high school kids suspect the grade's sharpest students, known as
the Blue Ribbons, to be controlled or programmed from another source other
than themselves. And as more and more students join the unique group, a
couple of rebellious kids take on the task of getting to the bottom of this
strange mystery.
CRITIQUE:
Creepy, escapist thrill-show, this movie takes elements from the STEPFORD
WIVES and CLOCKWORK ORANGE (9/10), mixes in some hip, young stars, a rockin'
soundtrack, and an interesting enough premise to fill its overly short 80
minute runtime. I haven't found myself thinking this much of late, but this
is one film that could've used another 20 minutes of so, to further develop
its interesting premise, and add onto its simple conclusion. It might've
turned the movie into something more than what it is now, which is a decent
thrill-ride, entertaining enough to enjoy, but shallow enough not to take
too seriously. Do you have 80 minutes to give up in your life, to watch a
dark, moody presentation shown over an alternative soundtrack, and Katie
Holmes in many a tight top? If you do, then check this puppy out, otherwise,
see one of the originals which I compared it to before, or better yet, check
into another one of screenwriter Scott Rosenberg's creations via THINGS TO
DO IN DENVER WHEN YOU'RE DEAD (7/10) or BEAUTIFUL GIRLS (8.5/10). Nick
Stahl's performance as the paranoid pothead with the overly literate tongue
was the only one to stick out in my mind (He went on to a bit part in
Terrence Malick's THE THIN RED LINE (6.5/10).
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Screenwriter Scott Rosenberg has a pen for the unique genres, as his first
three screenplays comprised of a quirky crime flick a la THING TO DO IN
DENVER WHEN YOU'RE DEAD, a romantic coming-of-adult-age drama, BEAUTIFUL
GIRLS (8.5/10) and the summer action blockbuster, CONAIR (6.5/10),
respectively.
The actor who plays the janitor in this film also played the role of the
Grim Reaper in 1991's BILLS AND TED'S BOGUS JOURNEY. His name is William
Sadler.


Title
Review for Nightmare Before Christmas, The (1993)
For more reviews and trivia, go to http://surf.to/joblo
Tim Burton creates another fantastical world of dark imagery and
isolated characters, and douses this world of the macabre within a
wonderfully upbeat and original musical menagerie by Danny Elfman. This
Academy Award-nominated stop-motion film is geared towards children,
but could thoroughly be enjoyed by adults with youthful & darkened
imaginations as well. This film annually visits the inside of my VCR,
and should be dubbed as one of the most original and classic Halloween
stories ever told.  
PLOT:
Jack Skellington, is the Pumpkin King of Halloween Town. Every year, he
demonstrates his delicious capacity to deliver scares and frights to
the entire town's grotesque population, but this year, he has run bored
with his annual routine. He sets out to find something different, and
does in the town of Christmas. The lights, the joy, the happiness of
this town burn the dimmed light within Jack's head, and lead him to
attempt a Christmas parade of his own in Halloween Town. The
consequences of this blending of the holidays leads to various
misinterpretations, excitement, harmonies and hilarity.
CRITIQUE:
Wonderfully dark and moody children's Halloween tale that gently stirs
all of the required elements of humour, musical charisma, children's
imagination and amazing special effects in a successful simmering pot
of entertainment. This film is filled with many wonderful images and
sounds from the wildly imaginative mind of Tim Burton, the man behind
the original BATMAN (8/10) and EDWARD SCISSORHANDS (8.5/10). The story
is as original as any one that I've ever seen for Halloween, and moves
along at an excited pace through its short running time of only 76
minutes.
The special effects are stunningly coordinated and surpass any Disney
animated films that I have ever seen. After a few minutes of staring at
these characters in awing disbelief, I completely fell under their
spell and in love with the personas. The musical numbers are easy to
understand and hummingly addictive (The album was nominated for a
Grammy for Best Musical Album for Children), while the dark and moody
atmosphere created in Halloween Town (Dali and Gaudi would be proud!),
is equated only by the cheery and charming ambience of Christmas Town. 
There are elements of other Halloween tales intertwined in this
masterpiece, along with a little GRINCH WHO STOLE CHRISTMAS, but
overall, this story is truly original, and gave me a truer appreciation
of both seasons involved. Of course, Halloween has always been my
favourite holiday of the year by a long shot, but don't let that bias
sway your vote. This film should capture anyone's dormant imagination,
with its wild visuals, upbeat musical renditions, sharp and exact
imagery, and creative story. See this one with your kids, if you have
any...if you don't, rent some for the weekend, it's worth it!
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Tim Burton began drawing at an early age, going on to attend the
California Institute of the Arts, studying animation after being
awarded a fellowship from Disney, for whom he went on to work. Some of
his trademarks include films with a Gothic feel to them, plots that
often focus around a misunderstood outcast, the frequent use of
composer Danny Elfman, the featuring of dead or dismembered dogs, and
the fact that he often likes to open his films with a quiet nighttime
snowfall.
Music composer Danny Elfman has been involved with most of Tim Burton's
directorial projects (except ED WOOD (6.5/10). He also provides the
singing voice for Jack Skellington in this movie. Furthermore, Danny is
the uncle-in-law of TV's "Dharma & Greg" star Jenna Elfman. His mom is
Blossom Elfman, an author of children's books. He is also a member of
the music band Oingo Boingo (nowadays known simply as Boingo), and
wrote the score for 1994's BLACK BEAUTY for his two daughters from a
collapsed marriage. Danny's brother Richard Elfman directed the
cult-classic sci-fi musical FORBIDDEN ZONE. Danny Elfman played Satan
in that very film.
Director Henry Selick followed this effort with another stop-action
feature titled JAMES AND THE GIANT PEACH, which was also produced by
Tim Burton.

Title
Review for Best in Show (2000)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Funny how we take so many things in our lives for granted. I see and do
things all the time without thinking about any of the people behind the
scenes of it all, and this film is a perfect example of one of the things
that I've never really thought about. Dog shows. I've always known about
them, I've caught a glimpse of them on the Sports Network from time to time,
but I've never really sat down and thought about what they truly consisted.
But have no fear, because writer/director Christopher Guest has come up with
an excellent mockumentary featuring the dogs, the people and all the rest of
the obsessive insanity that goes on behind the scenes at these dog shows.
PLOT:
A faux documentary featuring several dog owners preparing to take their
prize pets to the big show in Philadelphia. Along the way, we get an insight
into the world of dog shows, as well as all of the competition, neurotic
owner behavior and everything else that you'd expect from a "hobby" which
some people obviously take too seriously.
CRITIQUE:
A very funny, original take on the world of dog shows, filled with many
memorable characters, hilarious commentary and even some constructive
education about the industry behind the shows themselves. I'm more of a "cat
guy" myself, but you don't need to love dogs to enjoy this movie. The many
well-developed kooky characters are what drew me into this film, and I just
loved watching all of these actors riff left and right. Give Eugene Levy and
Catherine O'Hara some of the highest praise in this regard, with super
chemistry, perfect tit-for-tat dialogue sessions and one especially
hilarious sequence with Larry Miller as an old flame. You see, O'Hara's
character used to be "easy" when she was young, and the film features many
very funny moments of her former conquests crudely making points about their
trysts together, right in front of her timid husband. We also have the
extremely neurotic snooty couple, Parker Posey and Michael Hitchcock, who
feel the need to bring their dog with them to their psychiatrist and who
simply cannot seem to control their own diva-esque behavior. Kudos to both
of them, and especially on whoever decided to slap braces on the poor fools.
Nice touch.
The two final couples also offer many moments of chuckle in their own right,
especially the flamboyant gay character portrayed fabulously by John Michael
Higgins, and the very controlling dog trainer played intensely by Jane
Lynch. I mention all of these names and all of these characters because they
are what make up the fabric of this entire movie, and if you don't like
them, then you will more than likely not "get" this movie. I appreciated
them all, save for Christopher Guest's own character in the film, and I
especially loved two of the "smaller" personalities in the movie. The first
is Ed Begley Jr. (where has he been?) who slurps it all up as the manager of
the host hotel and Fred Willard, who in unquestionably the funniest thing
about this movie. He literally steals the show as one of the commentators of
the big dog show finale, and delivers some of the best lines that I've heard
all year. You couldn't find a bigger boob to add color commentary to the
show than this very misinformed gentleman! And a great job by his straight
man British co-host as well. Overall, I don't believe this comedy is suited
for most people. There is a lot of dry and satirical humor here, which may
not be appreciated by some. But for anyone who loved Guest's WAITING FOR
GUFFMAN, knows of the improvisational techniques perfected here by all
participants, and just plain loves dogs, this puppy is a perfect companion
for this fall's lazy weekend getaway. Funny and original...nice combo!

Title
Review for Lost & Found (1999/I)
For more reviews and movie trivia, visit http://www.joblo.com/
David Spade finds himself without his funnier sidekick, the late Chris
Farley, in a story that attempts to photocopy the high points from last
year's major comedy hit THERE'S SOMETHING ABOUT MARY (7/10), with poop, fart
and dog jokes, and a romantic struggle among suitors of a beautiful woman.
PLOT:
A man falls for a woman who does not see him for the self-professed great
guy that he is. In order for her to get to know him better, the man kidnaps
the woman's dog, and sets out to win her favor by spending more time with
her, in search of the lost pooch. Her ex-fiance from France also wants her
back. Wackiness ensues.
CRITIQUE:
This is David Spade's movie. If you don't like his style of funniness, you
will not like this film. If you do like his humor, you might want to check
this movie out, but even then, only on video. There is no reason to catch
this movie on the big screen because it only contains some chuckles, one or
two big laughs (And yes, the shit joke was one of the funnier ones), zero
believable romance between Spade and Marceau, and a weak and inconceivable
ending. One of the biggest laughs that I got out of this movie was in its
premise that wants us to believe that the gorgeous French actress Sophie
Marceau, would even look twice at the much shorter Spade, a man with the
absolute worst haircut in show business, and who gives very little reason
for anyone to like him in this movie. Bad acting aside, the man just doesn't
fly as a romantic lead.
I personally do like Spade's deadpan, sardonic humor, but even with that, I
found about 50% of his jokes as flat as a week-old Coke. And when you
consider that the only scenes that were even half-witty were the ones with
him in them, you kind of get a feel of what we're dealing with here. And
despite co-stars Marceau and Bruel's decent performances and admirable
attempts at humor, their scenes together only made me feel uncomfortable and
wonder aloud as to why two lovers from France would speak English together
when alone (The fact that I had time to think about this, tells you how
engaging their scenes together were.) Add a few music-happy montage scenes
to kill some time, an annoying sidekick via Artie Lange, and no romantic
believability whatsoever, and you've got yourself a video movie prime for a
lazy, summer night for folks interested in seeing a gorgeous woman go for a
geeky, sarcastic guy with awful hair. Either that, or you're a huge David
Spade fan and you want to check out a few of his funnier zingers.
PS: In keeping with the tradition of THERE'S SOMETHING ABOUT MARY, this film
also ends with an elaborate dance sequence during its end credits, featuring
the entire cast dancing to Dee-Lite's delicious tune "Groove is in the
Heart".
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
David Spade graduated from Arizona State University in 1988. His father left
his family when David was still was very young. Years later, his stepfather,
a war veteran, committed suicide. David is also the brother-in-law of
fashion designer Kate Spade. He stands 5'7, and his first movie appearance
was in 1987's "classic" POLICE ACADEMY 4: CITIZENS ON PATROL, playing the
character of Kyle.
Sophie Marceau is probably best known to American audiences for her U.S.
debut performance in Mel Gibson's BRAVEHEART, as Princess Isabelle.
Recently, she's been living with director Andrzej Zulawski, who is the
father of her first child, Vincent, born on the 24th of July 1995. She was
born Sophie Maupu.
Actor Patrick Bruel remains one of France's most popular talents, an
acclaimed actor with lauded performances in film and television and an
award-winning recording artist with chart-topping success in rock music. One
of his bigger musical hits was titled "Qui a le Droit".
Chubman Artie Lange also comes from a TV sketch comedy background, as one of
the regulars on TV's "Mad TV".
Following his graduation from University of Southern California Film School
in the early 1980s, director Jeff Pollack traveled through Asia both as a
tourist and documentarian. After three years on the road-and in the rice
fields and jungle, Pollack returned to the U.S., dabbling in real estate
development before devoting himself to an entertainment career. He created
and executive produced the long-running NBC sitcom "The Fresh Prince of Bel
Air," starring Will Smith, before crossing over into feature film.

Title
Review for Flawless (1999)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Double personality. Joel Schumacher. Think FLATLINERS. Think ST-ELMO'S FIRE.
Think FALLING DOWN. Now think BATMAN FOREVER, BATMAN & ROBIN & THE CLIENT.
He likes to make the smaller, more meaningful pictures, but then he also
enjoys making the bigger, commercial movies as well. And this one? Well,
with DeNiro in tow, you'd think it was a big film. You'd be wrong. This a
small, character-driven niche film, which Mr.Hyde likes to pop up and do
once in a while. Just do us comic book fans a major favor, Joel. DO NOT
TOUCH the fifth installment of Batman! You've done enough damage.
PLOT:
A macho ex-security guard doesn't like his neighbor who is gay and a drag
queen. The neighbor doesn't like him back, cause he's an obvious homophobe.
One day, the macho man has a stroke, gets paralyzed to his right side, and
needs speech therapy lessons, which can be administered by someone very
close to him. Guess, guess! That's right, irony upon irony, the same exact
drag queen that he hates, now has to give him lessons. Let the odd couple
therapy begin.
CRITIQUE:
Do not go to see this movie if you're looking for a good story. An eventful
story it is not. Do go see this movie if you enjoy character-driven films
which allow you to relate, care and understand the people in whom you are
investing your time, as opposed to seeing them simply as movie actors. And
this is why I kind of liked this movie. I liked its characters, especially
the flawless (sorry but I had to) rendition of the over-the-top drag queen
as delivered by Philip Seymour Hoffman, who covered all the basics a la THE
BIRDCAGE, but also powered through the scenes featuring his own emotional
battles versus the outside world. Give this man an Oscar nod, for God's
sakes. He's good. He's very good! DeNiro is also good, but for some reason I
felt like I'd seen him do this whole schtick before. AWAKENINGS maybe?
Anyway, you still have to admire a man who need not continue to play roles
of physically challenged people, but does so in order to challenge his own
acting chops to a higher degree.
Knowing DeNiro though, I was laughing to myself at the beginning of the film
as I thought about how many months of handball lessons he must've taken for
that one-minute scene featured in this movie. You gotta love those method
actors! Solid performances aside, there wasn't much more of consequence in
this film. And whatever else they did have in there wasn't all that good and
seemed out of place. It's unfortunate because whenever I felt as though I
was just getting to know these two characters better, the film took me out
of my element and through some cockamamie plot-line featuring an evil local
drug lord who was chasing the money that some punkass kid had stolen from
him. Of course, all this also lead to a thriller-type ending, which seemed
completely out of place in this film, when a deeper emphasis on the
characters, especially the drag queen's personal life, which was barely
touched upon, would have been much better appreciated. As you can see, this
was quite a split decision on my part. I dug the performances, especially
Hoffman's standout role as the woman caught in a man's body, but didn't much
care for the side-tracked story a la RANDOM HEARTS. So see it if you want to
see a couple of solid actors doing their "thang", but skip it if you're
looking for a good story.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Many of you will also have seen another aspect of Joel Schumacher's filming
career, which includes music videos that he's recorded for many artists.
This list includes the music video "Kiss From A Rose" by Seal, "The End is
the Beginning is the End" by The Smashing Pumpkins and "Devil Inside" from
INXS. His film  directorial debut began on 1981's THE INCREDIBLE SHRINKING
WOMAN, which he followed up two years later with the Mr.T film vehicle D.C.
CAB. He's also written a few screenplays including the famous 1976 film CAR
WASH, and even garnered credits as a costume designer in the 70s on such
pictures as Woody Allen's INTERIORS and SLEEPER.
One of actor Philip Seymour Hoffman's first movie roles was in 1992's SCENT
OF A WOMAN, in which he played a snotty, prep kid. Some may also remember
him as the fat, sexually frustrated man from the overrated HAPPINESS.
Robert DeNiro has been married twice in his lifetime and both times his
better halves were African-American. The first was actress Diahnne Abbott
and the second was Grace Hightower. He also had twin sons with Toukie Smith,
conceived by in-vitro fecundation.

Title
Review for Life Less Ordinary, A (1997)
>From the creators of the creepy SHALLOW GRAVE (8/10) and the great
TRAINSPOTTING (8.5/10) movies, comes A LIFE LESS ORDINARY. This movie
is, well, if you don't mind me saying so...a little less than ordinary.
PLOT: 
The plot has Robert getting fired from a corporate heartless company,
kidnapping the daughter (Celine) of said firm almost involuntarily,
hitting the road with the whining spoiled brat, and being sought after
by two "angels" sent down by Gabriel the Saint, who are supposed to
attempt a love connection between the polar opposite pair.
CRITIQUE: 
Nothing special here. The plot line is pretty thin and unoriginal. The
ending is all but given away by the poster of the film itself. The lame
angels, played surprisingly by Delroy Lindo and Holly Hunter, are
annoyances more than anything. Even Danny Boyle's most original style
seems to have taken a back seat
here. And to think that he turned down the fourth installment of the
ALIEN series for this shite.
Overall, I did not care about either of the characters enough to get
into the movie one bit. Some scenes were semi-funny (when Robert is
calling in the ransom request), there's a bit of style in the first ten
minutes or so but then it disappears, the soundtrack is pretty slick,
and the acting is passable, but overall
the movie just didn't have enough originality or drive to muster any
kind of enthusiasm from this big Danny Boyle fan (and that's saying a
lot).
Oh yeah, I almost forgot the best part of the movie which takes place
during the closing credits. A claymation rendition of the couple
travelling through their adventures is much more interesting than
anything in this entire picture. 
Little Known Facts: 
Ewan McGregor has starred in all three of Danny Boyle's feature films.
John Hodge has written all three of Danny Boyle's feature films.
Andrew McDonald has produced all three of Danny Boyle's feature films.
Ewan McGregor will play the young Obi-Wan Kenobi in the prequel to the
STAR WARS series.
Holly Hunter stands 5"2, and once shared a house (on and off) with
directors Joel Coen and Sam Raimi, writer/producer Ethan Coen and
fellow actresses Frances McDormand and Kathy Bates.

Title
Review for Patriot, The (2000)
For more reviews and movie wallpapers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Roland Emmerich directing a movie that doesn't feature major special effects
gadgetry or giant creatures pulverizing metropolitan cities? Say it ain't
so. Well, it is so, and so is the fact that star Mel Gibson reportedly
received a cool $25 million bucks for making this period piece. But with the
word of mouth starting off strong and the success of another periodic epic
still riding the wave of the early summer box-office (can anyone say
GLADIATOR), things are looking mighty good for the man behind such popcorn
fare as GODZILLA and INDEPENDENCE DAY.
PLOT:
A widowed father of seven children is suddenly pulled back into the savagery
of battle when his family is threatened by the American Revolution. With his
oldest son by his side, the father reluctantly joins the fight against the
British Redcoats and hopes to bring about the freedom of their nation.
CRITIQUE:
A slow-starting film, which presents an interesting story, some entertaining
battle sequences and a flawless representation of the times, ultimately
succeeds with an emotional connection to its characters, but not without its
sporadic lags. Surprised was I to find myself tearing up in some spots of
this movie, with numerous comfort moments needed for the Mrs. as well. In
fact, much unlike the GLADIATOR, this film manages to pack many moments of
emotion into its web of war, and further unlike the former epic, does so
without breaking any major ground with any of its battle sequences. Mind
you, the last 30 minutes of the film are definitely rock-solid, with an
all-out attack scenario sure to have most glued to their seats. But the core
of the film is centered more around its characters, with Mel juggling the
state of his family, sins from his past and the brutality of war, while his
son, the effective Heath Ledger, rides along with his idealistic
deliberations of honor and pursuit of justice. I liked the people in this
film, they seemed real to me and I ultimately cared about what happened to
each and every one of them.
Having said that, the film did begin to spread its emotions a little too
thin at some point, at which I wondered whether or not it would be able to
maintain an even balance with the film's action. But it did indeed, with
various small but carefully orchestrated battles spreading their way along
to the major one in the end. I found a lot of this war unsettling, only
because I wasn't used to this face-to-face combat, with lines of folks just
standing in front of one another and firing away. Very strange. But
ultimately, the direction and feel of the film just won me over and
completely immersed was I in its time. And that's saying a lot, because I
personally am not a fan of period films. Gibson kicked arse in the lead,
with enough genuine pain, anguish, revenge and pure adrenaline pumping
through his performance to demand your attention. But the film is really
taken to another level with the aid of a tangible enemy, a villain who in
this case is played to a tee by Jason Isaacs, slashing and burning
everything in sight. A delicious part handled masterfully by the actor
transports us from a seat among the audience, to a willing contestant and
rooter for the home team. In the end, this is not a "fun" movie by any
stretch of the imagination. It's bloody as heck, legs are chopped off,
people get killed left and right, the struggle seems to go on forever, and
very few (but timely) moments of comedic relief ever break through. But in
the end, the sense of relief and unburden is all worth it, with the film's
best cinematic moments saved for its last precious half hour.
A long arduous journey which definitely won't fulfill all appetites
certainly does a good job of representing a frenetic time and place in
history, presenting us with several well-developed characters and offering
us a handful of exciting battle scenes. It might have benefited from a
little trim and definitely provided one too many bleak moments for my taste,
but all in all, a solid effort for everyone involved.

Title
Review for Next Best Thing, The (2000)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
I've heard some people blow this movie off as just another "Madonna" or "gay
is chique" flick, but obviously none of those people have seen this film,
which talks about love, touches upon romance and most importantly, speaks
about the acceptance of families which aren't the same as our own. In a
nutshell, this movie is an interesting, funny and emotional slice of life in
the new millennium.
PLOT:
A single, pretty girl who can't seem to find the "right guy" ends up
spending a drunken, sexual evening with her gay best friend (both agree that
it was a mistake), only to end up with a baby nine months later. The two
friends must then decide how they are going to raise the child, and
eventually have to deal with what will happen when either one of them finds
their real true love of their life.
CRITIQUE:
Funny, emotional, dramatic, goofy, preachy and open-minded all wrapped in
one, this movie is probably the best romantic "platonic" movie that I've
ever seen. Okay, before I move on, let's answer the question that everyone
reading this review wants to know...yes, Madonna is pretty good in the
movie! Can I go on now? Thank you. I liked this movie mostly because it
actually rung original despite already having seen a few similarly themed
"gay/straight friends liking each other" movies over the past few years. I
think that the leads might've had something to do with that, since Madonna
and Rupert Everett really seemed to love one another platonically in the
film, and it worked! Perhaps their true off-screen friendship benefited the
duo. Of course, you don't really want them screwing in the movie, but their
sincere charm as a couple, makes you want to see everything work out in the
end. And boy, do things ever get sticky!
For a movie that does a good job of balancing the humor and drama for the
first hour or so, prepare yourself for some tissue-time in the last half
hour, when things get kinda rough. Of course, I don't like to admit that I
cry at films (although I will admit to crying as I watched the horror that
was HANGING UP (3/10) a few weeks ago), this movie strung a nice, emotional
tale to which everyone should be able to relate. In fact, the film has more
to do with friendship, love and the acceptance of people's differences, than
it does homosexuality. Don't get me wrong, the film obviously uses this
reality as its basis of narrative, but in the end, the film succeeds in
offering us a funny, emotional look at an atypical, or typical if you will,
American family, in all its glory! Madonna is actually pretty good in it,
and totally believable as a yoga teacher (that was probably her idea :), as
is Rupert Everett, who may want to begin branching out after another great
gay, friend role, since I'm guessing that there is a ceiling for such roles.
I will admit that I didn't truly buy into a couple of scenes that had
Madonna crying, but overall, she certainly did a great job of having me
appreciate her as this adorable, lonely girl just looking for the right guy
(as opposed to the real "Madonna" that she is). And let's not forget
Benjamin Bratt, who also looks great in this film (you go, Julia!) and
delivers his scenes with charm. And even more importantly, what about the
bodies on these guys, eh? I mean, is it just me, or were Rupert and Ben
competing for the best six-packs here? Wow. I am Jack impressed.
All in all, a very good movie that does a decent job of balancing its humor,
its drama, its love and its romance. Go in, enjoy it and if you're one to
shed a tear or two every now and then, I suggest you bring some tissues. Now
allow me to go put on some "Frank".
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Madonna's full name is Madonna Louise Veronica Ciccone. She recently dropped
out of the lead role for the 1999 movie MUSIC OF MY HEART, a part which
eventually went to Meryl Streep and nabbed her another Oscar nomination.
Rupert Everett is gay in real life and has twice been nominated for a Golden
Globe award. The first one was for his supporting role in MY BEST FRIEND'S
WEDDING, and the more recent one was for his performance in AN IDEAL HUSBAND
(7.5/10).
Benjamin Bratt is probably best known of late as being Julia Roberts' better
half, but he's been in the biz since around 1988. His mom is a Peruvian
Indian from Lima, but he grew up in San Francisco.
Actor Michael Vartan was born in Normandie, France and speaks both English
and French fluently. He began his professional movie career in French films,
his first was called "Un Homme et deux Femmes" (One man and two women). He
also turned down a role in SCREAM 3 (7.5/10) because he wanted to take his
career in a different direction.
Director John Schlesinger was born in London, England and is probably best
remembered as the director of the 1969 film MIDNIGHT COWBOY, which earned
him an Academy Award for Best Director.
Neil Patrick Harris also plays a gay man in this movie. Doogie Howser, M.D.
'Nuff said.
Screenwriter Tom Ropelewski was last credited as writer/director of the film
LOOK WHO'S TALKING NOW.
This working title for this film was THE RED CURTAIN.

Title
Review for Center Stage (2000/I)
For more reviews and movie wallpapers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Okay, okay...so I was dragged kicking and screaming to this film by none
other than the dance-freak herself, Mrs. JoBlo. I suppose that it serves me
right for having her sit through GOODFELLAS every other two weeks. But I
always like to be honest in my reviews, so it's only fair that you know that
I don't like ballet, don't like opera or theatre, and certainly don't like
to dance (although I don't mind a little slam-dance every now and then). All
this to say that despite my obvious distaste for most of this film's themes,
I actually enjoyed this frothy little pic.
PLOT:
A bunch of dedicated ballet-dancing teenagers must vie for a handful of
openings at the prestigious American Ballet Company. Competition, jealousy,
hard work and love all find their way into the story.
CRITIQUE:
Despite its unoriginal theme, this film actually managed to keep me somewhat
entertained with its light drama, light humor and inspirational message for
the kids. In fact, one of the main things that I liked about this movie was
how it was so different than all of the other "cooler" teen flicks which
pack our multiplexes every other weekend. These teenagers actually seemed to
have ambitions, goals, passions for a career, as opposed to the sorry sack
of sex-starved teens which usually line these films. Mind you, there's
definitely a place for those boogers as well, in fact, I enjoy a good time
as much as the next guy, but it was still nice to see some kids actually
trying to make something of themselves. Refreshing, really. The film also
featured many great dancing moments, as you would expect, and despite it
being ballet-dancing, which I admit to despising personally, I still managed
to remain quite interested, if only because of the superior technique
utilized so masterfully by these boys and girls. But when you consider that
this film is aimed primarily at teenage girls, it doesn't really make sense
to read reviews of the movie coming from 50-year old men, who will more than
likely, not appreciate the film on the same level as its intended audience.
I personally thought that the film was okay overall (and I still haven't hit
the big 30, people!), despite a couple of so-so actors, and a few lines
which were just horribly trite, I did appreciate the film's integral message
of persistence, hard work and truth to oneself. Many older generation folks
have probably seen this theme developed better in a handful of other films,
including FAME, the obvious comparison point. But on its own, this film
moves along at a quick pace, offers an endearing performance from its star,
Amanda Schull, and ultimately managed to keep an ol' foggie like me involved
for most of its run-time, so all in all, not too shabby. Of course, I could
have done without the obvious attempt at "connecting" with the younger
audience, with the final ballet show featuring a corny "modern-ballet"
motif, but then again, I'm not exactly a teenage girl (anymore, that is :),
so who knows how that will play to its target audience.
So see this movie if you like ballet, need some teenage inspiration, or
honestly just like to see boys and girls skip around in tights, or skip the
movie altogether, if you're looking for something revolutionary or truly
insightful.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Casting this film was one of the director's most difficult tasks. Not only
did the players have to be able to perform classical ballet, modern jazz,
Broadway dancing and salsa, but obviously, they also needed to know how to
act!
The role of Cooper Nielson was given to 26-year old American Ballet Theatre
superstar Ethan Stiefel, who already has a reputation as one of the greatest
male dancers in the world today. The filmmakers also incorporated some parts
of Ethan's own life into the movie, like the fact that he rides a
Harley-Davidson motorcycle.
The lead role of Jody was much more difficult to cast. In fact, the director
traveled to several cities all over the country, in order to find a dancer
to play the part. He auditioned hundreds of young girls, but finally decided
on Amanda Schull, who had just been accepted as an apprentice with the San
Francisco Ballet. She celebrated her 21st birthday during the production of
the film.
Sascha Radetsky, a dancer in the corps de ballet of American Ballet theatre,
originally read for the role of Sergei, the Russian boy, but ultimately got
the role of Charlie, the boy who falls in love with Jody.
The role of Sergei, the young Russian ballet student, was eventually cast
with Ilia Kulik, a young Russian ice skater who took home a gold medal in
the 1998 Olympics, and who makes his acting debut in this film.
Two "actors" who were actually cast in this film include Susan May Pratt,
most recently of 10 THINGS I HATE ABOUT YOU, who plays the part of Maureen,
and Eion Bailey, from FIGHT CLUB, who plays her boyfriend Jim in the movie.
This film was originally titled CITY BALLET and THE DANCE MOVIE.

Title
Review for Star Wars: Episode I - The Phantom Menace (1999)
For more reviews and movie quizzes, visit http://www.joblo.com/
I am not a Star Wars fanatic, but I do love the Star Wars movies, and own
the first three in my personal collection (A little background on the critic
always helps...). This first episode of the Star Wars films goes back 30-odd
years before the first movie took place, and uncovers the origins of many of
the films' biggest attractions, with an emphasized focus on the young Anakin
Skywalker, later known simply as Darth Vader.
PLOT:
Suffice it to say that there is plenty of turmoil in the galaxy, and Queen
Amidala needs the protection of two Jedis in an attempt to save her people
from further suffering. Along their route, the Jedis pick up a bizarre
creature who helps them out (sort of), and a young boy, who carries within
him a very strong kinship to the Force.
CRITIQUE:
A visual feast. This movie is a perfect example of why the word "eye-candy"
was invented. More enjoyable than THE RETURN OF THE JEDI, but not as
interesting as THE EMPIRE STRIKES BACK or STAR WARS, this film smashes all
previous science-fiction flicks and their claim to futuristic authenticity
with a flawless display of humans, robots, droids and every other kind of
freakazoid in the universe, meched into a wonderful world of special effect
wizardry of a society living in a galaxy far, far away...a long, long time
ago. Every scene contains plenty of beautiful and impeccably integrated
pieces of an artificial world made real by the genius of a man named George
Lucas. This film is a joy to watch and a wonder to inhabit.
Having said that, I found the story line confusing, a little slow in the
midsection, and ultimately boring. I won't numb you with the details of the
plot, but the bottom line is that there are bad guys, and there are good
guys. The Trade Federation, chancellors, blockades, I could do without. Not
very interesting. That being said, there is always something fantastic to
keep your eyes on at all times, so boredom was never really a big issue with
me. I also enjoyed the whole "getting to know" your characters information,
with plenty of background info on most of the prime members of the Star Wars
universe, and some fun cameos as well. The actors also kept up their end of
the bargain with Liam Neeson excellent as the main Jedi Knight, and Natalie
Portman pulling off a solid Queen. The little kid was also pretty good, but
Sam Jackson distracting, due mostly to his enormous presence.
My favorite new character was without a doubt Darth Maul who seemed to ooze
evil and had some cool light-sabering scenes with the Jedis. Too bad they
decided to use him in very little of the film. I also dug on young Anakin's
boss early on in the film, who is a perfect example of a CGI-created
character, who was fun to watch, and not overdone. On the other hand, my
least favorite new character is one that has seemed to rub many adults the
wrong way, and that is Jar-Jar Binks, the CGI-generated creature, which
annoyed me mostly because I didn't understand 3/4 of the things that he was
babbling about. Anyway, enough about him has been said already.
All in all, the film managed to enrapture me in its web of fantasy and space
adventure, strapping me in with its impeccable array of computer-generated
characters, holding me down with its great action scenes and interesting
background info, and blasting me off and into its exquisitely created
universe of special effect magic, majestic palaces and quaint villages, and
visually stunning characters.
Note: Forget the hype, forget this review, cleanse your mind. Just remember
that this is just a movie, so go stand in line and buy yourself some nachos
and Coke, sit your ass down and enjoy the visual story as it floats past
your eyes.
Little Known Facts about the movie and its stars: (courtesy of the IMDb)
George Lucas reportedly wrote this film in the same binder of yellow ruled
paper in which he wrote the original STAR WARS, and apparently financed this
$110-million film entirely out of his own personal stash. The character of
JarJar Binks was named by George Lucas' son, Jett.
During filming Ewan McGregor made lightsaber noises as he dueled. It was
noted and corrected during filmmaking. McGregor is the real-life nephew of
Denis Lawson, who played Rebel pilot Wedge Antilles in the original STAR
WARS.
In 1997, a fierce sandstorm destroyed several of the Tatooine sets in the
desert ouside of Tozeur, Tunisia. Filming resumed two days later. Director
George Lucas considered this a good omen, as the very same thing had
happened during filming of the original STAR WARS in 1977.
Natalie Portman re-dubbed nearly all of her lines after filming was
completed. Lucas' reasoning was that her voice has changed mildly during
filming and there was bad background noise during several of her other
scenes. Her Queen Amidala's throne-room dress took eight weeks to design.
During the first week of the first trailer's release, many theatres reported
up to 75% of their audiences paying full price for a movie, then walking out
after the Star Wars: Episode I trailer was shown.

Title
Review for Man on the Moon (1999)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Are you sick of hearing about hoooow much Jim Carrey acts like Andy Kaufman
in this movie?! Are you sick of all the comparisons, the praises, the
highbrow kudos? Well, I am, and God knows he is really good in this movie,
but lest we all forget what Jim Carrey does for a profession. He is an
actor. It is his job to act. The fact that he does it so well in this film
is really great and all, but why isn't anyone talking about the actual film?
Helllloooo? Is it good? Is it entertaining? Does it have something to say?
Well...allow me.
PLOT:
Based on the real life of comedian/singer/bongo drummer Andy Kaufman, this
film takes us through the early part of his career in Hollywood, his sudden
rise to fame on TV's "Taxi", his manufactured multiple personalities and all
the goofy stuff in between.
CRITIQUE:
This film wasn't really all that funny, wasn't really all that interesting
and wasn't really all that dramatic. In fact, if it wasn't for Jim Carrey's
strong showing as the lead character of Kaufman, I doubt I would even
recommend this film to anyone who didn't really care or know this man named
Andy. I personally knew very little about the man before this film, other
than his Latka performances on "Taxi", but I had the impression that he was
weird, controversial and kinda "out there". After this film, I know much
more about his performances (In fact, I think I know ALL of them, since it
felt like every one of his acts was basically played out on the big screen),
but little more about the man himself. In fact, all it did was confirm the
fact that he was weird, controversial and kinda "out there". Did it address
the man's upbringing, formative or high school years to get some kind of
feel as to why he may have acted the way he did? Nope. In fact, besides
admiring the man for his raw courage and debatable talent, I found very
little of significant value in this film.
Some might enjoy Carrey's (Kaufman's) routines in the movie, but I
personally didn't care much for most of them. Sure he was over-the-top,
loud, different and obnoxious, but is that supposed to be entertaining?
Well, I suppose it would be to some (Admittedly, Howard Stern is cut from
the same fabric and I do dig him...), but considering that this film is
little more than a showpiece for many of Kaufman's goofy shticks, I think
that you actually have to enjoy many of them to truly appreciate the movie
as a whole. And if you are thinking of seeing this movie because of the
Courtney Love "romance" factor, stop dead in your tracks right now, cause
this has got to be one of the weakest "love affairs" ever put to film. In
fact, why was she even in the movie? She didn't appear to make one iota of
difference in the man's life one way or the other. Anyway, if it feels as
though I'm complaining too much, you're probably right, but it's Christmas
time dammit, and I haven't even begun my stinky shopping!
Harumph...but with that bit of ugliness aside, I would recommend this film
on video to most who are interested in seeing how some people in showbiz get
started and how one goofy, really strange man made something of himself. On
the big screen, it really isn't worth it, unless you truly like the Jim
Carrey, who should definitely get an Oscar nod for his performance, or just
want to see Andy's performances all over again. Oh and by the way, when I
say that Carrey was excellent in his role as Andy, I don't pretend to know
whether or not he was EXACTLY like the man himself (I didn't know Andy
much). But what I am saying is that by the end of the movie, I no longer saw
Jim Carrey playing a part...I saw a person named Andy. And that, to any
actor, should be the highest praise indeed.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
According to good buddy Bob Zmuda's recent book about Andy entitled "Andy
Kaufman Revealed! Best Friend Tells All", Andy was "so in love with
prostitutes - he admired their "purity" - that if he'd been female he would
have wanted to be one himself." As it was, he had to settle with being a
one-man orgy at the notorious Mustang Ranch brothel in Reno. In fact, in
1979 he was in Reno for a week of shows and decided to have sex with every
prostitute at the brothel. Not only did he bed six hookers per day, he paid
$100 per prostitute - twice the going rate. By the end of the week, writes
Zmuda, his friend was sore from all the activity. He did also like to keep
in touch with many of the Mustangers and would, on occasion, fly one of them
out to stay with him in Laurel Canyon for a few days at a time.
Besides the numerous real life cameos by stars from TV's "Taxi", David
Letterman and Lorne Michaels playing themselves, it's interesting to note
the small role by Norm McDonald in one particularly awkward scene, and the
real Bob Zmuda as an angry man in another.
According to Jim Carrey, he and his-then wife, Melissa, were in attendance
the night of Andy's last big show at the Carnegie Hall. Melissa also has a
small role in this film as the waitress in the Comedy Store.
The IMDb reports that the title of the film is a reference to an R.E.M. song
about the late comedian, and that director Forman could not decide between
Edward Norton (who was reportedly dating the overrated Courtney Love at the
time) and Jim Carrey for the lead role. He eventually left it up to the
studio, and they obviously went with the more bankable Carrey.
And for all you who believe in the superstitious fodder, please note that
both Jim and Andy were born on the same date of January 17 (though 13 years
apart), and while on the set of this film, Jim apparently suffered the a
similar minor neck injury while filming a scene with the same professional
wrestler who once put Andy in a neck brace (Jerry Lawler, who incidentally
plays himself in this film).

Title
Review for Cast Away (2000)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
It's a shame that the movie studios had to give away this film's ending in
the trailer. An utter shame. I would have liked to been surprised by what
happened. I would have wanted to go in knowing as little as possible about
the circumstances surrounding the end of this movie, but nooooo, they
wouldn't hear of it. Ugh, I hate when studios mess up my movie experience
like that. Oh well, all the same, I still went to see this movie hoping to
enjoy it, even with the knowledge about its conclusion. I hope that anyone
who goes to see this movie knows as little as possible about the film. It
would be to your advantage. Trust me.
PLOT:
A man consumed by time in his own day-to-day life gets into a major plane
crash, leaving him stranded alone on an island. The movie basically follows
his journey as he attempts to survive and escape the lonely clutches of
island life.
CRITIQUE:
Can a movie that spends about 80% of its runtime alone on an island with one
man actually not be boring? You bet. Especially when it manages to make you
feel as though you are stuck on that very island with him. Here we have a
movie that does not play by the rules of Hollywood. There are no major
sweeping scores or soundtracks. There are no cute supporting players, or
breakout performances by the latest ingenues coming out of Tinseltown. This
film puts you through one of the most authentic plane crashes ever witnessed
on the big screen, and then just as effectively, strands you on an island
with a man just like any other. The journey you take with that person is an
interesting one, and one that held my attention throughout. I honestly
expected to be bored at some point. I was waiting for the whole stint on the
island to weigh down on me or for me to begin counting the number of people
in my theatre, but I thoroughly enjoyed the premise of this film and the
gradual manner in which they allowed its story to build. The film is also
loaded with ironies, of which I am a big fan. But with any film such as
this, chances are that not everyone will be a fan. There is obviously very
little dialogue in the movie, and you're basically living day-by-day with
Tom Hanks, so if he or his predicament doesn't interest you, you're not
likely to care much about any of the film. But it worked just dandy for me.
It's just too bad that I knew how it was gonna end up because of the crappy
trailer that the studios put together (read my complete tirade above),
otherwise the story might've held some suspense in it for me as well.
On the downside, I didn't really get too emotional about the movie. Hanks'
character was interesting to watch, mesmerizing to follow and fulfilling to
witness growing, but I didn't feel much for him, or anyone, at the end of
the movie. Was I supposed to? I think so. I think the story is supposed to
show us how we really don't take the time to appreciate the little things in
our lives, and even though the film does give you a real sense of that, the
relationship element didn't really gel for me. Having said that, the film
still comes through as one of the more original movies of the year, and the
direction by Zemeckis is top-notch. See the movie for its realistic
portrayal of life alone on an island, the terrifying plane crash, the
various adventurous escape attempts by Hanks and even for his performance,
which despite being mostly non-verbal, comes through once again. BTW, the
FedEx company should be nominated for Best Supporting Actor in this film.
Wow. Has there ever been a product placement used so entirely as part of a
movie? Incredible.

Title
Review for Ice Storm, The (1997)
For more reviews and movie trivia, visit http://www.joblo.com/
PLOT:
Story of two families living in Connecticut in the 1970s. The unemotional
husband and wife duos don't seem to have much spark left in their marriage,
like to drink and cheat. This improper umbilical cord introduces their kids
to the wonderfully insecure world of their adolescence without much moral or
parental guidance. Adults only, please.
CRITIQUE:
Interesting at times, boring at others, this character study semi-succeeds
in portraying a couple of dysfunctional nuclear clans, with solid
performances by all of its stars, especially the kids, despite its
occasional overly existential moments. Everyone in this movie is quite cold
and distant, appreciated to an extent by all who have gone through some
downer periods in their own lives, but hard to swallow for those who look
for entertainment in films. In that sense, this film is not recommended to
those who are looking for fun and amusement, despite a couple of curiously
unserious scenes. This film is meant for the higher-browed people who enjoy
watching others bemoan their lifeless journeys, contemplate a sack of sins,
and live in complete dysfunction among one another (Woody Allen, eat your
heart out!). Depressed yet? No, check out this film!
The writing is very good, most of the characters well-drawn and the look of
the film, unique and appropriate. I did find the pacing to be a little too
slow for my own jive, and bothered by the TITANIC-esque annoying flutes
passing off as the score, but all in all, an interesting study of human
beings attempting to differentiate themselves from the kingdom of the
animals.


Title
Review for Snake Eyes (1998)
Brian DePalma returns to his directorial seat after his last commercial
outing in 1996 with Tom Cruise in MISSION IMPOSSIBLE (8/10). Last
summer, Brian, Nicolas Cage and Gary Sinise were the talk of my
hometown of Montreal, as they took over the sporting alma mater of the
Montreal Canadians, the Forum, for a period of three months over the
summer. Anybody who was anybody, including anybodies who weren't
anybody, got parts as extras on this set, including my brother and my
good friend The Arrow (Neither of whom can be clearly identified in the
finished product.)
PLOT:
Richie Santoro (Cage) is a crooked beat cop who works the dirty streets
of Atlantic City. His childhood friend Major Kevin Dunne (Sinise) has
moved on with his life, and now works as the right hand man of the US
Secretary of Defense. The night is "fight night" in Atlantic City, with
everyone in the crowd, and a raging hurricane gasping outside. During
the boxing match, the Secretary of Defense gets shot in the neck by a
sniper. Santoro becomes the investigating cop of the shooting, as
evidence of a conspiracy to kill the man comes to light. The mystery
behind the shooting is the focus of the rest of the film.  
CRITIQUE:
Highly stylized, extremely talkative, generally actionless, and lightly
entertaining mystery from the man who has made pick-pocketing from one
of the greatest directors of all time, Alfred Hitchcock, part of his
own legend. This film does not maintain many moments of extreme thrills
or surprises. It does put together a decent mystery plot by way of
flashbacks (Written by David Koepp, the man who also penned MISSION
IMPOSSIBLE, the two JURASSIC PARK's and DePalma's CARLITO'S WAY
(7.5/10)), with some typically slick styling from DePalma, all the
while running in real time, but the overall framework of the film
leaves little to get excited about. The montage used during the final
credit crawl is also one of the worst and most boring of all time. 
Nicolas Cage does a decent job of over-acting his over the top
character here, and so does Sinise as the ambiguous friend from the
day. Juliette Binoche look-alike Carla Gugina from TV's "Spin City"
also turns in a fitting performance as the girl in distress. I must
admit that my recent viewing of THE NEGOTIATOR (7/10) might've set my
standards for thrills a little higher for this one, but either way,
this movie's plot does little to innovate the genre, while continuing
to homage the genre that made DePalma who he is today.
Admittedly, I was impressed with another one of DePalma's classic
one-shot-camera opening sequences, this one lasting at least 20
minutes, and many of his other camera tricks, but overall, the movie
seemed flawed in its attempt to enrapture the audience's imagination,
and deliver on a solid ending. The parts after the official denouement
were actually some of the funniest scenes in the movie, while the final
scene just seemed like another Hollywood demand gone acknowledged. All
in all, I guess you should go see this film, if you really like
DePalma, his style and his mysteries (Or if you know somebody who may
have played an extra in the audience.) If not, you could easily wait
for the video version of this film, which will surely appetize your
visually demanding gut and fill any 100-minute gap that's needed in
your life. 
Little Known Facts: 
Originally, Al Pacino was slated to play the role of Major Kevin Dunne
(Now played by Gary Sinise.)
Nicolas Cage received a salary of US$16,000,000 for his role in this
movie.
Gary Sinise's character name in this film is Kevin Dunne. The main
boxing reporter's real-life name from this movie is Kevin Dunn (Brother
of famed Saturday Night Live alumnus Nora Dunn.)
Carla Gugino began a modeling career at the tender age of 15.
In 1976, Gary Sinise co-founded Chicago's Steppenwolf Theatre with his
friend, and fellow Oscar nominated actor, John Malkovich.
Brian DePalma's middle name is Russell. He is the son of a surgeon, and
once directed Bruce Springsteen's "Dancing In The Dark" music video.

Title
Review for Six Days Seven Nights (1998)
For more reviews and movie trivia, go to http://surf.to/joblo/
>From the man who brought us GHOSTBUSTERS and TWINS, comes a story
starring Han Solo, Harrison Ford, and the woman presently dating TV
star Ellen DeGeneres, Anne Heche. Director Ivan Reitman straps himself
behind the camera for this fuzzy piece of ROMANCING THE STONE
(7.5/10)-lite.
PLOT:
Loving, romantic man takes his lady of choice to an exotic island for
some time alone together. While there, she gets called away on
business, and is taken to Tahiti, by a carefree and wayward pilot.
During a storm, their plane gets hit by lightning and crashes onto an
unknown island. Stuck with one another, the duo attempt to find a way
back to civilization, and gradually get to know each other better.
CRITIQUE:
Mindless fluff piece does not pass itself off as anything more than a
simple 95-minute exercise in mild comedy, overly precise romance,
decent chemistry and a non-threatening adventure. I enjoyed this movie
on the whole because I was able to rest my brain for a quick little
while, and allow myself to follow the misadventures of two charming
actors, whose fate never seemed like much of a mystery to me. The film
was easy to digest, well enough to enjoy along a round of tasty hot
nachos, and perfectly paced as to never allow you to fully grasp the
generic nature of its essence.
Kudos go out to both Harrison Ford and Anne Heche, who luckily for the
audience, seem to have sparked off a few rays of charm into their
characters. The opposite can be said of David Schwimmer, who still
cannot seem to play anything but that dolt-headed puppy-eyed love
schmuck from his hit TV show "Friends". That aside, I was impressed by
his character's real struggle over extra-curricular sexual activities,
and the actual conscience that he displayed in its aftermath. Unlike
many men in other movies, this character showed us that a man isn't
always ready to jump into bed with a chesty knockout at a drop of a
dime, but that morals, ethics and one's conscience always play a
revolving part in any such decision.
Overall, the film doesn't have many standout scenes to write home
about, but does offer some beautiful shots of the island's panoramic
possessions, along with some engaging performances by its leads. You'll
laugh, you'll sigh, you won't fall asleep and you'll forget about the
whole thing in the morning. If these are some of the elements that you
are looking for in a short film mixed in with a little adventure, then
this one's your bag o' nuts! If not, skip this, and your life will
forever be the same for having missed it. 
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Perhaps the most fateful casting of Harrison Ford's career was for a
role that he very nearly passed up. A promising young director named
George Lucas offered him a supporting part in his film AMERICAN
GRAFFITI (7/10), but Ford walked off the set in disgust when he learned
that he would be paid only $485 a week, less than half what he was
earning at that time as a carpenter. Luckily, he changed his mind when
the studio offered him an extra fifteen dollars a week. He also got the
part of Indiana Jones in RAIDERS OF THE LOST ARK (8/10), after
Spielberg and Lucas could not schedule filming of the movie around
their first choice's TV schedule, as Tom Selleck had a commitment to
his hit TV show "Magnum P.I.".
Harrison's wife is a screenwriter in her own right, and counts E.T.
(8/10) and Martin Scorsese's KUNDUN among her handful of credits. In
fact, in 1996, Harrison was listed as one of 50 people barred from
entering Tibet, after Disney clashed with Chinese officials over the
film KUNDUN, which his wife wrote.
Anne Heche's father, Donald Heche, was a choir director in a Baptist
church who frequented gay bars at night. Heche found out about her
father's double life at the age of twelve, as he lay dying of AIDS. "I
watched my dad disintegrate from AIDS because he was ashamed to be what
he wanted to be," Heche relates. He died the following year. In 1991,
she won a Daytime Emmy for playing Outstanding Younger Actress in a
Daytime Drama Series for TV's "Another World".
Actress Jacqueline Obradors, who plays the playful Angelica in this
film, was discovered by a producer while she was working as a grocery
store clerk.
Director Ivan Reitman was born in Czechoslovakia, but brought up in
Canada.
David Schwimmer graduated from Northwestern University. His mother is a
lawyer who took care of Roseanne's first divorce.

Title
Review for Wedding Planner, The (2001)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
PLOT:
A very pretty, but lonely, wedding planner unknowingly falls for a guy whose
wedding she is planning. As the wedding day approaches, she and the
groom-to-be spend more and more time together, and then...well, I think we
could pretty much all guess the rest, eh?
CRITIQUE:
Whose opinion do you think is more important for this type of movie? Me or
my girlfriend's? Well, as it turns out, she and I had diametrically opposed
opinions about this movie, so let's try this experiment and play the ol' "he
said, she said" game:
HE SAID:
Jennifer Lopez looked really beautiful in this movie. Matthew McConaughey
also looked mighty handsome. But put all that beauty aside and whadda you
got? Jack all! In fact, here's yet another example of a movie that blows
away its entire story in one 30-second trailer. Trust me...if you've seen
the trailer, you've seen the movie, folks! Sure, there are a couple of
"Jennifer acting cute" moments and the dcor nice to look at, but the film
as a whole is just too hollow, predictable, fluffy and tired. In fact, I'm
personally starting to get really tired of watching these 1-2-3 romantic
comedies. And oh yeah, I think I forgot to mention corny. I don't know,
maybe I just don't "get" this kind of movie since many people in our
audience seemed to be enjoying themselves. But try as I might, I just could
not see past this film's obvious story line, I'm talking from scene one to
scene last, lack of chemistry between the leads, crappy dialogue and phony
baloney "family" moments. Blech! I just didn't buy any of it!
The whole thing just smelled like a "vehicle" for a couple of movie stars
looking for a "romantic comedy" project. Even the so-called "comic relief"
Italian boyfriend in this movie did nothing but annoy me with his accent.
And was Alex Rocco really trying to sound Italian, too? Boy-oh-boy. But I
could sometimes even forgive predictability when the film as a whole is able
to entertain, or at least make me laugh, but even there, this film came up
very, very short. It was just so damn ho-hum! I mean, did you read the plot
breakdown up there? Lopez and McConaughey basically just walk around trying
to find stuff for his wedding the whole time...walk here, walk there, talk
about this inconsequential something, talk about that inconsequential
something. And why was it that this sexy, gorgeous, sensitive, loving, smart
businesswoman didn't have a boyfriend in the first place, you may ask? God
knows. I guess it made sense for the plot...but sadly, the plot doesn't
carry much weight in the real world. Ugh. See this movie if you liked any of
the other romantic comedies that I gave low scores to below. That would mean
that we don't see eye to eye on these types of movies and that this one
might appeal to you. And the missus' point of view...?
SHE SAID:
Well, she saw it all under a different light. She loved the whole look of
this movie, the flowers, the dresses, the clothes, the locales...all that
crap...uhhhm ,I mean, stuff! (Note to self: She might be trying to tell you
something, you commitment phobic dunce!). Anyway, she also bought into the
whole "will McConaughey and Lopez" end up together "mystery" (granted, she
hadn't seen the trailer) and thought that all of the characters were
believable and well-developed enough to care about (yup, she shed tears,
folks!). She also loved all of the romance sprinkled throughout the film
(the tango scene in particular) and really enjoyed the performance put forth
by the over-the-top Italian guy with the accent (natch!). Anyhoo, the one
thing that we did agree on was that the film didn't necessarily have many
humorous moments. Overall, not an original piece of work, but apparently fun
to watch (according to her). She scored it a 7/10.
Where's JoBlo coming from?
The Bachelor (5.5/10) - My Best Friend's Wedding (7/10) - Father of the
Bride (7/10) - Notting Hill (5.5/10) - The Wedding Singer (7/10) - What
Women Want (5/10) - You've Got Mail (5.5/10)

Title
Review for At First Sight (1999)
For more reviews and movie trivia, visit http://www.joblo.com
Take the man who produced GOODFELLAS (9/10), give him a story based in truth
written by Dr. Oliver Sacks (entitled "To see and not see"), the man
portrayed by Robin Williams in AWAKENINGS, slap in Quentin Tarantino's
ex-chum, Mira Sorvino, and one of the many Batmen we've had over the past
decade, Val Kilmer, and you've got yourself a perfect recipe for a romantic
melodrama, right? Well, not exactly, but somehow, the movie works!
PLOT:
Blind massage therapist falls in love with an architect from New York, and
vice-versa. She discovers an alternative surgery for him that would allow
him to regain his sight, which he lost at the age of one. Visual
transformation complete, the duo find themselves drifting apart as the
hardships of his newfound sight prove difficult. In the end, they must look
within themselves to figure out what they truly want out of life.
CRITIQUE:
Effective sappy film, runs slow at first, but eventually draws you in with
the solid performances by its leads, an interesting and truthful premise,
and its heartfelt epilogue, which teaches us never to lose sight of what is
most important to us. This is one of the few films that actually had me
buying the sap that it was preaching. It's longer than it should be, but it
does take the time to create a few believable characters, and develop a real
relationship between two people who truly want to be with one another. It
sure had me root-root-rooting for the home team! The cinematography of the
film was also real sweet, with New York in the winter months always looking
so fine. Add to that, the hockey references (I love hockey), a few cute
one-liners, and a couple of unexpected turns, and you've got yourself one of
the few recent romantic dramas to score.
The actors in this picture also made a big difference, with each one
bringing their own truth to their characters. Mira Sorvino was good, and not
overly tearful like the women from STEPMOM (6/10). Val Kilmer, who is
incidentally getting skankier by the picture, also came through as the blind
guy with the heart of gold. And guess who also makes an appearance? Remember
the flight instructor from 1986's TOP GUN (7/10)? That's right, Kelly
McGillis is back and she hasn't aged like the wine that is fine. She is also
very good as the older sister, who essentially raised Kilmer's character
from childhood. I think the relationship between the loving couple could
have used a little more spice, but other than that, this film did manage to
"gulp me up" during its money scenes, and in my book of colours, that's a
definite sign of an effective character drama.
All in all, a nice romantic tale to enjoy with your better half, especially
if you're in the doghouse, because this movie will surely bring out the
appreciation of the most important aspects of your relationship. It's a tad
slow and about twenty minutes too long, but it does manage to develop some
rich characters, around a fascinating premise, and dash in a couple of
romantic and enlightening moments all the while.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
This film is based on a real-life couple who are currently married and
living in Ohio.
It was during the week of this film's release, that actor Nathan Lane (real
name: Joe Lane), who plays the character of Dr. Phil Webster in this film,
"came out" in a publication of "The Advocate". For the first time, he
publicly announced that he was gay. He joins fellow actors Rupert Everett,
Nigel Hawthorne and Ian McKellen in that respect (among many other I am
sure.)
It was in January 1999, that Val Kilmer claimed that his old friend Kevin
Spacey, whom he studied with at Julliard, still owed Kilmer's father,
Eugene, $18,000, from a friendly loan that he took out from the latter, in
1979, in order for him to finish up his education at the prestigious acting
school. He never did finish his tutelage at the school, but did claim to
have paid pop Kilmer back $1000, which he claims was closer to the correct
amount of the loan. Kilmer claims that he will not speak to the actor until
his debt to his father is fully restored. Mind you, Kilmer's father passed
away in the early '90s, so he says that he's "gonna have to have Spacey pay
for the college education of my children." Oooh, what fun in Hollywood! Stay
tuned.
During the hockey game scene, you can clearly see the character of Austin
Powers, from AUSTIN POWERS: INTERNATIONAL MAN OF MYSTERY (7/10) on the giant
scoreboard over the ice.
Irwin Winkler is good friends with actor Robert DeNiro. DeNiro's daughter
Drena plays the character of Caroline in this film. Winkler produced ROCKY
(8/10), for which he won an Oscar,
This film was originally titled SIGHT UNSEEN.
When in Key West, Florida, be sure to stop by a restaurant named "Kelly's",
owned by the actress of the same name, Kelly McGillis.
The real Dr. Oliver Sacks also makes an appearance in this film as a doctor
at the news conference.

Title
Review for Vampires (1998)
For more reviews and trivia, go to http://surf.to/joblo
The major release this Halloween is this film based on the John
Steakley-penned novel Vampire$ starring the ever-intense James Woods,
and directed by the man who brought us real fright in THE THING (8/10)
and real fun in BIG TROUBLE IN LITTLE CHINA (7.5/10): John Carpenter.
PLOT:
Led by Jack Crow (Woods), a team of vampire-killers roam the United
States searching for and obliterating nests of vampires still wandering
the Earth. One day, they meet up with the Master of the vampires,
Valek, who is ready to move his nighttime gig into day. Crow, along
with his trusty companion Montoya (Baldwin), attempt to find and kill
the Master by telepathically connecting to him through some hooker whom
he once lovingly sunk his fangs into. Generous helpings of bloodsucking
and murders ensue. 
CRITIQUE:
Gory, bloody, well-timed, interesting modern tale about vampires
chomping their way into daylight, radiates some original theories, but
slows down in the middle, and winds up weak at the finish line. I loved
the first 20 minutes of this movie, which is pretty much what they've
been showing in the trailers up until now, but didn't care much for the
slower second act, and the over-the-top third. The confrontations with
the actual vampires are the most exciting part about this movie, along
with the great special effects and makeup. But halfway through this
movie, I did find myself counting the number of overdone close-ups of
the very ugly actor James Woods, and his overrated sunglasses.
Having said that, the ending did also contain some very cool fight
scenes, but the authenticity of the conclusion left something to be
desired. On the whole, the acting was good, with Woods playing an
excellent vampire-slayer, who's own father was once bit by a vampire
and tried to kill him. Daniel Baldwin, (the fatter, less talented
brother of Alec) actually came through as the tough side-kick who slaps
girls around (doesn't he always seem to play this role?), while Sheryl
Lee was pretty much wasted as the token whore who also generated
waaaaaay too many close-ups of her face as well. The master vampire,
Thomas Ian Griffith, played his part eloquently and left many a chill
in the audience's spine. The man was just a cool vampire!
Overall, the style of the film was very slick, as well as the John
Carpenter-based score, which had that whole Tex-Mex feel to it. The
special effects and the fighting sequences were also very bloody and
totally awesome, but I suppose the credibility of the last few scenes
could have been quite stronger. I would suggest this film to all
vampire, John Carpenter, and James Woods fans, because it does feature
some entertaining stuff from all three. On the other hand, if you're
sick and tired of vampire movies, or if you expect to find one
redeeming woman character in this entire script, look elsewhere,
because this blood-infested gore-ride is not here to win any political
points. Religious types might also want to stay away, unless they enjoy
the sight of priests and monks being slaughtered by the handful, and
the extreme verbal and physical abuse that the "good priest" in this
film receives. I personally took this film as it was presented to me, a
Halloween-released fun and bloody-carnage based movie, with lots of
killings, a little humour, and no real redeeming point.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
John Carpenter has also been credited on various pictures as Frank
Armitage, Johnny Carpenter, James T. Chance , John T. Chance, Edmond
Dants, Rip Haight and Martin Quatermass.
James Woods is alleged to have an IQ of 180. Scored a perfect 800 on
his verbal SATs and a 779 on the math section. He also fired his agent
for not telling him of Quentin Tarantino's offer to star as
Mr.Orange/Freddie in 1992's classic RESERVOIR DOGS (9/10). Looks like
he really IS smart!!!
John Carpenter is known to reuse character names from classic movies,
for example, his John T Chance pseudonym comes from the John Wayne
character name in RIO BRAVO, while Donald Pleasance's character name in
the original HALLOWEEN (6.5/10), Sam Loomis, is the name of Janet
Leigh's boyfriend from original PSYCHO (7/10).
Some fun trivia about John Carpenter includes the fact that he loves
Elvis and old cadillacs, is a major NBA fan and has a satellite dish
installed on his location trailer to keep up with the games, and always
has a portable basketball hoop on location. And of course, my personal
favorite is that his favorite meal of the day is breakfast - any time
of day (what a man!)
Director and writer of THE SHAWSHANK REDEMPTION (8/10), Frank Darabont,
has a cameo in this film as the "man with the Buick" who gets relieved
of his ownership duties by Baldwin's character.
Sheryl Lee is famous for being "Laura Palmer" from the cult-famed David
Lynch TV show "Twin Peaks", as well as the film version, TWIN PEAKS:
FIRE WALK WITH ME (4/10).
Producer Sandy King was script supervisor on at least three previous
Carpenter films including THEY LIVE (7.5/10), PRINCE OF DARKNESS and
BIG TROUBLE IN LITTLE CHINA (7.5/10), married John Carpenter in 1990,
and remains married to the director of this film to this day (She's
also known as Sandra Ann Carpenter.)
This film was originally known as VAMPIRE$. 

Title
Review for Bride of Chucky (1998)
For more reviews and trivia, go to http://surf.to/joblo
Chucky's never gonna die, and neither is this ongoing series of sequels
dedicated to the "good guy" toy from hell! Hong Kong director Ronny Yu
tackles this fourth part with stylish gusto, and adds an extra spice in
for effect: a bride for chucky, bien sur. Does Chucky really get lucky
in this one? You bet!!!
PLOT:
Chucky the killer doll is resurrected by his buxom ex-girlfriend Meg
because she believes that the spirit within Chucky, her real
ex-boyfriend mass murderer Charles Lee Ray, will come back to life and
marry her. Unfortunately for her, Chucky the wonder-knife has other
plans, and decides to bring her along as his rubber doll companion. The
slashing duo's plan is to retrieve an amulet that will allow their
spirits to rejoin physical human vehicles. Murder, mayhem and
all-around gruesomeness ensues.
CRITIQUE:
Entertaining, funny, campy sequel scores points for originality,
humour, great murder scenes, and the ever-loveable personality of
Chucky the psycho-doll! As sexist and rude as ever, Chucky steals every
scene in which he makes an appearance, with his beautifully psychotic
smile, and the addition of a handful of new murders to his rap sheet.
Just as cool is his sidekick Tiffany (with a splash of romance and
sensitivity tossed in), who actually manages to give white trash a good
name! The slick animatronics, the hip dialogue, the myriad of in-jokes
paying homage to other horror film contemporaries make this movie very
enjoyable, while allowing your brain to take the evening off for drinks
and a rest.
Not to mention the wonderful performance set forth by Jennifer's
Tilly's breasts who do a superb job of blending the character of the
film with the essence of her character. Her cans have done wonders
before, but this wonderful performance by her boobs is one to truly
cherish and consider "for your consideration". Her rack is sizeable,
luscious, delectable and plump in almost every scene, and manages to
portray every range of emotion from gregarity and jolliness to
melancholy and surprise. Her cleavage also makes an excellent showing,
and I'm not afraid to say this, almost brought me to tears in one
particular scene. 
Having said that, the
no-name-big-breasted-standard-horror-film-girlfriend was quite a
disappointment in my esteem, as was the
washboard-stomach-cardboard-cutout-boyfriend, who looked like a 32-year
old attempting to play a teenager (Perfectly cast for "Beverly Hills
90210"). The soundtrack was also extremely lame for a movie of its
revived genre, but the few Rob Zombie songs did manage to soothe my
musical hunger just a tad. All in all, this film is a good time at the
movie theatre for all those who want to see a movie about an evil
rubber doll who spews crude and foul remarks, the girl doll that loves
him, and the party of bloody bodies that get in their way. Warm up the
nachos, ice the Coke, take off your underwear, and prepare to have
yourself a brainless, good ol' time at the horror show!!! 
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
The first time that the full cinematic trailer for Gus Van Sant's
remake of PSYCHO was shown in the theatres was before this film.
Keep a close eye on the first scene, which offers a wink of the eye to
many of its horror sequel competitors, including Jason, Mike Myers and
Freddy Kreuger.
Screenwriter Don Mancini has a part in writing all four of the CHILD'S
PLAY films. He also co-executive produced this one.
This film was previously titled CHILD'S PLAY 4, CHILD'S PLAY 4: BRIDE
OF CHUCKY, CHUCKY and CHUCKY AND HIS BRIDE.
Brad Dourif did the voice of Chucky in all four CHILD'S PLAY films, and
also portrayed the original spirit of Chucky, mass murderer Charles Lee
Ray in the first film.

Title
Review for Astronaut's Wife, The (1999)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Johnny Depp is a great looking man. In fact, gun forced to my head, I would
absolutely "do the man" without any qualms, despite the fact that I do not
naturally swing that way. Charlize Theron...beautiful woman. Reminds me a
little of Mrs. JoBlo, as a matter of fact. Both pretty good actors in their
own right, with Depp certainly racking up a diverse repertoire of parts. Oh,
the movie, you say? Well, it's not good.
PLOT:
An astronaut loses contact with earth for two minutes while floating around
in space. Upon his return, his wife and others notice that he has become
somewhat "different". Over time, we begin to suspect that an
extraterrestrial may be inside the poor bastard.
CRITIQUE:
What can I say...this movie's trailer wins the annual award for "The Best
Trailer Giving Away Everything, And I Do Mean, Everything, That Is Going To
Happen In A Movie!" (With DOUBLE JEOPARDY finishing a close second!). It's
unfortunate because there may have been a couple of things that would have
surprised me otherwise, but I guess the marketing geniuses at New Line
Cinema figured that it would be more beneficial for people to know EXACTLY
what is going to happen in the film, without even seeing it!? Good move,
guys. That aside, the film is not a horrible watch, in fact Depp and Theron
certainly pull out some decent performances, with Depp hamming it up via his
Elvis accent, and the blonde streaks in his hair. Theron's role seemed
similar to her role in the much better DEVIL'S ADVOCATE (8/10) film, with
her deteriorating over time, and crying a lot. Having said that, she does it
very well, and she sure is nice to look at. The story of this film seemed
ambitious, but unfortunately for us, it basically goes nowhere. In fact,
count yourself lucky if you haven't seen the preview of this film, for you
will not have seen 95% of the movie like the rest of us.
The film itself plods along at a pretty slow pace, doesn't offer any real
tension or intrigue (Just a couple of "easy scare" scenes with people
popping out of nowhere), and is choked with plot holes. In fact, we never
really know why the extraterrestrial has come to earth, what his plans are,
or how Depp seems to show up every time that something that he doesn't like
is happening. The ending is also very stupid, with a twist which I
personally could have done without. And if you're grooving to see this movie
because of any special effects, forget about it right now, there are
probably more in DUDLEY DO-RIGHT. All in all, this movie is not a horrible
movie by any stretch of the imagination, but it's basically just "there". If
you like the two main actors, or love watching really great looking people
get paid millions of dollars to act on the big screen while you pay for
their kid's tuition, then by all means, go see this movie. Otherwise, wait
for it on video, sit around and watch it with your drunk friends, and have a
blast making fun of all the gaping holes in the script.
Either that, or try to figure out which of the two actors is the prettier?
Depp or Theron? Theron or Depp? Or try your luck at our Johnny Depp Movie
Trivia Quiz (http://www.joblo.com/youdontknowshiteaboutmovies21.htm). 
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Charlize Theron's mother killed her father with a gun one night, after he
got drunk and began abusing her again. The mother was charged, but received
not time in jail, after she was found to have been acting in "self-defense".
The father had apparently been an abusive husband for years on end. Charlize
was 10 years old at the time. He was French, she is of German heritage.
Charlize was born and grew up in South Africa, where she is now doing TV
promos against rape.
At the age of 18, Charlize's mom convinced her to go Los Angeles to try a
career in the movie industry. She came to LA without knowing anyone in the
city but after two weeks when she was standing in line on Hollywood
Boulevard an agent gave her his card. After eight months in LA, she got her
first part.
Johnny Depp has dated several young starlets in Hollywood including Winona
Ryder, Sherilyn Fenn,  Jennifer Grey (pre-nose operation which changed who
she was!), Kate Moss and actress/singer Vanessa Paradis from France. He most
recently sired a child from Paradis. It was a daughter whom they named
Lily-Rose Melody Depp. He likes to call himself "Mr. Stench".
Johnny's full name is John Christopher Depp III. He was born in Kentucky and
has been featured
on a rock album from the British band, Oasis. Depp played lead slide guitar
on the track, "Fade In-Out", after Oasis' own lead guitarist was too drunk
to perform it himself. Depp stepped in and nailed the lead on one take.
This is director Rand Radish's directorial film debut. He was known
previously as a writer, having written the screenplays for such films as
CANDYMAN 2: FAREWELL TO THE FLESH and THE MAKER.
The two twins in this film are played by Cole and Dylan Sprouse, the same
kids who played the one character of Julian in this summer's other comedy
BIG DADDY (7/10).
Actress Clea DuVall has no relation to great actor Robert Duvall. Her full
name is Clea Helen D'etienne DuVall.

Title
Review for Notting Hill (1999)
For more reviews and movie trivia, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Hmmm...let's see now. Julia Roberts was adorable in MY BEST FRIEND'S WEDDING
(7.5/10) and Hugh Grant was adorable in FOUR WEDDINGS AND A FUNERAL (8/10),
so let's slap 'em together in another romantic comedy written by the same
dude who wrote the latter film, and voila...another great hit! Well...maybe
next time.
PLOT:
Ordinary boy meets extraordinary girl (famous movie star). Boy introduces
girl to friends and family. Boy falls for girl, girl falls for boy. Boy
loses girl to another boy (another famous movie star). Boy sulks. Girl
(still the famous movie star) comes back to boy. Happy once again. Boy loses
girl again. Darn! Girl comes back to boy...etc, etc, etc...well, you get the
picture!
CRITIQUE:
Very interesting premise starring two charming leads, offers a few chuckles
here and there, an unconvincing romance, languid pacing and a lot of empty
scenes played out specifically for laughs, to the detriment of plot. Add
that to the ending of this film which goes overboard in my opinion, despite
offering us the only true moment of action in the entire bit, and a complete
lack of any real drama, and you've got yourself a ho-hum romantic comedy,
built around a fantasy dream to which we could probably all relate. In fact,
before seeing this film I thought that the premise of this film was a
diamond in the rough, but only if they managed to build something more
around it than just the simple "boy meets girl, boy loses girl, boy...".
After seeing this film, I'm afraid to report that there isn't much more in
there, folks.
Frankly, that would be fine if the actors in the film were convincing enough
in their roles, but I must say that I was far from convinced of anything
more than a simple novelty crush on a fidgety Englishman from the part of
Julia Roberts' character. And Hugh, well, every scene he was in basically
had him looking like a common Brit who was absolutely overwhelmed and in awe
of an American movie actress. Not in love with a woman. In awe of an
actress. I never FELT like either of these characters ever really cared for
one another as people, especially in the case of Hugh, who could not help
but look like a wounded puppy dog in every scene (blinking eyes and all),
whilst delivering some of the wittiest repartee this side of a
screenwriter's sharpest word processor. The supporting cast was pretty good,
but used strategically for laughs, and not much else. Admittedly, some of
the things that they were saying went right over my head (English accents
and all). Overall, a video rental at best, with a few grins here and around,
a fun and dreamy premise, but ultimately too repetitive, unconvincing and
just plain boring, to recommend with any enthusiasm.
Go rent WHEN HARRY MET SALLY (10/10) again, and thank me in the morning :)
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Hugh Grant received $1,000,000 for his role in this movie. Julia Roberts
received $15,000,000 for her role.
Julia Roberts turned down the female lead in SHAKESPEARE IN LOVE (5.5/10).
At the time, Daniel Day-Lewis was attached to co-star in the film opposite
her. She once tried out for a part on the TV soap "All My Children", but was
turned down. She is left-handed and stands 5'9". Bra size: 34B.
In 1995, Hugh Grant was arrested for lewd conduct after cops found him with
Divine Brown, a prostitute, in his car (She was apparently making on him,
like a monkey makes a banana). He pleaded no contest and got a $1,180 fine
and two years' probation. This is a man who graduated from Oxford
University.
Screenwriter Richard Curtis based the film in the backdrop of his own
residency, Notting Hill, a vibrant West London suburb. He is born in New
Zealand, and began writing comedy after leaving Oxford University in 1978.
He created the TV program "Mr. Bean" alongside Rowan Atkinson.

Title
Review for Pledge, The (2001)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
PLOT:
A life-long cop retires but not before a case about a murdered little girl
falls into his lap. After promising the little girl's mom that he will find
the killer, the man sets out to solve the mystery just as his retirement
comes to fruition.
CRITIQUE:
Other than re-iterating the well-known fact that "life sucks", I didn't
really get much out of this movie. Was it a mystery, was it an existential
drama about what life is like after an all-consuming career or was it simply
about giving Mickey Rourke a job? Who knows. One thing that I do know is
that it was definitely NOT an action movie, or your typical police thriller.
In fact, there was no action or thrills in this entire movie (don't let the
trailer fool ya!). This movie is more in the realm of "cinema" and the
art-house crowd. Not for your "everyman", that's fer sure. It's another
depressing, slow-paced cinematic effort with death as its major underlying
theme, by director Sean Penn, who seems to get off on films featuring a
protagonist who smokes like a chimney, drinks like a fish and looks real
cool in slo-mo shots. But I'm getting ahead of myself here. The movie
actually started off on a pretty nice footing. The whole
"cop-retiring-but-not-until-he-solves-that-one-last-case" thing was cool,
but unfortunately, the film takes a huge turn at about the one-third mark.
It almost seems to change into another movie altogether. It's too bad
because either one of the stories in this film might've been interesting on
their own, given their own scripts and direction, but the mix of the two
just doesn't click here.
The first story is a pretty standard murder mystery, while the other delves
deep inside the psyche of a man faced with his own futility at the dawn of
his retirement. Interesting enough on paper, but despite the film's engaging
set-up, the whole midsection of the movie is simply overloaded with
redundant scenes featuring bit parts by various actors, birds flying and a
whole lot of scenery, which ultimately all add up to very little in the end.
In fact, I remember turning to my friend at one point and remarking how
"nothing" had basically happened in the past 45 minutes. And when I say
"nothing", yeah sure, there is definitely stuff happening on the screen, but
the film simply wasn't progressing. At that point, I was hoping that the
film's conclusion would salvage some of its own misdirection, and add to the
solid outing by Jack Nicholson, perfectly underplaying his role, the
picturesque scenery and Penn's able, if not somewhat over-directed style,
but alas, t'was not to be. The ending did nothing to help me complete the
circle that was prepared by its lead character, and frankly left me quite
frustrated and unsatisfied. I think I understand what Penn and the writers
were trying to say with this ending, but God knows the film and its
anti-climactic conclusion, did very little to either entertain or enlighten
me either way. Montage after montage after montage after montage, all laced
in a pile of sad songs, a very thin mystery and plenty of useless one scene
cameos by "name" actors, mark this film as my first real disappointment of
the new year. Note my previous scores to related films below and see if you
and I are close in movie mindset.
Where's JoBlo coming from?
8MM (6/10) - As Good as it Gets (8/10) - Bone Collector (7.5/10) - Crossing
Guard (5/10) - Seven (10/10)

Title
Review for Zero Effect (1998)
Jake Kasdan, son of legendary screenwriter/director Lawrence Kasdan,
writes and directs his first picture entitled ZERO EFFECT at the tender
age of 23. 
PLOT:
The world's most "private" detective Daryl Zero is hired by a rich man
named Stark, to find his lost keys to a security box which contains
information that could be used against him, and to figure out the
identity of the person who is also blackmailing him. Zero's faithful
assistant, Arlo, acts as the middleman between the two men, since dick
Zero does not believe in meeting his clients. Let the unraveling begin.
CRITIQUE:
Quirky, original, but ultimately overlong and not so interesting tale
of the self-proclaimed "world's greatest private investigator." Bill
Pullman has never really excited me in any of his works (even my
favourite film of 1997, LOST HIGHWAY (8.5/10)), and continues to do his
humdrum work in this "trying to be hip" crime film, that never really
grabs a hold of anyone or anything. The film's premise is certainly
very cute, with the detective not wanting to meet any of his clients,
and being some sort of an acutely sensitive psycho-analyst who could
tell almost everything about a person after meeting them for only
thirty seconds. 
But ultimately, the film's plot and execution never really generate
enough drama, interest or zing to keep the film enjoyable at any level.
It seemed like a quirky film at times, a crime drama at others, and
ultimately degenerated into some half-assed romantic crime tale, which
didn't seem to know which end was up anymore. There were some original
points in the script, and even some clever moments about the detective,
his methods and motivations, but not enough to constitute anything
close to a successful movie.
Even Ben Stiller seemed wasted in his underplayed role of the assistant
who was torn between his love and his job. On top of everything, the
film packed it in a little under the two-hour mark, without justifying
at least thirty minutes of that lengthy total. In the end, I believe
that your enjoyment of this film will be strongly correlated to your
appreciation of the work of Bill Pullman, your desire to see
experimental films that may quirk your interest, and the unimportance
of the money that you are willing to invest in this video pick. If all
three traffic lights seem green to you, then please go ahead and watch
this movie and try to enjoy your time on board. If your interest is not
peaked by my guidelines, then I suggest you go out and rent the
ultimate hip, quirky, crime film: RESERVOIR DOGS (9/10), by Quentin
Tarantino, and have a blast! 
Little Known Facts: 
Bill Pullman made his big screen debut in the Danny DeVito / Bette
Midler comedy RUTHLESS PEOPLE (7.5/10) in 1986 and followed that with
two lead roles in SPACEBALLS (8/10) and THE SERPENT AND THE RAINBOW.
Pullman has a Master of Arts in theater studies, and while teaching at
Montana State University, one of his students was director John Dahl,
who subsequently gave him a role in his 1994 film THE LAST SEDUCTION
(7.5/10). 
Ryan O'Neal is the father of actress Tatum O'Neal, who was once married
to tennis great John McEnroe.

Title
Review for Where the Heart Is (2000)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, http://www.joblo.com/
This is the third Saturday night "sneak preview" that I've seen in the past
month, and the third "audience-friendly" flick of the bunch. Of course, it
only makes sense to preview movies which will most likely have the Jones'
recommending it to their co-workers come Monday morning water cooler time,
and such tactics certainly didn't hurt either KEEPING THE FAITH or RETURN TO
ME, which both received great word of mouth (also known as "free
advertising" in the marketing world). So will the masses enjoy this one?
Read on...
PLOT:
An uneducated Southern teen, abandoned by her mom, gets dumped once again,
this time by her dumbass boyfriend, at a local Wal-Mart, barefoot and
pregnant. The resourceful girl manages to live inside the market for about
six weeks, ends up delivering the baby at the store and must ultimately
learn to survive despite the cavalcade of obstacles which continue to be
thrown her way.
CRITIQUE:
The white-trash feel good hit of the year! Harumph...okay seriously,
although many will ultimately dismiss this film as the grand-daddy TV movie
of the week, I enjoyed much of it based solely on the excellent performances
put forth by five great actresses. Natalie Portman, leaving Queen Amidala in
the dust, with a subdued performance, just begging people to love her even
more than they do now. Ashley Judd, looking sexy without even trying, with a
great supporting role as the surrogate big sister to Portman, a woman who
probably needs more help than anyone in this film. Stockard Channing, Rizzo
to me always, with not a whole lot of time on the screen, but certainly a
lot of punch in her few moments. Joan Cusack, a woman who can't help but
deliver great performances one after the other, with another cool and funny
character, not as goofy as usual, but entertaining just the same. And Sally
Field, a woman who spends no more than five minutes in this film, with a
dead-on manifestation of the ultimate white-trash mommy dearest. And the men
you may ask?
Well, it's probably better if you didn't ask, since the world in which these
women live apparently doesn't provide for many decent men. That is, if you
don't count the old man who boinks Ms. Channing on the kitchen table every
now and again. Granted, the film certainly does play out like the ultimate
soap opera, but in the end, nothing really bored me. I had a few laughs here
and there, shed a couple of internal "guy-tears", yessiree-bobee, and golly
gee, who the heck wouldn't want to watch these two beautiful leading ladies
prance around the big screen all day long. I know I sure wouldn't mind. And
is it just me, or did Natalie Portman actually start looking like Ashley
Judd in a few choice scenes? But enough about that. In the end, most anyone
should be appreciative as to the sentiments which carry Portman's character
through the tough times, learning as she goes along and ultimately making
the best out of what she's been handed. It certainly is a triumph of the
spirit (am I quoting Oprah now?).
So piss on me all you want if you think I am recommending this film solely
on the extreme appeal of the actresses, but there are many reasons why some
movies work and others don't, and a lot of it has to do with the
performances. This one nails that door down shut, whilst also providing us
with a touch of humor, a touch of drama, and a touch of love. Of course, I
also thought Natalie Portman looked kinda sexy while she was preggers, but
that's a subject which only my psychiatrist can explain. Either way, I'm a
sick man but the film is still charming. You go, girl!
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Unsure about whether or not she wants to continue her career as an actress,
Natalie Portman is currently attending Harvard University full-time,
studying in psychology. According to her, she will not act in any other
films, besides the two Star Wars prequels, over the next four years, so that
she could concentrate on her studies. She once said that when she "got
older", she would like to be a doctor just like her father. Natalie was born
in Jerusalem, Israel, moved to the States at the age of 3, and uses her
grandmother's maiden name (Portman), to protect her privacy. She's also
fluent in French, Hebrew and Japanese. Boy-oh-boy...is there anything this
great girl can't do?! Wow.
In case you're like me and wondered where you'd seen the "nice guy" in this
movie before, the character of Forney played by James Frain, he recently
played Ben Affleck's good friend in REINDEER GAMES. Natalie Portman's
character is superstitious about the number 5 in this movie. In the novel on
which this movie is based, written by Billie Letts, the lead character is
actually superstitious of the number 7.
This is the directorial debut of Matt Williams. He is best known as the
co-creator of TV's "Roseanne" show and "Home Improvement".
This film was originally titled HOME IS WHERE THE HEART IS, which might've
been a better idea considering that Paul Newman's WHERE THE MONEY IS was
released just last week.

Title
Review for Very Bad Things (1998)
For more reviews and trivia, go to http://surf.to/joblo
Actor Peter Berg quietly tucks his thespian slippers under his bed for
a little while, and slips into a new role as writer and director of
this extremely black comedy starring everybody's favourite Jack
Nicholson-wannabee, Christian Slater, and the wonderfully cheery
Cameron Diaz.
PLOT:
Kyle and his friends go to Las Vegas for his bachelor party. They drink
like fish, snort a lot of cocaine and hire a hooker for some fun. When
the prostitute suddenly kicks the bucket, the boys have to resort to
plenty of sinful shenanigans to get out of their dilemma. One cover-up
leads to another, and all of a sudden, our friends are caught in a
downwards spiral of all things moral. Meanwhile, Kyle's wife Laura is
much more concerned with her wedding going off without a hitch, and the
guests having the padded chairs which she requested.
CRITIQUE:
Deeply disturbing, violently graphic, hilarious romp that chews into
every sick, twisted taboo that you'd ever think about, then goes one
step further, and then another step...and then one too many. This film
is one of the blackest of all the black comedies that I have ever seen!
It starts off with a good premise, and then gets darker and darker and
funnier and funnier, and then a little darker still. It pushes every
envelope that you thought would never be pushed, and succeeds in most
of what it is trying to do. These guys find themselves in an awful
predicament, and attempt to solve it by unsuspectingly placing
themselves in an ever worse predicament, and so on, and so forth. All
the while, the film laughs at itself, and the absurdity of every single
exaggerated situation that they find themselves in. Having said that,
please don't expect to find this story based in much reality, because
it does go overboard quite a bit, but that is its purpose.
The cast is great, with Slater playing one of his best roles in years
(Reminiscent of his psycho role in another great black comedy, HEATHERS
(8/10)), the rest of the boys also come through like gangbusters, and
Diaz plays the role of the ultimate wannabee bride convincingly. Berg's
camera technique is also well-handled, while the run time of the film
trickles in right before any indigestion. The only issue that I did
have with this movie was the fact that I did find myself rolling my
eyes about 3/4 of the way through, when some of the things just started
getting a little too much out of hand. Having said that, the ending was
ironically hilarious, and the overall audacity of the cast, and most of
all, Peter Berg was a sight to behold. This man must've been in some
kind of a funk when he wrote this crazy script because it is totally
"out there"! If you like to see movies that take things to the extreme,
then check this one out! If you like your standard, uncomplicated
Hollywood pictures, with your happy-go lucky couple and friends for
life, then forget this one, and go back and rent one of the eighteen
thousand romantic comedies out there.
Most of the humour in this film worked for me (and for most of my
friends, I might add), but admittedly, I have become accustomed to
overly-violent behaviour in films by now. If violence, murders and the
commitment of extremely immoral sins doesn't stir your darkened funny
cup, then forget that you ever heard about this film. This movie is
only for people who appreciate dark, dark humour under very bad,
horrible circumstances. But it's like I said, even I thought the
believability within this tent of black humour disappeared for a little
while, but all in all, the film worked for me as one of the year's most
original screenplays, and one of the most gruesome concepts to walk
down the cinematic aisle in a while. This is NOT for the faint of
heart, folks!
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
The policeman character in this film is named Officer Randone. That was
the name of the cop role that director Peter Berg himself portrayed in
1997's COPLAND (7/10).
The man who plays the Rabbi in this film is the actual father of actor
Jeremy Piven. His name is Byrne Piven. You may remember Jeremy Piven
from his role as comedy writer on TV's "The Larry Sanders Show."
Leland Orser played the crazed man in the massage parlour who was
forced to dick a prostitute with a sharp object acting as his probing
member, in the gritty David Fincher thriller SE7EN (8.5/10).
Actor Adam Sandler was slated to play the part of Michael Berkow, but
pulled out after a couple of days, and was subsequently replaced by
Jeremy Piven.
An obvious homage to Quentin Tarantino's RESERVOIR DOGS (9/10) features
the five guys walking in slow-motion towards the camera during their
quick run to the local store.
Christian Slater's real name is Christian Michael Leonard Hawkins. He
was born in New York, New York, and most recently spent 59 days in jail
for assaulting his girlfriend and a police officer as well as cocaine
abuse. In 1994, good-guy Christian was also arrested for bringing a gun
on a plane. He is a major Star Trek fan, and word on the street is that
his unusual eyebrows are the result of him shaving them when dressing
up as Spock for Halloween. They apparently never grew back in properly.
Cameron Diaz was signed on as a model at the Elite Modeling Agency at
the age of 16, after being discovered at a Hollywood party. Soon
thereafter, she got alcohol poisoning in Australia at the age of 18. It
took Cameron 12 callbacks to get her breakthrough role in THE MASK
(7/10), opposite Jim Carrey. She was also slated to star opposite
Christopher Lambert in MORTAL KOMBAT, but was forced to pull out after
she injured her hand before filming had begun. Her father is a
second-generation Cuban, and her mother is of German, English and
Native-American ancestry. 

Title
Review for Limbo (1999)
For more reviews and movie trivia, visit http://www.joblo.com/
PLOT:
A single mom songstress who's been moving from loser boyfriend to loser
boyfriend for years with her teenage daughter, meets a nice ex-fisherman in
Alaska, caught up in his own past demons. When the man's deadbeat
half-brother takes them all out for a boat ride, the film suddenly switches
gears, and turns into an all-out battle of self-discovery and survival.
CRITIQUE:
People will be divided on this film. On the one hand, it is a wonderfully
photographed picture set in a lush environment not often caught on film,
Alaska, with genuine performances from all of its main leads, interesting
characters and an ending that might have you appreciating its fresh
unconventionality. On the other hand, it's basically a movie featuring an
Alaskan fisherman who falls for an over-the-hill folkie singer with a messed
up daughter, that runs a little over 125 minutes, moves at a slow pace, and
might have many people screaming "foul" after its anti-Hollywood ending. I
personally reside somewhere in between these two views (I guess you could
say that I'm in "limbo" over my opinion....hehe....sorry, but I had to!),
with heavy kudos to Vanessa Martinez, who played the daughter, John Sayles
for executing an interesting character study inside an unexciting
environment (for me, at least), and the ending, which initially left me
feeling betrayed, but ultimately challenged me to think about the deeper
meaning of this film's message.
The actual goal of the film wasn't to tidy things up nice and cozy, it was
to present us with the lives of various characters interacting amongst one
another under different life experiences, motivations and vulnerabilities.
In the end, I felt as though many of their innermost fears had been
conquered and they were ready to take on the world/or disappear from it. If
you are the type of person who does not like films with open-ended finishes,
you will probably HATE this movie! I personally found it to be a little long
for my taste (I think they could have cut some parts of the daughter reading
endlessly out of the diary), a little boring in others, but overall, it
didn't dull me as much as I thought it would. The screenwriter and actors
should be commended for that, since it was their characters who sparked that
subtle interest within me. All in all, think character study meets THE EDGE
(7.5/10) with an ending that nobody can agree on.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
John Sayles has been nominated for an Oscar on two occasions for Best
Screenplay, one for PASSION FISH and the other for LONE STAR. He is also
well known to support himself as a Hollywood script doctor, and has written
numerous scripts for other directors including THE CHALLENGE for John
Frankenheimer and BREAKING IN for director Bill Forsyth.
Mary Elizabeth Mastrantonio made her big-screen debut in Martin Scorsese's
THE KING OF COMEDY (8/10) and followed that up with her infamous role of Al
Pacino's younger sister in SCARFACE (8.5/10). She also starred in a film
called THE JANUARY MAN, directed by her husband Pat O'Connor, with whom she
now resides in London, with their two kids.
David Strathairn began his acting career in John Sayles' RETURN OF THE
SECAUCUS SEVEN. He also starred in six other Sayles movies, including this
one. The San Francisco-born actor graduated from Williams College and earned
another degree from the Ringling Brothers Clown College before turning his
talents to film and stage.
Kris Kristofferson has eight Grammy nominations and the Best Song Grammy
Award for "Help Me Make It Through The Night". In 1970, he won Song of the
Year and Songwriter of the Year awards from the Country Music Association.
The part of Noelle was written for 19-year old Vanessa Martinez, who had a
small but pivotal role in Sayles' LONE STAR, her feature film debut.

Title
Review for X-Men (2000)
For more reviews and movie wallpapers/screensavers, visit
http://www.joblo.com/
One of my most cherished possessions to this day remains the NM (Near Mint)
copy of X-Men#4, for which I overpaid about a decade ago (according to my
dad), but which today, makes me look like a friggin' financial genius! I
love comic books. I've got about a thousand of them locked up in my
basement, and some of my nicest memories from the days o' puberty, are of me
nestled up in a corner with a copy of the early B&W Teenage Mutant Ninja
Turtles or the original Judge Dredd comics nestled in my lap. Sure, I
haven't read them in a while, but I know they're there, and one day...I will
go back.
Having said all that, I never really got into the X-Men comics. Not because
I didn't like them or anything, I just never got around to them. Spidey,
Batman, Punisher were always so much cooler. And the movie, you say? Well,
that's another story.
PLOT:
This film is set in the near future, a time during which mutant humans are
running rampant among us. These special people each have their own
particular powers distinguishing themselves from each other and the rest of
society. The human race is not sure how to deal with these hybrid beings,
and is considering certain policies regarding their governance. The good
mutants are trying to work with the humans, while the bad mutants are just
pissed. Clashes ensue.
CRITIQUE:
A good beginning to a possible franchise property, this film gives us a good
chunk of background on the characters, tosses in a few exciting fight
sequences, cool special effects and the other bad mutha of the summer:
Wolverine! Was this a great film? No. Was this a bad film? No way. It was
good. It did what it needed to do, and that was to entertain me for an hour
and a half, present me with many interesting and unique characters, sprinkle
in some moments of levity and color me comic-ally entertained. Add all that
to the tight tops on the mutant girls and I personally consider this to be a
very welcome start to the latest comic book gone Hollywood. And did the
majority of the characters win me over in the end? You bet your X they did!
Of course, everyone and their uncle is gonna have a favorite and not-so by
next week, so let's see which ones appealed to me. I really loved Wolverine
the most, dug Professor X and Rogue, especially the performances set forth
by Patrick Stewart and Anna Paquin, but not much else on the "good" mutants
front. Didn't much care for Storm or Halle Berry's "now-you-hear-it
now-you-don't" Jamaican accent, nor the jawline presented to us by Cyclops,
although the banter between him and Wolvie did hit the mark.
The biggest problem that I did have with the film, or any of its characters
for that matter, was the fact that the "bad guy", the main man leading this
mutant revolution against the humans was...well, how could I put it, an old
man! I'm not exactly sure if the character of Magneto was so old in the
comic books, but even if he was, the sight of Ian McKellen flying around in
those tights and helmet just didn't do it for me. I wish they would have
picked a more intimidating foe. That aside, I loved the character of Toad
and his long, twisty tongue, Mystique and her ultra-cool powers a la
chameleon and even Sabretooth, despite his feeble-mindedness. The special
effects were also all very well presented and even more importantly, not
overplayed. A little more action would have been appreciated, especially
during the film's first 20 minutes or so, but I suppose the film's final 20
clicks kinda make up for all that. And keep your eyes peeled for one of the
cooler fight sequences of the year, with Mystique and Wolverine going all
out near the tail-end of this thing. Kicking all kinds of ass with two very
cool characters turning in one very slick battle! In fact, I haven't said
enough about Wolverine. He is all over this movie, he's the loner, the
outsider, the drinker, the guy who doesn't need help from anyone, but gets
the looks from the girls and has a tender heart deep down inside. Hugh
Jackman does an excellent job as Wolvie and gives you just enough juice to
pepper up the rest of the good mutants and their ho-hum ways.
And remember that you don't need to have read the comic book or even known
anything about the X-Men before this film to really appreciate this movie as
the solid, comic book adventure that it is. It's a fun, summer romp. Real
fans will likely get a little more out of it, especially with the couple of
in-jokes tossed in and around. All in all, the film does leave you wanting
more and I guess that for the first of a possible many others...that's the
best that we could ask for. And oh yeah...Wolvie rules!

Title
Review for Charlie's Angels (2000)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
A first time movie director. Nasty rumors of infighting on the set. No
original "Angels" making cameos in the film. What were we to expect? A
disaster, to be sure. A mini-WATERWORLD, if anything. A film that we could
look back at the end of the year and say, "Boy, we saw that dirtball coming
down the aisle months ago, didn't we?" and pat ourselves on the back. But
color me surprised, impressed and above all, entertained...as the angels,
charlie and everyone else involved in this production somehow managed to
take whatever nasty rumors surrounded the film and turn them all into a
harmless hour and a half of fun, fun and another little thing called fun!
Women superheroes? You bet!
PLOT:
Oh, it's that same ol' story. Three smart, tough, sexy women prone to
kickin' ass and solving McGyver-type problems are given yet another
dangerous assignment from their boss, a multimillionaire gentleman whom
they've never met, and proceed to solve problems, kick ass and juggle bad
guys through umpteenth costume changes. Fun is had by all.
CRITIQUE:
A friggin' blast! This movie is a campy, kitshy, funny, action-packed,
bubblegum romp in the sand with three beautiful, sexy, smart women all
playing like they know they're in on one of the funnest movies of the year!
Kick arse soundtrack. Ultra-slick directing. Fun cameos. Cool dance
sequences. Awesome stunts. A cutesy story that doesn't amount to anything
more than a cartoon playing out like a comic book, but you know it's all
good because you're sittin' in your seat, chewing on that popcorn, letting
that butter drip down the side of your mouth and into the pile of cheese
topping off your nachos, and the film just gives you more cheese and more
fun and more kickin' arse, and you eventually realize that the film is just
a heapin' helping of movie fun and if you ain't on their side, then you
ain't in on one of the funkiest rides of the year. Slap Crispen Glover in
there as the ultra-sleek bad guy smokin' like a bad guy should. Sam
Rockwell, confirming his abilities as a solid quirky character actor, and
even Matt LeBlanc, walking around with his tongue firmly planted in his
cheek and getting jiggy with everything that boogies in this movie, and God
knows...it all boogies! Phew.
But honestly, folks, if you're looking for a quick, easy, fun ride for the
evening...something to take your mind of that darn boss back at the
workplace, or that better half of yours who just keeps nagging you about
this and that, grind your gears into neutral, sit back, relax and have
yourself a nice, cool tall one on the Angels and McG. It's been a while
since I've seen a movie have so much fun with itself, but this one is ripe
for the season. It takes girl power, tosses in some Jimmy Bond, a little
Mission Impossible spy mumbo-jumbo, three hot babes kickin' Matrix-type
arse, a rockin' soundtrack, cool cars, a cold-cocking start, some fun credit
outtakes, inside jokes left and right, and makes it all feel sooooo good.
And the girls honestly seem to be having a great time here. Lucy Liu, rock
solid as the most well-rounded angel of them all, smart as a whip, sexy as a
vamp and tough as nails. Diaz, cute as a button, reminding everyone why we
all fell in love with her in THE MASK, and Drew Barrymore, one girl who
should be doubly commended for taking part in the production side of this
fluffy gem as well. One small disappointment was the lack of Bill Murray's
classic scene stealing moments, but surely something to look forward to in
CA2. I've probably over-sold this movie by now, but to be honest, I had a
great time. I guess it's just been a while since I've seen something that
offered such unadulterated enjoyment...and cleavage :)
But if you expect to take this movie seriously, stop right now and don't
bother seeing it. This film is not made for you. It's made for people who
are looking for a punch-across-the-face kinda time, mixed in with a quick
Tequila pick-me-up and a nice, thick, gooey wad o' cheese. If you're that
person, stand in line right now, ask for one ticket for the Angels, and
prepare yourself to be taken through the fun side of the world of make
believe. The Angels...they are deliverin'!
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
One of the cuter in-jokes in this film comes by the way of an E.T. poster
slapped against the wall of a playroom in which two young boys meet Drew
Barrymore's character. Of course, Drew will probably always be best
remembered for her part of Gertie in that film.
If you don't recognize actor Sam Rockwell from his previous roles, allow me
to remind you. He plays the nerdy millionaire geek in this film. And last
year, he played the alternate member of the GALAXY QUEST crew (the guy who
always thought he was doomed) and maniac mouse-killer jailbird "Wild Bill"
in THE GREEN MILE.
On top of acting in and producing this film, Drew Barrymore also managed to
slip both her current (Tom Green) and ex-boyfriend (Luke Wilson) into the
activities. Both men have cameo roles.
There were three writers credited with the screenplay of this movie: Ryan
Rowe, Ed Solomon and John August. The latter gentleman is also the man
behind the screenplay for GO.
Director McG's full name is Joseph McGinty Mitchell.

Title
Review for Dance with Me (1998)
For more reviews, go to http://surf.to/joblo
Latin sensation Chayanne makes his way over to the United States of
America to star in this bubble gum, saccharine-filled romantic dance
movie, opposite the green-eyed, and always beautiful, Vanessa L.
Williams.   
PLOT:
Young Cuban man Rafael comes to the U.S. to find his real father. Upon
arrival, he works as a handyman at a local dance studio, and falls for
one of the dance teachers who happens to be rehearsing for the annual
Latin dance contest in Las Vegas. Dancing shoes pronounced, Rafael also
gets the opportunity to compete in the contest. Dance and romance soon
blooms.
CRITIQUE:
Light, mostly corny, lengthy dance-themed movie, that does have a great
soundtrack, and some good performances by the two, beautiful,
charismatic leads, Chayanne and Vanessa L. Williams. I would not
necessarily suggest this film for its romantic aspects, because they
are pretty weak, but if you like to stare at either of the film's main
stars, and if you like the Latin vibe and/or the dancing, then you
might not be totally disappointed with this movie. Having said that,
the dancing sequences seemed to be absent during most of the first hour
of the film, but did take over the movie, once the whole gang was
transported to Las Vegas for the dance contests.  
Chayanne, in his first American starring role, is the rich man's
Benicio Del Toro. He's great looking, dresses impeccably, dances like a
machine, and radiates great sensations with his full-toothed smile. He
also pulls off a humorous and original tribute to Gene Kelly from
SINGIN' IN THE RAIN. Vanessa L. Williams also looks great in this film,
if you like girls with super-short skirts, great legs and pumps, that
is. (turns out I do). There is also some chemistry between the two, but
unfortunately, the screenplay is pretty lame, and doesn't really do a
great job of convincing you of their absolute compatibility. No cheap
sex scenes either. Which was a bit of a letdown for most people, I
think. Then again, who cares. These bastards could dance up a storm and
look great doing it, so if that's what you're looking for, shell out
your hard-earned cash, and have a blast!
One extremely funny aspect of this film, was the fact that Kris
Kristofferson was actually cast as an experienced dance instructor, and
a man with actual emotions. It was funny watching him move around like
an ass, and squeeze his lips tight to convey emotion. On a positive
note, the soundtrack was very sweet, reminded me a bit of the MAMBO
KINGS (7.5/10) vibe, and the salsa music kept reminding me of the nacho
plate that I would soon make myself, once I got home and dug into some
real salsa. Having said all that, it must be said that I have never
been a dancer, a fan of dance, or a fan of dance movies, but Mrs. JoBlo
is. You figure out the pant-wearing scenario in that equation. For the
record, she also rated the film a measly 6/10.
Little Known Facts: 
This film was previously titled SHUT UP AND DANCE.
The "L" in Vanessa L. Williams' name stands for Lynn. She is often
confused with actress Vanessa Williams from the "Chicago Hope" TV
series. The Screen Actors Guild assigned her with the name Vanessa L.
Williams but the initial rarely appears in credits. The SAG will only
make it an issue if the other actress objects. Even news stories often
confuse the two.
Vanessa dropped out of Syracuse University to pursue the Miss America
crown in 1983, and never finished her degree. Once crowned Miss
America, she was dethroned when nude photos of her surfaced in
Penthouse magazine. The centerfold model for that issue was 16-year-old
Traci Lords. Now since Ms. Lords was underage at the time, it is
illegal to own or trade that issue of the magazine, unless the
centerfold pictorial is removed. Vanessa had three children with her
husband of 10 years, Ramon Hervey (They divorced in 1997.)
Screenwriter Daryl Matthews, partnered with Liz Curtis, was also
responsible for the choreography of the dance sequences in this film
(He is a former dancer himself.)
Chayanne is born in Puerto-Rico, where he is a recording artist and TV
soap actor.

Title
Review for Arlington Road (1999)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Okay, so this is one of the worst cases of a trailer giving away an entire
film's premise step by little step, but I'm a fan of lanky actor Timmy
Robbins, the aging but effective Jeff Bridges, and the cutest little
patootie this side of a goofy aunt we've all known, Joan Cusack. Now let's
see if this film can entertain me!
PLOT:
University professor who teaches a class in domestic terrorism suspects his
"Leave it to Beaver"-type next door neighbors as being a dressed-up family
behind certain harrowing right-wing activities. Does the man suffer from
mass paranoia due to his wife's death to extremists' hands, or is he right
on the ball?
CRITIQUE:
Despite its general predictability and slow start, this film did manage to
grab me by the balls, and fingernail-biting wise, thoroughly entertain me
for its very last half hour. In fact, the ending of this film was one of the
most inspired that I've seen come out of Hollywood in a while. I personally
enjoyed its refreshing conclusion, whilst my better half, Mrs. JoBlo, found
it quite unsatisfying (She loved the film otherwise). It would be fair to
say that this film's script is not its grandest asset, but that its director
is the one who should be applauded for turning this sub-level thrilling
story, into a most interesting thriller with a race to the finish ending
from hell. The shooting style, the dark scenarios, the uneasy feel of its
soundtrack (Note that the man behind those sounds is the very same man who
composed many of weirdo director David Lynch's eerily satisfying
soundtracks, Angelo Badalamenti) are three elements used effectively by the
director to create a decent build-up of tension. It sorta felt like the
movie FALLING DOWN for me, with a man literally "losing it" onscreen.
As the man who "loses it", Jeff Bridges staples his reputation as the actor
with the fluffiest hair in Hollywood, a superb capacity to cry at a drop of
a dime (A few less scenes of him tearing up might've improved my score as
well) and the actor best to be remembered as the slow-motion running dude
towards a camera. Despite those redundancies, Bridges did still manage to
convey a real interesting man who slowly crumbles before our very eyes,
while Robbins creepily presented his neighbor as a sorted side-dish to the
hodge-podge of mayhem. Liking Joan Cusack as I do, I wished they'd have used
her more often in this film, but that predicament was clearly not to be. Add
an extremely powerful opening scene, a slow-to-get-going first hour, a
semi-predictable plot to the stylish wonders of the director, an effective
soundtrack, and some decent acting gigs by all involved, and you've got
yourself an above-average thriller that doesn't break much new ground, but
certainly entertains as a whole. The original ending might turn some off,
but certainly, it helped in certifying my own opinion of this film towards
the green light of recommendation.
No need to see this puppy in the theatres, but certainly an entertaining
video/nacho night treat. Just make sure that you don't watch it with your
neighbors : )
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Screenwriter Ehren Kruger admits that, "Some of the best scenes in the movie
came out of the rehearsal process." He claims that he cannot take credit for
a lot of the best dialogue which "was improvised by these terrific actors."
This film is his first produced script. It won him the Academy of Motion
Picture Arts & Sciences prestigious Nicholl Fellowship for achievement in
screenwriting in 1996.
Director Mark Pellington's wife was the costume designer on this picture.
She is Jennifer Barrett-Pellington. This is Mark's second feature film after
1996's GOING ALL THE WAY. In 1992, he won the "Best Director" prize at the
Billboard Video Music Awards, for his work on the Pearl Jam video "Jeremy".
It also earned him four MTV Video Awards in 1993, including Best Director
and Video of the Year.
Actor Jeff Bridges has been nominated for three Academy Awards, for THE LAST
PICTURE SHOW, THUNDERBOLT & LIGHTFOOT and STARMAN. He is the brother of
actor Beau Bridges. "Beau" means "pretty" in French.
Does anyone remember actress Joan Cusack from her gig on TV's "Saturday
Night Live" during the 1985-86 season? I sure didn't.

Title
Review for Battlefield Earth (2000)
For more reviews and movie wallpapers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
We've seen a lot of alien invasion movies come out over the past few years,
but when's the last time we saw a really cool movie about aliens actually
running our planet? Not since the original PLANET OF THE APES has such an
interesting premise been given such major attention, as John Travolta takes
the first half of L. Ron Hubbard's famous sci-fi novel and turns it into
this summer's first big science-fiction popcorn ride.
PLOT:
It is the year 3000, and our planet is being manhandled by evil Psychlos
alien beings. Security chief Terl is the meanest sonnova-bitch of them all,
ruling with his arrogance, power and blackmailing skills. It isn't until a
peasant man who goes by the name of Jonnie Goodboy Tyler takes a stand that
the few surviving humans decide to rally in the hopes of defeating their
gigantic oppressors.
CRITIQUE:
Fun cheese. Despite starting off like a bad Star Trek episode, this film
eventually graduates to a higher level with great special effects, some
really slick bad-ass aliens, an intriguing premise and a good flow of loud,
campy fun. Don't bother seeing this movie if you're expecting a film similar
in nature to 2001: A SPACE ODYSSEY. This one definitely asks that you bring
along a bag of farfetchedness, with many of your likely questions relating
to the plausibility of a handful of human beings fighting an entire alien
race. But if you consider the pure arrogance of the Psychlos, and the way in
which they underestimate and even misdiagnose many of the humans, it becomes
a much easier pill of reasoning to swallow. I personally had very few issues
with the story, which I found to be interesting and fast-paced enough to
keep me entertained.
I had an initial problem with the alien beings, their accents and their
exaggerated laughs, but all that seemed to disappear about 20 minutes into
the film, as I got more and more used to their world. I also loved the fact
that the aliens were some real bad muthas! I mean, these guys were nasty
boogers! I dug on them completely, and was even rooting for them to stomp
our dumb human asses...! Overall, the movie played like a 2-hour sci-fi
comic book with many a loud bang, an overly obtrusive score, great scene
transitions and some of the better special effects of the year. You truly
felt like this was the end of the world as we knew it, and I certainly
didn't notice any part of my fair city of Montreal in any of the proceedings
(the film was shot on location here). This film is not to be taken too
seriously, with many melodramatic human moments sappy as hell (one scene
seemed like a carbon copy of Mel Gibson's infamous BRAVEHEART sequence
"...fight for our freedom!). And I also could have done without the umpteen
slo-mo shots of Barry Pepper running down Matrix-like hallways, but in the
end, the film was fast, furious and just a good ol' time at the theatres.
Now whether or not you end up liking the film, I think we can all agree that
this is certainly an admirable turn for Travolta. Both he and Whitaker chew
right into their dirty, grungy roles and truly become these unconscionable
alien beings. So if you're looking for a cool, mindless, special-effect
laden film starring a couple of bad muthas, this puppy is made prime for
you. This movie is loud, sorta campy, over-the-top and certainly not
super-tight in narrative. But overall, the energy of the film is slated to
"fun" and the last 20 minutes are especially wild. So don't take it all so
seriously and enjoy the ride!
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
I was lucky enough to meet and interview John Travolta for this film
(http://www.joblo.com/travolta1.htm), and here are a few tidbits from that
meeting:
1) Other than the fact that L. Ron Hubbard wrote the novel on which this
movie is based and is known as the founder of Scientology, there is nothing
in the film which connects the two.
2) A sequel for this film is already slated to begin production in Montreal,
most likely next year.
3) John is interested in directing one day, although it will probably be in
a limited capacity, and definitely about something personal, most likely an
adaptation of his own book, "Propellor One-Way Night Coach".
John Travolta's wife, actress Kelly Preston, makes an appearance in this
film as one of the female aliens named Chirk. She's the one with the
extra-long tongue swirling about.
Barry Pepper was born in Campbell River, British Columbia, Canada. He had a
few small roles in bigger films over the past few years, including parts in
SAVING PRIVATE RYAN, ENEMY OF THE STATE and THE GREEN MILE. Most of this
film was shot on location in Montreal, Quebec, Canada.
Director Roger Christian was art director on the 1979 movie ALIEN, and set
decorator on the 1977 sci-fi classic STAR WARS.
The film is actually based on the first 500 pages of the novel, with a few
moments from the second part of the book also thrown in.

Title
Review for Yards, The (2000)
For more reviews, screensavers, trailers & more, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Much has been made about this film and its well-rounded cast. Here you have
some of the older school's finer wines including James Caan, Ellen Burstyn
and Faye Dunaway, mixed in with some of the new generation's younger punks
including Mark Wahlberg, Charlize Theron and Joaquin Phoenix. A diverse cast
to say the least. Add writer/director James Gray to the top of the totem
pole, a man who waited six years after his directorial debut of LITTLE
ODESSA to create this film, and you've got an interesting melange of
cinematic experiences. Now let's see how this mixture tastes...
PLOT:
Having taken one for the team, Leo returns home after spending some time in
the pen, hopeful to return to the straight and narrow. Working for his
uncle, Leo gets trained by his buddy Willie, an expert in the dirty
political games prevalent in their industry. But it isn't long before one
such shady incident goes terribly awry and it's every man for himself. Of
course, Leo is once again left flailing in the wind of suspicion.
CRITIQUE:
This is a decent morality tale strapped to a very dark and depressing
setting, ultimately salvaged by many top-notch performances. A "gritty urban
drama" is probably the best way to describe this damp flick, a film that
certainly does present an interesting story, but does so in a manner that
just didn't grab me as much as I thought it would. There is very little
enthusiasm in this film, it's slow-paced, dreary and pretty gloomy for the
most part. In fact, the lead character played adequately by Mark Wahlberg
looks like he's going to kill himself in almost every other scene. He's down
and out. The film reminded me a lot of Scorsese's breakout 1973 picture MEAN
STREETS in many ways. Both pictures take place in the "mean streets" of New
York City. Both flicks seem to have an aversion to bright shots. And just as
in Scorsese's film, the so-called "dire" circumstances in this story
underwhelmed me for the most part. I mean, it just seemed like people were
making too much of things that didn't seem to necessitate all that hoopla.
Now don't get me wrong, the film does contain real moments of suspense,
characters caught in situations in which they have little way out.
But on the whole, I never really felt very close to any of the characters,
and telegraphed much of the film's grinding progression. But despite all
that, the performances were strong across the board, with Caan and Phoenix
grabbing most of the gusto. Burstyn and Dunaway were decent, but had very
little to do, while Theron took on yet another look and still managed to
punch in a solid performance. But it is Joaquin Phoenix who will likely be
the one most remembered for this film. Alternating between the many
different facets of his character, Joaquin danced the perfect line and will
hopefully be tagged with a nomination of some sort at the end of the year.
And despite the many similarities between this film and his directorial
debut, James Gray did manage to put an authentic representation of the times
on the screen, but not without overstylizing some of the film's more
poignant moments (appreciated by others, I found some of his tactics to be
distracting). So don't expect any major originality points with this film
but do expect to see some great actors doing their thing. And if you enjoy
dramas which focus on family, loyalty, redemption and all that fun stuff,
this film certainly packs much of that in its mix. Just don't expect to be
smacked upside the head by it all. Maybe just a gentle tap...

Title
Review for Gift, The (2000)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
PLOT:
A card-reading psychic woman in a small redneck town gets caught up in the
middle of a murder mystery case in which her psychic readings reveal much
about the details of said killing.
CRITIQUE:
With all of the Internet hype regarding the unveiling of actress Katie
Holmes' well...unveiling, you'd have to wonder what exactly the title "gift"
was referring to (either way, a big thank you goes out to director Sam
Raimi!). Incidentally, for my separate review of Katie Holmes' visual
presentation, scroll down below. But childishness aside, let's talk about
the movie at hand. This is an okay movie with a so-so story, fun characters
and a really great cast which allow it to step up a notch. If you were here
in my room right now, you would see me standing up and applauding Keanu
Reeves for his performance in particular. Good God, man...whendja turn into
an actor, dude?! Seriously though, I will pretend for a second that Keanu
actually took a whiff of my review of him in THE WATCHER, in which I
suggested that he change his look when he's going to play a different
character than we're used to, so that the audience won't see "Keanu the
movie star" as much as "Keanu the actor". It definitely worked in this movie
so a special kudo goes out to him. Another major kudo is presented to the
infallible Cate Blanchett, who holds much of this slow-paced movie together,
and Giovanni Ribisi for convincing us that he's nuts...once again (he is
acting, right?).
And the reason that I am talking mostly about the actors in this review is
because the story is one that didn't really do much for me. Yes, the mystery
of the killer was a good one, with pretty much everyone in town checked off
as a suspect at one point or another, but as the end approached, I think it
became more than obvious to anyone who was paying attention, who the culprit
would be. I also didn't get much sense of originality from the story as a
whole. A couple of the psychic's "dream" sequences were scary and boo-like,
but other than that, the film offered very little in scares or thrills (if
that's what you're expecting). In fact, it's actually a difficult movie to
rate because I didn't hate it by any stretch of the imagination, but nothing
in it was altogether memorable either (other than Reeves' performance). Even
the director, Sam Raimi, who at one point in his career was known primarily
for his camera acrobatics, seemed to have taken a backseat on this one
(perhaps he was already prepping up for his next "little" movie called
SPIDER-MAN). Overall, the film did provide a creepy, haunting feel, some
solid performances and a semi-interesting mystery, but I can't really see
how anyone could get overly excited about this movie. A good flick that'll
probably go down easier on video and definitely not for the thrill-seekers.
Mini-Review of the "Katie Holmes scene":
The tension was mounting throughout this entire movie. When would the
"scene" appear? When would we, as a united perverted audience, be able to
partake in the twin peak wonders? Was Raimi gonna pull a veiled shot on our
ass, or were we gonna get a "clean shot" of all the action? Many questions
left unanswered. But it wasn't long before the many grumblers in the crowd,
the very same people who stood in line overnight to see this grand event,
were properly served the main course. The "money shot" had arrived and the
painful months of waiting ever since the rumor broke on the Net were finally
past. And with about fifteen minutes left in the film, and every other
teenager in the crowd moaning over the lack of Katie's "katies", suddenly
the gangly actress appeared on screen for a period of about 5-10 seconds,
breasts fully exposed to the screen, and the hearts, and pants, of many a
teen (and one adult, thank you very much). Their performances, in one word,
were...splendid!
A "mixture of early Brando and late 80s DeNiro" is probably the best way to
describe the two-some's exhibition, with a special shout-out going out to
the "left one" in particular, who obviously must've studied with either
Stella Adler or Lee Strassberg himself. Other audience members weren't as
restrained as I was, sitting with jaw in lap, smiling from ear to ear, and
some even violently crying out for more (Although we did eventually get The
Arrow to settle down). I for one was glad that I waited to see the double
twins on the big screen, and quickly sent in my deposit for the DVD, hoping
that a closer examination of said can-cans would ultimately deepen my
understanding of the material at hand. In fact, I vow to spend hours and
days inspecting it over and over again, if I have to. But it wasn't until I
was walking out of the theatre tonight, with my winter coat tied
conspicuously around my waist, that I fully realized the importance of this
one particular cinematic event. And as I came to grips with that very
thought and brushed the slumbering tear from my cheek (that was a tear,
wasn't it?), and thanked the God all-mighty, my wonder transformed into two
smaller thoughts: the first had to do with how I was going to get rid of my
woodie by the time I got home so that my girlfriend wouldn't pull a twenty
questions on me and the second was how I was ever going to...get a life and
grow up!!! Either way, the wait was over and my so-called "life" could
finally go on.
Where's JoBlo coming from?
A Simple Plan (8/10) - Red Rock West (9/10) - One False Move (8/10) -
Practical Magic (3/10) - In Dreams (5/10) - What Lies Beneath (7.5/10) - The
Sixth Sense (8/10)

Title
Review for Alan Smithee Film: Burn Hollywood Burn, An (1997)
AN ALAN SMITHEE FILM: BURN HOLLYWOOD BURN
RATING: 1 / 10 --> So bad it hurts to watch
For more movie reviews and trivia, visit http://www.joblo.com/
PLOT:
Token director Alan Smithee steals the only copy of his film "Trio" from the
studio, after they complete the "final cut" without him. He threatens to
burn the film reel if they do not allow him to keep his vision.
CRITIQUE:
Wow. I really can't remember the last time a movie sucked on so many levels!
The "comedy" in this film is pathetic, obvious and dated (OJ Simpson jokes
galore). The plot is uninteresting, boring and bad. The structure of the
film is annoying, repetitive and pretentious. The acting is pretty bad,
especially Jackie Chan, who can't act to save his life. The cameos are lame
and seem forced, and the ending blows chunks.
All in all, this movie believes itself to be a clever, humorous and edgy
look behind the closed doors of Hollywood, but comes across as a boring,
stupid and completely unentertaining piece of shite. I love to see movies
about Hollywood shenanigans, but this one bites the big one. See it if you
like to watch really bad movies, otherwise skip it, because it will just
have you hating every star that makes an appearance in it. Luckily for us
all, this mess only lasts about 80 minutes, and Miramax honcho Harvey
Weinstein plays a lead-faced detective. By the way, is there any reason why
the studio or the producer couldn't have cut another version of the film by
the way of all the filmed stock that was left over? Who knows, who cares,
this "satire" sucks the bag.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Ironically, the original director of this film, Arthur Hiller, also
requested his name be taken off the credits and replaced by the DGA's Alan
Smithee moniker. This was after the film's production company, Cinergi
Pictures, preferred the cut made by producer/writer Joe Eszterhas to his.
The original script of this film included Arnold Schwarzenegger and Bruce
Willis.
Eszterhas announced through the media during post-production that Cinergi
Pictures didn't have the money to pay for soundtrack. He said that he would
finance the soundtrack from his own money and asked to submit tracks for it
to him. He received 9,200 CDs and cassettes from mostly unknown and unsigned
artists, listened to all that was sent (at least a couple of tracks from
each record) and compiled the soundtrack.
This film practically swept the "Razzie Awards" in 1999, given out to the
worst of all movie categories of the year, with no less than the "Worst
Picture" award, the "Worst Screenplay" (Joe Eszterhas), the "Worst
Supporting Actor" (Joe Eszterhas), the "Worst New Star" (Joe Eszterhas tied
with Jerry Springer) and the "Worst Original Song" ("I wanna be Mike Ovitz!"
as written by Joe Eszterhas).

Title
Review for Walk on the Moon, A (1999)
For more reviews and movie trivia, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Remember the dude who was Patrick Swayze's friend in GHOST (8/10), and then
screwed him over in the name of greed? Yeah? Well, his name was Tony Goldwyn
and this film is his directorial debut.
PLOT:
Square husband takes his frustrated wife and blossoming daughter to their
annual retreat in the Catskills mountains. During their stay, the husband
has to constantly drive back to town for work, leaving the wife to glad-eye
the local free-spirited blouse salesman, and the daughter to enjoy her
initial rites of passage into womanhood.
CRITIQUE:
This film did not offer me any new insight into the human condition, the
late sixties, the Jewish getaways, humor, blouse salesmen or the flowering
of a young girl. It did however include a typical 60s hippie soundtrack (if
you like that kind of thing), a great performance put forth by the
underrated Diane Lane, who projects the wife's utter desperation very
effectively, and Viggo Mortensen. Now despite his character's lack of depth
and absence of emotion, Viggo still managed to hold my attention simply by
his form as an actor, his presence as a bonafide moochacho, and his slick
mane. Ironically, I kept joking to my friend that they could've just called
this film the "Blouse Man" solely on the number of times they coined those
words. It is only later that I found out that the makers behind this
yawn-fest had originally had the foresight to title it "Blouse Man". Oy vey!
The husband in this film was also a disappointment by the way of the
lackluster performance given by the miscast Liev Shrieber, and his
character's ultimately unconvincing actions. In fact, for a film that
features a faithful Jewish wife cheating on her husband at the Woodstock
concert no less, this movie offered very little actual drama, and a
resolution that just seemed a little too tidy for my taste. Anna Paquin was
good as the confused daughter, but all of her transformations have already
been seen before in other better films, and the time dedicated to her
character in this film, was simply not enough to care. Other than that, the
jokes were all adult-oriented and lame for my taste, and the Woodstock scene
was obviously shot within a group of fifteen people or so. All in all, I
wouldn't recommend this film on any level, unless you are a huge Viggo fan
(there's a shot of his ass in this one as well), enjoy sexual re-awakenings
(via a couple of nicely shot sex scenes featuring the lovely Lane) and love
the Diane Lane. Otherwise, this film offers a weak plot, very little in
dramatic interest, and nothing memorable to offer cinema-goers.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Most of the scenes in the Catskill mountains were actually shot up North in
Montreal, Canada.
Diane Lane was married to actor Christopher Lambert from 1988 to 1994, at
which time, they got divorced.
The voice of the social director at the camp is none other than the voice of
Marge Simpson from TV's "The Simpsons", Julie Kavner.
This film went through three other title changes before settling on the one
set to its poster now: BLOUSE MAN, KISS THE SKY and OVER THE MOON.
Local Montreal movie critic Bill Brownstein makes a cameo appearance as a
customer in one scene at the husband TV repair workshop.

Title
Review for eXistenZ (1999)
For more reviews and movie trivia, visit http://www.joblo.com/
David Cronenberg takes a little time off before his official designation as
president of the 1999 Cannes Film Festival, and presents us with another
strange tale crawling out of his impressively twisted head. Shot in his
hometown of Toronto, David tosses in a little more Canadian content by the
way of Sarah Polley, and delivers his possibly over-saturated version of
alternate realities into the cinematic community. Think THE GAME (8.5/10)
meeting STRANGE DAYS (8.5/10) in a dark, creepy alley.
PLOT:
Futuristic virtual reality game super-creator Alegra Geller, runs into
opposition from people who call themselves "realists", who not appreciate
the propagation of her makeshift universe games, including her latest and
greatest one, called eXistenZ. Joined by her "bodyguard", Alegra runs
through her own game and her characters, in the hopes of escaping her
enemies.
CRITIQUE:
Dark, moody, interesting science-fiction melange of creative plot twists,
solid actors, an inventive and fresh premise despite my initial "been there,
seen that" resentment, and a truckload of gory, icky sequences accompanied
hand in hand by disgusting, yet overdone, squishy noises. This film managed
to keep me interested in its development, despite several moments of "are
they still in the game?" frustrations, and stamped a vote onto my approval
with a fun and appropriate conclusion. This movie is definitely not for
everyone. It's pretty graphic in its depiction of several skin-crawly
scenes, but does convince in its depiction of the futuristic world, and
their maneuverability within. Consider yourself in a game where everyone
else is programmed to react to what you do or say, and without any
cognizance of your own mission, and you might just get the gist of this
flick's foundation.
Be warned, this movie does not have much action in it, despite what the
electro-music-fooled trailer might have you believe, but it does put forth
an intriguing prophesy of our future, and deliver enough indirect
explanations to satisfy my peeked curiosity. And while most of the actors
were fine in their roles (I especially dig on Willem Dafoe in his most
psycho roles, and this one is pretty sweet), they aren't really the focus of
this story. The game of eXistenZ, the power of its creation and the
claustrophobic feel of the film make it a touch better than any other
play-by-numbers virtual reality trip. If you're any kind of a squeamish
person, or looking for the Kung-Fu and special-effect action a la THE MATRIX
(7.5/10), skip this sucker altogether, it is not for you. If, on the other
hand, you like dark and creepy films that play with your head and move along
at an even pace with twists and turns here and there, check this puppy out.
Just remember to check your back for port drillings before you leave the
theatre. You never know how real eXistenZ can be.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
COMING SOON to http://www.joblo.com/

Title
Review for Deuce Bigalow: Male Gigolo (1999)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
You have to hand it to Adam Sandler. Whether or not you dig his type of
humor, the man should be admired for at least one positive attribute: he
sticks by his friends. He and his old college roommates have written and
produced most of his own movies, and now, Sandler has turned his newfound
Hollywood super-power, into a greenlit project for his good buddy Rob
Schneider. And luckily for us, unlike their ex-SNL bud David Spade's first
sans-Farley effort, LOST & FOUND, this one actually works.
PLOT:
A professional fish tank cleaner suddenly finds himself in a big hole of
debt when he mangles the apartment of a male gigolo client of his, whose
place he was looking after during the man's three-week absence. Recognizing
his inability to come up with that kind of dough in that little amount of
time, Deuce decides to join the world's oldest profession, and turns himself
into...a manwhore!
CRITIQUE:
One of the funnier movies of the year, this film will definitely trigger two
types of reactions: love or hate. If you like the Adam Sandler grown-up
stupid child routine and all the crass humor from THERE'S SOMETHING ABOUT
MARY (7.5/10), well by golly, sign yourself up for this gig, cause it's
perfect for you. If, on the other hand, Merchant & Ivory are considered to
be two of your favorite words when discussing film, then I suggest you leave
Deuce and his piss and fart jokes alone. This definitely ain't for you!
Simple enough? Absolutely, and much like this film's actual plot line, do
not expect to find the answer to the world's problems lying in this movie's
abundance of wet T-shirt and handicap jokes, but do prepare yourself to
laugh a hardy har-har when Mr. Schneider and co. pull off two of the first,
and most hilarious, MATRIX, hommages of the year. You have to see it to
believe it. Pretty cool. Also, much like Sandler's last cinematic vehicle,
BIG DADDY, this film takes a real shot at romance tied into an emotional
scene or two, and believe it or not, Schneider actually pulls these scenes
off. Wow. Pretty neat.
Don't get me wrong here folks, you aren't gonna find the lost scenes from
CASABLANCA in here, but God help me if I didn't appreciate the obvious but
poignant "make the best of what you have" message woven into Schneider's
goofy script. And if all that wasn't enough, you have an excellent cast of
side characters, including one of the most intense cops put to film (with a
"small" fixation on his own penis), a beautiful girlfriend, who also happens
to be a pretty decent actress, and Oded Fehr, who if you hadn't noticed by
the umpteen love notes inscribed after my MUMMY review, is a great looking
man with an ass that would put most porno stars to shame. And the
mane...wow! Another hilarious turn is also given to the character of Deuce's
dad in this movie. His description of how he met Deuce's mom is to die for!
The one thing which surprisingly didn't work for me, were the epilogues at
the end of the movie. They seemed to be wanting to be funny, but just fell
flat. All in all, this movie is filled with cheap, filthy and quick humor,
and if that's what you're looking for, this should be your ticket to
he-bitch heaven (you'll fully appreciate that line after you see the film).
And for God's sakes, if you truly do not like childish, dirty and "stupid"
humor, do us all a favor and skip this movie, because you'll just end up
bitching about it later, even though a flashing neon light is telling you
"this is NOT for you!". Don't say I didn't warn you :).
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Schneider mentions a Filipino dish in this film, which might've been spurned
from his own familial background. Rob's mother is Filipino and his father is
Jewish. He was born and raised in San Francisco, the youngest of five
children. He got his first big break on the "David Letterman" show in 1987
at the tender age of 24, and apparently dated co-SNL star Julia Sweeney for
a few years in the early 90s.
This is Oded Fehr's second big screen appearance after his turn as Ardeth
Bey in THE MUMMY earlier this year. The real Oded was born in Tel Aviv,
Israel.
Surprisingly, there is only one other noticeable ex-SNL cameo in this film,
and that is the wonderfully dry humor of Norm McDonald, who not so
surprisingly, has a line which deals with anal intrusion.
Adam Sandler's film production company, which produced this film, is called
Happy Madison. Uuhm, do I really have to explain where the name came from?
Well, okay. Two of Sandler's films were called BILLY MADISON and HAPPY
GILMORE. There you go.

Title
Review for Runaway Bride (1999)
For more movie reviews and trivia, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Maybe I'm just a bigger fan of the original films that spawned the latest
batch of romantic comedies, YOU'VE GOT MAIL (5.5/10)-see SLEEPLESS IN
SEATTLE, NOTTING HILL (5.5/10)-see FOUR WEDDINGS AND A FUNERAL, and RUNAWAY
BRIDE (5.5/10)-see PRETTY WOMAN, but ultimately, I just found the most
recent crop of big-name star flicks to be too predictable and generally
uninteresting.
PLOT:
A cynical big city reporter finds a good story in a small town girl's
penchant for dropping her soon-to-be hubbies at the altar.
CRITIQUE:
This film never bored me, but never really entertained me either. It was
just there. I can't truly recommend it because despite some good
performances from Julia Roberts and Joan Cusack, the overall comedy in the
film was lacking and the romance didn't truly ignite until the film's final
fifteen minutes. Richard Gere also seemed bored to be there, and essentially
walked through his role and directly to the bank to cash in his big-ass
paycheck for this redundant part. Others seemed exaggerated and unbelievably
ignorant to believe (Why on earth was husband #4 so chummy with the
conniving reporter who was in town solely to disprove their real love for
one another?).
The general lack of suspense or believability of this film also left me
ho-humming past its overstated soundtrack, which featured easy-to-follow
words associated to the specific scenes, and the overdone montage sequences
which are generally used to pump up a weak script. I did enjoy Joan Cusack
as the quirky friend and some of the lessons learned, but overall this film
lacked the much needed charisma and chemistry that made PRETTY WOMAN what it
was. This film is a much better choice as video fodder on a lazy summer
afternoon, and might be enjoyed by most Gere and Roberts fans, but the rest
of us movie-going folk who like to see movies with plenty of romance, comedy
and charm, should certify this film as bride's maid, and check out the
ultimate bride, WHEN HARRY MET SALLY (10/10).
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Rumor has it that Julia Roberts was once a "runaway bride" of her own. Actor
Kiefer Sutherland and her were engaged to be married back in the day, when
she suddenly bolted on him, and left him for fellow actor and friend, Jason
Patric.
Richard Gere has been a Buddhist for over a decade, and was banned from the
Oscars once after making anti-China comments on the air at the 1993
ceremony. He is also an accomplished pianist and music writer. He hails from
Philadelphia, Pennsylvania.
Alumni from PRETTY WOMAN include director Garry Marshall, actors Julia
Roberts, Richard Gere, Hector Elizondo and Larry Miller. Elizondo is
considered by director/producer Garry Marshall to be his "good luck charm",
and as such is offered a role in each of his movies.
Director Marshall also makes a cameo in this film as the first baseman
during the baseball game sequence. He would be the one catching the ball
that is tossed over to first base.
Actress Rita Wilson is married to super-star movie actor Tom Hanks.
This film was originally titled PRETTY BRIDE.

Title
Review for She's All That (1999)
For more reviews and movie trivia, visit http://www.joblo.com/
SCREAM (8/10) was the film that vogued teen flicks back into theatres, so
let's take Matthew Lillard from that movie. I KNOW WHAT YOU DID LAST SUMMER
(7.5/10) was the follow-up teen-scream-popcorn-fest that brought in even
more mighty mighty bucks, so let's take Freddie Prinze Jr. from that cast.
Let's toss in Usher and Clea Duvall from last year's horror regurgitee THE
FACULTY (6.5/10), Chris Owens and Clea (again!) from the Jennifer Love
Hewitt vehicle CAN'T HARDLY WAIT (7/10), Jodi Lyn O'Keefe from the latest
HALLOWEEN: H20 (7.5/10), and even a cute cameo from the co-winner of the
"Queen of Teen flicks" award, Sarah Michelle Gellar (the other being
Jennifer Love Hewitt), and you've got yourself the makings of a perfect teen
romantic comedy, right? Well, let's see...
PLOT:
High school stud and all-around cool guy, Zach, is unceremoniously dumped by
his sexual alter-ego girlfriend, Taylor, and fished into a bet by his
friends to surreptitiously attempt to turn the school dorkiest girl, into
the high school prom queen in six weeks. While he attempts to do just that,
he soon finds himself actually beginning to like this "nerdy" girl.
CRITIQUE:
Cute movie that contains quite a few laughs off the top, an endearing couple
as its leads, but ultimately falls into the trap of utter predictability and
one too many serious moments for its own comedic good. Another small problem
with this film is the fact that the apparent "ugly duckling" girl in this
movie is actually quite cute, even before any sort of physical
transformation occurs. The touted prom queen on the other hand, could not be
any more one-dimensional, and bitchy, giving us very little reason to give a
crap about her. Don't get me wrong, I did actually enjoy most of this movie,
especially an amazingly funny and pointed "performance artist" presentation
near its inception, and the charming performances put forth by Freddie
Prinze Jr. and Rachael Leigh Cook, who kept their characters interesting
through most of this film's quick runtime.
One of my favorite movies of all-time, is actually quite similar to this
one, in that a bunch of guys bet on who is going to bring the ugliest girl
to a party. It's called DOGFIGHT (8/10) with River Phoenix and Lily Taylor,
and it is more of a dramatic representation of the repercussions that may
occur, when such a blatant lack of moral scruples strikes a couple who
really like each other. This film does not even pretend to slice that deep,
but does replace that lack of depth, with a slick soundtrack! :) And despite
this movie being as predictable as 1-2-and ?, it does come through on its
promise to fluffily entertain its target teenage audience with a hollow good
time, some laughs, some semi-tender moments and a couple of appealing leads.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Co-stars Prinze Jr. and Cook also co-starred in 1997's THE HOUSE OF YES. She
was a print model for 5 years before becoming an actress. She stands 5'2".
The hilarious "performance artist" near the first quarter of the film is
Alexis Arquette, one of the many brothers from the acting Arquette clan.
Kieran Culkin is the real-life brother of that HOME ALONE (8/10) kid,
Macauley Culkin.
Actress Sarah Michelle Gellar makes a cameo appearance in this film as one
of the girls in the cafeteria during the infamous "Simon
pizza-slice-meets-pubic-hair scene".
Another interesting actress in this film plays the character of Mackenzie,
Freddie Prinze Jr's sister. This actress actually won an Oscar for Best
Supporting Actress at the tender age of 12, for her role in the movie THE
PIANO. Her name is Anna Paquin. She was born in Winnepeg, Manitoba, Canada.
David Letterman once bet her $10,000 to get a basketball into a net. She
did, but he took the money back after the show. The media caused a fuss
about the whole deal, so he gave it back. Anna ended up giving all of the
money away to charity.
Director Robert Iscove also directed the 1997 television version of
CINDERELLA starring Brandy and Whitney Houston.
>From the "Who Hasn't?" files of trivia, it turns out that aside from
co-starring with him on episodes of TV's "Nash Bridges", Jodi Lyn O'Keefe,
once briefly dated co-star Don Johnson.
The two main stars of 1998's THE MIGHTY also star in this movie. Kieran
Culkin as Racheal Leigh Cook's younger brother, and Elden Henson as her
close friend.

Title
Review for When Harry Met Sally... (1989)
For more reviews, and movie trivia, visit http://www.joblo.com/
One way to determine how great a movie is, would be to calculate its
re-watchability quotient. I have seen this film over thirty times since its
inception, and have no qualms about watching it another hundred times in my
lifetime. It's a classic romantic comedy that is impeccably written,
wonderfully acted and beautifully shot under a fantastic musical umbrella of
love, fate and supreme friendship.
PLOT:
After College, two strangers named Harry and Sally drive from Chicago to New
York together and garner very little interest in each another. Five years
later, they meet again in an airport, with even less sparks flying this time
around. It isn't until another five years goes by, that Harry, now divorced,
and Sally, just getting off a five-year relationship, become friends, and
ultimately...much better friends.
CRITIQUE:
This film is the ultimate romantic comedy for all those people who don't
think that they will ever find anyone that is right for them. It isn't based
on the notion of the proverbial "love at first sight", but rather about the
more typical love that grows between two people who spend a lot of time
together, support one another through thick and thin, depend on each other
as best friends, and ultimately care more about each other than anyone else
in the world. Reminiscent of Woody Allen's ANNIE HALL (8/10), this is the
movie that sent Meg Ryan into cute, romantic, comedy movie star heaven, and
confirmed Billy Crystal as a viable romantic lead. The script is an
excellent breakdown of timeless conversations between the sexes ("Can men
and women ever be friends without sex getting in the way?" and "Will a
one-night stand with your best friend ultimately ruin your friendship?"),
witty repartee between the two leads, and a beautifully constructed love
story that is carefully assembled over time, and gently eases you into the
wonder of that thing called love.
This movie also offers one of the most romantic soundtracks that you'd ever
want to hear via a career-launching effort by Harry Connick Jr., an endless
array of picturesque scenes featuring the wonderful world of New York
Christmas at its best, quotable dialogue galore, and solid supporting
performances from Bruno Kirby and Princess-Leia-for-life, Carrie Fisher. The
only complaint that I have about this movie is that it is only ninety
minutes long. Other than that, it delivers a timeless tale of a charming
couple falling in love, intercut with various couples relating their own
accounts of l'amour de leur vie, with humor laced through every scene, and a
tangible sense of hope for all those who still believe in great friends,
fate and love.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
The lady who says "I'll have what she's having" in the infamous Meg Ryan
"faking an orgasm" scene is none other that Estelle Reiner, director Rob
Reiner's own mom. Rob's daughter with former wife and director in her own
right, Penny Marshall (Laverne from TV's "Laverne & Shirley"), also stars in
this film as Emily. She is dating Harry in one scene at Jess and Marie's
home. Penny Marshall and Rob Reiner were married for eight years from 1971
to 1979.
Screenwriter Nora Ephron went on to write and direct two very similar, but
not nearly as good, romantic comic tales called SLEEPLESS IN SEATTLE
(6.5/10) and YOU'VE GOT MAIL (5.5/10). Her script for WHEN HARRY MET SALLY
nabbed her an Oscar nomination for Best Original Screenplay at the 1989
Academy Awards. It lost to Tom Shulman's script for DEAD POET'S SOCIETY.
Notice how the last names of the two main characters are reflective of their
attitudes in life. Billy Crystal as Harry BURNS, and Meg Ryan as Sally
ALBRIGHT.
There is one scene in which Billy Crystal's character can clearly be seen
reading Stephen King's MISERY, which would ultimately be director Rob
Reiner's next picture.
This film surprisingly grossed close to $93 Million at the box-office, and
was one of Barry Sonnenfeld's last as a cinematographer as he went
on to direct such films as the two ADDAMS FAMILY flicks, GET SHORTY
and MEN IN BLACK (7/10).
The "real-life" couples featured in the intercut scenes telling their
stories of love, are actually actors.

Title
Review for Magnolia (1999)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Strange things happen. I spent my morning buzzing about being named as one
of "USA Today's" hot sites, got canned for the first time in my life in the
afternoon, and saw this film during the evening. After the movie, everything
just seemed...well, peaceful. What a beautiful movie. Should we cling to our
pasts, forgive our loved ones, treat others as we would like to be treated
or do we have little choice in any of the stuff that really goes on in our
lives? Writer/director P.T. Anderson takes us through an interesting journey
across the halls of chance, coincidence and fate.
PLOT:
This film follows the lives of various intertwining individuals during a
period of 24 hours in the San Fernando Valley.
CRITIQUE:
A wonderfully crafted picture, this movie sweeps you through the lives of
many interesting characters, develops several extremely memorable sequences
which will likely stick in your mind for years to come, and offers many of
today's top character actors in top form. And yes, that includes Tom Cruise
who delivers a kick ass showing, with one of his most unique performances in
years (And tops Brad Pitt in upper-body development, believe it or
not...wow, what a bod!). It is to note that this film is not for everyone,
and is another one of this year's infamous 3-hour+ movies, but one that is
in my opinion, totally worth its value in time. In fact, I don't remember
one particular scene in this film which did not grasp my complete and
undivided attention. The movie itself starts off with some "classic" P.T.
Anderson camera tricks that should automatically suck you into his game,
develops many an interesting story line across various well-established
three-dimensional characters, and ends off with one of the most bizarre
sequences ever put to screen. Some people have been heard to complain about
this ending, or the general esoteric nature of the film, but I enjoyed its
surreal conclusion and just loved every bit of this movie and its poignant
messages on life, love, forgiveness, infidelity, the past, dealing with the
present and chance.
Of course, all of these serious subjects were tackled admirably by a
formidable crew including extremely solid performances by little Timmy
Cruise, the always-reliable Philip Baker Hall and William H. Macy, and a
superb showing by Melora Walters. Julianne Moore was her usual solid self,
but I couldn't help but feel like she had already played this drugged-up
character before. The soundtrack was another successful supporting layer of
this film, as was the creative eye from P.T. Anderson and the overall
magical feel of the movie. I truly fell in love with the style of this film
and its many intertwining stories and characters. As soon as the movie was
over, I wanted to see it again and revisit the characters one more time. In
fact, I can't wait to see it again after discussing its many meanings with
my movie geek friends. Is everything left to chance? Will your past always
affect your present? Does forgiveness and acceptance play a part in it all?
A lot of puzzles, a lot of interpretations, a lot of engaging characters,
and most of all, a lot of genuine entertainment. This film is apparently not
intended for everyone, as witnessed by several of the walkouts during my own
screening, but definitely a keeper for all fans of character-driven dramas
laced with a tiny bit of humor and surreal fantasy. Love it or hate it, I
think we could all agree that P.T. Anderson has quickly become synonymous
with a man whose workings ooze extreme originality and excitement.
Can't wait to see his next pic. Great movie! Easily one of the year's best.

Title
Review for Fargo (1996)
Director: Oliver Stone
Writer: John Ridley (based on his novel "Stray Dogs")
Starring: Sean Penn, Jennifer Lopez, Nick Nolte, Powers Boothe, Claire
Danes, Joaquin Phoenix, Billy Bob Thornton, Jon Voigt, Julie Haggerty,
Abraham Benrudi, Laurie Metcalf, Liv Tyler
If "U-Turn" is what Oliver Stone does to take a "vacation" from being all
politically cynical, then I wonder what he must do for real vacations. 
Stone has done so much awesome work lately in the arena of political
criticism, as well as media, some of it being barely-well received by
critics and audiences (remember "Nixon?"), and so it's about time he tried
to not be such a political cynic and open his doors to being just a regular
cynic like the rest of us.  The result is this.
"U-Turn" is basically a black comedy a la "After Hours," except that it's
basically a redo of all those old crap film cliches, like a town where
everyone's crooked, there's no industry but a couple convenience stores and
diners, and, well, everyone's just plain weird.  It's also one of those
nightmarish kafkaesque films where everything where Murphy's Law takes into
effect, and everything that could go wrong goes wrong.
But unlike "After Hours," which featured an innocent man plagued by some
kind of weird Job-like bad luck, we are given a detestable creature, a
person who's on the lowest possible rung of the criminal ladder: the slimy
rat who owes money but is constantly running from those who want to collect
it.  He's Bobby Cooper (Sean Penn, making the 97 rounds nicely), and we
meet him as he's driving down the road in the middle of a desert when his
convertible gets a blown radiator hose, and he is forced to stop at the
nearest Arizona town in an effort to get his car fixed.
There, he runs into all kinds of trouble as he meets odd people he probably
shouldn't, and ends up in situations in which he does not belong.  For
instance, he loses all his money when he goes to a convenience store and
some robbers come in and a little gun fight ensues, blowing all his cash
up.  And a bit later, he meets a teenage girl named Jenny (Claire Danes),
who's remarks to him that he wants him to father their "love child" get him
in trouble with her hot-headed and dim-witted boyfriend, Tobey N. Tucker
(Joaquin Phoenix), who says people call him "T.N.T" because when he goes
off, people get hurt.
A couple other people we meet: the inbred hick garage mechanic, Darrell
(Billy Bob Thornton, unrecognizable under about an inch of grease), who's
probably the most evil person in the film; a blind man (Jon Voigt) who says
a couple of meaningful and not-so-meaningful afforisms; the sheriff (Powers
Boothe), who has his paranoid eye on Bobby; and even a diner waitress named
Flo (Julie Haggerty).
But the most notable people he meets are a married couple named Grace and
Jake McKenna (Jennifer Lopez and Nick Nolte, respectively), who hate
eachother so much that each ends up hiring Bobby to kill the other without
the other knowing (a blatant rip-off of "Red Rock West"), causing Bobby to
do some character weighing to see which one he should off if either of
them.
The plot pretty much goes in circles, as we see Bobby being beaten up like
crazy in every other scene, get up, and get beaten up again.  The guy is
already missing two fingers from a scene before the movie (which we are
shown in flashbacks throughout the flick), and we see that this is
basically God's revenge on Bobby for being such a bastard.  The story
becomes a nightmarish revenge story, all the more nightmarish because Penn
makes Bobby such a likable person and we soon sympathize with his plight
and just want him to get the hell out of Dodge.
This is all done with the kind of overdirecting that Oliver Stone is
famous/infamous for.  We get all kinds of wacky camera movements and
angles, cataclysmic editing, some screwing around with the sound track, and
gorgeous cinematography which make this technically amazing, but still a
lot like the headache that "Natural Born Killers" was.  I almost wonder if
Stone can make a technically simple movie anymore, like some of his earlier
work.
Nevertheless, Stone has a personal staple he puts on the film, and all his
technical stuff works this time in creating sheer paranoia, and giving the
film a nightmarish edge that it needs.  Too bad he doesn't really take it
over the edge and give the film a deeper tone, which is what Scorsese did
with "After Hours," turning what could have simply been a "shit happens"
film into an almost brilliant black comedy.  The film needs more of a plot,
which it runs out of about forty-five minutes along, leaving some subplots
(Jenny/Tobey, the guys who he owes the money to, as well as a couple
others) dangling with very little closure.
Oh, and then there's the "attempt" to add a message about, oh I dunno,
manifest destiny and the way we hurt the Native Americans (Lopez's
character is a Native American corrupted by an American).  Just to make
sure we didn't miss his "message," he adds photos of Indian chiefs over the
end credits.  This approach is so underdeveloped that the photos at the end
are a big laugh, and the entire need to add a political subtext to the film
just should have been dropped all together if he couldn't have fit it in in
the film nicely.
But Stone still exhibits a great sarcastic cynical take on life, turning it
into a bit of a pessimistic allegory for life: we're beaten around a lot,
have to deal with people as if not more selfish than we are, and then we're
eventually given the big screw-over by someone we didn't even suspect was
scewing with us in the first place.  He's expanded his pessimism a little
further, but hardly promises the same relief that his political or media
satires promise: that learning from our mistakes can prevent similar things
from happening.  This is more like: life sucks and there's nothing we can
do about it.
Still, for fans of Stone's wild stylistic approach to filmmaking, and
anyone who is into wacky surrealism, as well as a film where every actor
goes deliciously over the top with their performances (yes, even Claire
Danes), this will be pretty pleasing.  It's not a great film, but the
result is a rather fun film which steals from many films (the ending is a
sorta rip-off of "Duel in the Sun"), but still comes off as being at least
marginally entertaining.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Truman Show, The (1998)
Director Peter Weir takes another "better-known as a comedian" actor
(Carrey) and parades him around in a tale of drama, comedy and fantasy.
His previous subject for this matter had been Robin Williams in his
critically acclaimed DEAD POETS SOCIETY back in 1989.
PLOT:
Truman Burbank is a man whose entire life is being taped for television
viewing purposes. A TV show, aptly named The Truman Show, has broadcast
his life 24 hours a day since his birth. Everybody in his life are
actors: his wife, his best friend, his neighbours, his co-workers.
Everybody is in on it, except for Truman. Then one day, he begins to
radiate some suspicions... 
CRITIQUE:
Extremely original, well-written piece that ultimately left me
emotionally detached, and feeling bored at certain times. This movie is
written impeccably by the same writer of GATTACA (6/10), and covers
most of its bases extremely well in regards to the who, what, where,
when and hows that you may find yourself asking over its 100-minute
playtime. Having said that, many of its dramatic sequences did very
little to move me, and left me wondering if I should be caring more
about Truman than I ultimately did.
Some scenes were quite funny, others original...but all in all, the
film was basically nothing more than just a few creative ideas plugged
into a well-fabricated fantastical environment. Nothing blew me away
here, folks! Carrey was decent in his role, but I thought his character
was exaggerated at times (Does anyone really greet their neighbours the
way he did in real life?? Gimme a break.) Ed Harris was good, but his
range didn't go much further than standing around acting cool and
arrogant. The rest of the cast were also satisfactory, but no real
standouts. Interesting, but nothing more than that.
Overall, this film should fluffily entertain and delight most people in
regards to its original structure, style and plot line, but personally,
I found nothing "deeper" in it than that. No real reason to go see it
at the movie shoppes though. I suggest you wait until its video launch
six months from now. "Movie of the decade" ??? I think not. Let's all
remember that GOODFELLAS (9/10) was actually released in 1990, people
:)
Little Known Facts: 
Jim Carrey's full name is James Eugene Carrey. He was born in Ontario,
Canada, and at the tender age of 10, Carrey had sent his resume to
Carol Burnett. At one point, his family lived out of their car/trailer,
and at the age of 19, Carrey finally moved to Los Angeles.
Before his acting career took off, Jim Carrey once wrote a "fake check"
out to himself worth $10million for "acting services rendered". When
his father passed away, he placed the check inside his father's casket.
He always believed that his fantasy would become reality. Nowadays,
Carrey pockets a minimum of $20million per flick. 
Director Peter Weir was born in Sydney, Australia.
Actor Ed Harris stands 5"9, was born in New Jersey, and educated at
Columbia University. He has been married to actress Amy Madigan since
1982.

Title
Review for Officer and a Gentleman, An (1982)
For more reviews and movie trivia, go to http://surf.to/joblo/
Director Taylor Hackford's greatest cinematic achievement as of 1998,
this movie was able to touch people from both sexes and various sides
of the track, as the love story and the determination of the human
spirit reached out and played everyone's heartstrings succinctly.
PLOT:
Loser/loner Zach Mayo enlists in the Navy because he wants to inject a
little direction into his wayward life. During his 13-week boot camp,
he gets taught a lot of lessons of discipline, friendship and
ultimately, love, as he starts off as a son trying to escape his
father's past, and ends up as an officer and a gentleman.
CRITIQUE:
Inspirational and timeless, this romantic drama melds together a tight
script, strong performances by its lead actors, and a universally
positive message regarding the defiance of one's own demons, and the
success drawn from one's own determination, hard work and true heart.
This movie is made for the romantic in all of us, as well as the loners
that we've all experienced being at one point in our lives. How does
one get past the fact that there is no one around them willing to lend
them any love or support? How does one triumph over all adversities
despite the plethora of obstacles standing in their way? Well, besides
listening to hours of endless Tony Robbins motivational tapes, there is
only one way that we could all muster a little personal
self-confidence, and that is sheer persistence, will power and heart!
If you really want to do something, and I mean REALLY WANT TO DO
SOMETHING...you should be able to do it, no matter what obstacles lie
in your wake. This movie presents us with a great example of just that.
This film drills this philosophy right into our brains to the point
where I actually felt like going out and "doing something", just for
the sake of the thrill that the film gave me. Then I realized that it
was three in the morning, I was tired, and in my PJ's, so I left it
until the next day :). All that, and you get an interesting story about
the trials and tribulations of boot camp Navy candidates, plenty of
fully developed characters, a great performance by Louis Gossett Jr.,
and a wonderfully sugared romance which begins on notes of despair but
ends in true inspiration. Oh yeah, and I almost forgot...Richard Gere
is also quite good in the movie. This is a wonderful film that will
make you laugh and cry, smile and cringe, and give you more reason to
believe in yourself, and follow your dreams till their end. If
candidate Mayo-naisse can do it, we all can !!! 
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Louis Gossett Jr. won a Best Supporting Actor Oscar for his role in
this film.
The part of Zach Mayo was originally offered to John Travolta, who
turned it down on the advice of his agent. Richard Gere went on to play
that character in this film, and the film garnered 6 Oscar nominations.
Debra Winger spent part of her youth in Israel and served three months
in the Israeli army. She moved to California, where she decided to
pursue a serious acting career following a severe accident at a local
amusement park at which she was performing. She was married to actor
Timothy Hutton from 1980 to 1990. They had one son together.
Richard Gere was married to supermodel Cindy Crawford from 1991 to
1995.
Director Taylor Hackford lived with actress Helen Mirren from 1986 to
1997, at which point, they got married.
Look for an early film appearance by the actor who thought he was "too
good for TV", David Caruso, of TV's NYPD fame. He's the redhead recruit
with the heebie-geebies about water.

Title
Review for Talented Mr. Ripley, The (1999)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
PLOT:
A certain Mr.Ripley is hired by a worried American father to go to Italy and
convince his rich, spoiled, playboy son to return to the States. Once Ripley
meets up with the man and his fiance, he finds himself strangely attracted
to the man, his better-half and their lifestyle. It isn't long before Ripley
yearns to take on a bigger part of the rich boy's life, and soon finds
himself doing almost anything to achieve that very goal.
CRITIQUE:
Once more, this film falls into the early-winter Oscar movie trend of
running waaaaaay too long for its own good. This is a good film with fine
performances, solid direction, picturesque views and an interesting premise,
which essentially gets diluted in a script which focuses a little too much
on the "lives of the rich and famous" and not enough on the tightness of the
story, which could easily have afforded us more thrills, tension and
intrigue. I also thought that the homosexual under/overtones of the film
were too obvious and distracting on the whole, without the proper resolution
to justify all of its ambiguous references. Did it really matter what his
sexuality was? Why not focus more on the loneliness of the character?
Anyway, I guess this criticism is more of a personal quip. The director
might've felt as though this ambiguity was integral to the character. I
didn't and found it generally intrusive. On the whole, the film actually
felt like three hours, but it turns out that it was only about two hours and
twenty minutes, so I guess it did lag somewhat. The performances were all
pretty good with Law and Damon kicking the most ass. Damon was particularly
effective as the man with the "talent" to fool all others, and this despite
the fact that I didn't truly perceive his character to be as "talented" as
he was just plain lucky! Either way, Damon was solid in the role.
Overall, this film is intriguing enough to sit through, but difficult to
fully recommend because of its slow pace and lack of real tension. Some
people are comparing this to Hitchcock's films, but I doubt any of his films
lagged this much. I don't mean to harp on this length thing, but as
superficial as it may seem, not many people have the patience to sit still
for long periods of time, simply to gaze at beautiful Italian sceneries
going by from time to time. More meat is what this story needed, and a
stronger emotional pull from its lead character, who did generate some spark
of menace and vulnerability, but ultimately seemed to get lucky most of the
time, or be at the right place at the right time. If anything, I would
recommend you catch this movie on video so that you could be your own judge
and see if this story truly "works" for you. I dug the cinematography, the
actors and the direction on the whole, but found the story to be less
realistic than I would have liked and unreasonably long for my taste. Love
it or hate it, I think we could all agree on one thing: Jude Law is one
great looking man! Oh yeah, this film also has a dubious ending which may
leave many unsatisfied, but despite my own initial disappointment, I liked
it after all.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Matt Damon's first role was a one-liner in 1988's MYSTIC PIZZA. I guess Matt
really got affected by his role in ROUNDERS (7/10), a role for which he
reportedly received $600,000, since he apparently played in the $10,000
buy-in Texas Hold 'Em tournament at the 1998 World Series of Poker
(http://www.wsop.com) in Las Vegas. He lost during the first day of four. He
apparently turned down a role in Ang Lee's film RIDE WITH THE DEVIL in order
to shoot this one with Anthony Minghella.
Jude Law's "breakthrough role" came in 1997's GATTACA. He also starred in
David Cronenberg's eXistenZ (7.5/10). He was born in 1972 in London,
England.
Gwyneth Paltrow apparently turned down the role of Emma Peel in THE AVENGERS
(7/10).
Phillip Seymour Hoffman has been in three films which have been released
over the last three months of 1999: TALENTED MR.RIPLEY, FLAWLESS and
MAGNOLIA.
The second movie that director Anthony Minghella ever directed was 1993's
MR. WONDERFUL starring Matt Dillon and Annabella Sciorra. His next, was the
1996 Oscar-winning film THE ENGLISH PATIENT.
There was an earlier interpretation of this book which was filmed in 1960
called PURPLE NOON (It's a French film called PLEIN SOLEIL). The Minghella
version was originally titled THE STRANGE MR. RIPLEY.
Jack Davenport, who plays the gay character of Peter in this film, got his
first break after he wrote to John Cleese and asked to be a runner in the
movie FIERCE CREATURES. He ended up playing a zookeeper. He is the son of
actor Nigel Davenport and actress Maria Aitken.

Title
Review for Mission: Impossible II (2000)
For more reviews and movie wallpapers/screensavers, visit
http://www.joblo.com/
Easily one of the most highly anticipated movies of the summer (for
audiences and yours truly alike), MI2 was filmed in Australia, features the
great-looking Tom Cruise with long hair, Thandie Newton looking extremely
sweet in her biggest role to date, and ex-Wolverine candidate Dougray Scott
as the official "bad guy". Mix all that in with a healthy dose of Mr. John
Woo at the helm, and God knows the trailer makes it look like the
action-adventure kickass movie of the summer. So is it really that good?
Well...
PLOT:
Super-spy Ethan Hunt is once again asked to take part in a virtually
impossible mission featuring the recovery of a deadly new virus and antidote
from a madman bent on unleashing it upon the world.
CRITIQUE:
This movie starts off with a bang, downshifts into some pretty long and
surprisingly tedious exposition, but ultimately regroups and punches you in
the face during its last 30 bone-crunching minutes. Having said that, I was
slightly disappointed in the film, only because the trailer made it seem
like it was going to kick so much ass all over the place. My hopes might've
been set too high in the anticipation of full-blown action, and even more so
because of the superior talents of director Woo in that regard. Overall, the
film was good, but parts leading up to the halfway point just seemed to
uneventfully drag along for some strange reason, with talk of viruses, the
pharmaceutical angle, and ultimately, one too many rubber mask deceptions
(didn't we get enough of these in the first MISSION IMPOSSIBLE, as well as
FACE/OFF?). And being one of the few people to have actually really liked
the first movie, this one lacked a lot of that cool "spy feel" which I liked
so much in the first. Granted, this film also takes some of its time to
marinate the new "romance" vibe tossed into its cinematic recipe, but I
personally don't go to see John Woo movies in the hopes of finding out more
about the birds and the bees. I want to see action, cool stunts, slo-mo
shots of guns rattling off and an obscene amount of style.
This film definitely delivers on most of those counts, especially the
slo-mos and the proverbial Woo "pigeon scene", but not all in a
well-proportioned manner, in my opinion. The last third of the movie finally
picks up the pace, presenting us with an awesome motorcycle chase scene
which simply has to be seen to be believed, but overall, the pace of the
first half actually had me starting to twitch a little (in a "can we get on
with it already" kinda way). Of course, most of this review sounds negative
only because of my extremely high expectations, so maybe if you go in with
lesser anticipation than I did, you might just really love it. I very much
enjoyed the film's first twenty minutes or so, which included a great
sequence of Tom hanging off the side of a mountain with his little-bittie
fingers, and a pretty darn cool car chase. But the film ultimately crushed
some of my hyperactivity, with a slower, less in-your-face approach during
its next forty-five minutes of set-up. In the end, this film still spends
too much time discussing the plot, which could easily be described in a few
simple words (bad guy has deadly virus, get bad guy before he sets it free
on the world), and not enough time properly dividing up all the action.
I loved both MISSION IMPOSSIBLE and FACE/OFF, both of which I gave 8/10, and
despite this film's few great action scenes, decent acting by most, so-so
story, and captivating soundtrack, I can't help but feel a little
disappointed with thoughts of what-could-have-been. But comparing it to
other films and judging it according to my expectations isn't really fair,
so I will try and get past that and still recommend this film pretty
solidly, despite its leisurely paced build-up and stronger focus on romance.
Whatever you do, don't go into it as I did, expecting one of the most
action-packed movies of the last few years. Enjoy it as a good film
featuring Tommy Cruise, a babe, Ving Rhames sitting in front of a monitor
for two hours, an okay premise and a few over-the-top action sequences. All
in all, I liked it and look forward to a part trois.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Note: Anthony Hopkins has no more than five minutes of screen time in this
entire movie.
Thandie Newton played "Beloved" in the 1998 Oprah Winfrey movie of the same
name, and was previously featured in another Tom Cruise film, INTERVIEW WITH
THE VAMPIRE. She played Yvette. Her mom is Zimbabwean and her dad, English.
The character of Wallis in this film is played by none other than William R.
Mapother, cousin of actor Tom Cruise. Tom's birth name is Thomas Cruise
Mapother IV.
Bad guy Dougray Scott was originally cast as the character of Wolverine in
the X-MEN movie, but had to leave due to scheduling conflicts with MI2. He
was eventually replaced by Hugh Jackman.

Title
Review for Rounders (1998)
More reviews, go to http://surf.to/joblo
John Dahl crafts a poker tale based on a script by first time writers
David Levien and Brian Kopelman. Dahl has previously managed to create
three moody mystery films, including one of my all-time favourites, RED
ROCK WEST (8/10), along with THE LAST SEDUCTION (7.5/10) and
UNFORGETTABLE (7/10).
PLOT:
Poker junkie Mike (Damon) finally goes straight after losing $30,000 in
a life-changing poker match. Soon thereafter, he concentrates on law
school with his straight-as-an-arrow girlfriend, and tries to avoid all
card-game temptations. That is, until his good friend Worm (Norton)
gets out of prison, runs into some major gambling debts, and morally
challenges Mike into returning to his good old days of "rounding".
CRITIQUE:
Entertaining, believable, if slightly repetitive, behind the scenes
look at the high-stakes game of New York underground poker through the
eyes of one fresh-faced kid with a dream (surprise, it's Matt Damon!),
and his brother-like friend, Worm, whose integrity for the game is
essentially non-existent. This movie was never boring for me, was
filmed in just the right amount of time, and did maintain an extreme
air of authenticity throughout. Then again, I'm no card shark, so I
would have no idea if even half the jargon used in the film was real
anyway ("We might have to raise the juice on those rounders". Huh?)
The acting was uneven with Norton delivering another great performance
with his sleazy rendition of the morally-bankrupt Worm, while Damon,
well, played Matt Damon pretty well. John Turtorro's character seemed
highly underdeveloped (seems like some scenes with him might've been
cut out), as well as Gretchen Mol's standard girlfriend repartee (no
"Standing by your man" for this woman!), which didn't add much to the
story. John Malkovich also went over the top and came back, with his
highly carucaturized rendition of a Russian card player. The mood and
soundtrack of the film was nicely set by Dahl, while the obligatory
girlfriend sub-plot line just reminded me of the sour romance plot-line
in DONNIE BRASCO (8/10) from 1997 (in which Gretchen Mol also appeared
as Sonny's (Michael Madsen) girlfriend.)
Having said that, the film did manage to show us everything you ever
wanted to know about the game of poker and more (I don't remember
seeing a better poker movie in my life, but then again, I don't
remember seeing many poker movies in my life.), and a greater insight
into the mind of an addict (Any type of addict, if you really think
about it.) and the price one could pay for extreme loyalty. I would
recommend this film to all those who love the game of poker, and are
interested in exploring the life themes of addiction and loyalty. Other
than that, the film offers little else in the romance and/or suspense
factors, so if that's what you're interested in, forget this puppy and
go rent yourself another great Dahl movie: THE LAST SEDUCTION with an
Oscar-worthy performance by Linda Fiorentino as the cold, manipulative
sex-pot with a plan. Either way, you're going to have an interesting
evening.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Matt Damon's full name is Matthew Paige Damon. Matt's first film role
was a one-line part in 1988's MYSTIC PIZZA. Matt co-wrote the
screenplay for 1997's GOOD WILL HUNTING (7.5/10) with best friend,
buddy-boy Ben Affleck, for which the duo received an Academy Award for
Best Original Screenplay. Matt dropped 40 pounds for his role in
COURAGE UNDER FIRE, and received the sum of US$600,000 for his role in
ROUNDERS.
Screenwriter Koppelman came up with the idea for the script when he
heard about a friend of a friend who made more money as a "rounder" - a
poker hustler - than from his day job on Wall Street. He met the guy on
a street corner in Manhattan, they went down to one of the clubs, where
Koppelman, a former artist-and-repertoire scout for a record company,
was immediately hooked by the exotic environment. When he got home at
2:30 in the morning, he called old friend Levien and told him about
this great movie idea. Hence, the screenplay to ROUNDERS.
Both stars Damon and Norton are born in the state of Massachusetts, and
attended Ivy League colleges (Harvard for Damon, Yale for Norton.)
Director John Dahl co-wrote the screenplay to RED ROCK WEST with his
brother Rick Dahl. 

Title
Review for Rush Hour (1998)
For more reviews and trivia, go to http://surf.to/joblo
Another action/comedy-buddy flick pits Hong Hong sensation Jackie Chan
aside Hollywood's latest Eddie Murphy wannabee Chris Tucker. Director
Brett Ratner, who directed Tucker in his "break-out" comedy, MONEY
TALKS (6/10), helms this melange of the original 48 HOURS (7.5/10) and
the original BEVERLY HILLS COP (8/10).
PLOT:
A Hong Kong businessman's daughter is kidnapped for ransom. The FBI
attempts to solve the case, while the Hong Kong man brings in his own
private agent to help (Chan). The FBI wants to keep the new guy out of
their hair, and delegate this task to one of their lowliest LAPD cops
(enter Tucker). Stuck with each other, the unorthodox duo attempt to
solve the case for themselves. Fun and action ensues.
CRITIQUE:
Funny movie chopped full of action, lacks an original concept and plot
line, but comes through with hilarious banter from Tucker and fun fight
scenes with Chan. I found this film's main point of interest to be
Chris Tucker's verbal potpourri of mild profanity and humour, but
appreciate the fact that folks who don't enjoy the man's abilities may
be turned off from this film. He reminded me a whole bunch of the young
Eddie Murphy before the fame went to his head...vibrant, original and
voracious for laughs! 
Chan is also a great combo for Tucker's motormouth, with his lack of
English pronunciation, swift moves and graceful stuntwork. Chan is
considered the straight man in this film, and works on that level. Some
of his fans may be put off by the fact that he doesn't joke around as
much as his other flicks, but all in all, the duo clicked for me, and
that's what led this film to the recommendation arena. Some low points
include the ho-hum story line, the obvious use of "hip" songs to pad
some retarded scenes, and the lowly, and I do mean lowly, appearance by
Chris Penn as a fat-ass con-man (es tu Penn?). How this man's career
went from RESERVOIR DOGS (9/10) to playing fourth banana in Chan movie,
I'll never know!
Overall, I will suggest this film to all those who appreciate the work
of Chris Tucker (I liked him in most of his films, except FIFTH ELEMENT
(6.5/10), in which I thought his wild animation was terribly out of
place) and Jackie Chan. At the same time, I must say that if you are
not a big fan of either star, and/or if you are looking for an
interesting story line, skip this sucker and go back and rent either
one of the Murphy movies that I mentioned earlier. One more thing, as
per usual at the end of every Chan movie, this film includes goofs
during the credits, which are just as (if not funnier) than most of the
humour in this film. Stay tuned!  
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
As of September 1998, this film held the greatest box-office opening
weekend of any other September release ever ($31 million.)
Director Brett Ratner is engaged to actress Rebecca Gayheart.
Jackie Chan's real name is Kong Sung Chan, which means "born in Hong
Kong". In the act of performing his own stunts, he has broken his nose
three times, his ankle once, most of the fingers in his hand, both
cheekbones, and his skull. He stands 5"7.
Chris Tucker was born in Atlanta, Georgia, with three older brothers
and two older sisters. He was voted as the "Most Humorous member" of
his high school graduating class.

Title
Review for No Looking Back (1998)
Edward Burns' third feature film after THE BROTHERS McCULLEN (6.5/10)
and SHE'S THE ONE. This one's also sprinkled with beers, Irish stuff
and beautiful and confused people dealing with  relationships.
PLOT:
Charlie (Burns) returns to his hometown after three years away, and
wants to patch things up with his ex-girlfriend Claudia (Holly).
Unfortunately for him, Claudia has been living with Michael (Bon Jovi),
a childhood friend of Charlie's, for those three years, and doesn't
know exactly what to do. The dilemma she faces is the crux of this
film.
CRITIQUE:
Nice little character study that revolves around the feelings of
friends, lovers and family. Enjoyable enough, but not enough meat in
which to grind your viewer teeth. The characters and actors in the
movie were all very believable and interesting to watch, with Jon Bon
Jovi beginning to show some real signs of a thespian in the making.
Holly had never really impressed me before, but does a decent job with
the task that she's been assigned in this film. 
The movie's plot is not the most original in the world, in that it
deals with people asking themselves the proverbial question or whether
or not they should leave their hometown for opportunities elsewhere,
and whether or not one could ever really come home again (done much
better in BEAUTIFUL GIRLS (8/10), but then again, Hollywood hasn't
exactly bent over backwards to conceive many new theatrical ideas over
the past few years. Other than that, the little town is very quaint and
shows extreme signs of "the comfortable life" for many of its satisfied
inhabitants, while also demonstrating the lack of ambition or foresight
in many of those same people.
The soundtrack was fine (but can someone please tell Bruce Springsteen
to stop playing on soundtracks!!), as was the length of the picture. On
the down side, no memorable scenes made it onto this cinematic menu,
and there was one too many montage shots with music in the background
(usually a sign of a weak script). Two little things did bug me a bit.
One, there is one major continuity error during one of the pivotal
emotional scenes, in which Holly is bawling her eyes out one second,
dry another, and then blubbering the next. Somewhat distracting. Also,
and much more irritating, was the fact that every single character
seems to be drinking a beer or taking a smoke in every single scene in
this movie. I mean, it's incredible!! Does anybody really drink a
Budweiser in a laundry mat, for God's sakes?!?! Oh well. 
Overall, the movie is nice to watch with your "significant other", so
that you could ponder the "what would you do's" after it's finished,
but not much more than that. 
Little Known Facts: 
Working title for this film was LONG TIME, NOTHING NEW.
Edward Burns worked as a production assistant on Entertainment Tonight
for four years.
Lauren Holly turned down the Courteney Cox role in ACE VENTURA: PET
DETECTIVE (7.5/10).
Blythe Danner is Gwyneth Paltrow's mom.

Title
Review for Supernova (2000)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Hmmmm, major directorial issues, no preview rendez-vous for the critics, and
a huge thumbs down from JoBlo contributor PackBacker, pronouncing it as an
early candidate for "worst of 2000"...youch! So is it any good? Well, we
will never know what original director Walter Hill's intention was, since he
asked his name to be altered to Thomas Lee for the final print. Apparently,
the film was taken from his hands, and mangled by many, including legendary
director Francis Ford Coppola and the studio.
PLOT:
An ambulance ship set in space is called in for an emergency request from
way out in the middle of nowhere. They bring aboard a mysterious man who
also happens to be carrying some extra-dimensional cargo with him. Is the
man an alien? Is the cargo dangerous? Does the movie suck? Find out below.
CRITIQUE:
Unoriginal mesh of previously seen and better science-fiction movies such as
ALIEN, THE THING and even crap like VIRUS and EVENT HORIZON, this film did
at least manage to keep me interested throughout its entire run. Yes, that's
right, I was never bored and I suppose that's a good thing, right? Add that
to a couple of trippy sequences, laughable sci-fi dialogue and a quick
cohesive package of less than an hour and a half, and God help me, but I
didn't think this film was as horrible as I originally anticipated. Don't
get me wrong, this is not a good movie by any stretch of the imagination.
The characters are stock and one-dimensional, the flickering lights, beeping
switches, smoke and hand-held camera are patent sci-fi schlock and rarely
take your mind off the fact that the movie doesn't have one shred of
originality to piss on, but I guess I wasn't expecting much from this film
to begin with. Slap a couple of beers in your system, and by golly, you may
even enjoy the darn thing!
So I guess the trick is to go into this thing with nil expectations, in
which case you might actually appreciate the hour and a half of relaxation
that your mind will experience. And it's definitely video-bait, with very
few special effects and even less superior effects to warrant a trip outside
the home. The cast is wasted on jargon dialogue and two-bit romances barely
crispy enough to light a candle, but I suppose that if you're just looking
to have fun with some buddies, or enjoy a film which doesn't pretend to be
anything more than a staple sci-fi flick with no message, than this baby
might be worth saving a seat just for you. So let's recap: never boring,
pretty repetitive, so-so effects, ho-hum characters, zero originality, quick
runtime tacked on to an anti-climactic ending. Sound interesting to you? If
so, go ahead and supernova your ass over to this movie, caught in the annual
spot reserved for early year sci-fi rehashes. If not, skip it, erase the
title from your mind, and pretend you never read any of this. It won't be
hard. I saw the movie a few hours ago, and I barely remember a thing.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Director Thomas Lee, better known to some as writer/director Walter Hill,
also helped pen the first ALIEN movie (uncredited), come up with the story
for the second flick, ALIENS, write part of the third one, ALIEN 3, and had
a hand in producing all four ALIEN films.
James Spader is the son of two teachers. Ironically, James bailed from his
own education by grade 11, and bused tables, shoveled manure and taught yoga
before landing his first roles in film.
Actress Angela Bassett became what she has become after being pushed by a
high school teacher to apply for Yale. After she got a scholarship, she
ended up staying there for 7 years including 3 post-graduate years studying
drama.
Lou Diamond Phillips' birth name is Lou Upchurch. He was once married to
Julie Cypher, a woman who is now a lesbian and "partnered" with singer
Melissa Etheridge. In January 2000, the couple came out in Rolling Stone
magazine and admitted that the father of their children is none other than
singer and ex-drug addict David Crosby.
Peter Facinelli was the Tom Cruise look-a-like in the 1998 teen flick CAN'T
HARDLY WAIT (7/10). He is also married to Jennie Garth, the woman who is,
and will always be remembered for her role as Kelly Taylor on "Beverly Hills
90210". Has she done ANYTHING else?!?
Hmmm, the man who came up with the story for this film is named William
Malone. Most recently, he directed another film which was essentially "given
up on" by the studios in 1998, called HOUSE ON HAUNTED HILL (7.5/10).

Title
Review for Haunting, The (1999)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
A big house. A big director, Jan de Bont of SPEED and TWISTER fame. A big
star, Catherine Zeta-Jones, hot of the heels of ENTRAPMENT (6.5/10) and
ZORRO. A big remake of THE HAUNTING. And big special effects. So what do
they all amount to? Unfortunately for us, a big bore!
PLOT:
A hotshot doctor brings three insomniacs to an old, spooky mansion for
controlled testing. Unbeknownst to the patients, the good doctor is actually
conducting his own cover project that has to do with the psychology of fear.
CRITIQUE:
This movie just didn't scare me one bit. Sure, it creeped and spooked me out
a little here and there, but on the whole, it took waaaaay too long to get
going, provided very little meat in the plot, went way past its own bedtime,
and basically relied on grunts, the muttering of children's voices and
over-the-top special effects, to scare us. Well, this film didn't do much
for me. And they might as well have called it the "Haunting of Lily Taylor",
since she's basically the only character who had any real depth, background
or reason to be in the house in the first place.
Don't get me wrong, Catherine Zeta was sweet window dressing (despite my
continued perception of her faint mustache-see ENTRAPMENT), and Owen Wilson
was good as the standard "comic relief", but come on people, if you're going
to have us sit through two hours in a theater with these folks, how 'bout
giving them a little more than one-liners as dimension. Neeson was also
wasted as the smart, British guy. It's all too sad, cause certainly the
"idea" seemed like a good one (see THE SHINING (9/10) for a close to perfect
example of a creepy gone awry), but the story was thin, the conclusion was
laughable (Be gone...poof!) and the special effects? Well, they sure were
nice to look at, but not for a moment did one of them scare, or even for a
split-second, have me believe that they were anything more than Hollywood
special gadgetry.
See it for Zeta-Jones, or if you like special effects and scary movies that
take forever to get going, and provide very little payback, otherwise skip
it and check out the original or the ultimate movie about spooky homes from
the netherworld, THE SHINING.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Goofy actor Owen Wilson co-scripted indie favorites RUSHMORE (8/10) and
BOTTLE ROCKET with director Wes Anderson. His brother Luke Wilson is also an
actor, who once dated Drew Barrymore for a year or so. Brother Andrew is
also an actor.
Singer Lisa Loeb is listed in the credits as having portrayed the character
of Olivia Morice, but I personally did not notice her. She is well known for
her number one single "Stay (I missed you)" and goofy glasses.
The creaks and moans heard throughout the house were prerecorded and played
during filming in order to get a more natural expression of fear out of the
actors.
Catherine Zeta-Jones is currently dating flabby ass actor Michael "Sex is my
life" Douglas. She stands 5'8".
In 1998, actor Michael Rapaport pleaded guilty to the aggravated harassment
of Lily Taylor. He was ordered to stay away from her and undergo counseling
for one year.
Actor Bruce Dern, who plays the throwaway role of the gatekeeper in this
film, was once nominated for an Oscar for Best Supporting Actor for his role
in COMING HOME.
Director Jan de Bont was born in Holland, and began his lengthy career as a
cinematographer on films as DIE HARD, HUNT FOR RED OCTOBER and BASIC
INSTINCT, directed by another Dutchman, Paul Verhoeven.
Actor Todd Field also played a small but pivotal role in Stanley Kubrick's
last film, EYES WIDE SHUT. He was Nick Nightingale, the pianist.
This film was originally titled THE HAUNTING OF HILL HOUSE.
